 Prosecutors can get grand juries to indict a ham sandwich, the old adage runs.  With RICO, it now seems, federal prosecutors can convict that ham sandwich.  The American justice system can't survive many more prosecution "victories" of the kind against Princeton/Newport and Ed Meese's old friend E. Robert Wallach.  We have of course been long complaining about these Rudy Giuliani concoctions, blessed by a Justice Department asleep at the wheel, that apply RICO to non-Mafia individuals and businesses.  But what the two new convictions make clear is that under RICO, juries have little choice but to convict if prosecutors simply yell racketeers] In neither case did prosecutors bother to prove that the defendants violated any substantive provision of any criminal code.  The new precedent is that a RICO case can be won even if none of the alleged "predicate acts" are real crimes.  By the time the Princeton/Newport case reached the jury, the only "predicate acts" were security transactions alleged to be tax violations.  Lay aside the fact that Justice Department guidelines prohibit tax violations as predicate acts in a RICO prosecution.  Prosecutors persuaded Judge Robert Carter to prevent defendants from introducing testimony that the trades were perfectly legal under the tax laws.  The jury was barred from hearing arguments on whether the "predicate acts" were criminal.  In an affidavit the jury never saw, Boris Bittker, a Yale law school expert, concluded that treatment of the trading of convertible securities was "reasonable" under the tax code.  Instead, prosecutors assured jurors with these words: "You don't need a fancy tax-law expert because common sense tells you it's fraudulent."  The jury must have harbored some doubts about these proceedings, since it reduced the prosecutor's request to seize $22 million in defendants' assets to only $3.8 million.  Contrary to popular assumption, Bob Wallach, convicted this week, was not accused of bribery or any other identifiable crime.  Believe it or not, Mr. Wallach's two "predicate acts" under RICO were the alleged mail fraud of sending two legal bills to Wedtech that prosecutors said were really for lobbying Attorney General Meese.  Now, Wedtech officials were convicted as crooks, and Representative Mario Biaggi was convicted for his ties to the firm.  The jury apparently did not accept Mr. Wallach's contention that he was not paid for lobbying but for bona fide legal services for Wedtech.  But the point is that lobbying Mr. Meese would not have been a crime in the first place.  Indeed, there are plenty of lawyers whose legal bills are for appearances not in court but in the halls of Congress and agencies; tens of thousands of lawyers are RICO-able on the Wallach standard.  The bar would be up in arms if anyone thought prosecutors made Mr. Wallach a felon because of the headings of his bills, but everyone understands that this was a political prosecution.  Prosecutors went after Mr. Wallach because he was an easy target close to Mr. Meese; the prosecution's main arguments to the jury boiled down to libellous smears of Mr. Meese.  Prosecutors also prevented defense lawyers from calling Avital Sharansky to describe Mr. Wallach's selfless efforts to help get her husband, Natan, freed from the gulag, which would have bolstered his argument that he was a "bleeding-heart liberal" interested in helping Wedtech as a minority contractor.  The prosecutors hit the roof, saying Mrs. Sharansky's testimony would be "very powerful to the jury."  Judge Richard Owen decided he needed to think overnight before rejecting this absurd argument, and Mrs. Sharansky felt forced to return to Israel where her since-deceased mother was in a coma.  There will be appeals in both cases.  And New York lawyer Jed Rakoff, who represents two striking Eastern unions that Texas Air has sued as racketeers, just filed a lawsuit contending RICO is unconstitutional.  This may be the first suit under the invitation Antonin Scalia and three other Supreme Court Justices issued last term for challenges to invalidate RICO altogether as so vague as to violate any notion of due process.  Higher-court judges should understand that juries are entitled to believe that prosecutors allege actual crimes.  These bizarre cases explain why criminal codes are supposed to be more specific than vague "mail fraud" or "securities fraud."  RICO is so vague prosecutors can tell jurors to convict if something somehow didn't sound right.  Maybe there were curious tapes or defendants made too much money or were pals of Ed Meese.  RICO criminalizes any activity a prosecutor might want to punish, the rule of law be damned.  The courts have of course been waiting for Congress to undo the damage it did with RICO, but the last we heard due process was a constitutional right.  The question for appeals courts in all these cases is simple: How many more sacrificial victims are required before someone finally drives a stake through the heart of the most abusive legal invention since the Alien and Sedition Laws?  Bonwit Teller and B. Altman & Co., already struggling with morale problems and inventory shortages, face more problems ahead as vendors said they will supply new merchandise only on a cash basis.  The two chains are owned by L.J. Hooker Corp.  The subsidiary of Australia's Hooker Corp. filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection, claiming total assets of $910 million and total liabilities of $720 million.  The filing shows B. Altman had assets of $138 million and liabilities of $120.5 million as of June 30.  Bonwit Teller reported $161 million in assets and total liabilities of $84.4 million as of June 30.  "There's nothing strange about the vendor reaction, because this company hasn't been the best corporate citizen in terms of payment," said Sanford Sigoloff, the new chief executive of L.J. Hooker.  "Our job is to essentially work with the trade, give them cash before delivery, and then develop a relationship that allows them to give us trade credit."  In a related development, GE Capital Corp. has agreed to provide a standby debtor-in-possession line of credit of $50 million for L.J. Hooker.  The loan is secured by certain corporate assets including the inventory of B. Altman & Co. and Bonwit Teller.  The General Electric Co. subsidiary did business with Mr. Sigoloff when he managed Wickes Cos., a Santa Monica, Calif., retailer that emerged from bankruptcy in 1985.  Many apparel makers stopped shipping to B. Altman and Bonwit Teller in recent months because of Hooker's financial problems.  Yesterday, the two chains' flagship stores in Manhattan appeared unusually thin on fall merchandise.  Shoppers at B. Altman were greeted with signs advertising an "in-store warehouse sale."  A spokesman for B. Altman & Co. didn't return calls.  A spokesman for Bonwit Teller declined to comment.  Manufacturers owed money by Bonwit Teller or B. Altman & Co. expressed both disappointment and caution.  "We will either need approval from the insurance company that guarantees our retailer receivables or letters of credit," said Ken Ross, chairman and chief executive, JH Collectibles, Inc.  "It's a sad situation."  Steven Stoller, chairman of Karin Stevens Apparel Group Inc., estimated that Bonwit Teller owes his company $5,000 to $15,000 for previously shipped merchandise.  "We haven't experienced a major loss, but I won't ship them again until I'm given the okay by our factoring company," said Mr. Stoller.  "Of course, it's different if they pay cash up front."  Because August is traditionally a heavily promotional selling month as retailers attempt to clear out remaining spring and summer merchandise, the racks of markdowns at both B. Altman & Co. and Bonwit Teller weren't surprising.  Still, employees at both chains expressed confusion and unhappiness.  "Just say I'm frustrated," said a sales clerk at Bonwit Teller.  "It's very aggravating to be so low on fall merchandise at this time of the year."  At B. Altman & Co., a middle manager said, "It's a very loyal staff here, so it's very depresssing.  All you can do is hope for the best."  Procter & Gamble Co. reported fiscal fourth-quarter net income jumped 22% to $171 million, or 99 cents a share, from $140 million, or 82 cents a share, a year earlier.  Sales in the quarter ended June 30 climbed 9.25% to $5.43 billion from $4.97 billion the year before.  The surge, despite a steep charge for plant closing and restructuring, was higher than expected.  "The quarter was spectacular," says Jay Freedman, analyst with Kidder Peabody & Co. Indeed, the strong results sent P&G's stock up $5.375 to close at $123.625 in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday.  For all of fiscal 1989, net of the Cincinnati-based consumer-products giant soared 18% to $1.21 billion, or $7.12 a share, from net of $1.02 billion, or $5.96 a share, the year before.  Sales for the year climbed almost 11% to $21.4 billion from $19.3 billion in fiscal 1988.  Much of the progress stemmed from P&G's continuing efforts to trim costs.  For instance, managers' bonuses are now linked to profits in their divisions.  Analysts estimate that overall margins for the year climbed to 10.1% from 9.3% last year.  The results also were helped somewhat by year-end accounting adjustments on expenses and higher interest income drawn on cash the company is using to buy back stock.  While P&G had a hefty gain from operations, earnings were hurt by an after-tax charge of $78 million to cover costs of closing a Chicago soap plant and consolidating other manufacturing operations.  Analysts had expected the Chicago plant-closing charge to be about $35 million, but that portion of the provision is now estimated to total $50 million.  The remaining $28 million will cover the closure of certain production lines at plants in the food, detergent and cleaning products divisions.  P&G officials wouldn't comment on which plants would be affected, however, analysts said they understood there wouldn't be any layoffs.  Operating profit for the year and quarter was substantially higher than expected by analysts.  Excluding the charge, fiscal 1989 net would have been $7.59 a share, or about 25 cents to 40 cents a share higher than the latest estimates.  Perhaps P&G's brightest star is its international operations, which performed strongly in countries such as Japan after years of struggling for profitability.  For the year, international earnings totaled $417 million, up from $305 million in 1988.  That marks the second year that P&G reported a 37% jump in international earnings.  In the U.S., analysts said P&G's strengths included its detergent business, especially its new Tide with Bleach.  One continuing weakness, however, is P&G's food division, especially Crisco shortening and Citrus Hill orange juice.  "The whole food business in terms of profitability isn't doing well," says Bonita Austin, analyst with Wertheim Schroder & Co., noting that Folgers coffee is the exception.  Crisco sales are lower because of growing consumer concerns about fats, while Citrus Hill suffers from stiff competition from Tropicana and Minute Maid.  "They're the third guy in a two-man national race," says Hugh Zurkuhlen of Saloman Brothers.  Another reason the food division's results suffer, analysts say, is the expense of research on olestra, the fat substitute awaiting approval by the Food and Drug Administration.  P&G said its capital spending rose to $1.03 billion from $956 million last year.  Analysts say they expect P&G's momentum to carry into 1990 and beyond and many raised their fiscal 1990 estimates.  Brenda Lee Landry of Morgan Stanley raised her estimate to $8.30 from an earlier estimate of $8.15.  Kidder's Mr. Freedman and Joseph Kozloff at Drexel Burnham Lambert raised their estimates to $8.50 a share from $8.25.  "I can see a number close to $10 for 1991," says Mr. Kozloff.  Gemcraft Homes Inc., a once-giant developer that fell victim to last December's 11th-hour thrift bailouts, sold its home-building assets to a Houston-based investor group for $13.5 million -- including just $150,000 in cash.  The transaction, which ends a painful purgatory for what was once the second-biggest homebuilder in Texas, illustrates the problems regulators now face in trying to clean up the multibillion dollar mess left by the nation's failed savings-and-loan associations.  The investors, led by Houston attorney Thomas A. Falik, acquired 205 homes under construction, certain real-estate options, and the right to use Gemcraft's name in the deal, which was struck with the company's owner, the Federal Savings & Loan Insurance Corp.  As part of the purchase price, they produced just $150,000 in cash and $250,000 in a 90-day promissory note that Mr. Falik said probably will be whittled down by giving back to FSLIC certain furniture and fixtures they don't need.  The agreement also calls for royalty payments to Gemcraft totaling $50,000 to $275,000 during a five-year period.  But the bulk of the purchase price was covered by the group's agreement to assume just over $13 million in mortgages on the properties -- a stunning write-down of $40 million in first and second liens that Mr. Falik said the property originally carried.  The result, gloats Mr. Falik: "We got the name and operation for next to nothing."  Mr. Falik is quick to point out that FSLIC benefits, too.  Because the liens were held by thrifts that are insolvent or that were part of last year's Southwest Plan bailout, he said, FSLIC eventually would have inherited the job of selling the houses off piecemeal -- making the bailouts of those thrifts more expensive in the long run.  A former spokesman for the agency agreed, saying: "We think it's going to be a good deal for FSLIC."  But the transaction still sticks regulators with the shell company, Gemcraft Homes, which in March filed for protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code.  The company has few tangible assets and faces contingent liabilities that could exceed $50 million by one regulator's estimate.  Gemcraft came into regulator's hands through a circuitous route.  In 1987, waylaid by the economic downturn and bust in real-estate prices, the company was taken over by its primary lender, First Texas Savings Association.  When First Texas was sold to a group led by New York investor Ronald Perelman, the new owners decided to give Gemcraft back to FSLIC.  The agency then spent several months in a hapless effort to find a buyer.  The Falik group's purchase of the home-building assets comes as good news for at least some of Gemcraft's former employees.  Mr. Falik has already hired back some ex-staffers, including Robert Solomon, a former senior vice president who will serve as president.  The new company, known as Gemcraft Corp., eventually will employ 100, down from the 900 employees Gemcraft had at its peak, Mr. Falik said.  He added that the group plans eventually to pump $4 million into the new venture.  "We think it's exactly the right time to get into the housing market in Texas," he said.  The FSLIC itself hasn't been so lucky.  As part of this week's historic savings-and-loan legislation, the agency was dismantled and its functions assumed by newly formed entities.  At Litton Industries Inc., the industrial automation business seems to be automatically securing big contracts.  Just this week, Litton announced another multimillion-dollar agreement to provide engine-making machines for Ford Motor Co. in Europe.  Terms of the pact weren't disclosed, but Litton said it now has about $200 million of work with the auto maker.  Last October, Ford's European operations signed a $120 million contract with Litton, and the latest accord apparently makes up the bulk of the $80 million difference.  Eventually, says Drexel Burnham Lambert analyst Laurence Lytton, Litton would like to make industrial automation systems "the third leg of the company," along with defense contracting and energy exploraton.  The sector is booming and is likely to become even more important as Pentagon-derived dollars dry up because of federal budget cuts.  In fiscal 1986, Litton's industrial-automation operations posted sales of $311 million.  That nearly doubled to $600 million in 1988.  And through the first nine months of the year ended April 30 industrial automation systems already had contributed $513 million to Litton's $3.7 billion revenue base.  Much of the growth has been driven by Litton's 1987 acquisition of Lamb Technicon, which has long supplied Detroit with machines to forge engines and transmissions.  Lamb serves customers in this way: An auto company wants to build, say, a new engine.  Up to a year before the project even gets off the ground, Lamb works closely with the auto maker, offering advice on the best way to manufacture the engine.  Next, Lamb constructs metal-forming machines and installs them at its own factory.  Once it proves that it can consistently take a car part from the foundry and finish it to the point that it can be installed in the vehicle, the machines are ripped down and moved to the auto company's plant.  Lamb may then stay on for months to train auto workers in using its complex equipment.  Besides making machine tools at Lamb, Litton's industrial automation business designs computer and material-handling systems, too.  "Litton really sells itself on the fact that it's not just a consultant, but actually manufactures things themselves," Mr. Lytton says.  Indeed, company officials boast that Litton offers a wider range of shop-floor services than do its competitors.  Still, Litton's focus on the topsy-turvy auto market is troublesome to some.  Jack Kelly, who follows Litton for Goldman Sachs & Co., notes that Lamb now accounts for about 50% of the company's industrial automation systems segment and that Lamb itself is 90% auto-oriented.  "At some point," Mr. Kelly says, "the {current} slowdown in the auto market has to affect them."  Concedes Carlo Clavenna, Lamb division president: "If the auto industry has a good year, we have a good year.  If they have a soft year, we have a soft year."  Rivals, including Cross & Trecker Corp., Hueller Hille A.G. and Ingersoll Milling, are also trying to gobble up Lamb's leading market share.  For now, though, the new Ford contract is a sign that Litton is more than holding its own.  The new engines will be part of Ford's Zeta program and be used in models in the early 1990s, according to a Ford spokeswoman.  Under the terms of the contract, three machining systems to produce the engine cylinder heads, connecting rods, camshafts and crankshafts will be developed.  Litton says that by working on the engineering with Ford, Litton has saved the auto maker more than $10 million in capital equipment costs.  DEVON ENERGY Corp., Oklahoma City, said it offered 1.2 million shares of convertible preferred stock for $25 a share.  The energy concern said proceeds of $28.5 million will be used to pay down its revolving credit line, making the credit line available for further oil and gas development and possible future acquisitions.  Devon said the shares are each convertible into 2.325 common shares and will pay an annual dividend of $1.94 a share.  Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. was the underwriter.  In the arena of sports officiating, lawsuits are becoming as common as striped shirts and silver whistles.  Consider the case of Jim Bain, a part-time Big Ten basketball official.  During a crucial 1982 Iowa-Purdue game, he called a last-second foul that gave Purdue both the victory and a post-season tournament berth.  An Iowa souvenir company faced with a suddenly devalued inventory challenged his call with a $175,000 negligence suit in state district court, claiming he had wrongly harmed its ability to sell the souvenirs.  Mr. Bain, a Missouri mortgage banker, won, but only after a two-year court battle that went all the way to the Iowa Supreme Court.  "It is absolutely blowing the whole perspective of sports out of proper focus," he complains.  Mr. Bain isn't the only sports official facing legal wrangles.  Across the country, amateur referees at softball diamonds, high school stadiums and college field houses are finding that their decisions can trigger major-league lawsuits.  Defense costs -- which can exceed $100,000 in cases that go to appeal -- and time lost from defendants' full-time jobs are taking much of the sport out of refereeing.  None of the suits have resulted in huge judgments so far, but some settlements have exceeded $50,000.  The increasing tumult has prompted several states to grant legislative relief and many more to consider it.  Statistics are hard to come by, but attorneys, referees' organizations and insurance companies say the number of such suits is growing steadily.  "There were only a handful a decade ago," says John Spiotta, vice president of Bollinger Co., a New Jersey company that handles sports insurance.  "Now, it's up in the hundreds."  Until recently, sports referees had no special legal standing in liability and other suits, but challenges were rare.  Now, more amateur athletes want to participate while holding officials accountable for many of the risks, legal analysts say.  So far, they add, the trend hasn't extended to professional athletes, who are more inclined to accept the risks of their games.  Some observers of the sporting scene say the problem reflects the rise of litigation in all sectors of society.  Others blame the media glare that has exposed the once-carefree sports world's seamy underbelly: drug troubles, labor disputes and televised images of big-league managers kicking dirt at officials.  "Sports has lost the magical quality that set it apart from everyday life," says sports sociologist James Fry of the University of Nevada at Las Vegas.  "For a long time, referees in sports were sort of an unchallenged authority.  Now there isn't anything that can escape legal liability."  The growing litigation has sent shudders through the ranks of the nation's 250,000 amateur sports officials, whose pay ranges from a miserly $8 for a junior-varsity soccer match to $450 for college football bowl games.  Many have given up their avocation.  The Amateur Softball Association's roster of umpires has declined to 57,000 from 63,000 in 1983, and other amateur sports groups report similar losses.  "Some of our people got to the point where they were just afraid to work because of the threat of lawsuits," says Dotson Lewis of the Southwest Officials Association in Dallas, which provides officials for scholastic games.  "I think some of our better, older officials are just quitting."  Those who remain are loading up on liability insurance.  Policies are cheap for officials who are part of large organizations, as most are.  For $2 a year each, umpires of the American Softball Association can get a $10 million liability policy.  But even with such coverage, many officials bristle at the notion that the fouls they call during games can lead to months in court.  "We're supposed to be out there being impartial arbiters of the game," says former college basketball official Mel Narol, a Princeton, N.J., lawyer who specializes in defending referees against such suits.  "Now referees spend much of their time thinking about risk awareness."  With good reason.  Lawsuits have accused officials of being responsible for everything from broken bottles on the playing field to deadly bolts of lightning.  In a case still pending, a Cooperstown, N.Y., bat girl sued some American Legion umpires for $1 million after she was hit in the head by a bat being swung by an on-deck batter.  A New Jersey umpire was sued by a catcher who was hit in the eye by a softball while playing without a mask; he complained that the umpire should have lent him his.  The catcher walked away with a $24,000 settlement.  Hofstra University's athletic director, Jim Garvey, was sued in 1985 after he officiated a college basketball game during which a St. Bonaventure University player punched and broke the jaw of an opponent from George Washington University.  The victim sued the officials for unspecified damages in District of Columbia superior court, claiming they hadn't been in control of the game.  Mr. Garvey won, but not before he spent two years taking weeks off work and traveling from his Lido Beach, N.Y., home to Princeton and Washington, D.C., to testify and give depositions.  "Guys working for $25 a game don't want to deal with this sort of trouble," Mr. Garvey says.  "It's almost not worth the aggravation."  Groups such as the National Association of Sports Officials have responded by lobbying state legislatures for laws limiting sports officials' legal liability to cases where gross negligence can be proved.  Some attorneys' groups oppose those efforts, saying no one should receive such immunity.  "It can create a scenario where someone injured because of someone else's act can't be compensated for their bills," says Richard Mason, director of the Kansas Trial Lawyers Association.  Still, Kansas, Arkansas, New Jersey and three other states have passed such laws, and bills have been introduced in 15 others.  The national sports officials' group also has urged its 14,000 members to take the legal offensive by suing or pressing charges against players or fans who physically assault them during a game.  But even the group's president, Barry Mano, doesn't expect that to end the nose-to-nose arguments that have always been part of a referee's job.  "In our minds, we're probably right 95% of the time," Mr. Mano says.  "But I don't think it would be half as much fun if everybody applauded us."  American Telephone & Telegraph Co. said the Health and Human Services Department will become the first agency to plug into a multibillion-dollar long-distance network being developed for the U.S. government.  The contract for the private communications system, called FTS-2000, was awarded in December to teams led by AT&T and US Sprint Communications Co., with each company getting 60% and 40% of the business, respectively.  The Government Services Administration valued the 10-year contract at $3 billion to $10 billion.  Health and Human Services will use the new voice, data and video communications network in processing Medicare drug bills for the agency's Health Care Financing Administration, AT&T said.  That could generate revenue of $35 million to $40 million a year when the program begins Jan. 1, 1991, an AT&T spokesman said.  Under terms of the contract, the Government Services Administration divided the government's phone system by agencies, assigning AT&T to serve certain departments, and Sprint to others.  Sprint is a unit of United Telecommunications Inc., Kansas City, Mo.  BUSH'S BATTLE PLAN against drugs begins to take shape as a top priority.  Money is the main issue in the strategy to be announced early next month.  Drug czar Bennett wants to show a sense of urgency by adding $1 billion in antidrug spending next fiscal year to the $6 billion Bush requested earlier.  Budget chief Darman sees political benefits, but warns offsetting cuts must be found.  "There will be some friction," one administration official says.  Bennett urges Bush to announce the drug plan in a prime-time TV news conference or a speech.  Though some White House aides question such a high-profile stance, one senior adviser says Bush's personal involvement in the drug war is vital because "this is the kind of stuff people are thinking about."  Bush is expected to back Bennett's law-enforcement emphasis, but will hear other views.  A bipartisan group of senators writes Bush urging more federal aid for pregnant drug abusers and their babies.  TURF FIGHTS threaten to undercut the new attack on drugs.  A Bennett proposal for a new anti-drug coordinating body is resisted by the Justice Department and Customs Service.  Customs and Drug Enforcement Administration agents sometimes track the same smugglers because the agencies don't inform each other.  The failure of the CIA and the Pentagon to share drug intelligence is another problem, law enforcement officials say.  The military is reluctant to give up excess facilities for drug programs.  A commission created last month by Bush is supposed to determine which bases could be used in the war on drugs for civilian drug-treatment centers and prisons.  But a Pentagon official says the military treats inquiries about surplus space almost as if it were classified information.  HOSTAGE FRUSTRATIONS strain U.S. relations with Israel and Syria.  The U.S. suspects Israel is sharing information on the hostage crisis only when it is to Jerusalem's advantage.  Privately, administration officials thanked Sen. Dole for chastising Israel, though they don't blame the terrorists' hanging of Higgins on the Israeli kidnapping of a Lebanese sheik.  U.S. Jewish leaders complain that in meetings with them this week, Bush didn't try to distance himself from Dole's criticism.  Syria's claim that it is helpless to use its influence in Lebanon riles U.S. officials.  They say Syria's tight control of checkpoints shows it could do more to help with the hostage crisis.  One bright spot: A White House official says Bush has been able to use the "non-traditional" diplomacy of getting other countries to relay messages to Iran.  U.S. advisers praise the Soviets.  "To their credit, they have passed along the messages {for Iran} that they get from us," says an official.  MAKE MY DAY: White House aides hint revenge may be in the offing against senators who blocked William Lucas's nomination to head the Justice Department's civil-rights division.  One official notes dryly that "the president isn't pleased" and that "at an appropriate time, a political response might be made."  WHAT ETHICS ISSUES?  The Capitol Hill newspaper Roll Call urges advertisers to reserve early for a September supplement on "What's good about Congress."  In a letter, the paper's ad director writes that lawmakers "have heard a lot this year about what's wrong with the institution.  We'll focus on what's right."  TOUGH DECISION: EPA Chief Reilly isn't worried about a provision in Bush's clean-air bill that could suspend an alternative-fuels program if a recession is likely in the auto model-year three years hence.  Reilly says he will simply ask the White House chief economist to predict if there will be a recession in 1993, one year after the next presidential election.  ATTACKING THE WOUNDED: The U.S. League of Savings Institutions, upbraided in Congress for lobbying that helped cause the costly S&L crisis, faces a new threat.  The rival, smaller National Council of Savings Institutions urges industry members to switch to that trade group, saying, "You need a credible voice" in Washington.  EUROPE EASES potential obstacles to U.S. business, but worries remain.  Public pressure and quiet diplomacy help avert rules that would have hurt American firms when trade barriers within Europe fall in 1992, U.S. officials say.  A proposal to limit the scope of U.S. banks is modified.  The Europeans agree to consider U.S. interests in setting product standards.  But Rep. Gejdensen, chairman of the House trade subcommittee, fears that, to avoid restrictions, many U.S. companies simply plan to shift production to Europe.  "It may not make any difference to them whether they make it in Norwich, England, or in Norwich, Conn., but it matters to me," he says.  U.S. Trade Representative Hills concedes: "Anxieties may grow again."  The Europeans have saved some tough decisions for last -- such as local-content rules for automakers.  MINOR MEMOS: Heeeere's, Hashemi] A producer for ABC-TV's "Primetime Live" sent a congratulatory letter to new Iran president Rafsanjani seeking, without success, an interview on the show's premiere last week. . . .  Bush, told that some people think he's too nice in dealing with Congress, retorts: "It's a terrible attack.  I refute that.". . .  S&L crisis story?  A GAO report "Troubled Thrifts -- The Use of Supervisory Enforcement Actions" is just 12 pages.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  American Opportunity Income Fund Inc., initial offering of six million common shares, via Piper, Jaffray & Hopwood Inc.  Bay Ocean Carriers Ltd., initial offering of 3,310,000 common shares, via Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette.  Bibb Co., formerly NTC Group Inc., offering of $100 million of senior notes, via Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Central Newspapers Inc., initial offering of 3,592,800 Class A common shares, via Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Surgical Laser Technologies Inc., initial offering of 1.5 million common shares, of which, 1.3 million shares will be sold by the company and 200,000 shares will be sold by holders, via Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. and Needham & Co.  Coca-Cola Co., ever sensitive about its image, doesn't want anybody getting the idea that the real thing has anything to do with cocaine.  So the soft-drink giant slapped Alma-Leo U.S.A. Inc., a closely held Northbrook, Ill., candy distributor, with a federal lawsuit over a powdered bubble gum called Mad Scientist Magic Powder.  Coke charges that the white-powdered product is being sold in a miniature Coke look-alike bottle, violating trademark laws.  Buyers, the company claims, might therefore associate Coca-Cola with cocaine.  Floyd A. Mandell, Alma-Leo's attorney, says that is far-fetched.  Mad Scientist powder is sold in a pop bottle, not a Coke bottle, and "doesn't look any different from any other powdered candy," he says.  Furthermore, he says, it has a yellow tint and other companies are selling the identical product in the U.S. and overseas, without any adverse association with Coke.  Alma-Leo, he says, is "offended that Coca-Cola would bring this ludicrous accusation of an association with cocaine."  But a Coke spokesman says the product was brought to the company's attention by an Iowa educator who said a 12-year-old boy brought a Mad Scientist bottle to school, where the contents were mistaken for an illegal drug.  Coke first wrote to Alma-Leo demanding that it stop selling the product within seven days.  Alma-Leo, which says that such a move might force it out of business, tried to negotiate for permission to sell its remaining inventory and to ask the Italian manufacturer to change the bottle.  Coke refused and filed suit here, demanding that the U.S. District Court block Alma-Leo from selling the product and force it to destroy its inventory.  Alma-Leo has since agreed to halt sales pending a decision, expected next week, on Coke's plea for an injunction in the case.  The vaunted White House switchboard, it's said, can track down anybody, anytime, anywhere.  But Sam Pierce was a special case.  It was Sunday, Feb. 28, 1982.  Mr. Pierce was in his glory as the secretary of Housing and Urban Development.  Operator 21 couldn't find him.  The operator also couldn't find Starr Eckert, his confidential assistant.  The operator did locate Lance Wilson, Mr. Pierce's executive assistant, "but he could not provide a phone number for the secretary," according to the operator's duty roster.  The former HUD secretary, known as Silent Sam, was also Missing Sam on occasion.  That and other tidbits from Mr. Pierce's eight-year tenure at the top of HUD emerges from 48 boxes of his official papers, released to reporters last week.  Now at the center of a widening scandal over influence peddling and mismanagement at HUD, the papers show that Mr. Pierce was not only detached from his job, but that he sometimes went out of his way to avoid contact with the outside world.  For instance, Rep. William Lehman, a Florida Democrat, was "extremely persistent with his request to meet with the secretary," according to the notes of Mr. Pierce's assistant.  Mr. Pierce finally agreed to speak with the congressman.  But when Mr. Pierce learned that the legislator wanted to discuss the arcane topic of "Section 202 housing in Florida," Mr. Pierce promptly called the meeting off.  One senator, Strom Thurmond, the South Carolina Republican, learned that gifts of food were one way to get the secretary's attention.  "Thank you for the huge watermelon," Mr. Pierce once wrote Mr. Thurmond, who was seeking funding for various projects.  "I am sure it will be delicious]"  Mr. Pierce was also quick to digest his press notices.  President Nixon sent him a copy of a December 1988 National Review article that pronounced the housing secretary to be "The Unsung Hero of the Reagan Revolution."  In a note, Mr. Nixon described Mr. Pierce's "political courage" as "inspiring."  Mr. Pierce replied that he "deeply appreciates" such attention.  Mr. Pierce also reacted strongly when the press coverage was less flattering, such as when this newspaper, in 1983, referred to him as "the dud at HUD."  He responded by circulating a 13-page rebuttal not only to key senators and congressmen but to every other member of the cabinet and to President Reagan to boot.  Indeed, Mr. Pierce was so concerned about his press that the department's daily press clipping service was instructed not to distribute negative stories.  And even a request from a small-town newspaper to interview a deputy assistant secretary required Mr. Pierce's prior approval, the documents indicate.  Although federal bureaucrats and party officials are quick to criticize Mr. Pierce today, some fawned over him while he was still in power.  Take Grady Franklin Mapes, administrator of HUD's Denver region, who wrote the secretary a 1987 memo expressing gratitude for his support.  The typewritten memo repeated the words "thank you" 75 times.  {An Occasional Look at Investing Fundamentals}  No one disputes that commodity trading is probably the toughest way to make money in financial markets.  In spite of statistics showing that about 70% of all commodity traders come out losers on an annual basis, thousands of commodity brokerage accounts are opened each year by optimistic individual traders.  And now with the recent indictments of 46 floor traders who work at the Chicago exchanges, would-be commodity traders are becoming aware of yet more obstacles to the profits they seek: Many of the offenses these traders were charged with involve defrauding customers.  So why bother to learn a game that is extremely difficult to win when played honestly, and even harder when some of the players are dishonest?  The answer: Success can bring immense rewards.  A recent study by Barclay Trading Group of Fairfield, Iowa, showed that a few professional commodity trading advisers have posted five-year track records with compound annual returns exceeding 50%.  Most people don't realize that there are a few simple precautions that, if followed, could improve their chances of success markedly -- though not necessarily turn them into traders with 50%-a-year profits.  Moreover, by understanding and using the various kinds of orders available for entering and leaving the markets it is possible to severely limit the opportunities for fraud by those who work in the pits.  It should also be noted that although nearly 50 floor traders were indicted last week, there are thousands of traders on the floors of commodity exchanges who aren't suspected of dishonesty.  Before considering some simple do's and don'ts, it is first necessary to understand what commodity traders buy and sell.  A futures contract is an obligation to buy (for those who have purchased a contract) or deliver (for those who sold one) a specified quantity of a commodity at the agreed-upon price by a certain date.  Most contracts are simply nullified by an opposite trade before they come due.  There are futures in a variety of traditional commodities, such as corn and gold, as well as financial instruments such as stock index futures and U.S. Treasury bonds.  What follows is the minimum that neophytes should do before they start trading, though these suggestions of course don't guarantee success.  Educate yourself: Thoroughly study at least one entry-level book on commodities.  In that way, you will know how to enter orders and have some idea of how to approach the markets.  Two beginning books on commodity trading are "Getting Started in Futures" by Todd Lofton (New York: John Wiley & Sons, 1989); "Facts on Futures" by Jake Bernstein (Chicago: Probus Publishing Co., 1987).  Use risk funds only: If you can't afford to lose, stay away.  Many newcomers to the market fall victim to mail order or television pitches that essentially promise fat profits if you buy this computer program or that trading system.  With such assurances, some neophytes take money usually reserved for essentials, buy the trading system and start right in, only to find themselves busted out of the market in three weeks.  Have a trading plan: Jack Schwager, director of futures research at PrudentialBache Securities Inc., points out that many traders come into the market impulsively -- say, for example, because they see on the evening news that it is hot in the Midwest and that's bad for the soybean crop.  He says that the beginning trader then rushes to buy soybean futures, discovering too late that the market prices already have taken that weather into account.  Bo Thunman, editor of Club 3000, an information exchange service published in Kalamazoo, Mich., says the hardest part for a beginner is figuring out how markets move and thus when to take positions and when not to.  "People sometimes have the idea that they can buy a $99 system and make lots of money," he says, but that is naive.  Set a limit on how many dollars you're willing to lose on each trade: Every trader, beginner or experienced, must decide how much to risk in the market as a whole or on any given trade and stick with it.  Consider professional help: Commodity markets move fast, and thus require near-constant attention to both avoid disaster and spot opportunities.  If you doubt that you can carry on your regular job and still devote two or three hours a day to the markets, then consider turning your risk capital over to a commodity trading adviser or putting it into a commodity mutual fund.  But first secure and read their disclosure documents, which detail the fees and trading records.  And there are some things you should never do when contemplating commodity trading.  Don't rush into trading: Louis Mendelsohn, a commodity trading systems developer, says the markets are always going to be there, so what's the rush?  He suggests that after the fundamentals have been learned, a neophyte trader should spend some time "paper trading" -- that is, entering trades only on paper without putting real money into the market.  There is a contrary view on paper trading that says it is almost worthless because without real money on the line a trader's emotional state is vastly different.  Don't start big: An old saw asks: Do you know how to make a small fortune in commodities?  Answer: Start with a large one.  To avoid that trap, start with a small account and aim to make it grow.  In commodity trading, however, a $10,000 account isn't considered a large one.  Ignore telephone solicitations: If you receive a telephone call from someone you don't know who promises to make you a fortune trading commodities or options, hang up immediately and save a lot of money.  Don't grant discretion: Do not give to a broker the right to trade your account unless he can produce an independently authenticated record of his trading performance.  A few unscrupulous brokers might take such freedom as a license to generate commissions in the account without regard to your profitability.  Don't overdiversify: Initially, don't try to trade in more than three markets at once.  You will be plenty busy following those in a small account.  Also make sure you don't trade two or three related markets at the same time because if you are wrong on one you are likely to be wrong on the others as well.  Don't add to a losing position: If a trade is going against you, resist doing more of the same on the old stock market theory that doing so will lower your average costs.  Traders who follow this strategy in commodities generally "average" themselves out of the market.  Instead, stick with a position until it loses the maximum you allowed yourself when you opened it, then get out.  All successful commodity traders are very self-disciplined and play the game seriously.  "If you view futures trading as a hobby," says James F. Dalton, president of Dalton Capital Management Inc., a commodity trading and educational firm based in Chicago, "be prepared to lose a lot of money."  Unisys Corp. said it is imposing a salary and hiring freeze and other cost-cutting measures in the wake of sharply lower second-quarter earnings amid slowing demand for computers.  There was skepticism among Wall Street analysts, however, that the action will significantly improve the company's fortunes.  In confirming a Washington Post report, a spokesman for the Blue Bell, Pa., computer maker said the moratorium on pay raises extends through the end of the year, while the hiring suspension will last for an undetermined period.  He said the measures represent "another ratchet up" in a cost-containment program begun last fall.  Budgets for travel, capital spending, administrative expenses and research and development for the second half of 1989 also were trimmed, the spokesman said.  He indicated that the company also is considering other steps, including plant closings and layoffs in addition to those previously announced.  Earlier this year, Unisys said it would dismiss 2,500 people, or 3% of its work force.  "We're looking at our cost structure and what has to be done to bring that in line with the business environment," the spokesman said.  Some securities analysts who follow Unisys raised doubts that the actions will do much for the company's problems, which include high inventories, declining orders and fallout from a price war.  "Freezing salaries and hiring is a move in the right direction but it isn't going to solve its problems," said Barry Tarasoff, an analyst at Wertheim Schroder in New York.  "Its fundamental problem is lack of demand.  You can't save your way out of that problem."  In July, Unisys said second-quarter earnings tumbled 67% to $53.6 million, or 17 cents a share, from the year-earlier $162.3 million, or 78 cents a share.  Revenue rose 7.6% to $2.57 billion from $2.39 billion.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Unisys closed at $22.25, up 50 cents.  In a year in which the U.S. Supreme Court took a rightward turn, the usually staid and conservative American Bar Association seemed reluctant to follow suit during its annual meeting here this week.  On the two most controversial issues on the lawyers' agenda, flag-burning and the rights of people with acquired immune deficiency syndrome, the ABA delegates took uncharacteristically progressive positions.  On Wednesday, the lawyers voted to adopt a report issued earlier this month opposing both a constitutional amendment and legislation banning flag desecration.  While the lawyers inserted language saying that they "abhorred" such activity, after a lengthy debate they went along with a blue-ribbon panel, including former Secretary of State Cyrus Vance and former Solicitor General Erwin Griswold, upholding the First Amendment rights of political dissidents.  The ABA's policy arm, the House of Delegates, also adopted a report calling for strong measures to protect the confidentiality of people with AIDS. And, earlier in the week, it also sided with individuals and against the government on a national security issue involving extradition proceedings.  The moves seemed to surprise and even amuse some longtime ABA members.  Philip Lacovara, a prominent litigator now in the legal department of General Electric Co., jokingly referred to "that left-leaning House of Delegates" as he left the proceedings one afternoon.  ---  The recently completed and controversial court term was never far from mind.  As the ABA meeting began on Aug. 3, the group's outgoing president, Robert Raven of San Francisco, issued a personal plea to establish a death-penalty age minimum of 18.  In Stanford v.  Kentucky, decided earlier this year, the Supreme Court ruled that capital punishment could be imposed for acts committed before that age.  And outside the hotel where Justice Antonin Scalia {one of three justices who put in appearances at the seaside convention} participated in a program on the death penalty, about a dozen demonstrators protested the court's death-penalty and abortion decisons.  As Justice Scalia began his remarks, a woman in the audience shouted, "Keep abortion safe and legal for all women across the U.S."  ---  Another harbinger of change within the ABA is the candidacy of a woman -- Roberta Cooper Ramo -- for the group's presidency.  Ms. Ramo is the second woman to campaign for the ABA's top job. {The first woman lost her bid in 1986}.  Politicking for the ABA presidency is intense and begins far in advance.  Ms. Ramo's election for the 1992-1993 term, for example, won't be decided until the ABA's winter meeting in 1991.  But the Albuquerque attorney and her supporters were out glad-handing and arm-twisting in force.  Ms. Ramo, who is running against two men, said, "If we keep going to the same well, it's going to be difficult to change the face of the profession."  Interest in her campaign seemed high, especially since the new ABA president, L. Stanley Chauvin of Louisville, Ky., and the two male attorneys all but certain to succeed him in the coming two terms, have run for the office without opposition.  In an expansive gesture, the ABA also broadened its geographic base for the first time in memory.  After lobbying the organization for nearly a year, Tom Bolt, an attorney from the U.S. Virgin Islands, was admitted to the House of Delegates.  "They were worried we didn't have enough lawyers," notes Mr. Bolt, who now represents a 500-attorney delegation back home.  ---  The theme of the convention was supposed to be "Resolving Disputes in Pacific Ways" and all the lawyers combing Waikiki Beach draped in leis and Hawaiian shirts did present a mellow facade.  But the emotional high point of the meeting was the anything-but-peaceful recollections of Nien Cheng, who addressed the ABA at a luncheon on Tuesday.  The 74-year-old Ms. Cheng is author of the 1987 book, "Life and Death in Shanghai."  She excoriated the Chinese government for the recent bloodshed in Tiananmen Square, pointing out that government leaders, not the students, trampled on the rule of law.  She also recited the grim details of her own arrest and imprisonment by Red Guards.  Starved, beaten and denounced as a spy for six-and-a-half years, Ms. Cheng drew a laugh when she said, "I didn't have access to a good lawyer.  I had to defend myself."  ---  Lawyers who weren't busy on the beach or signing up for tours of the Hawaiian Islands could have attended scores of panel discussions on topics ranging from global warming to insider trading.  The panels were all carefully balanced with recognized experts representing all points of view.  The insider-trading program, for example, featured Arthur Mathews and Harvey Pitt, two well-known Washington, D.C., securities attorneys who represented imprisoned former stock speculator Ivan Boesky.  Their counterpart on the goverment's side was Gary Lynch, director of the Securities and Exchange Commission's enforcement division.  Program notes made no mention of the fact that Mr. Lynch, too, is joining the Wall Street side.  In a few weeks, he will leave the SEC and join the New York law firm of Davis Polk & Wardwell.  The Federal Aviation Administration reported a sharp decline in near-midair collisions and errors by air traffic controllers in the first half of this year.  The FAA said it received 280 near-miss reports from pilots in the first six months of the year, 25% fewer than the 371 it received in the first half of 1988.  The agency said near collisions fell 33% in all of 1988 from 1987, to their lowest yearly level in three years.  There were seven actual midair collisions in the first half of this year, compared with 12 in the same 1988 period, continuing a pattern of decreases in recent years, the FAA said.  The agency said that controller errors, involving failure to maintain specified separation of aircraft that are being directed by controllers, eased 8% in the first half, to 469.  FAA cited increased regulatory, enforcement and educational efforts for the improvements.  The agency recently has required more aircraft to be equipped with transponders that give controllers more information than earlier ones, and it has expanded its control of flights in airspace surrounding busy airports.  Recent reports by Congress's General Accounting Office have spotlighted continuing air-traffic control problems.  One such report showed that 231 of 325 near collisions involving commercial flights that it studied were serious.  Another said that the GAO found in a survey of 5,000 controllers that they overwhelmingly believed their ranks are still too thin, they handle too much traffic and work too long without a break.  The FAA had responded to that survey by saying that its own data showed broad job satisfaction among controllers, but it said it was trying various programs to increase that satisfaction.  LTV Corp. said its second-quarter net income declined 75% from a year ago, largely because of special charges taken in its aircraft division.  The steel, aerospace and energy concern said it had net in the quarter of $30.3 million, or 21 cents a share, compared with $123.9 million, or $1.02 a share, in the 1988 second quarter.  LTV said the latest quarter includes a $30 million charge from its decision to halt construction on a flexible composites center in Grand Prairie, Texas, and a $50 million provision for cost increases in several aircraft programs.  The company said it stopped building the new center largely because of reduced defense spending, which lessened the need for the facility.  LTV said most of the provision for cost increases related to greater-than-expected expenses related to its fixed-price contracts to build tail sections for Boeing 747 aircraft.  In addition, it said the charges include higher development and production costs on some military aircraft.  The 1988 second quarter included a $30 million charge from discontinuing LTV's heavy and medium military truck business.  Revenue in the quarter dropped almost 20%, to $1.66 billion from $2.06 billion, primarily because the company sold one steel plant.  It also plans to sell its steel bar division.  For the six months, LTV had net income of $106.9 million, or 82 cents a share.  The company had a net loss of $2 billion in the year-earlier period.  The 1988 period included a $2.26 billion charge for the cumulative effect of accounting for post-employment medical and life insurance benefits.  Revenue for the six months fell 17%, to $3.28 billion from $3.94 billion.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, LTV closed at $2.125, unchanged.  The Philippine government's first effort to privatize a company by offering it on the stock market has been a roaring success.  So much so, in fact, that it may be a long time before the government tries it again.  Trading in shares of Philippine National Bank, or PNB, began last month after the government of President Corazon Aquino offered to the public 30% of the stock in the state-owned institution.  The offering of stock in the country's largest commercial bank marked a shift in the denationalization program; up to then, the government had tried with mixed success to arrange for individuals or companies to buy state corporations outright.  The offering was a hit.  The shares were listed at 170 pesos ($8) apiece, but the per-share price surged more than 70% in two days.  During that time, total daily volume on the country's two stock exchanges soared about four times from prelisting levels, to about 400 million pesos; activity in PNB accounted for 60% of that total.  But many in the government are anything but pleased.  The listing has triggered legislative, judicial and administrative investigations.  The controversy threatens to jeopardize other listings of state companies and has revived debate about the role of foreign money in the stock market.  "PNB was exactly what we were hoping for as a model," says Gerardo Urbina, president of the Manila Stock Exchange.  "Now, I don't know."  A main point of contention has been the interest of foreign investors in the issue.  The surge in PNB's share price has come on the back of institutional foreign buyers who purchased large blocks of PNB shares, Manila brokers say.  There is evidence that local brokers accumulated shares before the listing in order to sell large blocks to a foreign buyer once the issue was traded.  Although there is no evidence of illegality, stock market analysts fear the new controversy will fuel sentiment among some legislators and officials that foreigners have taken advantage of openings offered to them in Philippine business.  Foreigners weren't allowed to participate in the initial offering itself; their involvement was to have been limited to trading in PNB shares once the stock became listed.  During the opening day, hundreds of thousands of shares were bought by brokers for foreign clients, according to brokers and analysts.  The largest purchase, at least 468,000 shares, was made by the Hong Kong unit of James Capel & Co., itself a unit of Hongkong & Shanghai Banking Corp.  According to brokers and other stock market sources, most of those shares were purchased from brokers who had gathered stock options from other individuals before the listing to sell to James Capel for a quick profit.  But because the issue was oversubscribed and allotments were reduced, the broker buying on behalf of James Capel had to purchase at least 100,000 shares on the market at a price far more than what James Capel had contracted to pay.  Josue Camba, managing director of Asian Oceanic Merit Securities Inc., the brokerage house that acted as middleman between the brokers and James Capel, declined to comment beyond saying that "as far as we're concerned, the matter is settled."  Officials at James Capel in Hong Kong declined to comment, and the head of the company's Philippine subsidiary couldn't be reached for comment.  Even before the James Capel transaction became known, critics such as Sen. Ernesto Maceda, who led a Senate investigation into the stock sale, had accused foreigners of taking advantage of the offering to accumulate a sizable holding in the bank and dictate policy.  Stock market analysts believe the latest revelation will give critics further leverage, even though the analysts say that the foreign institutions are strictly passive investors.  Furthermore, the analysts say, the controversy will help promote an image abroad that the Philippine stock market is unsavory.  Although foreign interest in Philippine shares has grown recently, the market has been hurt in the past by a widely held view that much of the market is driven by rumors and speculation.  The Securities and Exchange Commission, the central bank and the government agency charged with investigating graft and corruption cases have launched inquiries into the listing.  They follow the investigation led by Sen. Maceda earlier this month, in which senators claimed government officials pushed through a deliberately low offering price to benefit bank directors who were given the opportunity to purchase PNB shares at the offering price.  "There was a conflict of interest," says Sen. John Osmena, a member of the Senate investigation.  "Directors set the floor price and then bought" the shares.  The committee has yet to recommend any action on the issue, although Sen. Maceda has said he will propose legislation to regulate future stock offerings in government corporations.  Bank officials and analysts dispute that reasoning.  They say the offering was priced to reflect the company's net asset value.  Had it been priced much higher and had the shares not moved in the market, "it would have been disastrous" for further privatization efforts, says George UyTioco, president of First Pacific Securities (Philippines) Inc.  The damage the controversy will do to potential foreign investment remains to be seen.  Even before the PNB case, a legislative effort was under way to reduce foreign ownership of bank equity.  The situation illustrates the country's continued ambivalence toward foreign investment.  The approach is "one step forward, three steps backward," says a Philippine executive of a European bank.  Concerns about foreign involvement aside, the future is unclear for further efforts to channel privatization through the stock exchange.  Many bureaucrats heading government companies have resisted privatization and have seized on a number of excuses to delay action; the PNB affair provides another disincentive.  Many Canadian producers are refusing to sign long-term contracts for natural gas because they expect to see sharply higher prices in the near future.  Most of the contracts are to supply gas to the U.S., where Canada has 7% of the overall market but a much larger share in California and New England.  The producers sell their gas through contracts with gas-marketing companies, which negotiate with U.S. and Canadian buyers.  The producers are reacting to higher prices recently won by a small number of other producers who negotiate contracts on their own.  Producers don't usually publish the prices they get for their gas, but Calgary-based Renaissance Energy Ltd. says the average price of gas it sold in this year's first quarter was 18% higher than a year earlier.  Gulf Canada Resources Ltd. and Poco Petroleum Ltd., also based in Calgary, said their average prices rose 11% and 12%, respectively.  "It's a general, overall increase," said Lloyd Dunkley, vice president and chief financial officer of Poco.  "We should see prices move significantly higher in the next 12 months."  Richard Hillary, natural gas manager of the Independent Petroleum Association of Canada, an industry group, said the price producers receive could double in five years to reach three Canadian dollars ($2.56) or C$3.50 per thousand cubic feet.  Most gas-market participants agree that prices are headed upward, but opinion is divided on how large the increases will be and how long they will last.  Edward Sonday, vice president of gas supply for Brooklyn Union Gas Co., New York, said his company is paying more for gas than a year ago, and that he expects "steadily higher prices."  However, the American Gas Association, an industry group, says higher prices may stimulate enough new supplies to put a lid on the increase.  "In a year or two we'll have gas coming in from every direction and lots of it, as well as a lot more LNG {liquified natural gas} being imported," said Richard Itteilag, the association's director of gas demand analysis.  "I don't think Canadians can just walk away and expect buyers to come back at a higher price all the time," he added.  Canadian producers voted last week in favor of supplying Brooklyn Union and 15 other northeastern utilities with up to 341 million cubic feet of gas daily for 15 years, beginning in 1991.  But they rejected 10 other U.S. contracts involving 214.5 million cubic feet a day.  Since January, producers have rejected 14 contracts negotiated by Calgary-based Western Gas Marketing Ltd., a unit of TransCanada PipeLines Ltd. Western Gas went back to the buyers and hammered out better terms on three of the contracts.  Two of the sweetened contracts were approved by producers; no decision has been announced on the third.  Prices in long-term contracts are linked to "baskets" of alternative fuels.  In two recently rejected U.S. contracts, producers objected because coal was included among the alternative fuels, and they expect coal prices to decline.  "You can't get a producer to okay a contract that has No. 2 fuel oil any more, it has to be No. 6," which is more expensive, said Lorne Larsen, president of ProGas Ltd., another Calgary-based gas marketer.  "Some people have false expectations; they believe western Canada is floating on a sea of natural gas that we have to sell," said Clayton Woitas, president of Renaissance Energy.  "What we've seen is a lot more people willing to sit around our table and negotiate, and we're in a position where we don't have to sell that gas at just any price.  It's a nice change."  Raytheon Co. received a $32.2 million Army contract for Hawk missile parts.  General Dynamics Corp. was awarded a $19.9 million Air Force contract for aircraft construction material.  Ford Aerospace Corp., a unit of Ford Motor Co., got a $10.6 million Air Force contract for operation and maintenance of a satellite control network.  After building a reputation for precision and reliability with its skilled work force, German industry may be running out of elves.  Companies are finding fewer and fewer workers who have learned their trades coming up through West Germany's carefully regulated apprenticeship system.  As the economy enters its seventh year of export-driven expansion, the dearth of machinists, electricians and other skilled workers has led to staffing problems and even production bottlenecks at factories.  Industry critics blame companies for delaying the installation of modern tools on which workers could be trained.  The industry contends that the unions delayed modernization and, moreover, that fewer youths want to acquire vocational skills.  But everybody agrees there are no longer enough trained workers and that automation can't fully replace them.  Industry can't fill several hundred thousand skilled jobs, estimates Reginald Hagedorn, a labor expert at the German Employers Association.  "It's a complaint we hear from just about every company.  Trained workers aren't as easily replaced as they were in the 1960s," he says.  The lack is felt mostly in the labor-intensive capital-goods sector, which is scurrying to meet a 25% jump in orders this year.  Thyssen Industrie AG is looking for 263 skilled workers, chiefly machinists and electricians.  This compares with its average of 150 skilled-job openings in recent years.  The gap has curbed production at its machine-building division, says Udo Huetten, a personnel officer for the big engineering group.  "We just don't seem to be able to get the workers we need."  Siemens AG, the huge West German electrical group, can't fill several hundred job openings for skilled electricians, machinists and chemical workers.  Advertisements placed for electricians last month by Gildemeister AG, the precision machinery maker, didn't turn up any qualified candidates, the company says.  And engineering group MAN AG and jet-engine maker Motoren & Turbinen Union G.m.b.H. have resorted to signboards outside their plants listing openings for skilled workers.  "It's a chronic problem and the trend is worsening," says Motoren & Turbinen spokesman Hubert Horn.  "Skilled workers simply aren't to be had, and these are the key people you need at critical points in production."  The Federal Labor Office says much of the problem stems from career choices.  Some 650,000 younger West Germans began learning trade skills this year, down from a peak of 706,000 in 1986.  More youths are skipping the vocational training of their fathers to pursue a university degree and a white-collar job.  Yet unless their university studies were in engineering or another of the sciences, they often can't find work immediately or are forced to accept lower-skill jobs.  In September 1988, the most recent figures available, there were 89,500 unemployed university graduates, up 11% from the year before.  Not that blue-collar jobs are badly paid.  Thanks to their unions, West German workers have better wage and benefit packages and work fewer hours than any of their European counterparts.  Labor experts say demand for skilled workers could increase as basic manufacturing and nonskilled jobs are exported to lower-wage countries.  German manufacturers have begun transferring production abroad to cut labor costs, in preparation for the integration of European markets after 1992.  The reservoir of West Germany's two million unemployed offers little relief.  Unemployment was still running at a high 7.7% this summer, but the West German labor office explains that half of the registered jobless have no training, while the rest don't have the right training.  Many larger companies have had their own training programs for decades.  But as recruiting from the labor market remains bleak, even smaller companies are investing in apprentice programs.  "You have to train them yourself and hope they stay with you once they qualify," says a Gildemeister official.  But even meticulous planning can't satisfy the demand for skilled labor when decisions are made suddenly to expand production.  Bayerische Motoren Werke AG, which has an elaborate job-training program, added a second shift to its Regensburg plant to shorten waiting lists for its cars.  "It meant we had to go to the market for skilled workers," says Ernst von der Heide, a BMW personnel manager, "and we found that getting them has become increasingly difficult."  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Gaylord Container Corp. -- $150 million of subordinated debentures due Aug. 15, 2001, priced at par to yield 13.75%.  Rated single-B-2 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and single-B-minus by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through Salomon Brothers Inc.  The issue is noncallable for five years.  There is no sinking fund.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $875.1 million of Remic mortgage securities being offered in 13 classes by Goldman, Sachs & Co.  The offering, Trust 1989-59, is backed by Fannie Mae 9% securities.  Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. -- $500 million of Remic mortgage securities being offered in nine classes by First Boston Corp.  The offering, Series 84, is backed by Freddie Mac 9 1/2% securities.  According to available details, yields range from 8.93%, a spread of 92 basis points over three-year Treasurys, to 9.60%, a spread of 140 basis points over 20-year Treasurys.  Separately, Freddie Mac issued $400 million of Remic mortgage securities in 14 classes through Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  The offering, Series 82, is backed by Freddie Mac 9 1/2% securities.  According to available details, yields range from 8.81%, a spread of 85 basis points over three-year Treasurys, to 9.67%, a spread of 170 basis points over seven-year Treasurys.  Smith Barney Mortgage Capital Trust 10 -- $300 million of Series 1 Remic mortgage securities being offered in eight classes by Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  The offering is backed by Ginnie Mae 10% securities.  Yields range from 8.85%, a spread of 85 basis points over 10-year Treasurys, to 9.97%, a spread of 180 basis points over 30-year Treasurys.  UBS Mortgage Trust 1 -- $299.9 million of Remic mortgage securities being offered in 11 classes by UBS Securities Inc.  The offering, Trust 1, is backed by Freddie Mac 9% securities.  The issue is rated triple-A by Moody's and S&P.  @ EUROBONDS  Telecom Corp. of New Zealand Overseas Finance Ltd. -- 75 million New Zealand dollars of 13 1/8% bonds due Sept. 21, 1993, priced at 101.90 to yield 13.07% less full fees, via Westpac Banking Corp. Guaranteed by Telecom Corp. of New Zealand.  Fees 1 3/4.  Wouldn't America be a better place if white-collar professionals would link arms with blue-collar Joe Six-Packs to overthrow the fat cats ruling our plutocracy?  Just wouldn't it?  Well, that's the vision of social revolution that impelled Barbara Ehrenreich to write "Fear of Falling: The Inner Life of the Middle Class" (Pantheon Books, 268 pages, $18.95).  Her windy, whiny book is a critique of the rotten middle class, or more precisely, the rotten professional middle class, from the 1960s to the 1980s.  Ms. Ehrenreich's plan is to explain "the retreat from liberalism and the rise, in the professional middle class, of a meaner, more selfish outlook, hostile to the aspirations of those less fortunate."  But if there is a case to be made for this view, it fails to come through clearly in "Fear of Falling."  Some of her arguments are naive and contradictory, others incomprehensible.  And her solution -- a revival of "conscience and responsibility" -- seems simplistic given the alleged moral decline of the class she describes.  In Ms. Ehrenreich's scenario, three decades of creeping elitism have all but exterminated the liberal conscience.  The middle class in the '50s, she argues, was guilty only of benign neglect of the poor.  Then it was jolted in the '60s by the civil rights movement and the student rebellions.  Feeling threatened, middle-class professionals swung to the right in a self-serving alliance with the most reactionary element of the working class: the silent majority.  By the '80s the sellout was complete.  The middle class now teems with yuppies, neoconservatives and neoliberals.  "Fear of Falling" does deftly capture the status consciousness of the professional middle class.  BMWs or Chevys?  Saks or Sears?  The New Yorker or the National Enquirer?  Ms. Ehrenreich well understands that to many such distinctions speak volumes.  But when Ms. Ehrenreich moves from description to political analysis, things often fall apart.  Sometimes, she tries to present extreme liberal views by marshalling the kind of conservative arguments that would make Ronald Reagan smile.  Consider her theory that the middle class discovered the poor during the civil rights movement.  She blames sociologists for serving up an "invented poor" to the middle class.  A poor lacking in discipline.  Unable to defer gratification.  Living in an alien "culture of poverty."  Not to be trusted with money.  So it was that the middle class came to think of the poor as virtual children, unable to help themselves.  This view, she asserts, was very popular among middle-class people because it gave them what she calls a "brazen defense" of the status quo.  "The middle-class view of the poor," the author writes, "guaranteed that whatever else they got -- multiservice centers, area redevelopment programs, community-service projects -- they would not get money."  If dumping on government programs sounds downright conservative, it is.  But that clearly isn't Ms. Ehrenreich's intent.  She's really excoriating the professional middle class for failing to give its wealth away to poor people.  Elsewhere, Ms. Ehrenreich rewrites history to push her points.  You may remember Bob Dylan and the Beatles for fueling the rebellious spirit of the '60s.  The author remembers Madison Avenue.  In a chapter about the adult backlash that followed the student revolts of the late '60s, she blames the youth unrest on capitalism, which sold kids stuff like love beads and rock 'n' roll.  As the author writes: "And if there is an explanation for the student revolt that goes deeper than politics and public events, it was in the vibrant new consumer culture addressed to the young and fortified with the repressed defiance of the poor."  In fact, Madison Avenue and marketers didn't really start to exploit the prime teen commodity, rock 'n' roll, until after 1969, when Woodstock drew a crowd of 400,000.  And teen marketing in the '60s was a relatively innocent proposition: Designer jeans and MTV didn't surface until later.  Ms. Ehrenreich's claim that the silent majority -- ordinary working America -- was little more than a media invention also seems remote from reality.  During the unruly 1968 Democratic Convention, she argues, journalists came to realize that their liberal, anti-war sympathies were out of sync with Middle America.  The result was an invented stereotypical working class of punch-happy Archie Bunkers.  Ignored in the mythmaking was the real working class -- defined by Ms. Ehrenreich as the likes of Cesar Chavez -- which was "caught up in the greatest wave of militancy since World War II."  Ms. Ehrenreich ends with a plea that liberal middle-class professionals incite the working-class majority to revolt against "the growing and inordinate power of wealth."  Happily for the middle class, the only people the working class hates more than the poor are pointy-headed intellectuals.  Indeed, "Fear of Falling" provides evidence aplenty that the plutocrats need have no fear of falling -- and that Ms. Ehrenreich should mingle more with the masses.  ---  Ms. Freedman is a staff reporter for The Journal.  South Korea plans to tighten controls on foreign banks to prevent possible tax evasion, officials said.  The Bank Supervisory Board has decided to tighten regulations on foreign banks trying to sell business rights, board officials said.  The officials declined further comment, but Yonhap, the South Korean news agency, said that under revised regulations foreign banks would be asked to report their transfer plans in advance and submit contract papers to the board later.  Some foreign banks operating in South Korea sold their business rights to other foreign banks at huge premiums and evaded taxes, Yonhap said.  The number of foreign banks seeking branches in South Korea has been increasing, with net profits of 63 foreign bank branches now in South Korea hitting $209 million last year, up from $123 million in 1986.  South Korea also wants to tighten regulations on foreign banks seeking to open branches in order to protect domestic banks, the news agency said.  Portec Inc. said it plans to close its railway maintenance products division's Troy, New York, rail joint plant by the end of October.  Portec, which makes products for the construction equipment, material handling and railroad industries, said the plant employs 117 people.  Pantera's Corp., which is in a liquidity crunch, said it agreed in principle to sell its Branch Cheese Co. unit to International Cheese Co.  Terms of the transaction weren't disclosed.  Pantera's said proceeds from the sale will be used to reduce its $36 million in senior debt.  The company missed a $4.7 million principal-and-interest payment due to its banks Aug. 1, but has received waivers for 30 days from any default.  The board of Hilton Hotels Corp., in a widely expected move, asked its financial advisers to begin contacting potential buyers for the hotel and casino company.  At a regularly scheduled meeting, the board instructed Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. and Eastdil Realty Inc. to begin gauging buyers' interest in the entire company or just its hotel operations, underscoring the possibility of a spinoff of Hilton's highly profitable casinos.  William C. Lebo Jr., Hilton's general counsel, said packages of confidential information on the company, called "books" in Wall Street jargon, will be issued early next month to prospective buyers.  "Our investment bankers will be aggressively contacting people," Mr. Lebo said, adding that the company hopes to have the information ready after Labor Day.  The company received a surge of inquiries in May, when Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Barron Hilton said at the annual meeting that the company would consider any legitimate bids, and Mr. Lebo said that many of the prospective parties have since been in contact with Hilton to remind them of their interest.  The announcement pushed Hilton's stock down $3.875 to close yesterday at $108 a share in heavy New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Hilton's stock has traded as high as $113.50 a share in the last week, fueled by market rumors of the meeting and speculation that some preliminary bids would be discussed by Shearson and Eastdil.  Wall Street observers said the stock's drop probably stems partly from the company's specific mention of a casino unit spinoff, which could mean a somewhat lower price for shareholders because of potential tax liabilites.  "I think the market needed to be reminded of that possibility," said Joseph J. Doyle, an analyst at Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. Hilton's stock has been trading well above what many analysts value the company at on a fundamental basis, which they say ranges between $90 and $107 a share.  Hilton's volatility has been mirrored by other companies such as Los Angeles-based Caesars World Inc. and Holiday Corp. of Memphis, Tenn., in anticipation of a handsome price for Hilton's assets that should boost the values of other well-regarded hotel and casino companies.  The casino unit, which accounts for more than half of Hilton's 1988 revenue of $953.6 million, is considered to be more difficult for Shearson and Eastdil to sell to a foreign bidder because of the complexity of running the business and stiff state regulatory requirements.  Mr. Hilton has also expressed a personal interest in possibly keeping the casinos, but John J. Rohs, an analyst at Wertheim Shroeder, says he still thinks the casinos "could still go, at the right price."  The timing of the books' release suggests that any transaction would probably not be negotiated until mid to late fall, and completed sometime in the first or second quarter of next year, which would have certain tax advantages.  "We want to maintain our flexibility, and be slow, thorough and careful," Mr. Lebo said.  Among the rumored suitors are several Asian concerns including All Nippon Airways, Seibu/Saison Group and several Hong Kong real-estate groups.  Lincoln National Corp. said it hired Salomon Brothers Inc. to find a buyer for its Preferred Financial Corp. subsidiary.  The insurance-holding company said the unit, which serves the payroll-deduction life insurance and employee benefits markets, doesn't "fit strategically" with its other payroll-deduction and employee benefit operations.  Preferred Financial has assets of $54.2 million.  A National Wildlife Federation study lists an Aluminum Co. of America plant in Point Comfort, Texas, as the nation's single biggest emitter of toxic chemicals in 1987.  In Pittsburgh, however, Alcoa said it is on the list because of emissions of two substances -- aluminum oxide and sodium hydroxide -- which it said are being removed from the Environmental Protection Agency's list of toxic substances.  Once those substances are removed from the EPA's list, Alcoa says, none of its plants will be included among the worst polluters.  An EPA official said the two chemicals are being studied for possible removal.  The environmental group said the Texas facility released 465 million pounds of toxic chemicals, including almost 360 million pounds of aluminum oxide, which the group said may damage the respiratory system and contribute to brain disease.  The group's report, which is based on data collected and made available by the EPA, lists the 500 industrial facilities that released the largest amounts of toxic chemicals.  A law passed following the Bhopal, India, chemical-release disaster requires big manufacturing plants to give the EPA information on their toxic chemical emissions.  According to the report, the 500 facilities, situated in 44 states, released more than 7.5 billion pounds of toxic pollutants in 1987.  Texas and Louisiana had the greatest numbers of facilities on the list.  Of the 7.5 billion pounds, 2.6 billion pounds were emitted into the air; 550 million pounds into water; and 870 million pounds into municipal waste-water treatment facilities.  The rest was injected underground, dumped into landfills or shipped offsite.  Following several weeks of confusion, foreigners have been given the green light to purchase shares of Indonesian companies involved in retailing.  In a bid to clarify government policy, Finance Minister J.B. Sumarlin said foreigners are permitted to buy shares that domestic-retailing companies offer on the country's stock market, to a maximum of 49% of a company's equity.  Mr. Sumarlin also said foreigners could buy shares of three major companies in the process of becoming listed on the small Jakarta Stock Exchange: P.T. Hero Mini Supermarket, P.T. Bakrie & Bros. and P.T. United Tractors.  He indicated there would be no barrier to foreigners taking part in new share issues in the future.  Jakarta and foreign stockbrokers welcomed the comments as good news for stock-market development and a continuation of Indonesian policies introduced in December 1987 to allow foreign purchase of local shares.  But some brokers said the minister should have made his clarification earlier to head off confusion surrounding two of the new issues.  In the case of Hero, underwriters declined to accept applications from foreigners because they thought Indonesian regulations prohibiting foreign investment in retail concerns meant non-Indonesians couldn't buy any of the shares.  But in a recent statement, Mr. Sumarlin said foreigners could own shares in Hero, an expanding supermarket chain.  The minister appeared to make a distinction between direct foreign investment in a retailing company, and foreign-portfolio investment, in which he said non-Indonesians "won't get involved" in management of listed companies.  He said the issues involve only a small percentage of the companies' total shares, so even after the issues the companies clearly will remain in Indonesian control.  While it's too late for foreigners to take part in the initial Hero share offer they can buy its listed shares.  Although some brokers said Mr. Sumarlin's comments were reassuring, they cited the need for specific written guidelines so questions that caused the confusion over foreign shareholdings won't resurface.  In the case of Bakrie, a manufacturer with some trading activities, underwriters were divided among themselves throughout the issue offering period that ended July 27.  The lead managing underwriter P.T. Inter-Pacific Financial, was convinced that foreigners could buy shares and reconfirmed that view to Hong Kong and Singapore securities firms.  But at least two other underwriters said they felt the legal situation was too murky and didn't sell to foreigners.  Inter-Pacific and the Jakarta exchange would have faced a nightmarish situation if the government had ruled that Bakrie shares allocated to foreigners from the offering had to be given up, brokers said.  Brokers and analysts had feared that if Bakrie were ruled out of bounds because of a broad definition of retailing, then United Tractors also might be classified as a retailer not open for foreign shareholding, even though it sells an industrial product, not a consumer product.  The three new issues are important because they represent major Indonesian corporate names and contribute heavily to an increase in the limited supply of shares available on the Jakarta exchange.  Between 1984 and this year, the number of listed companies remained at 24.  Last year, the exchange broke out of its comatose state when changes in the regulatory framework and strong foreign interest contributed to a surprise price boom.  Air & Water Technologies Corp. received a warm response from investors in its initial public offering of four million shares at $17 a share.  The offering late Wednesday of Class A common for the environmental services firm was underwritten by Kidder Peabody Inc. and Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc.  The issue originally was targeted to sell at $13.50 to $14.50 a share, and was expected to involve only three million shares.  But the shares opened yesterday at $18.50 on the American Stock Exchange, and closed at $17.75.  Trading volume totaled 1.3 million shares.  Air & Water said proceeds of the sale will be used for general working capital, possible investments and acquisitions, and possibly to retire some of the company's debt and redeemable preferred shares.  Eckhardt C. Beck, chairman, said Air & Water Technologies' board authorized the company to periodically redeem certain debt and preferred issues.  Investor interest apparently was stimulated by growing public concern about the environment and pollution-control technology.  And a strong stock market gave Air & Water a good opportunity to get the best price for its public offering.  But the company has been debt-laden since it went private in 1987 in a leveraged buy-out, and servicing the debt has wiped out earnings.  In the year ended Oct. 31, the company had operating profit of $23.3 million and interest expense of $35.4 million.  For the six months ended April 30, operating profit was $15.2 million and interest expense was $18.1 million.  Air & Water posted a loss for fiscal 1988 of $7.1 million on sales of $440.6 million.  For the six-month period, the loss was $4.7 million on sales of $293.5 million.  Air & Water, through subsidiaries Research-Cottrell Inc. and Metcalf & Eddy Cos., provides air pollution control equipment and management of natural resources.  It previously was called R-C Holding Inc., which was formed as a result of the $288.5 million leveraged buy-out of Research-Cottrell in 1987.  Air & Water reduced its stake in Metcalf & Eddy to 83% through two public offerings since last October.  Here is how major foreign stock markets have fared since October 1987:  Tokyo  The Tokyo market has had a rollercoaster year.  Pushed up by Japan's strong economy but pushed down by political problems, stock prices have climbed erratically to new highs.  On July 31, the Nikkei average of 225 stocks hit a record, closing at 34953.87 -- up 16% since the end of last year and 60% since the crash.  Moreover, the Tokyo exchange wasn't hit as badly as the world's other major bourses.  It fell only 14.9% during the crash and recovered relatively quickly.  But most of the gains were posted in 1988, and many experts are becoming uneasy.  "Japan led all the other markets up, but the momentum has run out," says Peter Tasker, an analyst at Kleinwort Benson International Inc. Yet Tokyo analysts, though turning cautious, aren't predicting another crash anytime soon.  Japan went through some market-damping crises this year.  The mourning for Emperor Hirohito slowed stock-market activity.  Then, in May, the Recruit Cosmos influence-peddling scandal toppled Prime Minister Noboru Takeshita.  After only two months in office, his successor, Sosuke Uno, announced his resignation following the ruling party's electoral defeat.  The political uncertainties may continue to haunt the market.  Adding to the uneasiness is talk that the opposition parties may seek a capital-gains tax.  Already, individuals as well as foreign investors have been net sellers in Tokyo recently.  No one is expecting the foreigners, who have chalked up greater profits in home markets, to return anytime soon.  And Japanese investors worry about the recent strength of the U.S. dollar.  As the yen weakens against it, Japan pays more for dollar-denominated imports of oil and food, and that could ignite inflation.  At times, the Tokyo market has been buoyed by strength in New York, which gives investors an excuse to buy in Tokyo.  But analysts say the effect is fleeting; investors in Tokyo realize that while the Fed is lowering interest rates to encourage a "soft landing," the Bank of Japan raised the discount rate at the end of May.  Tokyo stocks have been fairly flat ever since.  London  The U.K. equity market has surged 30% this year, and the Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100 Share Index is within about 100 points of its all-time high of 2443, set in the summer preceding the 1987 stock-market crash.  During the crash and its aftermath, the index sank about 32%.  On the surface, this year's runup seems odd.  "There's a nagging feeling of disquiet: What is the market doing at these levels?" says Nicholas Knight, the head of strategy at the Nomura Research Institute of London.  Since June 1988, the U.K. has absorbed 10 interest-rate increases -- the Thatcher government's medicine for a surge in inflation.  With base rates at 14%, the economy is slowing down, and corporate profits are certain to drop.  Nevertheless, the Nomura Research Institute predicts that the Financial Times-Stock Exchange index will pierce its pre-crash high and end the year at 2500 and, by the close of 1990, will rise to 2800.  One explanation: British stocks aren't really as high as they seem.  Major industrial equities are trading at about 13 times earnings, matching the price-earnings ratio in November 1987, the month after the crash.  In the run-up preceding the crash, the ratio topped 19.  In addition, a spate of British takeovers have buoyed many stocks and often create gushers of cash profits that are quickly plowed back into the market.  And as takeovers push more companies out of the market, there is more money chasing fewer stocks.  Institutions are keeping their cash levels at about 10%, up from about 5% in the giddy climate two years ago.  Those cash levels suggest a lot of money can quickly pour into today's market.  London investors, to some extent, "have taken encouragement from Wall Street," says Ian Harwood, an economist at S.G. Warburg.  To some European economists, recent signs of an economic slowdown in America have relieved Europe of considerable inflationary pressure.  Frankfurt  West German stocks were hammered by the crash, which within weeks cut share prices to two-thirds their former value.  In Frankfurt, the panic was compounded by fears that the rising mark would batter Germany's export industries.  By Nov. 10, 1987, the FAZ stock index had dropped 35% to a post-crash low of 400.13.  German stocks were slow to recover.  By mid-1988, however, unexpected strength in the German economy seemed to foreshadow record earnings, and equity markets revived in earnest.  On June 20, 1989, the FAZ index reached 617.18, topping the pre-crash 613.67 for the first time.  Aided by booming exports and capital spending aimed at 1992, the economy grew at a brisk 4% annual rate in the 1989 first half, and the FAZ index hit a high of 664.22 yesterday -- up 20% from Jan. 1 and up 65% from the November 1987 low of 400.13.  The investment surge turned ho-hum builders and capital-goods manufacturers into hot stocks and even woke up steel shares.  Auto makers are running at capacity, and retailers could benefit as Bonn prepares to cut income taxes in January.  West German investors and institutions began nurturing the market rise last year, but not until early 1989 did foreign institutions return.  "The German recession that everybody feared never came, and foreign institutional investors are bringing their money back," says Peter Pietsch, an economist at Commerzbank AG in Frankfurt.  However, some clouds are darkening the horizon.  West German inflation isn't altogether whipped, and the Bundesbank might raise rates again within six months.  Also looming is a round of wage negotiations amid strike threats by the militant IG Metall metalworkers union.  In addition, Chancellor Helmut Kohl's center-right coalition government, which generally bolstered investor confidence during the postcrash recovery, may be in trouble.  His Christian Democrats have been slipping in recent polls.  Paris  The Paris stock market plunged 10.2% on Oct. 19, followed by a prolonged slump that lasted through January 1988, when the CAC index hit a low of 251.3.  And, like all major world markets, it's now in a prolonged boom: The CAC index hit an alltime high of 508.3 yesterday.  Analysts attribute this surge partly to the bourse's interconnections with other markets, which also are rising.  Other factors include the healthy world economy, the easing of U.S. interest rates and the high inflation-adjusted rates in France.  In addition, the French market is strong for specifically French reasons.  The economy is growing, and corporate profits are rising.  Moreover, after two years of virtually nonstop elections, France now is facing three election-free years, auguring a political stability that's favorable to stock markets.  And the euphoria is being fed by corporate takeovers, which are being encouraged by the efforts of French companies to get bigger in preparation for the heightened competition in 1992.  Many companies' shares have climbed in the anticipation that they could become takeover targets.  For instance, the distribution sector has risen on the coattails of a takeover earlier this year of La Ruche Meriodionale, a supermarket chain.  Nevertheless, many analysts are cautious.  Toronto Prices on the Toronto Stock Exchange, which has traditionally followed the U.S. market, fell 31% during the 1987 crash, but they have recovered almost all that ground.  The exchange's 300-stock index peaked at 4112.86 in August 1987 and plunged to 2837.79 on the following Oct. 28.  It reached its post-crash high of 4019.62 yesterday.  The buying has been led by institutions, both from within Canada and outside it, especially the U.S.  "The individual investor is still basically a sideline player," says David Neale, the director of institutional trading at Nesbitt Thomson Deacon Inc.  The recovery has been uneven, with profits of Canada's many natural-resources companies held back by a rise in the value of the Canadian dollar and recent declines in raw-materials prices.  Some observers expect more takeover activity because Canada's corporate sector is undervalued relative to the U.S. Foreigners will continue to invest in Canada.  In addition, the Free Trade Agreement with the U.S. -- under which tariffs and trade barriers will be removed over 10 years -- boosts domestic and international sentiment for investing in Canada.  Milan  The Milan stock exchange was one of the least affected by the 1987 crash, mainly because a previous two-year rally had ended earlier in 1987.  Nonetheless, on Black Monday, the Milan Stock Exchange Index slid 6.3%.  Since then, the index has jumped 39% above the level that day.  The market has climbed this year despite a 60-day political crisis.  But Ernesto Marelli, a trader at Milan's Akros Finanziaria S.p.A., says the installation of Giulio Andreotti as prime minister last month has generated "the impression that this government will last" longer than Italy's postwar average of 11 months.  Analysts and traders attribute the stock-market gains to good 1988 corporate profits and a strong 1989 outlook for the big corporations such as Fiat S.p.A.  Also helping has been a lot of merger and restructuring activity, particularly in the banking sector, as Italian companies try to improve their competitive positions for the single European market at the end of 1992.  Hong Kong  After Hong Kong stock prices had inched higher last year, "people woke up" early this year to some favorable trends, says Timothy Moe, director of research at Jardine Fleming Securities Ltd. One, he says, was "the fact that the U.S. hadn't gone into recession" despite many gloomy predictions, and exporters' prospects brightened.  The other, "the increase in Hong Kong investment in China," eased worries about possible restraints on the tiny British colony's future growth.  So, investors began buying in earnest.  They had reason to consider Hong Kong stocks undervalued; in the wake of the 1987 crash, the Hang Seng index had plunged 50% to 1895.  By mid-May, it was up about 20% on the year, to a 1989 high of 3309 -- still below the 3783 on Oct. 16, 1987.  But the turmoil in China this spring set off a skid in the Hang Seng index, which fell until it hit 2093 the day after the June 4 massacre in Beijing.  Despite a recent rebound, the index is down for this year.  Stockholm  The Stockholm Stock Exchange's Affaersvaerlden index plunged 40% in October 1987 but was one of the quickest to recover after the world-wide crash.  In 1988, the index rebounded 51%, and so far this year it is up a further 30%.  The Swedish economy has been unexpectedly buoyant, confounding most economic forecasters, who had warned of a first-half downturn.  Corporate profits also have surged.  However, a slowdown in the U.S. economy could crimp some big Swedish concerns' profits.  For example, two auto makers, AB Volvo and Saab-Scania AB, sell more cars in the U.S. than any other single market.  But most Swedish corporations have their biggest exposure in Europe -- and U.S. influence in Stockholm markets "is more on a psychological level," one expert says.  Zurich  Scared investors took their time coming back to the Swiss stock market after a long decline following the 1987 crash.  Now, however, stock prices have surged, and analysts are bullish.  "Investors have recovered by learning that you can't build an investment strategy on fear.  Money must be invested," says Werner Rein of Union Bank of Switzerland.  Swiss traders and analysts note that because Swiss companies are export-oriented, their profits tend to surge when a strong U.S. economy boosts foreign demand.  In addition, analysts believe that declining interest rates in the U.S. will drag down European rates, further helping European companies.  Ardsley Partners, a New York investment partnership, said it increased its stake in Microcom Inc. to 11.4% of the common shares outstanding.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Ardsley said it holds 1,035,000 Microcom common shares, including net purchases of 226,500 shares from June 15 to Aug. 4 for $16.313 to $18.25 a share.  Microcom, based in Norwood, Mass., makes data communications equipment.  In national over-the-counter trading, Microcom closed at $19, down 75 cents.  RJR Nabisco Inc. said it will dismiss 1,640 employees, about 12% of the work force at its tobacco company, in a bloodletting that has been awaited since its $25 billion leveraged buy-out by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. earlier this year.  The tobacco and food giant said the cuts will include 825 white-collar workers, 700 manufacturing employees and 115 temporary and part-time workers.  The casualties were higher than recent estimates of 1,000 or more cuts at R.J. Reynolds Tobacco Co., which employs about 14,000 people.  The dismissals shocked some.  "It is a whopping big layoff, I'm astounded," said David Goldman, an analyst with Nomura Research Institute.  He said he took the extent of the reductions, particularly in the manufacturing area, as a further sign of RJR's tobacco troubles in an industry whose rate of decline has accelerated recently.  "This just confirms that the company is really in the doldrums," he said.  James W. Johnston, chief executive officer of the unit, said the dismissals were part of a massive companywide restructuring designed to make the Winston-Salem, N.C., tobacco company "a lot lighter on its feet and more responsive to the marketplace."  They were also aimed at bringing the company's size more in line with unit sales.  He said the cuts were designed only in part as a cost-cutting measure.  Mr. Johnston would not say how much the cuts will cost debt-laden RJR Nabisco, which is giving each regular full-time employee a severance package of a minimum of eight months pay and benefits.  Nor would he say how much the cuts will save the company annually after the initial hit.  One senior-level adviser along with a former RJR executive estimated the annual savings in the range of $60 million; one analyst said it could be much more.  The severance packages could wipe out much of the savings in the first year, analysts said.  The company's latest second-quarter results included $247 million in charges resulting from severance payments for top executives and others.  Mr. Johnston said the latest cuts were being made fairly evenly across departments, but he wouldn't be more specific.  In some cases, he said, management layers were being wiped out in a streamlining process.  In others, people were let go as five daily mail deliveries were cut back to two and four engineering groups were consolidated into one.  The exact nature of the pruning is important, according to tobacco industry analysts and former RJR employees, for it will indicate how well RJR will be able to compete in the future.  RJR has been badly losing ground to archrival Philip Morris Cos. lately because of its flagging core brands -- Winston, Salem and Camel -- and, some believe, because of a dearth of new products.  For that reason, many tobacco experts have been wondering how deeply the company's research and development effort would be slashed.  It wasn't hard hit yesterday, according to a person familiar with the effort.  He said fewer than 100 employees will be cut from that department, less than half the cuts he had expected.  Although Mr. Johnston wouldn't comment specifically, he reiterated his belief that research and development would play an important role in the company's future.  "I would look at existing brands as banging out singles and doubles, and research and development as an area that would hit some home runs," he said.  He is said to be particularly enamored of two of RJR's new cigarettes, Chelsea, a sweet-smelling brand aimed primarily at women, and Magna, a macho cigarette aimed primarily at men.  Mr. Johnston did say that the company's 2,500-person sales force will be spared completely.  That, too, is critical to the company's future.  Philip Morris has hired 900 new salespeople in the last year and is trying to push RJR out of the best spots on supermarket shelves.  These are not the first staff reductions either at the tobacco company or at RJR Nabisco since the buy-out by KKR.  The company dismissed 700 workers, 10% of its cigarette-factory work force, in April.  The company attributed those reductions to the death of Premier, its so-called "smokeless" cigarette, which was pulled from test markets in March.  When RJR Nabisco's headquarters was moved to New York from Atlanta this summer, the headquarters staff shrank to 350 from 650.  When KKR won the giant buy-out battle against a group led by former Chief Executive F. Ross Johnson last December, it said there would be no massive firings.  Commonwealth Holdings of Sacramento Calif. said it holds a 5% stake in El Pollo Asado Inc., of Phoenix, Ariz., and may request a seat on the company's board of directors.  Commonwealth said it acquired 217,000 shares between March 30 and August 7 at 81 cents to $1 a share.  A San Francisco investor said he sold 42,000 shares in De Tomaso Industries Inc., reducing his stake to 7% of the company's common outstanding.  Kjell Qvale, chairman of British Motor Car Distributors Ltd., said in a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission that he sold the shares July 5 to reduce his investment in De Tomaso Industries.  He now holds 143,956 shares, the filing said.  De Tomaso, which owns 51% of Maserati Automobiles, is based in Red Bank, N.J.  The nine domestic auto makers planned to build 108,204 cars this week, up 10.7% from the 97,758 cars built in the same week last year.  Production is up 27.7% from last week as all but a handful of plants have resumed full production after model changeovers.  For the year-to-date, U.S. car output of 4,290,380 vehicles is down less than 1% from the comparable year-ago period.  The Big Three auto makers plan to build 83,652 cars this week, up 4.9% from a year ago.  But the Big Three's share of domestic auto production this week fell to 77% from 81.5% as the Japanese auto makers continued to expand U.S. production.  General Motors Corp. is reopening 12 assembly plants this week.  Some of the reopenings were delayed from the original schedule because of slow sales.  Ford Motor Co. has daily overtime scheduled at the Mustang plant in Dearborn, Mich., and the Michigan Truck plant in Wayne, Mich.  ---  @ This Last Yr.  Ago -Yr. to Date- %  @ Week-e Week-r Week 1989 1988 Chg.  @ GM ...... 39,446 19,648 44,125 1,958,087 2,017,011 - 3  @ Ford .... 29,606 31,235 29,612 1,082,137 1,140,663 - 5  @ Chrysler 14,600 11,689 5,985 568,925 653,187 - 13  @ Honda ... 7,505 7,289 7,561 235,084 227,571 + 3  @ Nissan .. 2,460 1,878 2,898 71,651 64,974 + 10  @ Nummi-f . 4,000 4,190 3,331 126,894 102,570 + 24  @ Mazda ... 4,304 2,643 4,246 139,254 68,745 +103  @ Toyota .. 3,710 3,701 0 71,721 0 d  @ Diam.Star 2,573 2,479 0 36,627 0 d  @ Industry 108,204 84,752 97,758 4,290,380 4,310,560 - 0  d-Percent change greater than 999%. e-Estimated. f-Includes Chevrolet Prizm and Toyota Corolla. r-Revised.  A group of investors including WMG Co. sold 68,000 shares of Excel Bancorp Inc., reducing its stake to 8.03%.  The group sold the shares in Quincy, Mass.-based Excel Bancorp between July 17 and Aug. 2 at $11.95 to $12.3875 a share, according to a Securities and Exchange Commission filing.  Two Cresskill, N.J., investment partnerships said they raised their stake in Pacific First Financial Corp. to 8.53% of the shares outstanding.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, Alpine Associates and ZH Associates said they hold 649,300 Pacific First common shares, including net purchases of 86,500 shares from May 31 to Aug. 4 for $22.50 to $23.50 a share.  The filing didn't give a reason for the increase, but a previous filing said Pacific First shares had been purchased in the ordinary course of business.  Pacific First, based in Tacoma, Wash., operates savings banks.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Pacific First closed at $24.375, up 12.5 cents.  Cumberland Associates, a New York partnership, said it bought 13.03% of Canyon Resources Corp.'s common shares outstanding.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Cumberland said it acquired 1.2 million Canyon shares in a private transaction Aug. 2 for $2.4 million.  Cumberland said it acquired the shares "solely for investment."  Canyon, based in Golden, Colo., is a precious-metals exploration and development concern.  Wang Laboratories Inc. said its banks extended the deadline for renegotiating its growing short-term debt after more than a month of bargaining failed to produce an agreement.  The struggling computer giant said the bankers extended a waiver of non-compliance with the net worth requirements of its revolving credit lines to Aug. 16.  The waiver was to have expired yesterday.  Wang fell out of compliance with the debt agreements last week when it posted a net loss of $374.7 million for its fourth quarter ended June 30.  Frederick A. Wang, president and chief operating officer, resigned Tuesday.  His father, An Wang, who is chairman, founder and chief executive oficer, said the company will search for an outsider to fill the posts.  In American Stock Exchange trading yesterday, Wang Class B shares slipped 37.5 cents to close at $6.875, with 2 million shares changing hands.  Wang Class C stock, which elects a majority of the company's board, closed at $12 a share, up 25 cents.  More than 200 senators and representatives asked Secretary of State James Baker to "communicate our concern to the British government" about Sir James Goldsmith's #13.35 billion ($21.66 billion) highly leveraged bid for B.A.T Industries PLC.  The letter, signed by a wide range of lawmakers, expresses concern for employees and policyholders of B.A.T's U.S. units, Batus Inc., and Farmer's Group Inc., the California insurer.  The letter itself doesn't threaten any legislative action against the proposed transaction.  But it does underscore the increasing sentiment in Congress against foreign takeovers and highly leveraged takeovers in general.  "Goldsmith and his financial supporters have served notice on American workers, consumers, policyholders and policy makers that the use of debt to finance highly leveraged transactions has no limits," the letter said.  "Thousands of communities across America will be hurt by this hostile bid," said Sen. Mitch McConnell (R., Ky.), one of the letter's authors.  The letter's co-author, Sen. Wendell Ford (D., Ky.), called for a General Accounting Office investigation and a determination on whether the Securities and Exchange Commission could "assert jurisdiction" over the bid.  The bid for the British tobacco, retail and insurance concern must win U.S. regulatory approval for the acquisition of Farmer's Group, which Sir James's group plans to sell.  Sir James said: "I am shocked that 200 people would sign a letter attacking us without a single one of those people checking with us as to its accuracy or validity."  Industrial Equity (Pa cific) Ltd., a Hong Kong investment firm, said it sold its approximately 5.7% stake in AmBase Corp.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Industrial Equity said it sold 1.8 million AmBase common shares for $15.50 each and 162,300 shares at $15.75 apiece Monday.  Industrial Equity holds no remaining shares in AmBase, the filing said.  Trading in shares of Computer Associates International Inc. soared yesterday to nearly seven times the stock's recent average volume as investors reacted to news about the software company's earnings prospects.  When the dust settled, Computer Associates stock closed down $2.375 a share at $17 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  The stock was the second-largest loser on the Big Board in percentage terms.  The company triggered the sell-off with an announcement late Wednesday, after the stock market closed, of "substantial uncertainty" about Computer Associates' results for the quarter ending Sept. 30.  At issue is the company's pending acquisition of rival Cullinet Software Inc. Customers of Computer Associates' products have delayed purchases until the completion of the merger.  Cullinet stock tumbled $1.125 yesterday to $8.25.  A Securities and Exchange Commission official said the SEC yesterday gave final approval for Computer Associates to submit its prospectus to Cullinet shareholders.  Computer Associates has been a topic of debate among analysts recently.  Critics have argued that the company has sustained its growth only through acquisitions and is now so big that it can't buy companies fast enough to maintain that growth.  They also say Computer Associates has managed its financial statements more aggressively than is prudent.  The stock has lately become a favorite among short sellers.  They are betting the stock will fall and have borrowed shares to sell, expecting to replace them later with shares purchased at a lower price.  The short interest in the stock surged to 2.8 million shares as of July 14, up from only 401,000 a month earlier.  The bears applauded Wednesday's news and the resulting stock price tumble as confirmation of their suspicions.  "The company's going to let one shoe drop at a time," said one New York-based short seller.  "I'm not sure how many there are; but the company is in a lot of trouble.  It's not the growth story some people think it is."  Added another short seller from the Southwest who hasn't covered his position yet because he believes the stock is worth about only $6 a share: "The situation hasn't changed at the company. {The management} has just run out of accounting tricks."  Analyst Charles R. Taylor Jr. of Prudential-Bache Securities Inc. said he thinks the company will vindicate long-term investors.  "Computer Associates will be impacted in a very transitory way" by the acquisition delay, Mr. Taylor said.  Brian Taylor, who trades the stock for Dean Witter Reynolds, said much of the selling came from investors who "are tired of being ripped up every couple of months."  But he said a lot of investors, including himself, bought the stock, figuring it was a bargain at the lower price.  Investments in money-market mutual funds rose $1.24 billion to a new high in the week ended Wednesday.  Assets of the 463 funds tracked by the Investment Company Institute totaled $338.35 billion.  The Washington-based trade group noted that while assets in institutional funds decreased, assets of funds purchased by individuals increased.  Separately, Donoghue's Money Fund Report, a Holliston, Mass., newsletter, said earlier this week that the average seven-day compound money-fund yield fell to 8.68% from 8.84% a week earlier.  Assets of 141 institutional funds, the Investment Company Institute said, decreased $954 million, to $86.53 billion.  Assets of 227 general-purpose funds increased $676.8 million to $107 billion, while assets of 95 broker-dealer funds increased $1.52 billion to $144.81 billion.  My worst fears about the violent degeneration of Peruvian society were confirmed during a visit last month to the home of Congressman Manuel Piqueras.  After being let in by a pleasant-looking doorman with a submachine gun "hidden" in his left inside coat pocket, I was led to the living room where the congressman's 19-year-old daughter, Soledad, was recounting the day's events.  Less than an hour earlier, as she was coming out of a bank in a Lima suburb, two men had pushed a gun into her back and forced her into a car.  A hood was placed over her head, and she was addressed by name: "Soledad, you had better be careful."  The assailants clearly were not after her money, as they did not even check her pockets.  Nor did they attempt to abuse her physically.  After a 20-minute car ride, the young woman was abandoned in another part of Lima by her assailants.  Soledad's father, Manuel Piqueras, is head of a congressional commission formed to investigate the Rodrigo Franco Command, a paramilitary band of vigilantes presumed to be responsible for her abduction.  In inflation- and violence-ridden Peru, the Rodrigo Franco Command is merely another actor in what increasingly resembles a tragicomedy.  But its emergence adds a frightening new twist to the increasingly Lebanese-like situation here: The command purportedly has links to high-ranking members of President Alan Garcia's government, Mr. Garcia's APRA Party, and segments of the police and armed forces.  The very legitimacy of Peru's judicial and political institutions is at stake.  Peru already claimed two major guerrilla groups, the Castroite Tupac Amaru movement (MRTA), and the far more violent "Sendero Luminoso" -- Shining Path.  The Shining Path guerrilla movement has claimed more than 15,000 lives since it launched activities in 1980.  Its vision for Peru is an apocalyptic one, blending Gang-of-Four Maoism with a "back to the Incas" vision of society -- a vision that involves the destruction of all institutions and members of society that are non-Indian in origin.  Since the 1985 elections, Shining Path has effectively sabotaged all development efforts in the Andean region, and has killed 45 mayors, a direct threat to the coming municipal elections in November.  The army has grown increasingly impatient with the government's failure to adopt a coherent counterinsurgency policy, as well as with a drastic shortage of funds.  Army officers in some of the emergency zones were rumored so short of funds that they could not buy boots.  The air force, meanwhile, is forced to contract its helicopters out for private flights in order to cover costs.  The counterterrorist intelligence agency, "Dircote", is extremely frustrated with a judicial system that it believes is too lenient with terrorist suspects.  In the words of one former Dircote agent: "All of our exhaustive and patient work . . . disintegrated in midair when it reached the hands of the judges."  In July 1988, Sendero's supposed No. 2, Osman Morote, was captured and tried, but was found not guilty on several counts of terrorism.  On July 28, Osman Morote's defense lawyer, Manuel Febres, was kidnapped and murdered.  A group calling itself the "Comando Rodrigo Franco" -- named after a promising young APRA official killed by Sendero in August 1987 -- took responsibility.  The command has been most active in the emergency zones that are under military control.  It seems highly organized and secretive and clearly has access to intelligence information and sophisticated weapons, such as East German silencers that are normally used only by the military.  It almost always claims responsibility for its assaults, and targets not only Sendero sympathizers but anyone who criticizes the government.  Among its most infamous actions are:  -- The murder of Ayacucho journalist Juvenal Farfan, his wife and two children;  -- The dynamiting of the home of Oiga magazine editor Francisco Igartua, a conservative critic of the government;  -- The bombing of the tomb of a famous Ayacucho Senderista, Edith Lagos;  -- The murder of MRTA member Luis Miguel Pasake;  -- The murder of the head of the powerful anti-government miner's union, Saul Cantoral.  Although the crimes display the characteristics of terrorist assaults, all of the crimes committed by the command have been processed by the Homicide Division of the Police Services.  Its investigations have not led to the detention of a single suspected member of the command.  Protection requested by individuals receiving threats has not been extended.  Much of the speculation about government involvement with the command centers on the Ministry of the Interior and its new minister, Agustin Mantilla.  In May 1986, an executive Supreme Decree gave the ministry authority to approve budgets and obtain weapons for the expansion of "internal civil defense."  Mr. Mantilla, who was vice minister at the time, allegedly became personally involved in importing huge shipments of arms, apparently without the approval or knowledge of the joint armed forces command.  In October 1986, reporters received a tip about a shipment of 10,000 Kalashnikov rifles, 300 machine guns and 6.6 million pounds of ammunition from North Korea, which they discovered being unloaded from the ship El Maranon at the port of Callao.  Another large cache of weapons from North Korea -- mislabeled as "batteries and parts" -- was discovered on the ship Sabagal in March 1988 by Oiga magazine reporters.  Mr. Mantilla's brother, Coco, reportedly was seen directing the offloading of the second shipment.  Although he is not an official member of the ministry, he has been given a special license to import arms and is allegedly responsible for mislabeling the Sabagal shipment.  Promised investigations of the scandals have not been pursued by the government.  On Oct. 2, 1987, a car exploded outside the pro-Sendero newspaper, El Diario.  Two of the three youths in the car were killed, and one survived.  All three were members of the APRA youth.  The survivor, Jaime Rios Saenz, was taken to a police hospital and given priority treatment under direct orders from the Interior Ministry.  His whereabouts remain unknown, and there has been no progress made on judicial proceedings for the case.  The congressional commission appointed in June to investigate the command and its alleged links to the Interior Ministry is unlikely to turn up anything implicating APRA; Congress appointed an Aprista, Abdon Vilchez Melo, as its head.  Also, the seven-member commission has little funding and virtually no protection.  The assault on Mr. Piqueras's daughter was clearly an attempt to dissuade him from continuing the investigation.  The daunting task for those like Mr. Piqueras, who seek to support political and judicial institutions in this troubled nation, is to make sure that the term "Peruvianization" does not vie with "Lebanonization" as a code word for a nation's demise.  ---  Ms. Graham is a research fellow in foreign-policy studies at the Brookings Institution in Washington.  Trustcorp Bank, a unit of Trustcorp Inc., said it has decided to sell four offices in order to help gain regulatory approval of the bank's proposed purchase by Society Corp. of Cleveland.  The company expects the purchase to be completed by year end.  Society, also a banking company, agreed in June to acquire Trustcorp for 12.4 million of its shares.  At Society's over-the-counter share price of $38.875 yesterday, the transaction would be valued at $475.9 million.  Reynolds & Reynolds Co. said it received a three-year, $25 million business forms contract from Insurance Services Office Inc., New York.  Insurance Services provides forms, printing and actuarial services to more than 1,400 independent insurance companies, Reynolds & Reynolds said.  Reynolds & Reynolds was named the exclusive vendor to supply and distribute the organization's forms, the company said.  Reynolds & Reynolds supplies business forms and computer systems.  MGM Grand Inc.'s second-quarter net income soared to $19.2 million, or 92 cents a share, reflecting a $26.5 million pretax gain from the sale of Sands Hotel & Casino in Las Vegas, Nev.  Year-earlier second-quarter net of the hotel-casino and airline operator was $411,000, or two cents a share, after a $111,000 tax credit.  The latest-quarter earnings included a $352,000 tax credit.  Quarterly revenue fell 9.5% to $48 million from $53 million, reflecting the lack of operating revenue from the Sands.  MGM Grand said operating results from its Desert Inn Hotel & Casino improved in the period "as a result of increased gaming activity and an improved win percentage."  Fred Benninger, chairman and chief executive officer, said, "We are pleased with the return on our investment in the Sands.  A portion of the proceeds has been used to retire all of our outstanding debt and we are now positioned to focus our attention on the future development of the Desert Inn."  The company acquired Sands and Desert Inn in February 1988.  Operating results of the company's all-first-class airline, MGM Grand Air, also improved, with operating revenue climbing to $7.4 million from $5.7 million.  The number of passengers flown during the second quarter increased 16% from the year-earlier period, and the load factor, or percentage of available seats filled, rose to 76% from 62%.  Advance reservations increased 23% from last year.  The airline flies between New York and Los Angeles.  For the six months, MGM Grand's net jumped to $25.1 million, or $1.20 a share, from $1.3 million, or eight cents a share, a year ago.  Latest period net included a $1.8 million tax credit, compared with a $422,000 tax credit a year ago.  Revenue rose 25% to $112.5 million from $90.1 million.  Many of Merrill Lynch & Co.'s 11,000 brokers are steaming at a new policy at the firm, which the brokers say will force them to sell Merrill annuities exclusively.  The trouble started earlier this summer, when Merrill decided to maintain brokers' commissions on sales of Merrill annuities and eliminate them on non-Merrill annuities when investors switched from the Merrill product.  In a rare display of hostility between Merrill management and its retail sales force, the securities industry's largest, each side is accusing the other of ignoring the interest of Merrill clients.  The dispute is yet another reflection of the turmoil afflicting the brokerage business since the October 1987 stock market crash, when thousands of individuals fled the financial markets.  Annuities -- investment contracts that build up tax-deferred savings -- are a major money maker for securities brokers, especially since the crash cooled investors' passion for stocks.  Last year, sales of single-premium, interest-earning annuities increased 57% to $10.03 billion from $6.40 billion in 1987 at 40 large insurers surveyed by Life Insurance Marketing & Research Association of Hartford, Conn.  First-quarter sales of the product slipped 4% to $2.94 billion, "but we still expect the first-half sales to be greater than last year's first half," says Scott Dunn, an associate analyst. (The figures will be available today.)  Merrill says its policy, which becomes effective in January, is designed to protect clients' best interests, especially for an investment that's a lot different than stocks and bonds.  Most annuities impose contract-surrender charges that typically start at 7% of the account balance and are gradually phased out.  These provisions effectively lock-in investors for several years.  Also, unlike a bond, the principal of an annuity won't decline if interest rates rise.  But the security of the annuity depends on the issuing insurer.  "Annuities aren't designed to be swapped like stocks and bonds or mutual funds," says John L. Steffens, head of Merrill's retail brokerage division.  "Annuities should be sold on a long-term basis."  Some Merrill officials say the new policy was designed in part to discourage brokers from "churning" customer accounts, or switching from one annuity to another simply to gain a hefty commission.  Several brokers, who requested anonymity because they fear retribution from the firm, say the annuity policy will force them to sell the Merrill product exclusively.  "That's nonsense," says Mr. Steffens.  "The fact is our brokers have every opportunity to sell any {annuity} they want.  But they're not going to get paid" for selling the non-Merrill product.  In an industry motivated by financial incentives, that explanation rings hollow to the brokers.  "Brokers now are going to do only in-house Merrill Lynch annuities because if they go outside they won't get paid," says a Merrill account executive.  Merrill now takes about 4% of the money invested in annuities as a commission; about 36% of that goes to the broker.  Mr. Steffens acknowledges that dozens of brokers are upset about the new policy.  Still, he says these brokers are "a small group" in Merrill's sales force.  "They're acting extremely self-righteously," he says.  "We only had 1% of our products switched" into a non-Merrill annuity during the past year "while 13% of our annuity sales were switches from other {insurers'} annuities.  What we're really talking about is a non-event."  Merrill is considered among the top three annuity sellers in the U.S. and is convinced its products "are of a very high quality," says Mr. Steffens.  "The point is all annuities aren't created equal.  Take a look at the heartache people went through after buying annuities that were only as good as the company guaranteeing them."  The comment is a veiled reference to the collapse of big annuity writer Baldwin-United Corp. five years ago.  Many investors deserted annuities after that calamity and holders of the Baldwin annuities faced long delays and lower-than-expected interest on the money they had invested.  Norway's consumer price index as of July 15 rose 0.1% from June 15 and was up 4.8% from July 1988, the Central Bureau of Statistics said.  The government has set a goal of bringing inflation down to 4.4% for 1989.  The statistics agency said last month's slight rise was due mostly to food prices, which rose 1.3%, and furniture and household goods, which were up 0.2%.  First Federal Bancorp. said its Citizens Federal Savings Bank subsidiary agreed to buy nine northeast Florida branch locations from Anchor Savings Bank of Hewlett, N.Y.  The price wasn't disclosed.  The proposed acquisition, which still needs federal regulatory approval, would increase Citizens Federal's deposit base by $170 million to $245 million.  With the government projecting sharp rises in grain production this fall, U.S. agriculture appears to have rebounded from last year's devastating drought, despite pockets of severe crop damage.  But the Agriculture Department's first field survey of 1989 crop conditions indicates that the recovery will fall short of expectations for some crops, particularly corn.  The department forecast a corn harvest of 7.35 billion bushels, a 49% jump from last year's drought-stunted harvest of 4.9 billion bushels, while most market analysts had been more optimistic, pegging 1989 production at 7.5 billion bushels.  Department economists predicted a 24% jump in soybean production to 1.91 billion bushels, slightly higher than estimates made by private analysts.  On the basis of its Aug. 1 survey, the department projected wheat production at 2.04 billion bushels, up 13% from last year, but down 3% from its July 1 estimate.  The increase, however, isn't expected to be large enough to allow the U.S. to begin rebuilding its wheat stockpiles.  From the standpoint of the futures markets, the department's report was decidedly bullish.  Analysts foresee an initial flurry of trading on the markets this morning.  "I expect all grains to start out higher," said Ted Mao, a grain specialist for Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., New York.  Today "should be a pretty exciting day," said Katherina Zimmer, a Merrill Lynch & Co. analyst in New York.  "This report is unequivocally very bullish for wheat.  We will have the lowest wheat stocks in almost two decades."  On the farm-export front, the Agriculture Department had additional encouraging news for the Farm Belt.  Department analysts lowered their estimate of the 1989 Soviet grain crop by 10 million metric tons to 200 million tons, and raised their estimate of Soviet grain imports by three million metric tons to 36 million tons.  A metric ton is equal to about 2,204.62 pounds.  The changes reflect lower estimates of planted acreage and forecasts of reduced yields in some Soviet grain-growing areas because of dry, hot weather.  The department expects the Soviets to import 13 million metric tons of wheat and 22 million metric tons of corn and other coarse grains, as well as one million metric tons of rice and other grains in the marketing year that began July 1.  Despite lingering drought in the western Corn Belt, the department expects corn yields to average 112.8 bushels an acre, up 28.2 bushels from last year but 6.6 bushels below the record high of 119.4 bushels in 1987.  Record yields were foreseen for the Southeast.  The department lowered its corn-stocks forecast slightly, because of its lower crop estimate and higher expected use of corn as a feed grain, food ingredient and export item.  The nation is expected to have a corn stockpile of 1.68 billion bushels on Sept. 1, 1990, down 150 million bushels from the July 1 estimate.  This means that Agriculture Secretary Clayton Yeutter is likely to reduce the so-called land set-aside requirement for corn farmers next year.  Soybean yields were projected at 32.3 bushels an acre, which would be the fourth highest on record.  But some market analysts expect dry weather this month to trim that figure somewhat.  Department analysts expect weaker export demand for soybeans to offset a lower crop estimate, enabling the U.S. to start rebuilding its soybean stockpile.  They predicted a stockpile of 285 million metric tons by Sept. 1, 1990, up from 155 million tons projected for this Sept. 1.  Expansion in spring wheat planting was expected to more than make up for frost and drought damage to the winter-wheat crop, which was planted last fall and harvested early this summer.  The department forecast durum wheat production at 90.7 million bushels, slightly more than double that of last year, and other spring wheat at 487 million bushels, more than double last year's crop.  But winter-wheat producers were expected to harvest 1.47 billion bushels, 6% less than last year.  Because of strong export demand and domestic consumption, the nation's wheat stockpile is expected to total only 474 million bushels on May 31, 1990, the lowest level since the mid-1970s.  Ms. Zimmer, the Merrill Lynch analyst, predicted that the tight wheat supply will drive up wheat futures prices by at least 50 cents a bushel over the next three months, and that next fall, farmers "are going to plant wheat wall to wall."  Frank B. Hall & Co.'s losses continued to widen in the second quarter and its largest holder, Reliance Group Holdings Inc., pledged a $50 million infusion for working capital.  The insurance brokerage and employee benefits consultant reported its second-quarter net loss widened to $60.8 million, from a net loss of $7.1 million a year ago, largely because of charges related to discontinued operations.  Hall, based in Briarcliff Manor, N.Y., said it agreed in principle to issue $50 million in a new series of convertible preferred shares to Reliance Group Holdings, controlled by Saul Steinberg.  After accounting for warrants and preferred stock, Reliance holds a total 74% of Hall.  A spokesman for Hall couldn't say how much the issue would increase Reliance's stake, because terms were still being negotiated.  Hall said in a statement the issue was "strategically important" because it would strengthen Hall's financial position and provide working capital and money for acquisitions.  Hall said it recorded $50 million in charges in the quarter.  The charges include $16 million for a reserve to settle litigation against Hall's former underwriting subsidiary, Union Indemnity Insurance Co. Hall will make an initial payment of $19 million, covered by liability insurance, and $29 million over 10 years, to be paid by the company, to settle the suit.  The charges also included $15 million for Adjustco, a discontinued claims administrator, and $19 million for certain reinsurance operations that aren't writing any new business, as well as other litigation.  Without the charges, Hall had an operating loss of $10.8 million, wider than the net loss of $7.1 million a year earlier.  Hall said the higher operating loss resulted from increased spending to recruit new technical personnel, and increased costs for automations systems, part of Hall's strategic plan.  Revenue rose 4.2% to $93 million from $89.2 million, a result of new business production and retained accounts in the quarter.  Hall said revenue grew despite widespread rate-cutting in the property/casualty insurance industry, reducing brokers' commissions.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Hall shares closed at $3.75, down 12.5 cents.  First Eastern Corp. said it agreed in principle to acquire First National Bank of Wyoming, Pa., for about $12.4 million in stock.  First National holders would receive 143 shares of First Eastern stock for each of the 2,500 First National shares outstanding.  The acquisition is subject to approval by First National holders and regulators.  First Eastern has more than $2.4 billion in assets and 54 branches throughout northeastern Pennsylvania.  First National has $50 million in assets at its one branch.  The law firm of Jenkens & Gilchrist, under fire for its advice to three failed savings and loan associations, agreed to settle malpractice claims brought against it by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp. for $20 million, according to people familiar with the settlement.  The settlement, if approved by U.S. District Judge A. Joe Fish of Dallas, would rank among the five largest malpractice settlements ever paid by a law firm in the U.S., according to malpractice insurers.  The payment also would rank as the second largest obtained by the FSLIC in its prosecution of malpractice claims against law firms that advised savings associations.  A year ago, the Philadelphia law firm of Blank, Rome, Comisky & McCauley agreed to pay the FSLIC $40 million to settle claims from the law firm's involvement with Sunrise Savings & Loan Association of Boynton Beach, Fla.  That settlement was rejected by the federal judge handling the case but has been resubmitted and is awaiting the judge's written approval.  The FSLIC initially sought $100 million from Jenkens & Gilchrist in a lawsuit filed in June 1987 over the firm's advice to the now-defunct State Savings & Loan Association of Lubbock, Texas, and Brownfield Savings & Loan Association of Brownfield, Texas.  The cost of defending that lawsuit -- more than $5 million -- prompted Jenkens & Gilchrist's lead malpractice insurer, Texas Lawyers Insurance Exchange, to file a separate suit to withdraw its coverage.  A state district judge ruled last month, however, that the policy didn't permit the coverage to be withdrawn.  Jenkens & Gilchrist, with 183 lawyers, is settling the FSLIC suit involving the two S&Ls for $10 million, all but $150,000 of which will be covered by the firm's policy with Texas Lawyers Insurance Exchange.  Gregory, Self & Beutenmuller, a small firm that spun off from Jenkens & Gilchrist, is separately paying the FSLIC $5 million to settle.  Four former partners from Jenkens & Gilchrist aren't settling, according to a letter to Judge Fish from Jenkens & Gilchrist's defense attorney, Lyman G. Hughes.  A separate agreement with the FSLIC calls for Jenkens & Gilchrist's insurers to pay $10 million to settle claims not yet filed involving the firm's work for Vernon Savings & Loan Association, a Dallas thrift whose lending practices have led to federal criminal charges against seven former officers and borrowers.  Thomas Cantrill, a Jenkens & Gilchrist managing partner, wouldn't comment on the terms of the settlement, except to say, "We are working with the FSLIC in an effort to resolve our differences."  Lawyers with the Federal Home Loan Bank Board in Washington, representing the FSLIC, also declined to comment on the terms of the settlement.  Shrugging off repeated warnings of an impending recession, the Dow Jones Industrial Average briefly topped its pre-crash closing high yesterday.  Most of the other widely watched U.S. stock averages have already set new highs.  But even more striking is how the strength in American stocks is being matched by surging prices in most of the world's equity markets.  Tokyo's market, defying some Americans' predictions that its towering stock prices could only lead to a terrible plunge, has kept climbing to a record.  West Germany's stock market is up 17% since April.  London has been strong, and Stockholm is up a whopping 63% from its low point of the past 12 months.  Political turmoil in Italy hasn't stopped its equity market from setting highs since the 1987 crash.  Hong Kong stocks are an exception.  They rose steadily in the 1989 first half but then dropped, undermined by the upheaval in China and an uncertain future after the British colony reverts to Chinese control in 1997; even so, they are down only 3.3% for the year.  Yoshindo Takahashi, the president of Nomura Securities Co.'s research arm in the U.S., notes that for the moment, anyway, the world's markets seem to have forgotten about some of the problems that rattled them in the past: oil shocks, international debt problems, inflation worries and U.S. budget deficits.  That spate of amnesia was evident on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday.  The Dow Jones Industrials climbed above their old closing high of 2722.42 before easing back on profit taking to end at 2712.63, up 26.55 points on the day.  What's sparking the gains in country after country?  Foreign stocks have been pulled higher partly by the updraft from Wall Street.  The U.S. economy, for all its problems, is still a dominant force, and, consequently, so is the U.S. stock market.  "The most important unifying theme is that the Federal Reserve in the U.S. has so far been able to achieve a soft landing without putting the U.S. economy into a recession and {nevertheless} keep the rate of inflation within acceptable limits," says Graeme MacLennan, investment director at Ivory & Sime PLC in Edinburgh, Scotland.  World-wide, equity investors have enjoyed a similar bouillabaisse of delectable trends: falling interest rates, solid corporate profits, steady economic growth, relatively low inflation and mostly hospitable political environments.  "The world economies are still in a growth stage," says Matthew Windridge, the research chief at Banque Paribas Capital Markets Ltd. in London.  Before the October 1987 market crash, he says, "markets either got overheated or there was a potential for overheating.  Now, markets are anticipating that that's been avoided and that the old cycle of four years of growth and two years of recession has been avoided."  About half of this year's international bull market is due to just a natural recovery from the global crash of two years ago, according to Anthony Regan, the chief international investment officer for Putnam Cos., a Boston fund-management firm.  "The crash is receding from memory," he says.  "You have prices that are generally no higher than before the crash, yet corporate earnings and dividends have continued to grow strongly."  Helping keep the bull market going have been political developments.  "There's been a confluence of a world-wide shift to the right, a pro-business bent and the globalization of markets and business," says Donald P. Haroz, the international portfolio strategist for Hoguet, Keller, Wittman & Co., a New York money-management firm.  He cites the conservative governments of Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher in Britain and Chancellor Hermut Kohl in West Germany; President Bush's administration, widely considered a friendly carry-over from Ronald Reagan's; in Japan, the continuing dominance of the free-market ideals of the ruling Liberal Democratic Party, even though the party itself has become a bit wobbly.  "Even France, though it returned to a Socialist government, is socialist with a center-right flavor," Mr. Haroz says.  Mr. MacLennan of Ivory & Sime notes the "corporate takeover syndrome, not just in the U.S. but the U.K., where we are getting megabids."  Noting the $21.37 billion offer for B.A.T Industries PLC and the $5.67 billion that Hanson PLC paid for Consolidated Gold Fields PLC, he adds: "Even by American standards, these are enormous bids."  Much of Europe's acquisition activity has been sparked by the plan to pull down trade barriers in the 12-nation European Community in 1992.  Although takeovers, particularly hostile ones, remain relatively rare on the Continent, money managers expect more and more of them in West Germany, France and the Netherlands.  The prospect of an increasingly competitive environment after 1992 also has been encouraging companies to control costs and raise productivity -- moves that bolster their profits and their stocks.  Simultaneously, Mr. Windridge of Paribas says, "markets are anticipating the end of the cold war and the potential for much more trade with the East Bloc."  So far, the biggest beneficiaries have been the West German and Austrian stock markets because of those countries' traditionally strong trading relationships.  Also propelling the global bull markets have been ample liquidity -- available cash -- and solid corporate profits.  Major central banks, fearing a global recession after the market crash, relaxed their monetary policies to reduce interest rates.  At the same time, some economists say, the currency-stabilization moves since February 1987 have forced central banks to intervene heavily in foreign-exchange markets.  That also has lead to easier credit policies, especially in Japan.  The upshot: A lot of money has been sloshing around the world, and institutional money managers have been pouring it into stock markets.  For institutions -- not individuals -- are powering this year's rally.  Small investors were clobbered by the crash and "in most countries are still nervous about buying equities," Putnam's Mr. Regan says.  Foreign investors are also playing a role, and the smaller the market the greater their influence.  Foreigners represent only about 3% to 4% of the total value of the Tokyo stock market, but they can account for as much as 15% to 20% of some smaller bourses, analysts say.  They specifically point to the Spanish, Australian, Austrian and Scandinavian markets.  "One of the biggest influences in overseas markets is Japanese money," says Mr. MacLennan of Ivory & Sime, which manages funds for two large Japanese institutions.  He says that as they grow more knowledgeable about foreign equities, Japanese institutions such as life insurers and trust banks are diversifying their equity investments away from Wall Street -- which used to account for as much as 90% of their overseas stock portfolios.  Foreign money can be mixed blessing, however.  "If you see a major correction, foreign money is likely to move very quickly," says Mr. Windridge of Paribas.  In addition, money managers warn that foreign institutions, which look at more than just stock prices, may shift large sums quickly if currency expectations change markedly.  The 1987 crash, coupled with this year's bull market, persuades some analysts that global equity markets are generally linked in the direction they move, though their movements vary widely in degree.  Thus, Mr. MacLennan says, "if we hit a glitch, all the stock markets" may well slump.  However, many analysts remain cautiously optimistic for the rest of this year and into the 1990 first quarter, though few expect stock-market gains matching those since the crash.  Behind the optimism: a combination of stable commodity prices, receding inflation and high liquidity.  In addition, most economists see interest rates generally falling, except in Japan.  Moreover, the global economic slowdown that would accompany lower interest rates may not affect all countries simultaneously.  A recent study by Salomon Brothers contends that business cycles in the U.S., Japan and West Germany -- the three biggest economies -- are less synchronized than at any time in the past 20 years.  Nicholas P. Sargen, an economist at Salomon, says that while the U.S. economy is slowing quickly, economic growth in Japan and Germany is exceeding expectations.  Moreover, both Japan and Germany are expected to stimulate their domestic economies, Mr. Sargen says.  Japan's cabinet recently approved a tentative budget calling for a 3% rise in spending, the biggest increase in a decade.  West Germany is scheduled to cut income taxes.  "Thus, while the U.S. economy is currently slowing, a slowdown in Japan and Germany may not occur until next year," Mr. Sargen says.  Therefore, he views the risk of a global recession as "slight."  USAir Leasing & Services, a unit of USAir Group Inc. said it ordered 10 new Dash 8 aircraft from a Boeing Co. unit for $86 million.  USAir Leasing said the transaction consists of firm orders for six 37/40 passenger series 100 models of the Dash 8 twin-engine turboprop aircraft and four larger 50/56-seat series 300s.  USAir said options also were taken on 10 more Dash 8s, with models to be determined later.  USAir said deliveries of the firm orders are scheduled to begin in the 1990 third quarter and continue through the first quarter of 1992.  The optioned aircraft would be delivered in 1992-1993.  USAir Leasing, based in Arlington, Va., will lease the new planes to the four USAir Express airlines that are also subsidiaries of USAir Group.  In its first crackdown on generic drug companies involved in fraudulent activities, the Food and Drug Administration revoked recent drug approvals granted to Par Pharmaceutical Inc. and American Therapeutics Inc.  The revocation involves chlorzoxazone, a generic version of Parafon Forte, made by a Johnson & Johnson division.  Par received its approval for the muscle relaxant June 5 and ATI got its approval June 23.  FDA Commissioner Frank E. Young emphasized that if the generic drug scandal worsens "there is a real possibility" that the industry "may be totally discredited."  He added that unless the agency moves swiftly "to safeguard the generic drug review system, the potential for a loss in public trust in generic drugs may be realized."  Three FDA employees have pleaded guilty to charges that they took illegal gratuities from generic drug firms, and Commissioner Young has testified that he expects more indictments within the agency.  Brand name drug companies are also affected by the FDA investigation of generic drug companies.  Agency approvals of both brand name and generic drugs have "slowed dramatically," in the past couple of months, Mr. Young said, as the FDA performs retrospective reviews of already marketed generic drugs.  "These re-evaluations are aimed at ensuring that previous approvals were conducted in a fair and scientifically sound manner and were not based on fraudulent information," he said.  Mr. Young has come under attack from the House Energy and Commerce Subcommittee as well as from generic drug makers to revoke drug approvals from companies that cheated or made payoffs to obtain drug approvals.  Leading this effort are Mylan Laboratories Inc., Pittsburgh, and Barr Laboratories Inc. of Pomona, N.Y. Barr even took the unusual step of petitioning the FDA to revoke all drug approvals granted to Par since 1986 and to ATI since October 1984.  The FDA's action against Par, of Spring Valley, N.Y., and American Therapeutics, of Bohemia, N.Y., didn't arise from allegations of payoffs related to the approval of chlorzoxazone.  Instead, the action was based on plant inspections that disclosed "significant manufacturing problems," according to a letter to the Health and Human Services Department from Commissioner Young.  The letter wasn't more specific about what problems were found.  David Weeda, an attorney for ATI, charged that the FDA didn't follow proper procedures to revoke the drug.  "The FDA had no legal authority to do it, and there's nothing wrong with the product."  Mr. Weeda also said only problems with the company's labeling and packaging turned up during the FDA's inspection.  He said the drug never was sold on the market.  A spokesman at Par confirmed that the FDA revoked its chlorzoxazone approval after it had already begun shipping the drug.  The spokesman said the revocation came in the midst of a plant inspection that is still running and began "in May or June.  The FDA inspectors are still here.  They've given us one report, a list of findings, and I don't know whether we've fully responded."  He said the FDA didn't find any health or safety problems with the drug.  FDA Commissioner Young said in the letter that the agency should have held off on approving Par's and ATI's applications.  "Given that, we have decided to rescind these approvals, despite the risk of ensuing litigation," he said.  The FDA's action seems to reverse an earlier position.  In July, Commissioner Young testified before a congressional subcommittee that the FDA didn't have any legal grounds to withhold products made by companies involved in wrongdoing or companies whose employees have made payoffs to speed up or slow down drug approvals.  He said at the time that if the FDA were to take such action it would expose itself to undue risk of litigation.  Mr. Young also testified that the FDA could act more swiftly if legislation were passed allowing it to debar companies involved in corruption or to revoke or refuse to approve applications from companies over a certain length of time.  Earlier this week Par said that its president plans to retire and that it expects to report a net loss of more than $1.7 million for its fiscal third quarter.  The loss for the quarter, ended July 1, includes about $3.5 million in charges related to product recalls, fines related to guilty pleas by the company in the federal criminal investigation, and certain write-offs.  A year earlier, the company had net income of $2 million, or 18 cents a share, on sales of $24.7 million.  Par and its Quad unit recently pleaded guilty to one count of providing an unlawful gratuity to an FDA employee.  A former senior vice president of Par, Ashok Patel, and Dilip P. Shah, former president of Quad, each pleaded guilty to a related charge.  Subsequently, the company disclosed that it had filed false drug data with the FDA, was recalling one of its drugs and had stopped selling two others.  So far, the company has recalled three drugs.  Of the three FDA reviewers who pleaded guilty to accepting bribes, one acknowledged accepting illegal gratuities totaling $9,600 from former top officers at ATI.  A former FDA generic branch chief pleaded guilty to two counts of interstate travel in aid of racketeering after accepting a trip to Bangkok and London and after accepting furniture paid for at the direction of ATI's president.  The third FDA reviewer pleaded guilty to accepting two $500 gift certificates from Mr. Shah.  The company, which hasn't been charged in the criminal investigation, has repeatedly denied any wrongdoing on its part or that of its executives.  Sony is thinking small in a big way about video.  A decade after its Betamax home-video format lost out to rival VHS, Sony Corp. of America, a unit of the Japanese consumer-electronics giant, is trying to force its way back into the video limelight with its 8mm format, launched four years ago.  Sony hopes to popularize "Video 8" through the concept of "personal video" -- video wherever you go -- as exemplified by its Video Walkman line: tiny battery-operated color mini-TVs with built-in videocassette recorders.  Sony Corp. has heavily promoted the Video Walkman since the product's introduction last summer, but Bob Gerson, video editor of This Week in Consumer Electronics, says Sony conceives of 8mm as a "family of products, camcorders and VCR decks," whose sales will reinforce one another.  He dismisses the Video Walkman as an attention-getting gimmick aimed mainly at well-heeled trend setters: "At $1,000 a pop, you don't sell many of these things."  However, he adds, "It's no secret that Sony is looking at 8mm as an all-purpose format."  More important to the future of 8mm is Sony's success in the $2.3 billion camcorder market.  The Japanese company already has 12% of the total camcorder market, ranking it third behind the RCA and Panasonic brands.  But 8mm video faces problems and tough competition.  For instance, the rival VHS format has "really got its hooks into the American consumer," says Thomas Chesser, an electronics analyst at Smith Barney.  And, 8mm cassettes can't be played on existing VHS equipment.  In addition, there's a relative lack of film titles available in 8mm.  The great advantage of 8mm is size.  Over the past four years, 8mm video camcorders have been a big success among home-video buffs and techno-junkies, who have bought more than one million of the compact units that record and play videos on tapes the size of audiocassettes.  That compares with roughly paperback-book dimensions for VHS.  Accordingly, most VHS camcorders are usually bulky and weigh around eight pounds or more.  In contrast, Sony this month will introduce a full-featured, $1,500 palm-sized 8mm model, the CCD-TR5 Handycam, tipping the scales at less than two pounds.  But 8mm is not automatically the walk-away winner in the compact-camcorder sweepstakes.  To compete with Video 8, Matsushita Electric Co.'s 51%-owned JVC unit introduced in 1986 a compact version of its dominant VHS format, called VHS-C, that is nearly as small as an 8mm videocassette.  And VHS-C can be played on existing VHS machines with only a simple adapter; by contrast, 8mm tapes are incompatible with the VHS machines.  At present, VHS-C machines can record for only 20 or 30 minutes, while 8mm tapes run as long as two hours.  JVC says it is developing a 40-minute VHS-C cassette and that an enhanced Super VHS version of VHC-C (or S-VHS-C) due this fall would be long enough to show a feature film in the extended-play mode with little detectable picture deterioration.  This summer, JVC launched an ad campaign emphasizing the VHS-C's compatibility advantage over 8mm, while its sister company, Panasonic, recently cut list prices $100 to $200 on some of its VHS-C models, to as low as $799.  List prices on Sony's camcorders begin at $1,300.  Another problem for Sony is that while nearly every movie title is available on VHS cassettes, there are currently only about 1,400 titles on 8mm video.  Of those, roughly 250 are feature films; the rest are video magazines, instructional films and documentaries.  At present, Sony itself is the primary distributor of prerecorded 8mm tapes through its mail-order Cinema 8 movie club.  Bill Fisher, national software-marketing manager with Sony Video Products Co., says the company is adding three titles a month through licensing agreements with the home-video units of Paramount Communications Inc., Nelson Entertainment Co. and Warner Communications Inc.  For its part, the unit of what will soon be Time Warner Inc., entered the market last fall with 33 older catalog titles, and this year will release 20 new 8mm titles.  And other companies, such as MGM/UA Communications Co. and RCA/Columbia have agreed to license some older titles to Sony.  Some studios remain hesitant to enter the market because there isn't a critical mass of 8mm machines in consumers' homes.  "It's the proverbial chicken and egg situation," says George Krieger, president and chief executive officer of CBS/Fox Home Video, a leading videocassette distributor that is a joint venture of CBS Inc. and News Corp.'s 20th Century Fox studio, which isn't supplying any 8mm tapes at present.  Likewise, MCA Inc.'s home-video unit, which distributes movies made by Universal Studios, says it's looking at the business but isn't in it yet.  And video retailers are entering the market warily.  Tower Records, a 50-store audio and video retail chain based in Sacramento, Calif., has been "testing" 8mm software sales since April in 12 of its leading stores.  John Thrasher, Tower's top video buyer, says he is "really pleased" with most of the test locations, but hastens to add: "I don't know how big of an investment that we as a retailer can invest in {another} video format."  In any case, he says he intends to keep at least "a representation of some really hot titles" in 8mm.  Minneapolis-based Musicland Group announced last Friday that it will begin test marketing of prerecorded 8mm cassettes at 19 of its 745 audio and video outlets this month.  RKO-Warner Video Inc., a 31-store New York-area chain, is also dipping its toe into the 8mm pool this month.  "We want to be there if there is a business in 8mm," says Jeff Levy, RKO-Warner vice president, for purchasing.  Despite the heat of competition, Mr. Gerson of This Week in Consumer Electronics thinks Sony can succeed in the home-video market in the same way it has thrived in the highly competitive color-television-set market.  "Sony only has 8% of the market," he explains, "but they have 20% of the {high-end} market they want, and that's not bad."  Bolar Pharmaceutical Co. said it and three officials were sued in federal court by a shareholder charging fraud and other misrepresentations, and violation of securities laws.  The complaint, filed in Brooklyn federal court, seeks unspecified damages.  The suit was filed by Martin Bergstein against Bolar; Robert Shulman, its president; Larry Raisfeld, a founder and secretary treasurer, and Jack Rivers, executive vice president.  The proposed class includes those who purchased shares in Bolar, a maker of generic drugs, between Aug. 21, 1987, and Aug. 3, 1989.  The suit charges that Bolar and its officials failed to disclose that Bolar's application for Food and Drug Administration approval to make the generic version of SmithKline Beecham PLC's Dyazide brand blood-pressure medicine was "fraudulent and questionable."  As reported, congressional investigators said they received information that suggests Bolar filled capsules with SmithKline Beecham's Dyazide to win U.S. approval of its own generic form of the drug.  Bolar has denied the company passed off the brand-name drug as its own in testing procedures.  Bolar said it and the individual defendants believe the allegations in the suit are without merit, and that it intends to defend the action vigorously.  Jardine Fleming Holdings Ltd. of Hong Kong said it has received a license from the Indonesian government to open the country's first foreign joint venture in stockbroking.  The venture, also allowed to carry out corporate-finance and venture-capital activities, is named P.T. Jardine Fleming Nusantara Finance.  Jardine Fleming will hold 85% of the equity.  The other 15% will be owned by P.T. Rajawali Wira Bhakti Utama.  The new firm, set to begin business later this month, will have a paid-up capital of 15 billion rupiah ($8.5 million).  Last December, the Indonesian government announced a series of measures to help build the country's small capital market.  One measure allowed foreign firms to set up stockbrokerage units locally, as long as an Indonesian partner held at least a 15% interest in the firm.  This year, following expansion of the Jakarta Stock Exchange, a number of foreign firms are believed to have applied to the Finance Ministry for such licenses.  Rajawali Wira Bhakti Utama is owned by three Indonesian business groups.  One is Gadjah Tunggal Group, which is primarily active in the tire business.  Ometraco Group is involved in feedmills and manufacturing.  The third is Danaswara Group, headed by businessman Peter Sondakh, who is president-director of Rajawali.  Rajawali Wira is an investor in a private television channel for Jakarta along with a son of President Suharto.  Alan H. Smith, managing director of Jardine Fleming Holdings, said in Hong Kong that his company believes deregulation measures in Indonesia "have added a much needed impetus to the development of the local capital markets."  Jardine Fleming in March launched a $25 million Indonesia Fund to buy listed shares on the Jakarta Stock Exchange.  In the past six months, the Jakarta exchange has drawn wide foreign interest.  Mr. Smith said Indonesia is going to be "an expanding and interesting market" where his company wants to be active.  Hot spots of aflatoxin, the potent carcinogen that plagued the U.S. corn crop last year, are flaring up in south Texas and the Midwest.  The outbreak of the fungus-produced poison in south Texas is of particular concern.  Much of the region's recently harvested corn crop, one of the first to be harvested in the U.S., is used by many food companies for tortillas, snack food and popcorn.  Some grain elevators in the region have refused to buy between 30% and 60% of the corn brought to them in recent weeks by farmers because tests have detected unsafe levels of aflatoxin.  At least one corn sample tested by government scientists showed 75 times the amount of aflatoxin considered safe for human consumption.  "We have a very severe and critical situation," said Richard Whittington, Hidalgo County executive director of the U.S. Agriculture Department's Agricultural Stabilization and Conservation Service, which doles out crop price supports.  "This will bankrupt some farmers."  Earlier this week, state authorities embargoed 70,000 pounds of year-old corn because of aflatoxin contamination and regulators have picked up surveillance of corn millers that might ship product out of Texas.  Meanwhile, farmers in some counties of western Illinois and eastern Iowa are discovering a worse aflatoxin problem than earlier thought with the corn harvested during last year's rare outbreak.  Between 20% and 50% of the farmers in some counties have found aflatoxin in their corn bins, according to crop scientists and government officials.  It was never clear earlier how widespread the problem was.  Government surveys in Iowa and Illinois last fall found dangerous levels of aflatoxin in about one-third of the corn sampled, but the surveys were too small to be statistically valid.  Some experts believe that the aflatoxin, as earlier feared, multiplied over the winter in poorly stored corn.  Aflatoxin, which causes liver cancer in laboratory rats and is poisonous to humans, is excreted by a fungus that thrives in hot climates in Asia and Africa, and occasionally in the southern U.S.  The outbreak in the Midwest last year was widely blamed on the worst drought in 50 years.  The continuing problem with aflatoxin is taxing the ability of U.S. regulators to keep corn safe for human consumption, an issue that has already prompted Congress to hold hearings and some states to adopt their own screening procedures.  Indeed, there is new evidence that aflatoxin-contaminated corn is seeping into the food chain, albeit at a slower rate than this spring, when spot-checking by state and federal inspectors discovered aflatoxin in unsafe levels in milk and milled corn, and in lesser amounts in cereal and popcorn.  Earlier this summer, federal investigators found a trace of aflatoxin in a sample of chips made from corn.  While the amount wasn't dangerously high, it shows that the poison can slip through the screening procedures of grain handlers and food companies.  One month ago, a northern Illinois dairy dumped milk after cows apparently ate tainted corn.  It is impossible to know, however, whether this is happening in quantities that might present a public health hazard.  Aflatoxin is so potent that the FDA considers corn unsafe for human consumption if it contains more than 20 parts of aflatoxin per billion, an amount that is often difficult to detect reliably under the best of laboratory conditions.  Large companies that use Texas-grown corn to make snack foods, such as Borden Inc. and PepsiCo Inc.'s Frito-Lay Inc. unit, said they either aren't buying corn from south Texas this year, or haven't detected any aflatoxin.  There isn't any evidence yet that contaminated corn from south Texas has entered the food chain.  The crop represents a tiny fraction of U.S. production, and it is too early for much of it to have been processed yet.  But Texas authorities are concerned that some grain elevators aren't equipped to stringently test the corn crop they are selling to small tortilla makers, which themselves aren't outfitted to test what is a staple among the Hispanic population.  Texas officials are also concerned that some contaminated corn might have been shipped into Mexico, which is also thought to have a problem with aflatoxin in corn grown on its side of the border.  After losses for three consecutive quarters, Telesphere International Inc. expects to report earnings next week that will surpass its break-even goal for the second quarter, said Harry Thompson, chairman.  The communications concern expects to announce as much as $100,000 in earnings, or about one cent a share, on revenue of just over $44 million, Mr. Thompson said in an interview.  The turnaround comes after a major makeover in ownership, management and financial operations.  For the year-earlier period, Telesphere had earnings of 10 cents a share.  Revenue increased about $9.5 million from a year earlier, Mr. Thompson said.  Eugene Ruiz, a Telesphere senior vice president, said the company has improved its position with vendors who "previously were going to shut off the company."  Telesphere had been plagued by billing and collection problems, especially in its 900-line interactive services and its alternate-operator services segments, which each account for about a third of the company's revenue.  Alternate-operator services supply telephone credit-card billing and operator-assistance services primarily to hotels.  While Telesphere has shifted all debt and collection responsibilities to the individual information providers on its 900 services, the company still carries nearly $1.9 million in bad debt, primarily from its operator services, according to Mr. Ruiz.  The company's revival began with an infusion of cash from New York investor Francesco Galesi in January.  Mr. Galesi's move came after the resignation of the company's founder and chairman, Dennis J. Casey, in October 1988.  Mr. Thompson said Mr. Galesi is to purchase a final installment of $4.2 million in debentures this week, bringing his rescue effort to $15 million.  Under Messrs.  Thompson and Ruiz, who both joined the company four months ago, Telesphere has brought in a new chief financial officer, new chief operating officer and new marketing executives.  Telesphere announced Wednesday that investor George D. Gould, former undersecretary of the Treasury Department; Alan Rossi, chairman and chief executive officer of Voicemail International Inc.; and investor A. Jones Yorke, a former president of Paine Webber Jackson & Curtis and a former executive director of the Securities and Exchange Commission, are to be elected to the company's board at the annual meeting Sept. 26.  They will join Mr. Thompson and Joseph W. Bartlett, partner in the law firm of Gaston & Snow, on the board.  Despite the collapse of so-called gab-party lines, Telesphere has seen a big boost in revenue from its 900-line business, which has grown to 450 from 50 information-provider services.  The segment, which includes information by phone as well as survey and contest services, accounts for 40% of revenue, with projections that it will provide 50% of revenue by year's end, according to Mr. Thompson.  In addition, Telesphere's 1+ dedicated-WATS service is also showing growth, and the company has brought line costs down by $1 million a month for each of the past six months, Mr. Thompson said.  For the six months, revenue reached about $79 million, about even with the comparable year-ago period, Mr. Thompson said.  He said that Telesphere will continue to concentrate on its turnaround and internal growth but that it will look for acquisitions as its financial health continues to improve.  The company hasn't defaulted on any principal debt payments, according to Mr. Ruiz.  He said Telesphere makes payments of $350,000 in principal and $480,000 in interest each month.  "There was an awful lot left undone by previous management in every area," Mr. Thompson said.  "We're moving now into a position where there won't be so many surprises," he said.  Alamo Rent A Car Inc. is suing Illinois over a new law that drastically reduces the need for a motorist to pay for a "collision-damage waiver," a form of car-rental insurance.  In one of the first laws of its kind, Illinois this year adopted a measure that limits to $200 the amount a car-rental company can charge a renter for car damage.  That practically eliminates the need for renters to pay for the waiver, which typically costs $9 to $13 a day.  The waiver essentially is an agreement that the company won't sue the driver in most cases to recover such damage costs.  In a suit filed in state court, Alamo, based in Fort Lauderdale, Fla., alleges that the new law is unconstitutional.  Alamo claims the law deprives the company of its right to try to recover costs for damages to its cars.  Officials at Illinois's secretary of state office declined to comment.  Consumer groups have criticized car-rental companies for selling the waivers to renters who might not need them because their personal vehicle-insurance coverage already protects them.  New York is the only other state that has passed a similar law.  The liability limit there is $100.  Neoax Inc. said it agreed to sell its Superior Air Parts Inc. unit for $29.5 million to a new company formed by HMA Investments Inc.  The Stamford, Conn., company said it expects a third-quarter pretax gain of $6 million, all to be sheltered by tax-loss carryforwards.  Completion of the deal is subject to the buyer obtaining financing.  The transaction includes a non-compete agreement between Neoax and the newly formed SP Acquisitions Corp., of New Canaan, Conn.  Superior is a parts supplier for piston aircraft engines.  This would be the third sale of a Neoax subsidiary in just over a month and would complete the sell-off of the company's precision components segment.  The proceeds from the three transactions will be about $200 million with anticipated pretax gains of about $83 million, all expected to be recorded in the third quarter, Neoax said.  Neoax's primary business, through its International Mill Service unit, is recycling steel and aluminum products, and handling environmentally sensitive waste.  Dow Chemical Canada Inc. and Shell Canada Ltd. said they plan to build a fractionation plant in Fort Saskatchewan, Alberta, for about 120 million Canadian dollars (US$102.5 million).  The companies said the plant, which will split natural gas liquids into components including ethane, propane, butane and condensate, will be able to process about 70,000 barrels of natural gas liquids a day.  Production is expected to begin in 1992.  An official of Dow Chemical Canada, a unit of Dow Chemical Co., Midland, Mich., said the partners each would invest a maximum of C$60 million in the new plant.  Other parties are considering investing in the venture, the official said, though he wouldn't identify them.  Separately, the companies said they reached an accord under which Shell Canada, a unit of Royal Dutch/Shell Group, will sell ethane to Dow Chemical Canada for its proposed C$800 million ethylene plant in Fort Saskatchewan.  The plant is scheduled to begin output in 1993.  Initial annual capacity is set at about one billion pounds.  Ethylene, a key building block in petrochemical production, is used to make products such as plastics and antifreeze.  In pursuit of possible insider-trading violations, Britain's Department of Trade and Industry has frozen 165,000 shares of Consolidated Gold Fields PLC.  According to department officials, the move is intended to smoke out the real owners of the shares, who so far have successfully hidden behind so-called "nominee accounts" at various financial institutions.  The insider-trading investigation centers on heavy purchases of Consolidated Gold options and shares just before Minorco S.A. launched a #2.05 billion ($3.35 billion) hostile bid for the mining giant last September.  Under the government's freeze order, owners of the shares can't sell or transfer them or vote on shareholder matters.  From the government's point of view, the action comes at a propitious moment: Minorco's bid ultimately failed, but Hanson PLC last month agreed to buy Consolidated Gold for #3.5 billion.  Unless the owners step up and cooperate with the investigation, they won't be able to cash in, a department official said.  The department took similar steps in June, in an effort to learn the identities of holders of 330,000 Consolidated Gold shares.  According to a department spokeswoman, the holders of those shares have remained behind their nominee-account shields.  Two separate appraisals of the British economy conclude that it will take months more of high interest rates to wring out current inflationary pressures.  Both studies -- one by the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development in Paris and the other by the Bank of England here -- maintain that Britain had too much of a good thing in late 1987 and 1988.  Economic expansion and buoyant consumer spending flared into economic hyperactivity last year.  Despite 10 consecutive interest rate hikes, pushing base rates to their current 14%, inflation is still a worry.  "It's a slow process," said a Bank of England official.  "It would be unwise to do anything other than persist."  That view squares with recent predictions from private economists, who believe Britain's high rates won't budge until early next year, perhaps in March with a new budget.  A Bank of England economist did predict that the inflation index, currently stuck at an 8.3% annual rate, will begin to inch down in August.  "We're looking for a slowdown, the first manifestation of which will be a squeezing of corporate-sector margins, and the later manifestation will be a weakening labor market," said a Bank of England official.  The central bank's bulletin notes that already, home purchases and spending on household goods have slowed significantly.  The bank and the OECD don't see much likelihood that Britain's tight-money policies, which began in June 1988, will bring on a full recession.  "The risk that policies have been tightened too much appears to be comparatively small," the OECD report states.  One protection against a deeper-than-desired slowdown is the still robust level of business investment, partly from corporations gearing up for the European Community's integrated market in 1992.  In part, Britain's economic problems are an offshoot of the October 1987 stock market crash.  Fearful that the market plunge might lead to a broader economic contraction, Britain relaxed both monetary and fiscal policies.  Home purchases boomed along with demand for automobiles and consumer products.  As plant capacity was strained at home, foreign suppliers stepped in, leading to a widening trade deficit.  According to the OECD, the trade gap points to another problem that may prove to be the most serious for the United Kingdom: a weakening competitive position.  Trade in manufactured goods, historically in surplus for Britain, has been in deficit since 1983.  Cars and capital goods bought in the U.K. increasingly come from other countries.  According to the OECD, the U.K. lost market share in most product groups during the 1980s, despite the strong economic improvement in Britain and an expansion in international trade.  One exception to the OECD's bleak competitive assessment is in research-intensive products, where Britain has gained a comparative advantage.  The OECD notes another problem afflicting Britain -- unreliable economic statistics.  Corporate profit may be overestimated, while personal income is probably underestimated, the international organization says.  As a result, it's "difficult to trace the course of the economy over the past two years or so with any precision," according to the OECD.  "Advertisers are beginning to discover what's going on out here -- a style of advertising that's different than the rest of the country," says Geoffrey S. Thompson, senior vice president of ad agency Foote, Cone & Belding's San Francisco office.  "We've had a real nice resurgence . . . and it's all out-of-town business."  National advertisers, hailing from as far east as New York, are indeed starting to discover the Other Coast, or at least a few select agencies here.  Creative "hot shops" like Los Angeles's Chiat/Day and San Francisco's Hal Riney & Partners caught the outsiders' eyes first.  But lately, Western outposts of a few old-line agencies like Chicago-based Foote Cone are starting to become national advertising powers in their own right.  Traditionally, the far-flung offices of big New York and Chicago agencies were little more than service offices, or small agencies set up to compete with local shops for local accounts.  Even today, the West Coast offices of most of the great names of advertising bear little resemblance to their cosmopolitan parents.  Their clients are generally small retailers, like local supermarket chains or shoe stores.  These West Coast offices fight ferociously with each other for even the smallest clients -- clients their parent companies wouldn't think of pursuing.  But a few agencies have managed to break free of the local grind.  Foote Cone's San Francisco office, perhaps the most successful so far, has long attracted notice for its Levi Strauss & Co. commercials.  It only broke into the big time, though, in the past few years with two high-profile campaigns: its Levi 501 blues ads, and its claymation California Raisins campaign.  While both those clients are California-based, they won the office national attention, which is leading to more national business.  Cher herself, for example, chose Foote Cone's San Francisco office to create ads for her perfume, Uninhibited, because she wanted the team behind the Levi's ads.  The perfume's distributor, Parfums Stern, is based in New York.  S.C. Johnson & Son, based in Racine, Wis., uses the San Francisco office to create ads for its Agree and Halsa shampoos while Foote Cone's Chicago headquarters handles its other brands.  The account had been split between agencies in Chicago and New York.  Taco Bell of Irvine, Calif., another major new client of Foote Cone San Francisco, had previously been at Omnicom Group's Tracy-Locke agency in Los Angeles.  A strong creative reputation certainly helps Foote Cone and other West Coast agencies like Hal Riney, whose national accounts include General Motors' new Saturn line.  But perhaps just as important is technology: the fax machine, the phone, the computer.  "The time problem is breaking down," says Foote Cone's Mr. Thompson.  Omnicom Group's BBDO office in Los Angeles, whose clients include Apple computer, for example, creates storyboards on personal computers and sends them by fax; it can even create moving storyboards, or "animatics," on computer.  The office isn't yet handling many clients outside the Los Angeles area, but it is creating print ads for Dodge, a client in BBDO's Detroit office.  It earlier created much of the print work for the U.S. Navy account pitch, which was won by BBDO's New York office.  And it has done some creative work for International Paper, also a New York client.  "Ultimately, our growth plan will take us out of the Los Angeles market, probably in the next year," says Steve Hayden, executive vice president and general manager of the Los Angeles office.  He adds: "Location is less the issue than who is going to do the job best.  Our license extends back to the Mississippi.  We've talked to clients in Chicago," even though BBDO has its own office there.  As West Coast operations attempt to grow stronger, though, stepping on the toes of their sister offices is probably inevitable.  Yet some are willing to take that chance, partly out of necessity: There just isn't enough business on their home turf to go around.  Particularly in Los Angeles, scores of agencies are vying for a limited advertising market.  Just about every major agency surveyed in Los Angeles recently was gunning for the exact same short list of small accounts.  Everyone repeated the tale of Dinkum Dog, a hot dog account of less than $1 million that attracted more than 70 of the biggest names in the ad agency business -- and then collapsed.  All the West Coast agencies surveyed were also actively scouting the rest of the Pacific rim, which in the long run will probably present the best way to break out of their rut.  And so, expanding out of the regional market remains a priority for a determined few agencies.  BBDO in Los Angeles, for one, handled primarily local accounts until just a few years ago; it in fact used to be two offices that were somewhat uncomfortably merged last year under the leadership of several former Chiat/Day executives.  Gene Cameron, president and chief executive officer of the office, readily concedes that there was "culture shock" from the merger, which required an outside consultant to smooth things over.  But Mr. Cameron says the situation has now improved, and BBDO is on to the next step, a step that a few years ago would have been a contradiction in terms: "We're really tring to build a world-class agency here in Los Angeles."  Income from tourism in the first half of this year was down only 1% from a year earlier, China said, but tourism has nearly halted since troops crushed a popular, pro-democracy movement in June.  China earned $970 million from tourism in the 1989 first half, said He Guangwei, deputy director of the National Tourism Administration.  But the 12.9 million tourists represented a 14.3% decline from the yearearlier period, the official Xinhua News Agency quoted Mr. He as saying.  He didn't explain the reason.  Tourists stopped coming immediately after the June 3-4 massacre in Beijing, in which hundreds, perhaps thousands, of student protesters and their supporters were killed.  The summer months are the height of China's tourist season, but only a few foreigners are visiting now.  The U.S. still is advising Americans not to make trips here unless necessary, though the State Department on Wednesday allowed dependents of U.S. diplomats to return.  Mr. He predicted that 22 million tourists will visit China this year and that the industry will have earned $1.3 billion.  Others, however, aren't so optimistic.  "I don't think this year is going to be a very exciting year, as far as business is concerned," said Bernd Riegger, general manager of the Holiday Inn Lido in Beijing.  Cooper Cos., embroiled in a proxy fight with dissident shareholders, said a large shareholder agreed to drop his opposition to the management slate proposed for election at the annual meeting Sept. 15.  Moses Marx, a New York broker who controls 6% of Cooper's stock, had supported a dissident group seeking to unseat management at the annual meeting.  But Cooper Cos., a Palo Alto, Calif., maker of medical diagnostic and other equipment that has sold most of its assets in the past two years, said Mr. Marx instead will be a nominee on the management slate.  The company declined to say why Mr. Marx switched his allegiance.  Mr. Marx couldn't be reached for comment.  The dissident group alleges that Cooper's top management, which ousted the company's previous chairman, Parker Montgomery, has wasted corporate assets and mismanaged the concern, causing its stock price to plummet.  The dissident group couldn't be reached for comment.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Cooper shares closed unchanged at $2.875.  A county governing board rejected pleas that it remove the name of Supreme Court Justice William Brennan Jr. from a courthouse named in his honor.  At last month's meeting, under pressure from veterans' groups, members of the nine-member Hudson County Board of Freeholders indicated they were prepared to rename the courthouse to protest Justice Brennan's participation in a court ruling that laws against flag-burning are an unconstitutional restraint on freedom of expression.  In a unanimous vote yesterday, the board decided to drop the matter.  "We were told the whole world was watching Hudson County," said freeholder Marilyn Roman.  "Aren't we a group of civilized people?  We don't want to embarrass Justice Brennan."  The freeholders were persuaded by members of the local bar association to continue to show respect for the justice, who worked in the building as Hudson County's first assignment judge between 1949 and 1951.  Ten lawyers spoke in support of Justice Brennan.  Five veterans denounced him.  John Tomasin, a lawyer who is also a veteran, warned: "We have a few people who say, 'Let's be petty and punish the justice.' If we do that we'll go back to the old days, and Hudson County will be treated like idiots and morons."  If the report of your death is greatly exaggerated, you won't be able to collect in a lawsuit for defamation.  That's the ruling of the New Jersey Supreme Court, which found that an obituary that mistakenly states that a person is dead does no harm to that person's reputation and, as a result, is not libelous.  "While we appreciate the shock the plaintiff may have felt in reading of her death, it was necessarily quickly dissipated by her certain knowledge that the announcement was premature," the court wrote in its 6-0 decision earlier this week.  The court cautioned, however, that a libel suit could go to trial if an erroneous obituary referred to circumstances surrounding a death that could have defamatory meaning, said Gerard Hanson of Brener Wallack & Hill, Princeton, N.J., who argued on behalf of the defendant, the Princeton (N.J.) Packet.  According to Mr. Hanson, during oral arguments the court indicated that, for example, a suit over a false obituary that reported that a mayor had died from a drug overdose would be allowed to go to trial.  Mr. Hanson added that, although it was the first time the New Jersey court had dealt with such a case, "There is a wealth of precedent in other jurisdictions to support the opinion."  In 1985, the twice-weekly newspaper, the Packet, printed an erroneous obituary of Marcy Decker.  A year later, Ms. Decker sued the paper, claiming that her distress over the obit contributed to the loss of her job and helped her ex-husband gain custody of the couple's child.  Ms. Decker's attorney, Louise Robichaud of Kingston, New Jersey, was unavailable to comment.  According to Princeton Packet editor Richard Willever, the newspaper had failed to follow its practice of verifying all obituaries when it neglected to call the family to confirm the unsigned obituary.  Mr. Hanson argued in the paper's defense that a newspaper has no legal duty to check the facts in an unsigned press release from a funeral home.  James E. Preston, chairman and chief executive officer of Avon Products Inc., as promised, met with Irwin Jacobs, an investor who has proposed paying $2.85 billion for the cosmetics giant.  "The two men had a full and complete discussion of Avon's recently announced business plans," according to a brief statement from New York-based Avon.  "As agreed before the meeting, there were no discussions about the sale of the company."  Avon earlier rejected Mr. Jacobs's offer and agreed to meet with him.  The statement released late yesterday reiterated Avon's stance: "Avon's board has repeatedly said the company is not for sale."  A partnership of the Minneapolis investor and Amway Corp. hold 10.1% of Avon's 54.9 million shares outstanding.  The proposed bid for Avon was $41 a share; Avon shares closed yesterday at $38.375, down 25 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Norsk Data AS said it will post a bigger-than-expected first-half loss and announced the resignation of Rolf Skar, its longtime chief executive officer.  The Norwegian computer company's weak first half adds to doubts about its chances of survival.  Industry analysts were skeptical that the management change and corporate restructuring that were unveiled can stanch the losses or the apparent erosion of customer confidence in Norsk Data.  Norsk Data said it expects to post a pretax first-half loss of 240 million Norwegian kroner ($34.6 million) if a small nonrecurring gain is excluded.  That would be nearly double last year's first-half loss.  Most analysts had expected the loss to narrow as a result of recent cost-cutting moves, including the dismissal of one-fifth of Norsk Data's employees.  The departure of Mr. Skar, a Norsk Data founder and chief executive since 1978, had been expected.  Directors named Erik Engebretsen, the company's chief financial officer, to succeed Mr. Skar.  Analysts expect Mr. Engebretsen, a 40-year-old economist who joined the company two years ago, to intensify the continuing overhaul of Norsk Data's financial controls.  With the exception of a couple of provisions, Environmental Protection Agency chief William Reilly said lawmakers are more likely to weaken than strengthen the president's clean-air bill as it moves toward passage on Capitol Hill.  At a breakfast meeting yesterday with reporters and editors of The Wall Street Journal, Mr. Reilly specifically said he anticipates industry efforts to reduce the scope of the auto alternative-fuels program and to remove a provision that would cap utilities' emissions of sulfur dioxide, a rule that could limit their growth.  He said that the emissions cap faces particular opposition in the House and that he is aware that even some sponsors of the administration's bill believe it is too tough on utilities.  Mr. Reilly, contending that industry opposition to the emissions measure hasn't softened, disputed charges by lawmakers and environmental groups that significant concessions were made to business groups during the drafting of the bill.  "We've seen very strong concern and opposition from the energy industry.  We've seen a somewhat ambivalent but generally negative view from the auto industry on alternatve fuels," he said.  At the same time, he said, environmentalists have a good chance of winning tougher standards for auto tailpipe emissions and of succeeding in doubling the required warranty on pollution equipment to 100,000 miles per car.  Proponents of tougher auto standards gained some ground yesterday when eight Northeastern states agreed to adopt tougher auto emissions rules than the Bush administration is proposing.  Moreover, a top General Motors Corp. executive yesterday expressed support for the president's proposal.  In a speech at an automotive conference in Michigan, Gary W. Dickinson, a GM vice president, said that while the Bush plan will be tough for the industry to meet, "on balance it is more realistic than any of the alternatives pending in Congress."  While GM's backing will likely shore up the support of Rep. John Dingell (D., Mich.), a key sponsor of the legislation, it will also reinforce the perception of environmental groups and other lawmakers that the plan is too soft on the auto industry.  Still, Mr. Reilly said he expects that whatever emerges will be based largely on the president's proposal, noting that the measure has already attracted support from a coalition of moderate Democrats and Republicans.  "These bills are not that far apart," he said, referring to other clean-air proposals in Congress.  Lawmakers have predicted that a clean-air measure will pass sometime next year.  Mr. Reilly asserted that Rep. Henry Waxman's (D., Calif.) more stringent approach on reducing smog, which would demand greater pollution reductions from the auto industry, would bring only 2% a year in additional pollution reduction compared with Mr. Bush's smog proposal, but would cost $6 billion more a year.  He estimated that the administration's smog provision, the bill's most expensive section, would represent $8 billion to $13 billion of the measure's total annual cost to business.  That total annual cost is estimated at $14 billion to $19 billion.  Mr. Reilly said there might be an acid rain compromise struck -- for example, between Sen. Robert Byrd (D., W.Va.) and Senate Majority Leader George Mitchell of Maine -- to save high-sulfur coal mining jobs by requiring some coal-fired utilities to install scrubbers.  Scrubbers would allow plants to continue burning high-sulfur coal more cleanly.  Mr. Bush's bill is styled to give utilities flexibility to switch to cleaner fuels or to cut emissions in other ways.  Another vulnerable provision, he suggested, is the administration's proposal to allow utilities to trade or sell credits earned from reducing emissions below new federal standards.  Mr. Reilly said he expects considerable opposition to this provision from some environmental groups.  Arguing that the administration measure wasn't weakened during drafting, Mr. Reilly defended a provision that would allow auto makers to average emissions, a provision that he said has been widely misunderstood.  He explained that averaging of tailpipe emissions would be allowed within each engine family rather than across entire fleets, which, he said, would allow auto makers additional flexibility while still reducing the amount of pollution.  "There's nothing to fear from averaging," he said.  "That's a false charge against us."  Separately, Mr. Reilly plans to meet today with top officials of nine companies with polluting plants that EPA officials say pose some of the biggest health risks in the country.  He intends to try to persuade them to cut voluntarily their emissions of toxic chemicals, even before new requirements are put in place.  EPA officials describe the meeting as part of an experimental strategy to solicit voluntary industry cooperation in the face of recent data showing excessively high amounts of toxic air emissions.  William Fay, chief lobbyist on clean-air legislation for a coalition of major industries, argued, however, that there is a disincentive for companies to make voluntary reductions when there isn't a guarantee they will get credit for them when a clean-air law is enacted.  Expected at the session are officials from Occidental Chemical Corp., Exxon Chemical, Texas Olefins, Texaco Chemical Co., GE Plastics, Dow Chemical USA, Goodyear Tire & Rubber Co., BASF Corp., Reichhold Chemicals Inc. and the Chemical Manufacturers Association.  The Northeast states seeking to toughen auto standards plan to propose the adoption of requirements as stringent as those in California.  The program would include stiffer exhaust standards, a 100,000-mile warranty for pollution-control equipment and a more aggressive vehicle-recall program, among other provisions.  Michael J. Bradley, executive director of the Northeast States for Coordinated Air Use Management, said in a prepared statement that the program would increase the cost of a new car by about $150.  The states in the program are Connecticut, Maine, Massachusetts, New Hampshire, New Jersey, New York, Rhode Island and Vermont.  If these states and California have auto-pollution standards that are stiffer than the national standard, that could increase pressure on lawmakers to adopt a single standard nationwide as tough as that of these states.  Chrysler Corp. called the Northeast states' plan "premature," saying that the best way to accomplish clean-air goals is to enact federal legislation.  Barbara Bryant, a market researcher who used to work for Bush adviser Robert Teeter, is expected to be nominated to be director of the Census Bureau.  Ms. Bryant would assume the post as the bureau moves into the final stages of preparing for the 1990 census, a massive undertaking that will result in redistributing congressional seats among the states.  She also will play an important role in deciding whether to adjust the 1990 tally to compensate for undercounted minority group members.  The director's job has been vacant for several months.  The Bush administration's first choice, Alan Heslop, a Republican redistricting consultant from California, withdrew his name in June.  Some Democrats had threatened to vigorously oppose his nomination.  Ms. Bryant is vice president of Market Opinion Research Inc. of Detroit.  Mr. Teeter was a part owner of the firm until he sold his interest to work on the Bush presidential campaign.  Ms. Bryant couldn't be reached for comment yesterday.  When Charles Marder started his nursery here a dozen years ago, he simply sold and transplanted trees, the way any other small-town nursery might.  Then he discovered what big spenders really need.  Today, the Marders Nurseries Inc. summer team of 80 will plant 60-year old Japanese maple trees in your front yard.  No matter how new your fortune, at least your trees will look old-money.  The company also relocates entire driveways to give more scenic access to mansions.  Average project cost: $50,000.  "We give a look like a generation before them lived here," says Mr. Marder.  "That's worth money."  In the past three years alone, the company has doubled its profits and tripled its staff, he adds.  Sales are still "under $20 million" a year, he says, but they're headed up.  As in many pricey playgrounds from Palm Beach, Fla., to Palm Springs, Calif., small businesses here are profiting handsomely from growing throngs of affluent Americans who demand every conceivable luxury and service in their vacation retreats.  And as business owners tell it, more people than ever will gladly pay whatever it takes to get the pampering they want.  Nowhere is the trend more visible than in East Hampton, one of the most chic and expensive vacation havens in America.  With August the hottest month for vacationing here, many business owners say they're ringing up more sales right now than ever before.  Over the years, the streets have become choked with more New York City denizens flocking here by jet, Jaguar and jitney.  This summer, officials estimate the population at between 60,000 and 80,000, compared with about 17,000 in winter.  Vacationers come for the rolling pastures and pristine beaches, and they shop with a vengeance.  Many shopkeepers fret over how long they can keep this gold mine to themselves.  Already a few big-name retailers, including Ralph Lauren, have set up shop.  And as more vacationers keep coming, locals complain that the crowds erode the very charm they came to enjoy.  But for now, they will put up with the profits.  With business booming on a recent Saturday morning, the parking lot behind the Barefoot Contessa gourmet food store looks like a Mercedes dealership.  Inside, shoppers squeeze through the cramped aisles, designer bags bulge with gourmet foods, and cashiers ring up goat cheese at $17.50 a pound.  As shoppers peel off bills and charge triple-digit orders with American Express Gold cards, owner Ina Garten shakes her head and smiles.  "We can't make enough," says Mrs. Garten, whose volume has tripled since she bought the store in 1985.  "Every Sunday we beat the last Sunday.  This is a very profitable business."  And there's plenty of room for competitors.  Down the road, another gourmet food store gets $42 a pound for lobster salad.  At East Hampton Classic Auto Services Inc., seven mechanics -- triple the number four years ago -- work overtime to repair Porsches, Fiats and Jaguars lined up outside the garage.  The shop charges up to $500 to tune up a Porsche; any other engine work will cost you $58 an hour.  There is a waiting list.  "We have a reputation for being expensive, but good," says owner Robert Kennedy, whose profits have steadily increased over the years.  "Seventy-five percent don't even ask for an estimate."  Mr. Kennedy says the "slow season" is getting shorter; recently, business has been good through December.  Vacationers here are happy to pay big money even for the most mundane service.  Hawkeye Home Management says it gets $20 an hour for cleaning houses -- and is turning away business.  "There's a lot of money to be made out here for honest, legitimate companies," says Dick Rodriguez, owner.  People "don't ask how much it costs."  For the most part, brokers, bankers and media types who can't afford mansions out here buy summer shares in houses.  Often strangers thrown together for the weekend, they will spend all of Saturday preparing for dinner, if not shopping.  Odds are they will visit the Amagansett Farmer's Market in nearby Amagansett.  More than any other small business, it is a testimony to the increase in conspicuous consumption in the Long Island summer spots.  When Patricia Struk started the Amagansett Farmer's Market 30 years ago, it was nothing more than a farm wagon where she sold flowers.  Today it is a booming specialty food store that sells, among other things, poached salmon with herb mayonnaise at $18.50 a pound.  "We try to have the best money can buy.  It just costs more," says Mrs. Struk.  While there are still shops for the budget-conscious, virtually everything has a gourmet flair here -- even the shopworn A&P lets customers pick from a tank teeming with live lobsters.  "People don't bat an eye when they pay $16 a pound for cheese," says John Hammerley, visiting a group house as folks in the kitchen prepare lamb inside.  "They walk in and peel off $50 bills like it's chump change."  But to those caught up in the summer ritual, this is business as usual.  For $34 -- about the same price Greyhound charges for the more than 230-mile trip from New York to Washington, D.C. -- club-class riders on the Hampton Jitney are pampered with two attendants, a de-thorned rose, choice cheeses, champagne and a T-shirt on the 100-mile ride to East Hampton.  With such a monied crowd clamoring to spend money here, shop owners wonder how soon they will have to share the loot with big outsiders.  Earlier this year, the Benetton clothes chain opened a shop in nearby Southampton.  About a month ago, Ralph Lauren opened a Polo Country Store on Main Street in East Hampton.  Inside Mr. Lauren's store, a crocodile belt sells for $815.  A foot-long wooden fish decoy is $150.  A deerskin skirt goes for $1,279.  "It's hand-painted," a saleswoman points out.  A store manager says business couldn't be better.  This is a town that at one time was a mecca of tiny mom-and-pop businesses.  But soaring commercial rents and big-name retailers are edging many small businesses off Main Street.  And as more and more outsiders come to carve out their own little slice of paradise, acres of pastures are turning into front yards for mansions.  The village's roads are choked with traffic, irritating old-timers.  After all, just 100 years ago East Hampton proper was a sleepy fishing village.  Though some find its charm studied, it still prides itself on being the quaintest of the Long Island summer spots.  The Ladies Village Improvement Society still holds an annual fair here, and many residents leave home without locking doors.  Nonetheless, as summer residents stay longer, locals feel their time is passing.  Says Morgan Rank, an eight-year East Hampton local who owns an antique shop on Newtown Lane, "The greed is killing off the natural beauty of this place, the very reasons that have made it so attractive."  Allegheny International Inc. said it filed its latest plan of reorganization with a federal bankruptcy court.  The plan, which Allegheny outlined several weeks ago when it was approved by the board, includes all of the company's subsidiaries, including Sunbeam Corp. and Chemetron Corp.  The producer of kitchen appliances and other consumer products filed for protection from creditors' lawsuits under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code in February 1988 and has since proposed a number of plans to pay its debts, but none has been adopted.  The latest reorganization plan must be voted on by Allegheny shareholders and creditors.  Allegheny said these votes should take place before the end of this year.  Current shareholders would receive only 5% of the common stock of the reorganized company.  The balance of the stock would be issued to holders of subordinated debt, and to provide new financing for the company.  The plan provides for payment in full of Sunbeam claims prior to the Chapter 11 filing, other than debt including Sunbeam's 5 1/2% debentures, which are being reinstated.  Allegheny's senior secured bank debt also would be paid in full.  The cash payment would total about $400 million, the company said.  The plan calls for issuance of $50 million in notes of the reorganized Sunbeam, to satisfy claims since the Chapter 11 filing and other claims of Sunbeam institutional lenders and the Allegheny senior secured bank lenders.  Those notes would have warrants allowing the notes to be exchanged after one year, if the notes are still outstanding, for two-thirds of the common equity of the reorganized company.  Senior unsecured lenders to Allegheny and Chemetron would receive 12-year pay-in-kind debentures in a face amount equal to the principal of their pre-petition loans, which totaled about $109 million, the company said.  The company is talking with several investment bankers who would take over the pay-in-kind debentures once Allegheny emerges from bankruptcy-law proceedings, thus leaving the senior unsecured lenders with cash, as opposed to notes.  Allegheny's general unsecured creditors, whose claims total $45 million to $50 million, would receive preferred stock of the reorganized company.  Also, James D. Milligan, former chief executive officer of Questor Corp., who has been acting as a consultant to Allegheny's board, would become chief executive of the reorganized company.  The Federal Aviation Administration said it will test new $1 million bomb-detection devices at six airports in an effort to combat air terrorism.  The agency will place the devices in airports at Frankfurt, West Germany; Miami, and San Francisco as well New York's Kennedy and London's Gatwick, FAA Administrator James Busey said.  The sixth airport is likely to be in Detroit, officials said.  Aviation-industry representatives have disputed the efficiency and safety of the device, called the thermal neutron activator, or TNA, which bombards baggage with neutrons to detect the nitrogen compounds found in plastic explosives.  Opponents claim TNA can also be set off by cheeses or meats and can pose a radiation risk for workers.  Plastic explosives hidden in a tape recorder were blamed for the bombing of Pan Am Flight 103 over Lockerbie, Scotland, last December.  In an air-security effort following that bombing, the FAA has pinpointed 40 "high-risk" airports in the U.S. and abroad that it said should have new bomb-detection devices, such as TNA.  About 400 devices will be needed to handle the high baggage volumes at those airports.  Ramada Inc., Phoenix, Ariz., said the Nevada Gaming Control Board unanimously recommended that the Nevada Gaming Commission approve Ramada's restructuring plan.  The five-member Gaming Commission is scheduled to hear Ramada's application for approval on Aug. 24.  The restructuring plan calls for Ramada to sell its hotel business to New World Development Co. of Hong Kong and Prime Motor Inns Inc., Fairfield, N.J., for $540 million.  Ramada will then distribute to shareholders cash from the sale and stock in Aztar Corp., a new company formed to operate Ramada's casino business.  Ramada shareholders last month approved the restructuring, but the plan also needs the approval of casino regulators in Nevada and New Jersey.  New Jersey regulators are scheduled to begin hearings on Aug. 22.  Ramada expects to complete the restructuring by mid-September.  President Bush said he will nominate Gen. Colin L. Powell, whom he called a "complete soldier," to be chairman of the Pentagon's Joint Chiefs of Staff.  Gen. Powell, 52 years old, served two combat tours in Vietnam and has considerable experience in the bureaucratic wars here, having been President Reagan's last national security adviser.  Gen. Powell will be the first black to be the nation's top military officer.  Congress recently reorganized the Pentagon's command structure by taking away some authority from the heads of the individual services and giving it to the chairman of the Joint Chiefs.  The new arrangement, intended to streamline decision-making in a crisis, has yet to be given a real test.  Gen. Powell doesn't have the breadth of experience of the man he will replace, Adm. William J. Crowe Jr., who commanded joint U.S. military forces in the Pacific and in Europe before becoming chairman of the joint chiefs.  But Gen. Powell is likely to have a smooth time winning Senate confirmation.  Sen. Sam Nunn (D., Ga.), chairman of the Senate Armed Service Committee, called Gen. Powell "an excellent nominee," adding that the general's "proven abilities and his experiences provide a sound foundation for his advice on wide-ranging defense issues in times of severe budget constraints and a rapidly changing international scene."  Gen. Powell was serving in his only major military command, U.S. Forces Command in Atlanta, when Mr. Bush chose him for the top military job over more than two dozen generals and admirals who have greater seniority.  Gen. Powell was appointed this spring to Forces Command, which is responsible for taking control of U.S. Army units in a crisis and preparing them to be sent overseas.  Born and raised in the South Bronx section of New York, Gen. Powell is the son of Jamaican immigrants.  He joined the Army in 1958.  After serving in Vietnam in 1962 and again in 1968, he got his first exposure to high-level Washington in 1972, when he was selected to serve as a White House fellow.  Amid tours of duty in West Germany and South Korea, Gen. Powell spent six years working as a top military assistant in the office of the secretary of defense, where he met many of the top officials in the Reagan and Bush administrations.  President Reagan made him his national security adviser in 1987, and Gen. Powell is generally credited with restoring the integrity of the office in the wake of the Iran-Contra scandal.  Adm. Crowe is scheduled to retire on Sept. 30.  Initial claims for regular state unemployment benefits fell to a seasonally adjusted 330,000 in the week ended July 29 from 342,000 in the previous week, the Labor Department said.  The number of people receiving regular state benefits in the week ended July 22 decreased to a seasonally adjusted 2,175,000, or 2.1% of those covered by unemployment insurance, from 2,257,000 in the previous week, when the insured unemployment rate was 2.2%.  Counting all state and federal benefit programs, the number of people receiving unemployment benefits in the week ended July 22 fell to 2,123,200 from a revised 2,227,500 a week earlier.  These figures aren't seasonally adjusted.  It's a typical morning on the Santa Monica freeway.  Bumper-to-bumper traffic grinds to a halt.  Barbara Stewart, busy president of an advertising agency, is trapped in her 1988 silver Dodge Ram van.  Is she frantic?  Quite the contrary.  Cellular phone in hand, Ms. Stewart talks with a client 90 miles away about a new ad campaign.  She hangs up, revises the ad layout, then zaps him a copy over her van's portable facsimile machine, linked to the cellular phone.  During the two hours it takes her to creep from Irvine to downtown Los Angeles, the car phone rings steadily: A client calls to change the publication date of an ad; a prospective customer asks about fees; Ms. Stewart's office faxes an ad layout and a brochure for her approval.  "One day, I got 20 phone calls and seven faxes," exclaims Ms. Stewart, the president of Hubbert-Stewart Advertising.  "I'm seriously thinking about installing another telephone in my van."  Once a high-tech plaything, the cellular telephone is fast becoming a fixture of American life.  Sales agents and deal makers adore them.  Lawyers and engineers relish the mobility they bestow.  Hard-charging supervisors use them to keep staffs even busier.  Police praise their versatility, especially for drug busts.  Not since the telephone itself has an advance in phone technology promised so profound an impact on how people work and lead their lives, in sometimes unexpected and not always positive ways.  For all their advantages, cellular phones create the prospect of perpetual intrusion.  They seem to be nearly everywhere now, yet they're still proliferating.  Users are finding it more difficult to disconnect themselves, even briefly, from the workplace.  And since these phones don't come with receptionists or secretaries, cellular calls can't be screened.  Remember when a train or plane ride was an interval of tranquility?  Amtrak now has phones on trains, most airlines are putting them aboard, and there's even talk of installing cellular phones along hiking trails in forests and parks.  A manager in Denver complains that he is now on call around the clock.  Recently, he was forced to lug his portable unit to his daughter's birthday party at a park.  "It's ridiculous," he laments.  "My boss would have asked me to stay home and miss her birthday if I didn't have the cellular phone."  Daniel Foxe, a management consultant in San Francisco, says a cellular phone practically ruined a recent camping trip to Yosemite National Park.  He complains that a neighboring camper brought along a portable cellular telephone "that rang off the wall.  What's the sense of getting away?"  In desperation, he moved to another campsite.  Others get annoyed when they receive a call from someone in a car.  "It's so rude," says Richard Adams, a produce broker in New Jersey.  "How can they give you any attention?  One buyer would hang up on me every time he came to a toll booth.  You can't get any business done that way.  Personally, I think he was showing off."  Nancy W. Phillips, a real estate agent in Paoli, Pa., believes "it's an indication of how quickly our lives are moving.  Everything is faster paced.  We want our information now.  I don't know how good that really is."  Still, usage of cellular phones is soaring.  Since cellular phone service was first offered in 1984, the number of mobile phone customers in the U.S. has skyrocketed to 2.1 million.  By the end of 1989, the number is expected to increase 57% to 3.2 million subscribers, a level experts didn't expect the industry to reach until at least 1992.  Last year, Americans spent $1.07 billion on cellular calls.  This year, the volume will reach $3.2 billion, and by 1995, experts say it could climb as high as $15 billion.  Some locations, such as Los Angeles and New York, can barely accommodate the heavy volume of calls, forcing many cellular companies to convert their networks to digital technology to handle the deluge of new subscribers.  "It took the cellular industry four-and-a-half years to reach one million customers," says Charles Many, president of Nynex Mobile Communications Co., a unit of Nynex Corp.  "In contrast, it took 20 years before one million television sets were sold in the U.S. and seven years before one million VCRs were sold."  Growth potential is fueling fierce battles for cellular franchises, which the Federal Communications Commission began granting more than five years ago.  Earlier this summer, McCaw Cellular Communications Inc. launched an unsolicited tender offer for LIN Broadcasting Corp. at a price per subscriber that was more than double that paid for any cellular property so far.  McCaw's initial bid was $5.85 billion.  LIN rejected the offer, demanding at least $6.22 billion.  BellSouth Corp. waged a hardy battle last year to acquire Mobile Communications Corp. of America's 11-city operation.  First, BellSouth found itself in a bidding duel with McCaw and was forced to sweeten its $564-million offer to $710 million.  Then, while waiting for court approvals, BellSouth got ambushed by Wall Street traders and institutional investors.  During the year-long wait, the price of cellular phone companies nearly doubled, making the BellSouth-MCCA deal look like a giveaway.  Investors sued to scrap the accord and traders began bidding up the price of MCCA.  Fueling such bids is a staggering rise in the value of cellular-phone franchises.  McCaw's bid values potential customers at $275 to $300 each.  A year earlier, BellSouth paid $70 for each potential customer.  And three years ago, $24 a customer was considered steep when U S West Inc.'s cellular unit paid that amount for a San Diego franchise.  With the exception of LIN Broadcasting, cellular companies have yet to turn a profit, but their stock prices are skyrocketing.  Since New York-based Cellular Communications Inc. went public in 1986, the company's stock price has soared 700%.  Last year alone, the stock price climbed from $13.88 to $26.75, a 92.8% increase.  LIN Broadcasting's stock price last year surged 63% to $71.50 and McCaw's rose 67.4% to $27.  LIN's stock currently trades at about 50 times annual earnings per share.  Dennis Leibowitz, a cellular analyst with Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities, says that Wall Street is banking heavily on future growth.  Adds Kenneth Leon, an analyst with Bear Stearns & Co.: "It's like trading in futures."  Is such growth likely?  As equipment prices have plunged, the market's expansion has accelerated.  Cellular phones that carried price tags of about $3,000 five or six years ago can be purchased now for as little as $300.  Industry experts believe prices will keep dropping, since strong demand has led to economies of scale for most manufacturers.  Each time the cellular market doubles, incremental production costs have fallen about 20%.  The Yankee Group, a Boston-based research firm, compares the cellular phone market to the video cassette recorder industry, which didn't boom until the price of the VCR dropped below $500.  These days, cellular phones are being displayed and sold right next to VCRs, stereos and television sets at such mass merchandisers as Sears, Radio Shack, K mart and Wal-Mart.  "I walked out of the Pep Boys (store) with a mobile telephone that was programmed and ready to go," says Bruce Rivett, an auto-repair shop owner in Philadelphia.  "As soon as I got in the car, I ordered a pizza and picked it up on my way home."  How soon until there's a phone in every car?  Probably not until monthly service rates also decrease.  A cellular call during peak hours now costs about 37 cents to 50 cents per minute.  For the average subscriber, that translates into a monthly bill of about $150.  And customers don't just get charged when they make a call; they also get charged when they receive one, and they must pay about 10 cents on every busy signal or unanswered call.  In addition to usage charges, most cellular telephone companies also charge monthly fees that range from $39 to $145.  Despite such fees, cellular phones have become important money savers, especially for small business owners who can't afford to hire a receptionist or answering service.  Roger B. Styers, owner of Husky Towing & Auto Recovery in Clinton, Md., figures his mobile phone is saving him about $100,000 a year because he doesn't need a dispatching service to answer his phone.  When he's out on the road, office calls are forwarded to the cellular phone in his truck.  "I can tell the customer exactly where I am and how long it'll take me to get there," Mr. Styers says.  Richard Freeman, who repairs fiber optic cables, says his cellular phone allowed him to clinch a business deal on the fairway of a Savannah, Ga., golf course.  William David Viss, an Arizona hay trader, buys and sells bales over his cellular phone while driving his tractor.  To keep from missing customers' calls while on the trail, a small California company that leads horseback expeditions into the mountains packs a cellular phone in the saddle bags.  Real estate agents, salesmen and lawyers find similar advantages.  "In this business," explains Mrs. Phillips, the real estate agent, "the car is also your office."  When clients see a house they like, she pulls over, calls the number on the for-sale sign and usually gets an appointment to see it right away.  "It helps move buyers along," she says.  Jed Rakoff, a trial attorney in New York City, sits in the back seat of a careening taxi to make his morning calls.  "I've become such an addict," concedes Mr. Rakoff.  "Cellular telephones have added 40 minutes (of productivity) to my day.  It's not all billable time, but it has made a difference."  In Delaware's Court of Chancery, Wall Street speculators awaiting takeover-related rulings were among the first to arm themselves with cellular units; they were so distracting their use was banned while court is in session.  During the Polaroid-Shamrock case this spring, Alexander Metviner, a lawyer, bolted from the courtroom before it recessed.  Chased and caught by bailiffs, Mr. Metviner first claimed his cellular phone had been hidden in bushes outside the court, then admitted he had it with him in the courtroom.  He was reprimanded by Delaware's supreme court and faces contempt proceedings.  By now, cellular phones are penetrating far beyond the business world.  Many people are buying the equipment for safety reasons.  Ever since a stroke left Christine Lindsey crippled, the 52-year-old Florida resident has been afraid to go anywhere in her car alone for fear of getting stranded.  But with the cellular telephone, "I've regained my independence," says Mrs. Lindsey, who needs a cane to get around.  "If my car breaks down, I know I can call for help."  Carol Segal, a consultant in Detroit, says she bought a cellular phone because "it's not very safe for a woman to drive alone on today's highways."  Mrs. Segal's job requires substantial travel across Michigan and occasional trips to the East Coast.  "The cellular telephone is my security guard," she says.  But she also admits that the phone helps kill time on long road trips.  Sometimes she passes the time by chatting with her son -- in London.  Public safety officials are putting more resources into cellular phones.  San Diego officials plan to build a network of cellular call boxes along the freeways to aid motorists.  A regular telephone network would have involved expensive construction costs to run phone lines along the roadway, they say.  In St. Petersburg, Fla., the police department is augmenting its citizen band radio system with cellular.  The citizen band radio, or CB, is open to eavesdropping, has limited coverage and broadcasts more static than cellular signals.  In Union Township, N.J., police are using cellular phones to crack down on drug rings and auto thefts.  Recently, Union Township police used cellular phones to break up a group that was stealing cars from a multi-level parking lot.  Police Chief James Truhe says an officer sat on the roof, waited for the break and then alerted officers outside the lot.  "Before we were using the (CB) radio and the perpetrators would listen in.  They knew where we were," the chief explains.  William T. Coughlin, a Seattle computer specialist, has cellular phones in both his cars, a portable unit in his boat and is now considering buying a pocket phone for his briefcase.  "If you stand still, life will pass you by," he shouts because the connection from his cellular telephone is carrying a little too much static.  "But this is still pretty good, considering that I'm calling you from a plane."  The Dow Jones Industrial Average smashed through its record closing level briefly yesterday afternoon, ending above 2700 for the first time in nearly two years.  But the blue-chip average failed to sustain all its gains as last-minute profit-taking prevented it from surpassing its record close of 2722.42 set Aug. 25, 1987.  Instead, the industrials ended at 2712.63, up 26.55, after a day of active trading.  But analysts and traders agreed that it's only a matter of time before the average eclipses the record close.  "This is the bears' last stand," said Peter Canelo, chief portfolio strategist at Bear Stearns.  "The Dow industrials is a widely watched barometer and the enthusiasm that surrounds the assault on new highs and the discrediting of the bear case ought to take us higher."  Bond prices also rallied as the Treasury sold $9.75 billion of new 30-year bonds.  The average yield for the new debt was 8.14%.  The dollar posted modest gains.  Although the Dow Jones industrials' breakthrough was welcomed by most investors, it was somewhat anticlimactic.  "We passed the all-time highs in the S&P 500, the New York Stock Exchange index, and just about everything else a long time ago," Mr. Canelo said.  "The Dow Jones industrials were the last ones to get the news."  The intraday highs for the average yesterday were the result of program trading that had the average more than 40 points ahead in the session's final hour.  But analysts said the underlying gains since the current rally began last November are undeniable.  "There's nothing fake about this market," said Mr. Canelo.  He said that based on traditional measures of value, such as the ratio of stock prices to per-share earnings, the stock market remains a good bet despite the fact it is at all-time highs.  "With the Dow Jones industrials at just over 12 times earnings, the market is a bargain," he said.  "We're definitely headed for 3000 sometime between now and the middle of next year."  The Dow industrials have lagged behind broader market measures because they're chiefly stocks that are sensitive to the economic cycle.  Until last week most investment strategies concentrated on buying and holding so-called defensive stocks that tend to do well in a weak economy.  But last Friday's July employment report showing a stronger than expected economy prompted a switch in many investors' strategies toward cyclical stocks.  That tends to boost the Dow Jones industrials more than the broader averages.  "For the first seven months of the year the Dow just didn't play," said John Connolly, the chief investment strategist at Dean Witter.  "Now the cyclicals are really starting to chip in and the Dow is catching up."  He noted, however, that some of the biggest price gains among the 30 stocks in the Dow Jones average have come in two issues -- Philip Morris and Procter & Gamble -- that are considered defensive stocks.  Charles Clough, the head of investment strategy at Merrill Lynch, noted that the stock market since the October 1987 crash has overcome many obstacles.  "Over the last year stocks have weathered a tight Federal Reserve policy, rising interest rates, a slowing economy and slower corporate earnings momentum," he said.  Now, he added, the economy is reaching a point in which the environment is turning favorable for stocks.  With interest rates falling and inflation easing, "All the forces are there to suggest that the market can go higher," he said.  In major market activity:  Stock prices rallied in active trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 198.7 million shares.  Advancing issues on the Big Board were ahead of decliners, 838 to 653.  Bond prices rose on the final day of the Treasury's three-day refinancing operation.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond gained almost a point, or nearly $10 for each $1,000 face amount.  The yield slipped to 8.07%.  The dollar strengthened modestly.  In late New York trading the currency was quoted at 1.9055 marks and 139.85 yen, compared with 1.8975 marks and 139.15 yen Wednesday.  Sorema N.A. Holding Corp. said it completed its acquisition of Copenhagen Reinsurance Co. of America in an all-stock transaction.  The purchase, agreed to last May, was subject to regulatory approvals, which were received late last month.  The acquired company, renamed Sorema North America Reinsurance Co., will have a statutory policyholders' surplus of about $100 million.  In exchange for its American unit, Copenhagen Reinsurance Ltd. of Denmark received a 15% stake in the holding company, valued at about $15 million.  The remaining 85%, valued at about $85 million, is owned by Groupama, France's largest domestic property and casualty insurer.  Porsche Cars of North America Inc. said it won't raise the prices of its 1990 models when they come out in late September, even though several new standard features have been added to the cars.  The move follows a decision last April by the U.S. sales and marketing arm of Porsche AG of West Germany to cut prices on its 944 models, which constitute about half of Porsche's U.S. sales.  It also is a response to Porsche's slower U.S. sales and the weakening demand for European luxury cars in the U.S. Last year, Porsche sales dropped 33%, and they fell 44% this year through July.  As a result of the price freeze, some Porsche 944 models will sell for about the same price they carried in the 1988-model year.  Other 1990 models will have the same price as the 1989 models.  The base price of the least expensive model, the Porsche 944 S2 coupe, will remain at $41,900.  The highest-priced car, the 911 Carrera 4 Cabriolet convertible, will remain at $77,800.  The added features include driver-side and passenger-side air bags on all of the company's car lines; not all 1989 models had air bags.  Porsche also added features on individual cars, such as a tire-pressure monitoring system on the 928 model.  Part of the problem that Porsche faces is the result of significant price increases in previous model years.  The decline of the U.S. dollar's value and Porsche's high overhead costs made it difficult for the auto maker to avoid the price boosts.  "We've been working hard to reduce our overhead and production costs and, when possible, pass those savings on to customers," said Brian Bowler, president and chief executive officer of Porsche's U.S. sales unit.  Newmont Mining Corp. said it agreed to buy an additional 5% stake in Peabody Holding Co. from Equitable Life Assurance Society of the U.S. for $57.5 million, giving Newmont a majority stake in the nation's largest coal concern.  Newmont, a mining concern, said the move is intended to allow it to pull at least $400 million in cash out of its investment in Peabody.  The transaction also is expected to increase Peabody's debt by at least $800 million over the company's current debt of $600 million.  Newmont, which currently owns 49.97% of Peabody, said Peabody has an option to buy Equitable's stake first.  Either way, however, Newmont will become Peabody's majority holder.  The purchase is expected to close in late September and then, Newmont said, it plans to recapitalize Peabody in a way that will pay Newmont cash.  Newmont wants the funds to cut its own $1.2 billion in debt.  Last week, Newmont dropped a plan calling for Peabody to buy out its four shareholders other than Newmont and declare a special $425 million dividend to Newmont.  Newmont then would have sold half its stake in Peabody to Salomon Brothers Inc. and Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. for $75 million.  The end result would have been that Newmont received $500 million in cash and Peabody took on an additional $1 billion in debt.  However, Newmont said a sympathy coal strike and new environmental regulations that might affect the power industry and coal prices made it reluctant to take so much cash out of Peabody.  "We're very interested in Peabody remaining healthy," a Newmont spokesman said.  As a result, Newmont said it proposed that Peabody buy out its other shareholders for cash and notes instead of all cash but that Eastern Enterprises, one of the holders, balked at the suggestion.  In addition to Eastern and Equitable, Bechtel Investments Inc. and Boeing Co. also own stakes in Peabody.  Newmont said it is considering several ways to recapitalize Peabody, including a plan that calls for Peabody to again try to buy out the other shareholders and pay Newmont a dividend, or a plan that would pay a dividend to all Peabody shareholders.  After the recapitalization, Newmont said it expects to reduce its stake in Peabody to less than 50%.  The Interior Department has decided against appealing a court decision that said companies that are responsible for oil spills generally should pay the full cost of restoring the environment.  Last month, the federal appeals court here rejected an Interior Department formula that in most cases would allow companies to pay lower amounts for damage to wildlife and other natural resources.  The formula, which applied to damage done by hazardous wastes as well as oil spills, generally allowed polluters to pay either the cost of restoring a site or the market value of the damaged resources, whichever was lower.  In most cases, the market value is lower.  As a result of the ruling, Exxon Corp. is likely to face significantly higher costs than the department's formula would have required to clean up Prince William Sound, where its Exxon Valdez oil tanker spilled 11 million gallons of oil in March.  Interior Secretary Manuel Lujan said in a statement that appealing the court's decision would prolong the uncertainty over how much polluters should pay.  Hoping to maintain momentum in his $5.4 billion, $240-a-share bid for United Airlines parent UAL Corp., Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis obtained a meeting between his aides and UAL advisers last night.  The meeting in New York City was expected to center on the mechanics of how UAL plans to conduct a review of its strategic options so Mr. Davis can decide whether to press a timing advantage he enjoys over other potential bidders.  Mr. Davis was expected to be represented at the meeting by David Batchelder, the former aide to T. Boone Pickens.  One Wall Street source said the senior United adviser was likely to be Michael Goldberg, co-head of mergers and acquisitions at First Boston Corp.  People familiar with UAL attributed the board's surprising decision Wednesday night to explore all its alternatives, instead of rejecting the bid, to the threat that Mr. Davis could launch a tender offer and solicit shareholder consents to oust the board.  The same people said the review of options was designed to communicate to Mr. Davis that United wouldn't pursue a "just-say-no" defense.  One wag immediately dubbed it the "just-say-maybe" defense.  Although some people said UAL was hoping to spend two weeks before the board meets again to review its options, one joked that the review "could be very fast if Marvin Davis were to start a tender offer tomorrow and a consent procedure Monday."  But the stock action yesterday, in which UAL rose $7.25, to $251.125 a share, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading, indicated that its stunning surge since Mr. Davis's bid was disclosed may be decelerating until traders get a clearer picture of how the review will proceed.  So far this week, the stock has risen $86.625.  With UAL opening the door to a possible sale, takeover-stock traders focused on the same group of bidders who pursued Northwest Airlines parent NWA Inc. alongside Mr. Davis.  They are Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. and Forstmann Little & Co., two leveraged-buy-out firms, and Pan Am Corp.  Of the three, KKR is considered by far the strongest bidder, with financially woozy Pan Am rated a long-shot and Forstmann in between.  KKR has already agreed to work with the same two investment banks that advised the firm on its NWA bid.  They are Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. and Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  But one source cautioned that KKR's interest remains preliminary.  Some observers say Mr. Davis has come surprisingly far in just one week in his pursuit of United.  But others remain to be convinced that he sincerely wants to buy the company.  Some say he has been taken seriously because he set up NWA to be bought by someone else, instead of as a serious buyer himself.  Still, indications persist that his overture wasn't entirely unwelcome.  Instead of hanging up the phone when Mr. Davis telephoned last week, UAL Chairman Stephen Wolf is said to have conducted a cordial discussion of the UAL board's position and his own responsibilities that lasted five to ten minutes.  "There is no turning back for UAL.  A transaction has got to take place here," says Timothy Pettee, airline analyst at Merrill Lynch & Co.  He believes a transaction will be similar to Los Angeles investor Alfred Checchi's purchase of NWA. Mr. Checchi completed a leveraged buy-out of NWA with the help of $400 million in equity from a foreign airline, KLM Royal Dutch Airlines.  Many investment bankers say bidders for United will, like Mr. Checchi, try to line up equity from other foreign airlines to reduce the debt leverage of their bids and thus reduce the chance of federal government intervention in the deal.  Among foreign airlines that could become involved are two that already have a tie with United's computer reservation system, British Airways and Alitalia.  But British Airways has said it isn't interested in such investments unless it can exercise some control, which isn't legal yet for U.S. airlines.  Additionally, any buy-out of UAL, especially a management-led buy-out, may well include an Employee Stock Ownership Plan.  There are significant tax breaks for banks that finance transactions involving ESOPs.  For instance, the banks pay taxes on only half the interest charged for financing an ESOP-related transaction.  United employees have indicated they would be willing to participate in a management-led buy-out.  The International Association of Machinists says it may propose a transaction that includes a recapitalization, an employee ownership stake and an equity investment by a third party.  The union proposed such a transaction for NWA, including Forstmann Little, that became a back-up for the Checchi deal.  Government officials transferred deposits of three small, insolvent savings and loans to new owners, spending the first cash available under the new savings and loan bailout signed into law this week.  The transactions will cost the Resolution Trust Corp., the new government agency established to sell or merge the nation's ailing S&Ls, only $175 million.  That's just a drop in a flood of $50 billion the agency will spend over the next two years.  Under the deals announced last night, deposits of the sick thrifts will be transferred to new institutions, which include two banks and a savings bank.  The acquiring institutions will pay a premium for the right to receive the deposits, and they will have the option of purchasing loans and other assets of the failed S&Ls.  The deposits they acquire will be backed by equivalent cash payments from the agency.  In one transaction, Comerica Bank Texas of Dallas is likely to convert the thrift it is acquiring, Park Cities Savings Association of Dallas, to a bank branch.  The new law allows banks to make such conversions.  Agency officials hope that by giving purchasers of sick S&Ls such options, the new law will make the institutions more attractive to buyers and thus will draw new capital to the thrift industry.  For example, banks easily could expand their branch systems and realize economies of scale by buying S&Ls and converting them to bank branches.  "It helps to become the low-cost producer in the market," said J. Michael Fulton, senior vice president, corporate development, of Comerica.  Those who acquire the S&Ls won't be required to honor rates the institutions have been paying on certificates of deposit.  Instead, after two weeks, they will be authorized to reduce those rates to what they are paying on passbook accounts, according to a spokesman for the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. However, CD holders will be allowed to withdraw funds early without paying a penalty.  In the past, bank or thrift regulators rarely gave acquiring institutions the option to repudiate the CD rates paid by insolvent thrifts, even though such rates often were much higher than prevaili ng market rates.  Last year, such repudiation was permitted in just 30 of the 200 transactions in which failed banks were sold.  "It's important to emphasize in the bank area, most haven't been handled like this," a spokesman for the FDIC said.  Resolution Trust operates as an arm of the FDIC.  Comerica took over deposits totaling $39.7 million from Park Cities Savings, and is paying $20,000 for the right to receive the transferred deposits.  Park Cities held assets with a book value of $48.1 million.  In another transaction, $90.1 million in deposits of Liberty Federal Savings & Loan Association, New Port Richey, Fla., were transferred to the Citizens & Southern National Bank of Florida, Fort Lauderdale, Fla.  Citizens & Southern is paying Resolution Trust $1.1 million for the right to receive the transferred deposits.  Liberty Federal held $56.5 million in assets.  Resolution Trust transferred $46.5 million in deposits of First Savings of America, Orland Park, Ill., with assets totaling $21.3 million, to St. Paul Federal Bank for Savings of Chicago.  The offices of all the failed thrifts will open today under the names of the buyers.  Regulators said they will continue with such fairly simple transactions until they become more accustomed to closing sick thrifts under the new law.  "It will be a learning process," said Roger Watson, head of planning for the FDIC.  "We will start reasonably slow and be more careful in early transactions to perceive what the market expects and what the trade-offs are."  Once Resolution Trust gets its footing, he said, institutions with the greatest operating losses will be given a high priority to be merged, sold or liquidated.  Corporate doctor Sanford C. Sigoloff, himself a bit queasy after the rocky recuperation of Wickes Cos., has finally taken on a new patient.  The next in line to receive the Sigoloff cure is debt-laden L.J. Hooker Corp., the U.S. subsidiary of Australia's Hooker Corp., which got into trouble here in part by quickly expanding its B. Altman & Co. and Bonwit Teller retail chains and jumping into a major U.S. real-estate effort.  Treatment for L.J. Hooker -- as with previous Sigoloff cases Daylin Inc. and Wickes -- started with a Chapter 11 bankruptcy filing earlier this week.  And Mr. Sigoloff says one of his top priorities as chief executive officer at L.J. Hooker will be to reassure creditors.  Such a bedside manner is one of the specialties of the 58-year-old Mr. Sigoloff, even if he is perhaps better known for adopting the nickname "Ming the Merciless."  The association with the Flash Gordon villain at times seemed appropriate because he often has chosen to amputate the sickest parts of corporate patients as a way of saving the healthiest parts.  The Ming in Mr. Sigoloff was very evident in the early years of his 6 1/2-year tenure at Wickes, the big retailing and manufacturing concern that he took into the nation's second-largest bankruptcy-court filing in 1982; it emerged in severely streamlined form three years later.  As he manages L.J. Hooker -- with its B. Altman, Bonwit Teller and 13 other units in Chapter 11 -- one goal will be "to keep the other assets out of Chapter 11," he says.  Those non-Chapter 11 enterprises include some real-estate operations, Hooker's joint-venture interest in Parisian Inc. and its majority interests in California's Merksamer Jewelers and Houston's Sakowitz retailing operations.  Although he will operate L.J. Hooker through his Sigoloff & Associates consulting concern in Santa Monica, Calif., the Hooker headquarters will continue to be in Atlanta, he says.  Mr. Sigoloff, known for his almost constant travels among far-flung operations during the Wickes years, expects to be airborne a lot again with Hooker's widely dispersed businesses.  "I expect to be everywhere I need to be," he says, adding that he's glad to have spent a lot of time with his family in Los Angeles in the eight months since Blackstone Capital Partners L.P and Wasserstein, Perella Partners L.P. completed their purchase of Wickes.  Wickes was a bittersweet experience for the executive, who was trained as a physicist and chemist before finding a niche in corporate turnaround situations at Republic Corp. and Daylin, a retailer that he also took through Chapter 11.  Mr. Sigoloff was an extremely active and visible chief executive at Wickes -- as he probably will be at the Hooker operations.  He took to the airwaves as spokesman for the Wickes Builders Emporium home-improvement chain, calling himself "the toughest retailer in America."  In the ads, a lightning bolt struck over the heads of store workers, who dutifully responded that "we got the message, Mr. Sigoloff."  But his corporate strategy, after bringing Wickes out of bankruptcy-law proceedings in 1985, involved a series of big acquisitions, two of which were each valued at more than $1 billion.  The $1.16 billion purchase of the Collins & Aikman carpet operation drained Wickes's income and performed poorly, helping keep investors unimpressed with the company.  When a management-led buy-out fell through last year after a period of lower-than-expected earnings, the Blackstone-Wasserstein group ended up paying about $539 million for Wickes, about $34 million less than management had proposed paying.  Mr. Sigoloff blames much of the 11th-hour problems at Wickes on investor psychology.  Holders wanted "a quick return on assets that had to be repaired over a period of time," he says.  But he's still proud of having built Wickes's assets from the ruins he took over in 1982, a prospect that he hopes to repeat again at Hooker.  Mr. Sigoloff had been involved in teaching a series of crisis-management courses around the country when he encountered Richard Grellman, whom Hooker Corp. had hired to oversee the sale of Hooker assets in Australia and the U.S.  The two men eventually worked out a management agreement bringing in Sigoloff & Associates.  The L.J. Hooker case -- involving an expanding foreign-owned company making a U.S. bankruptcy-court filing that covers only part of its assets -- could be a model for future problem companies, Mr. Sigoloff believes.  Other international companies are bound to run into trouble and use bankruptcy court to work their way out, he says, and the prospect of managing the first such case is "very intriguing to me."  He says he isn't sure yet precisely what got Bonwit, B. Altman and the other assets into trouble.  "They were doing well enough for people to lend money to them, but it just didn't work according to the books," he adds.  Mr. Sigoloff doesn't envision getting involved in store advertising this time, though, because these store operations have a far better image than did Builders Emporium.  "Here," he says, "there's 100 years of history" and managers are highquality; "They don't need a tough CEO to get people out to the stores."  The first problem to resolve, he says, is that stores "have been basically starved for merchandise" because of supplier worries about payment.  Looking at the broader scope of L.J. Hooker's problems, says Mr. Sigoloff, the very act of trying to turn around retailing operations without the proper management expertise might have led it into deep trouble.  Turnaround situations, says the executive, are "one of the great sinkholes in American business if you don't do them right."  Mr. Sigoloff also is eager to put his team of five senior managers and four associate team members on a new case.  A few players have been with him since the Daylin days, with others joining for subsequent projects.  Although they have all seen rough times -- especially in the last days at Wickes -- some team members joke that they expect to see the Ming magic again.  One Sigoloff & Associates executive says he knew Mr. Sigoloff had found the right new patient when he "touched a broken display case, and it healed."  Kansas City Southern Industries Inc. won a legal victory when a federal appeals court Tuesday denied a request by South Dakota that the court reconsider an earlier denial of a $844.2 million judgment against the company.  The Kansas City, Mo., company said the court action this week represents the last step in the appeal process at the circuit court level for South Dakota.  The only avenue for appeal is for the state to go to the Supreme Court, the company said.  The court upheld a June 28 decision that reversed a lower court judgment against the company and its railroad unit.  A federal jury originally had found that the company and its Kansas City Southern Railway unit conspired with other railroads to obstruct the building of a coal slurry pipeline from Wyoming to Texas.  As a result of these actions, the jury said, the company and the railway caused the failed pipeline project to cancel its water contract with South Dakota.  The overturned judgment had included $600 million in antitrust damages and $244 million in tort and punitive damages.  At the Iranian Chamber of Commerce, Bahram Ravan sports aviator glasses, a seersucker suit and the latest fashion in economic thinking: a booster's view of Iranian business.  "This city is bursting with opportunities," the official says, waving his arm at Tehran's smoggy skyline.  "Iran and Islam aren't opposed to capitalism.  After all, you must remember that 'bazaar' is a Persian word {meaning market}."  Since the Islamic revolution, 'bizarre' has often seemed a better word for Iran's odd mix of business fundamentals and religious fundamentalism.  For example, when a Tehran assembly line worker decided reading the Koran was more important than working, his manager had to agree, or risk the ire of revolutionary enforcers.  Also unlucky was the engineer whose job interview included more questions on how to shroud a Shiite corpse than how to combat concrete creep.  He didn't get hired.  Now, for the first time in 10 years, entrepreneurs are optimistic that money-making, rather than the mosque, will drive Iranian economic policy.  Iran's President-elect Hashemi Rafsanjani, a businessman as well as a mullah, has signaled that economic reform will be his priority.  To succeed, he will have to overcome both Iranians' aversion to the West, and the West's paranoia about Iran.  The Chamber of Commerce's Mr. Ravan, who has a master's degree from the Massachusetts Institute of Technology, typifies the contradictions still tearing Iran.  Finishing a sales pitch about the bonanza awaiting foreign consumer-goods companies, he reminds his visitor: "If you want spiritual peace, it is enough to have one television set."  ---  A clean shave and a silk tie may go over well on Wall Street, but at Khomeini Square in Tehran, the dress-for-success crowd favors a three-day growth and a tie-less collar.  Beards are a sign of Islamic humility, neckties a hated emblem of Westernization.  Says one clean-shaven businessman: "If I grew a beard it would be easier for me to get a bank loan," because all banks are owned by the Islamic state.  But he shaves because Iran's surviving capitalists also network, shunning deals with those who look too fundamental.  Iranians doing business with the West have image problems enough, even without stubble.  When Manouchehr Talebian, owner of a castings factory, signed a contract for delivery of a metal-melting furnace from England, start-up supervision was part of the contract.  But Western technicians, scared of being seized by religious zealots, won't come to Tehran.  "They offered me my money back instead," says Mr. Talebian, who finally persuaded a lone Englishman to come by providing sanctuary in his Tehran home.  This year, Mr. Talebian was set for a business trip to London when the Salman Rushdie affair erupted, closing the British Embassy.  He hadn't yet picked up his visa.  Applying to go to West Germany instead, he found that relations with that country had chilled as well.  Because of such blips, Iran isn't exactly swimming in the international business mainstream.  A recent issue of Iran Exports magazine details the country's participation at trade fairs in commercial hubs such as Gabon and Beirut, and describes new trade ties with Algeria, Kenya and Bulgaria.  "Bulgaria?  Ecuador?  Give me a break," exclaims a Western diplomat in Tehran.  "These guys aren't interested in Bulgarian technology.  But they're looking for partners that won't bother their political bosses."  ---  Iran's recent change of bosses, however, already is signaling that the country is opening up -- even to tourists.  The State Foundation for the Disabled has gone into the tourism business, organizing groups from Syria and India.  And Mr. Rafsanjani has negotiated a trade deal with the Soviets, whom the ayatollah long called a "satanic force."  A few Iranian exporters wouldn't even mind getting back into bed with the U.S., the Great Satan.  Iran Poplin Co., a maker of bedsheets, boxer shorts and other textiles, had burgeoning sales in America before a U.S.-imposed trade ban in 1987 abruptly shut off the market.  The company has turned to Europe but is hedging against further diplomatic snafus by doing market research in Africa.  "You have to keep cool and calm," says Abdol-Reza Bajelan, Poplin's export manager.  There are 160 countries with which he could do business, he notes.  "If 20 or 30 of them stop you, others are always available."  The U.S. ban also cut sales of Persian carpets, which account for half of Iran's annual non-oil exports of $1 billion.  In Tehran's covered bazaar, Mehdi Segatchi unfurls a century-old Isfahan carpet.  "I could sell this for $15,000 in America," he says.  "If only I could sell it in America."  Before the ban, the U.S. accounted for 15% of his sales.  He even had his own shop in Utah, now closed.  His one remaining American customer is an Iranian-born carpet-seller who is stockpiling rugs with Mr. Segatchi for future sale at his store in Memphis, Tenn.  "When the ban goes, my business booms," says Ali Taghavi, who owns a shop in Chickasaw Oaks Plaza.  "Even in Tennessee they appreciate fine carpets."  ---  And even in the Islamic Republic, they appreciate greenbacks.  On Tehran streets, the cry "change money dollars" is heard almost as often as the call to prayer.  The government doles out hard currency only for essential imports, forcing companies to buy dollars on the street, at up to 20 times the official exchange rate.  In Iran, though, black marketeers don't hide in dark corners.  Hundreds crowd the sidewalk a few doors from the Central Bank, clutching plastic bags bulging with banknotes, and shouting their rates like traders on the floor of the Chicago Merc.  "Every time Mr. Rafsanjani appears on television, the dollar drops," says Mohammed Mamoudzadeh, a currency dealer in the bazaar.  The leader's sensible comments on the economy give confidence, he says.  But so far, the currency has continued to edge back up to its wheelbarrow rate of over 1000 riyals to the dollar.  As an accountant, Sargon Amirkhas finds all this hard to explain to his international clients.  For one thing, the item usually labeled "interest" on a balance sheet is listed in Iran as "bank expense" or "guaranteed profit" to avoid an Islamic prohibition on usury.  Business deductions are hard to claim because black market purchases, which often account for half a company's costs, don't come with official receipts and therefore aren't recognized by the state.  And Mr. Amirkhas's numbers-crunching still is done by hand in ledgers, rather than by computer.  Despite the Byzantine bookkeeping, he prefers accounting to other businesses in Iran, which are subject to the state's fickle attitude towards profit and private property.  "If your capital is on your body, they can take it away," he says.  "If it's your brain, how can they take it?"  These days, the state is trying to give back some of the assets it seized in the heat of revolution.  One industrialist was offered his aluminum factory -- plus the debts it had amassed under state control.  He declined.  ---  Iran's war-ravaged infrastructure also takes a toll.  In the laboratory beside Mr. Talebian's factory, there are two machines measuring metal hardness.  One is a sleek electronic tester from England; the other, a bulky mechanical East German version.  Mr. Talebian keeps both because the electronic one is too sensitive to Tehran's frequent power outages and surges.  A nearby wax-molding shop is staffed by women who wear Islamic headscarves and take meal breaks in a separate cafeteria.  Otherwise, Mr. Talebian's foundry isn't that different from counterparts in Cleveland.  He anticipates a strong recovery as Iran rebuilds after the devastating war with Iraq.  But most Western managing directors don't have to double as forklifts.  To cut down on the red tape that tangles all imports, Mr. Talebian often returns from business trips hefting spare parts and tools.  Trying to avoid crippling excess-baggage charges on a recent flight from Europe, he hauled aboard an overnight bag containing 55 pounds of pneumatic grinders and hammers.  "Someone walked into it by accident and almost broke his toe," he says.  Fortunately, he adds, "I have insurance."  Optrotech Ltd., Billerica, Mass., said second-quarter earnings rose 80% to $1.1 million, or 20 cents a share, from $585,109, or 11 cents a share, a year earlier.  The computer-systems maker said it reduced expenses.  Revenue rose 15% to 17.5 million from $15.2 million.  In the six months, profit rose 82% to $2 million, or 38 cents a share, from $1.1 million, or 22 cents a share, a year earlier.  The company said it is testing a new system in its Image product line at a major U.S. computer-manufacturing plant.  Image products are equipment used to make photo-tools for use in manufacturing printed circuit boards.  Western Digital Corp., Irvine, Calif., said it agreed to market International Business Machines Corp.'s high-capacity disk drives for personal computers.  The maker of storage-management and communications products valued the three-year, renewable agreement in excess of $60 million.  Western Digital said the 3.5-inch drives, which use the so-called small computer systems interface, are compatible with most personal computers.  The 320-megabyte drives are the highest-capacity 3.5-inch drives available, Western Digital said.  It expects the market for high-capacity drives to grow to $3.5 billion by 1991.  Under the pact with Armonk, N.Y.-based IBM, Western Digital will sell the drives under its own name world-wide.  Separately, Western Digital said its board authorized the company's employee stock-purchase plan to buy as much as $5 million of its common stock in open-market transactions.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Western Digital shares closed at $9.50, up 25 cents.  Subaru of America, Cherry Hill, N.J., announced discount leases on all its 1989 and 1990 cars, marking the first time the company has used incentives to boost sales of its Legacy model.  The all-new Legacy is designed to be the bread-and-butter model of the 1990s for Subaru, which imports cars made by Fuji Heavy Industries Ltd. of Japan.  The leasing program knocks the payments on a 48-month lease of a Legacy to $238 a month from $304.  The leases are offered through Subaru's finance arm, Subaru Financial Services.  Subaru's sales declined in each of the past two years after reaching a peak of 160,414 cars in 1986.  So far this year, Subaru has sold 87,088 cars, matching last year's sales at this time.  Last month, Subaru boosted overall sales by 16.5% compared with a year earlier, largely because it sold 3,700 Legacys.  But the company will need to sell 5,000 Legacys a month to keep up with the planned output from a new plant in Lafayette, Ind., scheduled to start production in September.  That plant is a joint venture of Fuji and Isuzu Motors Ltd.  Thursday, August 10, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9 1/16% high, 9% low, 9% near closing bid, 9 1/16% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.725% 27 to 49 days; 8.50% 50 to 59 days; 8.25% 60 to 89 days; 8% 90 to 119 days; 7.875% 120 to 149 days; 7.75% 150 to 179 days; 7.375% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.80% 30 days; 8.65% 60 days; 8.55% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.15% one month; 8.10% two months; 8.05% three months; 7.97% six months; 7.89% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.75% one month; 8.55% three months; 8.45% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.72% 30 days; 8.55% 60 days; 8.40% 90 days; 8.37% 120 days; 8.27% 150 days; 8.09% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% one month; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% two months; 8 13/16% to 8 11/16% three months; 8 3/4% to 8 5/8% four months; 8 11/16% to 8 9/ 16% five months; 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 15/16% one month; 8 13/16% three months; 8 5/8% six months; 8 9/16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 7, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.94% 13 weeks; 7.70% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.11%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 10%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.90%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.50%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Richardson Electronics Ltd. said it has been subpoenaed by the Antitrust Division of the Justice Department to produce certain documents in connection with the department's investigation of the LaFox, Ill., company.  The Justice Department in March began looking into Richardson's increased market share in the manufacture and distribution of tubes for television and radio transmission.  Power grid tubes account for about 35% of the company's $156.6 million in fiscal 1989 revenue.  Many companies abandoned the tube business in the 1960s and switched to transistors and other semiconductors, but Richardson remained and concentrated on the large market for replacement parts.  Since the early 1980s, the company has acquired 17 independent tube companies and divisions, and its sales have increased drastically.  Richardson said it must produce documents by Sept. 12 before a grand jury sitting in Chicago.  Fluor Corp. said it was awarded contracts by Rohm & Haas Co. and Clorox Co.'s Hidden Valley Ranch Co. unit.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The Irvine, Calif., company's Fluor Daniel Inc. unit will do work including engineering and construction management at Rohm & Haas's Bristol, Pa., acrylic paint base site.  Under a separate contract, Fluor Daniel will upgrade sewer and tank systems to meet environmental requirements at Rohm & Haas's chemical facility in Philadelphia.  Both projects are scheduled for completion by mid-1990.  Fluor Daniel will engineer and manage construction at Hidden Valley Ranch's Reno, Nev., food-processing plant under a third contract.  Completion is set for early 1990.  In early June, Sun Microsystems Inc.'s president, Scott McNealy, disclosed that the computer maker's eye-catching growth would end because of production and other problems.  He said Sun might have a "slight loss" for the quarter, but the relentlessly upbeat executive said the miscues had been corrected and sales would quickly rebound.  Barely seven weeks later, however, the Mountain View, Calif., workstation maker conceded that its problems were worse than it had let on.  In late July, Sun said its loss for the fiscal fourth quarter, which ended June 30, could reach $26 million and acknowledged that it might not earn a profit in its current quarter as well.  What went wrong at Sun to alter the company's outlook?  Three costly problems -- one new and two others the company failed to fix -- have left Sun reeling after seven years of sizzling growth.  First, the company failed to halt hiring quickly after sales slowed due to production, order and inventory problems.  In the past five weeks, Sun has added nearly 1,000 workers, even as its top managers publicly vowed to "freeze" hiring of nonessential personnel.  Sun employs about 10,000 people.  "Managers clung too long to the idea that they could clean things up right away," says Russ Crabs, an analyst at SoundView Financial Group, Stamford, Conn.  "Because they anticipated a quick comeback, many rushed ahead, hiring a whole year's worth of people even before" the new fiscal year began.  Second, Sun's troubled information system -- its computerized record-keeping network -- is still trouble, even though the company said in June it had been resolved.  When Sun finally installed a new information system in April, after considering such a move for years, it didn't work.  For several weeks, the company lost track of orders, inventory and other crucial aspects of its business.  Sun has since corrected the worst problems, but the system still doesn't track inventory well or spit out certain key reports.  As a result, to close the books on its June quarter, Sun must now finish some of the accounting work by hand, a spokeswoman says.  At about the same time that its information-system problems erupted, Sun introduced five major new computers.  But delays in producing some of the machines prompted Sun to shift its sales strategy.  "When the new products slipped a couple of weeks, we told the sales force to start pushing the old products again," Ed Zander, Sun's vice president of marketing, said in a June interview.  As a result, Sun sold more of its older computers than expected early in the fiscal fourth quarter.  "My forecast was wrong," Mr. Zander conceded.  Since late May, however, a bigger problem has emerged: Sun misjudged the popularity of its new, lower-priced Sparcstation 1, a fast desktop machine dubbed the "pizza box" because of its flat, compact design.  Demand for the machine, which uses a Sun-designed microprocessor called Sparc, has outpaced initial forecasts by at least a factor of 10, causing a painful shortage of parts.  Color monitors are in shortest supply, making it impossible for the company to fill many orders, an insider says.  Moreover, the popularity of the Sparc-based computers cannibalized sales of Sun computers using microprocessors made by Intel and Motorola to a greater degree than the company had expected, Mr. Crabs says.  Even though the Sparc-based machines are in short supply, many consumers who might have bought the older machines have simply decided to wait for the new ones, hurting Sun's sales for now.  Sun's sales shortfall and feverish hiring means the company probably won't make money in the quarter ending Sept. 30.  The prospect of two losing quarters in a row is prompting questions about the ability of Mr. McNealy, the chief executive, to control Sun's operations.  "McNealy's credibility obviously has suffered a great deal," says Robert Herwick, an analyst at the brokerage firm Hambrecht & Quist in New York.  "There's been a loss of confidence in him."  What's worse for Sun, these miscalculations have coincided with decisions by several important Sun executives to leave the company.  In June, for instance, chief financial officer Joseph Graziano jumped to rival Apple Computer Inc.; a major debt package unraveled in his wake.  In April, Bernard Lacroute, the company's chief operating officer and Mr. McNealy's right-hand man, left the company out of frustration with Sun's "hectic pace" and lack of controls.  To push into new markets, Mr. McNealy had sponsored dozens of autonomous units within the company.  Mr. Lacroute held this unwieldy organization together, but despite his efforts, by this year these overlapping fiefdoms had spawned confusion and waste.  The most damaging consequence of this infighting emerged in sales, where different divisions battled one another for the same customers.  "Our salesmen were confused, and our sales managers were confused," Mr. Zander said.  "Our competition understood our own strategy better than we did."  Mr. Lacroute's departure prompted Mr. McNealy to reorganize the company, a move many inside Sun considered long overdue.  Mr. Lacroute's responsibilities have been spread among a group of senior executives.  Besides reducing the company's welter of development projects and streamlining sales and marketing, Sun also has targeted its customer-service operation for improvement.  Though these moves will strengthen Sun, some outsiders believe the company's top management is thin.  "They need to find a replacement" for Mr. Lacroute, says Vinod Khosla, a Sun co-founder who is now a partner in the San Francisco venture-capital firm that Mr. Lacroute joined recently.  Sun, known for flouting tradition, has built a huge following among engineers and other "techie" professionals by selling high-performance machines designed to run smoothly in networks.  After routing smaller competitors in the work-station market, Sun raced after the computer industry's giants with a bold strategy built around the Sparc microprocessor and an invitation to other manufacturers to "clone" its newest machines.  Now competitors, the target of Sun gibes for years, are eager to take advantage of the company's difficulties.  Hewlett-Packard Co., which gained the lead in the market for technical workstations following its purchase of Apollo Computer Inc., recently mailed a "Sun survival kit" to Sun customers promising to "help you get out of the Sun."  Digital Equipment Corp., also on the offensive, earlier this year introduced computers that are priced favorably against Sun's.  International Business Machines Corp., the world's largest computer maker, is expected to introduce this fall a new family of computers aimed at Sun's traditional customers.  IBM has failed in its past attempts to crack the huge workstation market, but the new effort appears to be shaping up better.  "I'm worried about IBM," Mr. Khosla says.  "It's going to be a strong announcement."  ---  @ Sun Microsystems  @ SALES EARNINGS STOCK  @ QTR. (In millions) (In millions) PRICE  @ 6/30/88 $365 $25 39.25  @ 9/30/88 388 21 40.00  @ 12/30/88 448 30 17.50  @ 3/31/89 497 31 20.675  @ 6/30/89 425* (27)* 22.75  @ 9/30/89 510* 0* 14.50#  @ *Estimate by Shearson Lehman Hutton  @ #Closing price 8/10/89  Note: Stock prices are quarterly highs in over-the-counter trading  Henley Group Inc. posted a second-quarter net loss of $18 million, citing charges related to completing its acquisition of PA Holdings Corp.  In the year-earlier quarter, the La Jolla, Calif., industrial and investment concern had a restated loss of $57 million.  The results were restated to reflect discontinued operations and the consolidation of its Signal Landmark Holdings Inc. unit, a real estate developer.  Revenue for the latest quarter rose 61% to $407 million from $253 million.  Henley blamed the latest-quarter's loss on increased amortization of good will and other non-cash charges related to the PA Holdings acquisition.  In June, Henley agreed to pay Wasserstein Perella & Co. $165 million for the 50% of PA Holdings it didn't already own.  Henley attributed the revenue rise in the second quarter to continued strong performance by Itel Corp., a San Francisco, Calif., leasing company in which it holds a 40% interest.  New York Life Insurance Co., New York, said it has agreed to acquire Windsor Group Ltd. Terms weren't disclosed.  Windsor, a life-insurance company based in Britain, is a unit of British-American Insurance Co., based in the Bahamas.  New York Life said it is acquiring Windsor's total assets of about $167 million.  New York Life offers traditional life-insurance products in the U.S.  The company said its New York Worldwide Holding unit is buying the British firm as a first step toward establishing a presence in Europe before the creation of a single market in the European Community.  Trade barriers within the European Community are to cease after 1992.  Windsor's main operating group, Windsor Life Assurance Ltd., sells life-insurance products through a network of exclusive agents.  New York Life is one of the largest life insurance companies in the U.S., with $44 billion in assets.  UGI Corp.'s AmeriGas unit signed a definitive agreement with Martin Gas Corp., Kilgore, Texas, to buy most of the propane assets of a Martin subsidiary for a price believed to exceed $30 million.  AmeriGas will acquire West Florida L-P Gas Co. and Best L-P Gas Inc. from Martin-owned West Florida Gas Inc.  The two units operate 19 propane distribution centers in Alabama, Florida and Georgia, with annual sales of about $17.3 million.  The proposed acquisition is part of a UGI strategy to move out of industrial gases, a spokesman for the Valley Forge, Pa., company said.  The sale awaits government approval, but UGI said it expects the deal to close in September.  Bell Industries Inc.'s net income plunged 82% to $1.5 million, or 25 cents a share, for its fourth quarter, reflecting the company's sale last year of its computer disk unit.  In the year-earlier quarter, Bell had net of $8 million, or $1.23 a share, including a net gain of $5.7 million from the sale of the unit in April 1988.  Sales for the quarter ended June 30, fell 7% to $105.7 million from $113.1 million.  The Los Angeles maker and distributor of electronics, computer, building and other products said its electronics division, its largest unit, increased its gross profit margins, despite lower sales that resulted from the recent softness in the electronics market.  Other units had record sales and higher operating profit, Bell said, although its building products unit posted a decline.  For the year, net fell 64% to $4.6 million, or 75 cents a share, from $12.8 million, or $1.96 a share, a year ago.  Sales fell 3% to $418.2 million from $431.6 million.  Year-earlier revenue included $15.1 million of sales from the computer disk business.  Stan West Mining Corp., Scottsdale, Ariz., said it reached an agreement with its principal secured creditor to proceed with a major recapitalization plan.  Under the plan, Stan West, a gold-mining concern, said it will sell $4 million of three-year convertible debentures plus warrants to purchase as many as 15.9 million, or 51%, of the company's common shares.  The plan also gives Stan West's management options to purchase as much as 10% of the company's common shares.  Stan West shares closed yesterday at 9/32, up 1/32, in national over-the-counter trading.  Accrued interest on the debentures at a 15% annual rate will also be payable in Stan West common shares, the company said.  It plans to redeem the debentures in exchange for 10,000 ounces of gold over three years.  THE DOW JONES INDUSTRIALS passed 2700 for the first time in nearly two years, closing at a post-crash record of 2712.63, up 26.55.  The average briefly topped its all-time closing high of 2722.42 before profit-taking nudged it down.  Bonds also rallied, and the dollar rose.  Meanwhile, the strength of U.S. stocks is being matched in foreign markets.  ---  Marvin Davis and UAL held talks last night, with the investor hoping to maintain momentum in his $5.4 billion, $240-a-share takeover bid.  UAL's stock rose $7.25, to $251.125.  ---  RJR Nabisco plans to eliminate 1,640 jobs at all levels of its tobacco unit as part of a major companywide restructuring.  The cutbacks had been expected since Kohlberg Kravis's buy-out of RJR earlier this year.  ---  U.S. grain output is forecast to increase sharply this fall, indicating most American farmers have rebounded from last year's drought.  Still, the recovery may fall short of expectations, particularly in corn.  ---  Three small insolvent thrifts had their deposits transferred to new owners, becoming the first S&Ls to be bailed out under the new law.  ---  The FDA began a crackdown on generic drug firms involved in fraudulent activities.  It revoked recent drug approvals for Par Pharmaceutical and American Therapeutics.  ---  Procter & Gamble's profit rose 22% in its fiscal fourth quarter despite a steep restructuring charge.  Much of the gain came from cost cutting.  ---  Hilton Hotels has begun seeking a buyer for all or part of the hotel and casino company.  The widely expected move sent Hilton's stock down $3.875, to $108, in heavy trading.  ---  PaineWebber said it is investigating its activities with HUD following the disclosure that an employee is a key figure in the congressional probe of influence peddling at the agency.  ---  Unisys is freezing salaries and hiring and taking other cost-cutting steps due to lower quarterly profit and slowing demand for computers.  ---  Many Merrill Lynch brokers are angry over a new company policy that, they say, forces them to sell Merrill annuities exclusively.  ---  Royal Dutch/Shell and BP had sharp gains in quarterly profits, reflecting higher oil prices and strong gasoline and chemical operations.  ---  Many Canadian gas producers are refusing to sign long-term contracts because they expect higher prices.  Most contracts are with the U.S.  ---  Hooker's Bonwit Teller and B. Altman chains face more problems.  Vendors said they will supply new merchandise only if paid in cash.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 198,660,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2712.63, up 26.55; transportation 1419.63, up 13.34; utilities 220.20, off 0.12.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3332.36, up 27.94.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 128.41, unchanged; spot index 129.03, up 0.30.  Dollar: 139.85 yen, up 0.70; 1.9055 marks, up 0.0080.  Corporate Capital Resources Inc. filed a lawsuit in U.S. district court in Los Angeles, alleging that five companies with a stake in Corporate Capital tried to "artificially manipulate" its stock price.  Named as defendants are Securities Settlement Corp., First Options of Chicago Inc., Continental Bank Corp., Jessup & Lamont Clearing Corp. and Jessup & Lamont Securities Co. None of those parties could be reached for comment.  According to the suit, Corporate Capital reached an agreement with the defendants on July 12 for Corporate Capital to buy back about 4.5 million of its shares from the defendants at a price of 25 cents each in monthly installments of $100,000.  Two weeks later, the suit alleges, the defendants refused to proceed with the transaction and sold their shares to a third party.  Corporate Capital, of Westlake Village, Calif., is a business development firm.  PAKISTAN HAS EMERGED as an intermediary in talks on hostages in Lebanon.  While the Bush administration refused to rule out direct talks with Iran, Pakistan's foreign minister is expected to meet with officials in Tehran to discuss the release of hostages held by pro-Iranian Shiite Moslems in Lebanon.  A Tehran newspaper reported that "indirect talks" would begin soon.  The Pakistani minister, who is planning a trip to Tehran next week, met with U.S. officials last week in Washington, and an administration aide said the captives were "prominently discussed."  Two U.N. peacekeepers were injured as militiamen allied with Israel rounded up Moslems in southern Lebanon, a day after an Israeli convoy was attacked.  ---  MOSCOW SAID it would start paying farmers partially in foreign currency.  In an effort to reduce the nation's agricultural imports and increase domestic production, the Soviet Union announced that farmers growing wheat and other commodities would be paid in foreign currency, presumably U.S. dollars, for anything they produce above average levels from 1981-85.  The official Tass news agency said the government decision appeared to apply, at least initially, to state and collective farms.  The plan, first proposed during a recent session of Moscow's new legislature, is the latest in a series of moves to shake up the agricultural sector.  ---  Rescue crews in Ethiopia were sent to a remote area after two U.S. satellites detected separate emergency distress signals that could have come from the missing aircraft of Democratic Rep. Leland and 13 others.  The signals, both far from the flight path of the plane that disappeared Monday, boosted hopes of finding the aircraft.  ---  Solidarity lawmakers met with members of two small political parties to discuss Walesa's proposal to form a government coalition in Poland without the Communist Party.  If the two parties, traditionally aligned with the Communists, join with the union-led opposition, they would hold the balance of power in the Parliament.  ---  Estonia banned strikes in an attempt to end a protest by thousands of the Soviet republic's ethnic Russian minority.  But the strikers vowed to continue the walkouts, which have affected more than 30 factories.  The strikes erupted Wednesday after the approval of a law tightening residency requirements to vote or run for public office.  ---  Bush selected Powell to be chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff.  The four-star Army general, national security adviser to Reagan, would be the first black to hold the post as the nation's senior military officer.  Bush who passed over several more senior officers with his decision, called Powell, 52, a "complete soldier."  ---  The Air Force confirmed that the five astronauts aboard the space shuttle Columbia had placed a spy satellite into orbit.  The satellite reportedly is designed to snap detailed photographs of military targets, mainly in the Soviet Union.  The spacecraft is scheduled to land Sunday in California.  ---  Agricultural officials have detected hot spots of aflatoxin, a carcinogen that plagued the U.S. corn crop last year, in Texas and the Midwest.  The outbreak of the fungus-produced poison in south Texas is of particular concern since much of the region's recently harvested corn crop is used by many food companies.  ---  Officials in Mexico said more than 100 people were killed and about 200 injured in Wednesday's derailment of a passenger train in northwestern Sinaloa state.  Rescue workers searched for survivors of the crash, which scattered cars across the track into surrounding fields and a ravine.  The train was headed to Mexicali from Mazatlan.  ---  U.S. immigration officials have approved requests from three of nine Nicaraguan Contra members seeking political asylum, the State Department said.  The rebels had sought asylum Wednesday, two days after five Central American leaders agreed on a plan to disband the guerrilla forces.  ---  Police in South Africa dispersed a rally by about 500 trade union members outside a Johannesburg courthouse, where 27 of their co-workers were charged with disturbing the peace.  Police used whips and batons to break up the protest.  At least 18 black demonstrators were injured and 20 people were arrested, union authorities said.  ---  Authorities in Lebanon said at least 22 people were killed and about 140 injured in artillery duels between Syrian gunners and Christian forces in and around Beirut.  More than 500 people have been killed since the latest round of fighting erupted in March.  ---  A study concluded that 10% of U.S. hospitals surveyed, mainly in inner cities, treated 58% of 14,145 patients with AIDS in 1987.  The National Public Health and Hospital Institute also said that hospitals had a loss on average of $136 a day for each AIDS patient admitted.  Telos Corp., set back by $252,000 in write-offs, reported a 90% drop in fiscal first-quarter net income.  In the quarter, ended June 30, the technology-services company's profit fell to $45,000, or one cent a share, from $462,000, or 12 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue rose to $29.5 million from $27.3 million.  "Despite achieving sales gains in both our software services and hardware services segments during the first quarter, earnings were adversely impacted by various factors," said Howard H. Metcalfe, president and chief executive officer.  The write-offs, which had been expected, were taken because of revenue that had been recorded by the company but didn't really exist.  Telos said it has taken action "to ensure effective control over revenue recognition."  In addition, the board has appointed a special internal audit committee to review the situation.  Telos said its earnings were also dragged down by higher-than-anticipated operating costs, as they relate to revenue.  "Actions are being taken to reduce costs proportionate to revenues in the subsequent quarters, although some impact is expected to continue after the first quarter," Mr. Metcalfe said.  Telos's total backlog, funded and unfunded, was $176.4 million at the end of the quarter, up 76% from $100.5 million a year earlier.  This doesn't include a $40.1 million, five-year contract awarded to Telos by the U.S. Army Missile Command last month.  The company had total backlog at the end of fiscal 1989 of $179.5 million.  MAI Basic Four Inc. formally threw in the towel on its nine-month hostile pursuit of Prime Computer Inc., but an entity affiliated with MAI's chairman still plans to pursue a last-ditch attempt to win control of Prime's board through a proxy fight.  MAI let its $525 million offer for Prime's mini-computer business expire, and MAI officials said the company is now formally out of the bidding war for Prime.  "Our intention was to get MBF completely out of the {bidding} picture.  It's really time for MBF to get back to running its business," said William Weksel, MAI's president and chief executive officer.  However, Mr. Weksel said that while MAI is no longer participating in the pursuit of Prime, MAI's chairman, Bennett S. LeBow, will forge ahead with the proxy fight to unseat Prime's seven-member board through his Brooke Partners L.P. Prime had originally scheduled its annual meeting for this past Wednesday, but the meeting was postponed.  MAI's action comes one week after Prime reluctantly agreed to a reduced offer from its friendly suitor, J.H. Whitney & Co. Whitney's lenders had backed off from financing its original $1.2 billion bid late last month after Prime posted a second-quarter loss of $19 million.  The revised bid, for 49.5 million Prime shares at $20 each, is valued at $1.13 billion.  MAI has slowly been retreating from the battlefield ever since Whitney emerged in June as the friendly suitor.  Late last month, MAI dropped its tender offer for Prime, citing financing problems, but said it would forge ahead with a proxy fight for control of the board and the alternate plan to acquire Prime's minicomputer business.  MAI first offered to buy the mini-computer business for $450 million in cash and $150 million in debentures, but quickly changed the terms to an all-cash bid of $525 million.  Mr. Weksel said that MAI's decision to drop its offer for the minicomputer business "wasn't a question of getting the financing."  Although MAI's investment bankers, Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. and Merrill Lynch & Co., had declined to extend their financing commitments for MAI's $19.50-a-share tender offer for 49.5 million Prime shares, the bankers had assured the company that they could finance the alternate offer for Prime's mini-computer business, Mr. Weksel said.  The executive acknowledged that Prime's acceptance of Whitney's lower offer, which was reduced from $21.50 a share, was a factor in MAI's exit, although he also cited "the deterioration in Prime's results."  He added that, "There comes a point in time where it's just not worth it to pursue it."  As of March 31, MAI had spent $12.2 million on its battle for Prime.  The bond market snapped out of a six-day slump yesterday after the Treasury Department completed its huge $29.5 billion note and bond auction.  The Department sold about $9.75 billion of 30-year bonds yesterday in the third and final phase of its quarterly refunding of the government debt.  The average annual yield on the new long-term bonds was 8.14%.  That was down from 9.11% at the previous 29 3/4-year bond auction on May 11 and was the lowest yield since 7.49% at the 29 3/4-year bond auction on Feb. 5, 1987.  Bond prices opened lower, but they began to rally late in the day as speculation spread that the 30-year bond auction had gone better than many analysts and economists had expected.  In late trading, the existing benchmark 30-year bond rose nearly one point, or close to $10 for each $1,000 face amount.  The issue's yield, which moves in the opposite direction from its price, fell to 8.07%.  Municipal and corporate bonds also rallied.  Mortgage-backed securities ended higher even as more than $2 billion of new mortgage securities hit the market.  But trading was extremely light prior to and after the auction, leading to speculation that the rally reflected a spurt of buying among a small number of dealers who were rushing to cover short positions.  In a short sale, investors sell borrowed securities and later seek to make a profit by buying an equal number of securities at a lower price to replace what was borrowed.  "A lot of dealers had expected the market to fall after the auction," said Richard L. Sandor, senior vice president of financial futures and options at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  "This was a short-covering rally."  Many traders said there were very few retail buyers.  Many other traders seemed puzzled by the sudden turnaround in bond prices.  "A lot of people who were bearish are scratching their heads," said William Brachfeld, an executive vice president at Daiwa Securities America Inc.  Regarding the refunding, traders said investors gave a lukewarm reception to the first two legs of the Treasury's auction but showed far more interest in the 30-year bond sale.  The auction staged a "respectable performance, but was by no means a sellout.  Dealers still have a lot of supply," said Philip Braverman, executive director of BNY Securities Inc.  He said foreign participation, especially among the Japanese, was the reason why the sale went better than expected.  He estimated that Japanese investors purchased about 40% of the 30-year bonds, slightly more than had been projected a few days ago.  Mr. Brachfeld estimated that the Japanese purchased between 35% and 40% of the new bonds.  Bond prices were also supported by expectations that today's economic reports on the producer price index and retail sales for July will show the economy continues to weaken.  "Both those numbers are expected to be fairly important," said Charles Lieberman, a managing director at Manufacturers Hanover Securities Corp.  "There was some buying in anticipation that the data will indicate that inflation is moderating and consumer spending remains soft."  Economists surveyed by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report expect, on average, that the July producer price index rose 0.1% and that retail sales last month increased 0.7%.  If the reports are in line with the forecasts, that could "provide a platform from which the market can gradually improve," said Mr. Braverman.  The market was also helped by news of a stronger-than-expected cash management bill sale earlier in the afternoon.  Lawrence Leuzzi, managing director at S. G. Warburg & Co., said many investors were expecting the average rate on the bills to come in at 7.90%.  "When it turned out that the yield was 7.88%, there was a lot more investor interest in the market.  People were breathing a sigh of relief."  Treasury Securities  The existing benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late yesterday at a price of 108 31/32, up 30/32 from 108 1/32 Wednesday.  The yield on the new benchmark 30-year bond slid after the auction results were announced.  In when-issued trading, the new bonds were quoted at a price to yield about 8.05%.  The new 10-year bonds auctioned Wednesday were quoted in when-issued trading at a price to yield 7.98%.  The Treasury also sold $15 billion of 247-day cash management bills yesterday.  The average discount rate on the new bills was 7.88%.  Traders note that the bill sale saw strong bidding, as evidenced by the bid-to-cover ratio of about 3 to 1.  The ratio, which reflects the number of bids the Treasury receives for each bid it accepts, is used to gauge investor demand.  The bid-to-cover ratio at the 30-year bond sale was 2.06 to 1, slightly lower than the 2.10 to 1 ratio seen at the last bond sale in May, but a better level than Wednesday's 10-year note sale ratio of 1.91 to 1.  Meanwhile, short-term interest rates moved lower.  The discount rate on three-month Treasury bills was 7.85%, for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.01%, while the discount rate on six-month Treasury bills was 7.56%, for a bond-equivalent yield of 7.95%.  Here are details of yesterday's 30-year bond auction:  Rates are determined by the difference between the purchase price and face value.  Thus, higher bidding narrows the investor's return while lower bidding widens it.  @ 30-Year Bonds  @ Applications ................ $20,100,148,000  @ Accepted bids ............... $9,752,236,000  @ Accepted at low price ....... 53%  @ Accepted noncompetitively ... $374,000,000  @ Average price (Rate) ........ 99.833 (8.14%)  @ High price (Rate) ........... 99.944 (8.13%)  @ Low price (Rate) ............ 99.721 (8.15%)  @ Interest rate ............... 8 1/8%  The bonds are dated Aug. 15 and mature Aug. 15, 2019.  Here are details of yesterday's 247-day cash management bill auction:  Rates are determined by the difference between the purchase price and face value.  Thus, higher bidding narrows the investor's return while lower bidding widens it.  @ 247-Day Bills  @ Applications ............... $45,312,375,000  @ Accepted bids .............. $15,020,305,000  @ Accepted at low price ...... 7%  @ Accepted noncompetitively .. $14,000,000  @ Average price (Rate) ....... 94.593 (7.88%)  @ High price (Rate) .......... 94.600 (7.87%)  @ Low price (Rate) ........... 94.580 (7.90%)  @ Interest rate .............. 8.36%  The bills are dated Aug. 15 and mature April 19, 1990.  Mortgage-Backed Securities Over $2 billion in new Remic securities hit the Street, and prices of Government National Mortgage Association securities and other mortgage issues were 1/8 to 1/4 point firmer late yesterday.  Traders said retail interest was strong throughout the session.  Even in the early hours of trading, when prices were lower on the day, demand was strong enough to keep spreads to Treasurys tight.  As Treasurys rallied, spreads widened out to about where they left off late Wednesday, according to traders.  Market participants said the heavy issuance of real estate mortgage investment conduits was an offshoot of the massive thrift sales of mortgage securities in recent weeks.  Dealers "had a lot of collateral" on hand to back collateralized mortgage obligations, said one trader.  An apparent slowing in the pace of thrift portfolio liquidations yesterday contributed to the firm tone, traders noted.  Among the major derivative offerings were: $875.1 million of Federal National Mortgage Association Remic securities through Goldman, Sachs & Co.; a $500 million Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. Remic through First Boston Corp.; a $400 million Freddie Mac Remic through Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.; a $300 million Smith Barney Mortgage Capital Trust 10 issue through Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.; and a $299.9 million UBS Mortgage Trust 1 Remic through UBS Securities Inc.  Ginnie Mae 9% securities for August delivery were quoted late at 97 29/32, up 1/8 on the day and up from a 97 14/32 morning low.  The yield was about 9.428% to a 12-year average life assumption.  Municipals  Municipal bonds reversed a weeklong downswing, traveling higher on the coattails of Treasurys to stand up as much as 1/2 point on the day.  Prices started the day with a decline, waffled through midday, then shot higher in the afternoon as speculation mounted that the 30-year Treasury bond auction went well.  Traders said the auction results solidified the day's gains.  For example, Triborough Bridge and Tunnel Authority's 7 1/8% securities of 2019, among the most active of New York dollar bonds during the session, were bid as low as 97 3/8 in the morning before climbing to 98 1/8.  The bonds closed at 97 5/8 bid Wednesday.  The move overall pared the yield about 0.05 percentage point to 7.27%.  "It was the classic whipsaw" trading pattern, said one New York trader of the session.  The improved market sentiment appears to have helped the week's stymied new issues, with a number of major open account balances slashed.  Foreign Bonds  British government bonds, called gilts, ended about 1/8 point higher, but that amounted to only a small portion of the gains posted earlier in the day.  Gilts opened on a strong note, which overwhelmed supply and surprised traders who had expected only thin activity.  The rally in gilts brought yields at the long end down below 9.60% for the first time since mid-March.  But "prices just backed away from their highs once volume dried up by midday," one trader said.  He added that a pullback in the pound from morning highs contributed to the gilts' weakness.  The benchmark 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 ended 5/32 higher at 116 6/32 to yield 9.58%, while the 11 3/4% notes due 1991 rose 2/32 to 100 6/32 to yield 11.57%.  Japanese government bond prices ended slightly lower in dull trading.  The benchmark No. 111 4.6% issue due 1998 closed at 97.10, down 0.09 yen per 100 yen face value.  The yield rose to 5.075%.  West German bond prices drifted in aimless trading.  Traders said investors were hoping today's July U.S. producer price and retail sales data would add some life to the market.  After last week's surprise U.S. non-farm payroll revision, however, no one was willing to risk taking a position the day before the release of key data.  The government's 6 3/4% issue due 1999 fell 0.10 point to 100.65 to yield 6.65%, while the 6 3/4% notes due 1994 gained 0.10 point to 100.20 to yield 6.69%.  Among recent German Eurobonds, the World Bank 6 3/4% issue due 1999 was unchanged at 99.25 to yield 6.85%.  Corporate Issues  Corporate bonds ended 1/4 to almost 1/2 point higher.  One new issue came late in the day.  Gaylord Container Corp., a maker of paper packaging products, issued $150 million of subordinated debentures that were priced to yield 13.75%.  Charles L. Chadwell, 48 years old, was named vice president of the human resources operation of this company's aircraft engines division.  He succeeds Sam Dolfi, 60, who retired.  Mr. Chadwell had been general manager of the Lynn, Mass., production operation of the aircraft engines division.  Separately, Michael A. Smith, 45, was named vice president and general manager of the aircraft electronics division.  He had been president of the automated systems department and succeeds Robert G. Stiber, 43, a corporate vice president, who was named general manager of the small aircraft engine group.  General Electric also has interests in financial services, broadcasting, industrial and lighting products and plastics.  Clorox Co. expects to report net income for the quarter and year ended June 30 fell from a year-earlier, reflecting a write-down from the anticipated sale of its Olympic paints division.  The household-product concern's net for the year-ago quarter totaled $36.5 million, or 67 cents a share.  Fourth-quarter sales rose about 15% from $360.8 million a year earlier.  Net for the previous year was $130.9 million, or $2.39 a share.  Sales grew 18% from $1.15 billion the previous year.  Results for the prior periods were restated to reflect exclusion of the Olympic division's results as well as the exercise of a note by Henkel KGaA, a West German household-product and chemical company owning about 27.3% of Clorox's 55.4 million common shares outstanding.  William F. Ausfahl, group vice president and chief financial officer, said that in fiscal 1989, Clorox shipped record volumes of several established product lines, including liquid bleach, cat litter and barbecue sauce.  Improved performance also reflects the absence of some charges against equipment and foreign investments taken in last year's fourth quarter.  "So our continuing businesses are very healthy," he said.  However, the company lavished its highest-ever level of spending on several new product introductions -- including its Clorox Detergent, still in test-markets in the West, Southwest and Southeast.  The detergent has prompted a round of competitive products and promotions by giant Cincinnati-based Procter & Gamble Co. and others.  Thus, the anticipated date of the detergent's national introduction is still a closely guarded secret "for competitive reasons," Mr. Ausfahl added.  The planned sale of the Olympic paints division, a strategic move to concentrate on core household and food-service businesses is pending.  The sale for an as-yet undetermined price will result in a write-down of unknown size, Mr. Ausfahl said.  This anticipated write-down -- which he declined to discuss -- depressed net to below last year's periods, "but we will still be profitable," he added.  Analysts have estimated that the paint division could fetch anywhere from $70 million to $120 million, but Clorox won't comment on such speculation.  The company said it is still reviewing bids from several potential buyers.  In a brush with history, the Dow Jones Industrial Average briefly vaulted above its 1987 record close before profit-taking in the final minutes cut into its gain.  The average finished 26.55 points higher at 2712.63 after peaking about 5 1/2 points above its best closing mark of 2722.42.  It was the average's second highest close in history, a post-crash high and its first close above 2700 in nearly two years.  The closing level on the average is what matters for the record books.  Computers at brokerage firms and stock-quotation vendors calculate the industrial average throughout each session, but variations in how these systems work result in varying figures for the intraday highs and lows.  Yet another version of this and other major stock averages is the "theoretical" high and low, which is shown in the table under the charts of the Dow Jones Averages on Page C3.  These are based on the highest and lowest New York Stock Exchange prices for the stocks in those averages, no matter what time of day each high and low occurred.  Yesterday, traders said a recovery in Treasury bonds unleashed a wave of speculative buying in the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index futures pit.  That in turn triggered a number of computer-related buy programs that sent the industrials climbing toward record territory.  Aside from futures-related activity, buying in Procter & Gamble and Woolworth provided a major boost.  Broader market averages trailed the blue-chips.  The Standard & Poor's 500-stock index, for example, gained 1.31 to 348.25.  Advancing stocks led decliners on the Big Board by a narrow margin, as 838 issues rose in price and 653 fell.  "You have to be concerned with the breadth of the rally," said Tom Gallagher, managing director in charge of capital commitment at Oppenheimer & Co.  "The closer the market gets to its old high, the sloppier it gets, and it is going to have to pay the piper for the poor technical structure."  On the floor of the New York Stock Exchange, a cheer went up as the industrial average ran past the record closing level at about 3:30 p.m. EDT. But, traders said, the mood at the exchange was much more subdued than it was in August 1987 when the record was set.  "It's a hollow victory insofar as the prosperity of the participants isn't there," said veteran New York Stock Exchange floor broker John B. Burke.  "People in this business aren't making the money they were two years ago when it looked like the whole world was participating."  Procter & Gamble jumped 5 3/8 to 123 5/8 after its latest earnings proved better than analysts had expected.  The company reported net income of 99 cents a share for its fourth quarter ended in June, compared with 82 cents a year earlier.  "The company's prospects continue to be very bright," said Jay Freedman, an analyst at Kidder Peabody, who raised Kidder's earnings estimate on P&G for fiscal 1990 to $8.50 a share from $8.25.  The company should benefit from "a very powerful combination" of strong sales volume and improving operating profit margins because of its cost controls, Mr. Freedman said.  He also raised Kidder's P&G stock-price targets for June 1990 and June 1991 by $10 a share each to $140 and $160, respectively.  The firm also raised its investment rating on Woolworth, which climbed 3 to 63 7/8.  Dean Witter Reynolds said the stock could be worth $82 to $84 a share in a leveraged buy-out.  The company declined to comment.  Other strong blue-chips included Eastman Kodak, which went up 1 1/8 to 51 3/4 in composite trading of 2.6 million shares; Philip Morris, up 2 3/4 to 163 1/4; McDonald's, up 1 to 30 1/8; Minnesota Mining & Manufacturing, up 5/8 to 79; and Goodyear Tire & Rubber, up 1 1/8 to 55 3/8.  Aluminum Co. of America was unchanged at 73 1/2; Prudential-Bache Securities lowered its investment rating on the stock.  Computer Associates International was the most active Big Board issue; 6.8 million shares changed hands after the company said delays in its takeover of Cullinet Software have produced "substantial uncertainty" about results for the current quarter.  Computer Associates plunged 2 3/8 to 17, while Cullinet fell 1 1/8 to 8 1/4.  Another technology issue, National Semiconductor, rose 7/8 to 7 3/4 on 2.5 million shares amid speculation that Intel may offer to acquire the company.  Intel declined to comment, but analysts were generally skeptical, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  UAL, the owner of United Airlines, gained 7 1/4 to 251 1/8 after the company's board decided to explore all its options instead of rejecting the $240-a-share bid from investor Marvin Davis.  The advance lifted the Dow Jones Transportation Average to its fourth consecutive all-time high, as it gained 13.34 to 1419.63.  HAL, the parent of Hawaiian Airlines, surged 3 3/8 to 35 3/8 on the American Stock Exchange as rumors resurfaced that Delta Air Lines is interested in acquiring the company.  Other strong airline stocks included Alaska Air Group, which rose 1 to 30 1/4, and USAir Group, which gained 7/8 to 52 1/2.  A late sell-off hurt Delta, which remained unchanged at 79 3/8 but traded as high as 80 1/2.  Late selling in AMR, the owner of American Airlines, pushed that stock up 5/8 to 77 1/2.  Hilton Hotels dropped 3 7/8 to 108.  Its board instructed its management and financial advisers to begin soliciting takeover bids for the company and its hotel segment, but details of the instructions proved to contain some bearish elements.  Holiday fell 3/8 to 70 1/2, and Caesars World lost 3/4 to 40 3/8, but other hotel and casino stocks held solid gains.  Golden Nugget rose 1 1/4 to 26 1/2, Circus Circus Enterprises advanced 2 1/8 to 47 7/8, and Prime Motor Inns gained 1 5/8 to 36 1/2.  Rorer Group, a perennial target of vague takeover rumors, went up 5/8 to 44 7/8.  Other drug stocks showing strength included Upjohn, which advanced 1 3/4 to 37 1/2 on volume of 2.6 million shares, and Bristol-Myers, which rose 7/8 to 47 7/8 on 2.4 million shares.  Tambrands jumped 3 1/4 to 71 3/4 on a report that Centaur Partners has a 3% stake in the company.  Ferro climbed 3 to 58 7/8 amid rumors of a possible offer from either Centaur or Japonica Partners.  The two New York-based investment firms declined to comment on speculation that they might make an offer.  Beverly Enterprises gained 1 1/4 to 9 3/4 on 4.1 million shares.  Traders and analysts cited vague takeover speculation, including rumors that the Pritzker family of Chicago may be interested in the company.  Todd Shipyards rose 1 to 7.  The company posted earnings of $5.9 million for its first quarter, ended July 2.  It had a loss of $2.3 million a year earlier.  Lac Minerals rose 3/4 to 11 1/2 in advance of a Canadian court ruling that's expected to resolve a dispute over ownership of the Page-Williams gold mine, the country's largest.  Another company involved in the dispute, Corona, gained 5/8 to 7 7/8 in active trading on the American Stock Exchange.  The Amex Index advanced 1.09 to 382.24, extending its string of record closes.  Volume was 17,990,000 shares, compared with 19,010,000 Wednesday.  There were 295 issues advancing, 275 declining and 263 unchanged.  Convest Energy Partners went up 3/4 to 3 1/4.  The partnership said it is exploring a possible business combination with units of General Investment & Development, the parent of its general partner, Convest Energy Corp.  A handful of inner-city hospitals treat an overwhelming share of the nation's AIDS patients, a situation that threatens their ability to provide general care, a study says.  An increasing percentage of hospitalized AIDS patients are indigent intravenous drug users, the study shows.  That trend could put more pressure on inner-city hospitals, especially public institutions, which already treat a large percentage of people with AIDS.  The findings were reported by the National Public Health and Hospital Institute in Washington, D.C., based on a survey of 276 hospitals nationwide that treated AIDS patients in 1987.  The data, published in today's Journal of the American Medical Association, show whom hospitals treat for the disease, what it costs and who pays.  The results show that 10% of U.S. hospitals treated 58% of 14,145 patients with AIDS, or acquired immune deficiency syndrome, admitted to the surveyed institutions in 1987.  Just 10 hospitals, including six public facilities, cared for 32%.  In addition, hospitals had a loss on average of $136 a day for each AIDS patient they admitted and $2,285 per admission.  Losses were higher for public hospitals, which admitted a higher proportion of Medicaid and indigent patients than private hospitals, the study shows.  "If current trends prevail," the authors, led by Dennis P. Andrulis of the hospital institute, say, "the generally inner-city hospitals where AIDS patients are concentrated may find their ability to provide health services in general severely compromised."  The authors also argue that political support for AIDS treatment could erode if inequitable distribution of cases continues and the overwhelming majority of institutions are essentially unaffected by the disease.  Among other findings:  -- Of AIDS patients admitted to hospitals nationwide, 54% were homosexual and 27% were intravenous drug users.  In the Northeast, 43% were intravenous drug users and 40% were homosexuals.  -- Overall, Medicaid was the primary payer for 44% of AIDS admissions, private insurers 29%, and Medicare 2%.  Uninsured or indigent patients accounted for 23%, and prisoners made up the remaining 2%.  -- Hospitals in the South generally reported the heaviest per-patient losses from AIDS cases, mostly because restrictive state Medicaid programs limit reimbursement for treatment, the authors said.  They urged that standards for Medicaid coverage be applied more equitably from state to state.  SPAR AEROSPACE Ltd., which reported a net loss of 5.7 million Canadian dollars (US$4.9 million) for the six months ended June 30, said it halved the quarterly dividend on its subordinate voting shares to three Canadian cents.  The Toronto-based communications and defense equipment maker said the dividend reduction reflects "current operating performance," which compared poorly with net income of C$4.4 million, or 40 cents, for the first half of 1988.  Spar said its 1989 results included a C$7.75 million pre-tax provision for items including restructuring costs, and a one-time gain of C$1.3 million from recovery of income taxes.  Revenue rose to $117.8 million from $117.1 million.  Spar said the dividend will be payable Oct. 2 to stock of record Sept. 18.  If an airline tried to increase profits by eliminating the emergency fuel carried on its planes, it is doubtful that many of its passengers would approve.  Yet according to some analysts and a handful of industry executives, airline buyers and would-be buyers now are proposing deals that, in a financial sense, are the equivalent of flying on one wing.  NWA, in the midst of a record operating year, has been acquired for $3.6 billion.  UAL -- its stock soaring -- is in play.  Shares of AMR, Delta and USAir are being traded at record prices -- exceeding even the blazing pace of the stock-market indexes.  In bygone days -- which is to say, until about six months ago -- airlines were viewed as unpredictable, capital-intensive companies, ill-suited to debt.  But since the purchase of NWA by a group led by Alfred Checchi, Wall Street has started seeing carriers as flying gold mines.  Through these rose-colored glasses, airlines' ticket revenues are seen steadily rising, their assets values as vast.  In the words of one industry executive: "The business is still cyclical, but it isn't as cyclical as it used to be.  Traffic has doubled since deregulation and nothing has changed in supply."  This executive says that business should hold up even during a recession.  And with fewer airlines remaining, he concludes, "those of us who are left will make a lot of money."  This theory, however, has yet to be tested by a downturn.  And the buy-outs being proposed "don't make sense if you assume that earnings deteriorate significantly in a recession," says Karen Firestone, a portfolio manager at Fidelity Investments.  Ms. Firestone, no cynic on airlines, merely says the industry "isn't predictable," and thus excessive debt is "risky."  Stated differently: Who knows when the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries, or terrorists, or unions, or a recession, will make the carriers' lives unpleasant?  The tone of investment bankers pushing airline buy-outs is very different.  According to a Salomon Brothers study prepared for possible buyers, "Traditional criticisms of leveraging an airline no longer bar transactions."  An unauthorized copy of the study, dubbed Project Frequent Flyer, says United, American, Delta and USAir are all "significantly undervalued" and could be leveraged and bought at big premiums to stock market value.  Salomon declined to comment on the report.  One airline financier, unrelated to Salomon, says, "What really happened in deregulation is you got all the fools out of the business.  Airlines used to be run by pilots."  The new buyers, he says, "have managers who realize they are there to make money, not give us a lot of bull about capital costs and cycles."  This financier insists that the new breed of buyers go through "very prudent economic models with all the what-ifs."  Mr. Checchi, in particular, he says, "made a very good buy."  However, John Neff, an airline investor and manager of Windsor Fund, says he is happy that he is not among the lenders to NWA's new owners.  "There is no margin for error," he explains.  Mr. Checchi and NWA officials weren't available for comment.  But Philip Baggaley, an airline bond analyst at Standard & Poor's, says NWA's pretax earnings this year -- estimated at $350 million to $400 million -- will only barely cover its estimated $350 million in buy-out related debt.  And NWA is enjoying a record year.  Total cash flow, which eliminates depreciation charges, might kick in another $350 million.  But, Mr. Baggaley notes, depreciation isn't merely an accounting entry; it represents deterioration of real airline assets.  Capital expenses can be deferred, but only for so long, he says.  "You can't eat into your seed corn forever."  NWA, like other airlines, may be planning to sell aircraft and lease them back.  Earlier this year, for instance, an airline bought four narrow-body Boeing 737s at $20.9 million apiece, and sold them to a Delaware bank for $26 million each, according to Paul Turk, an airline consultant at Washington-based Avmark.  Then, the carrier leased the planes for 23 years at 1.25% of its sale price a month.  Such deals may offer tax and other advantages; they also convert a capital cost to an operating (lease) expense.  But they don't eliminate the cost, or change the fact that flying is capital-intensive.  United, for instance, projects its capital spending at $2.2 billion a year, including $1.6 billion for aircraft.  Leasing planes, Mr. Baggaley says, is merely "another form of secured debt."  Currently, airline equipment "trades in a very active market, and values are a lot higher than in recent years," says Edward Greenslet, an analyst in Jacksonville, Fla.  But one industry executive says that with huge numbers of planes currently on order, such values could fall.  He also disputes that the industry is no longer cyclical.  "Beware of the guy who says this time is different," the executive says.  Salomon's study assumes that revenue passenger miles will increase from 4% to 5% in good years.  And in down years?  Apparently, there aren't going to be any.  It projects demand rising steadily through 1993.  Even armed with the news that good times will continue, Salomon's margins are hardly comforting.  A buyer of UAL at $325 a share would be able to cover cash interest charges with only a 7% margin in the third year of a buy-out, the study says.  Not to worry, it adds, because major carriers, by controlling routes and major hubs, aren't as vulnerable as previously to competition.  They also have "hidden, salable assets," such as airport gates, landing slots, routes and planes.  They manage fare structures more efficiently.  And they benefit from "high operating leverage."  For example, Salomon says, a half-penny increase in yield per revenue passenger mile would boost United's operating income by $363 million.  But leverage also works in reverse.  PaineWebber analyst Edward Starkman says a rise of merely 27 cents in the price of a gallon of jet fuel -- currently about 60 cents -- would wipe out the entire industry's 1988 operating profits.  Last year, the industry's operating profit margin was a post-deregulation high of 5.4%, according to the Air Transport Association.  But a scant two years earlier, margins were half their current level.  And for the first four years of the 1980s, the industry had losses of about $1.4 billion.  "People are looking at it as a new industry, and it may well be," says Paul E. Tierney Jr. principal in Coniston Partners, which helped spur a restructuring of UAL in 1987.  But he says, "It's a time when a lot of the stars are lined up in the right position.  We've got stable labor, decreasing interest rates, low oil prices and high {airplane} load factors."  In fact, while most carriers are struggling to update aging fleets, there are signs that industry growth is already peaking.  Total revenue passenger miles rose a scant 1.1% in the first six months of 1989.  Domestic traffic, in that period, fell by 1.6%.  And prices people pay to ride on airlines, after rising sharply in the latter half of last year, have been falling for several months.  Prices climbed to 14 cents per passenger mile early this year, the Air Transport Association says.  Since then, prices have fallen to 12.8 cents.  Julius Maldutis, a Salomon Brothers analyst who is separate from the firm's investment bankers, says, "I have maintained that since domestic traffic turned negative in February we have had a very early warning" of an industry slowdown.  While industry profits are high, they owe much to the strike at Eastern, which apparently is rebuilding service.  For a carrier such as United, which isn't a major Eastern competitor, operating profits before interest and taxes fell slightly in the second quarter.  "The conventional wisdom is that it's not like in the past, but that still leaves a lot of room for volatility," one analyst says.  Those bent on restructuring carriers "are betting that if we do see passenger loads dropping, the airlines will have the discipline to not go crazy on cutting fares," PaineWebber's Mr. Starkman says.  "As a prudent buyer, I'd want to have as much cushion as I could."  ---  Randall Smith contributed to this article.  Every year, a significant part of this city's wealth goes up in smoke.  Political parties and business and cultural associations pay millions of pesetas for costly displays of fireworks throughout the year.  Each March, in an annual festival, several hundred neighborhood groups spend lavishly on elaborate papier-mache street sculptures that they consign to the flames.  "Other cultures have different ways of disposing of surpluses.  This is our way," shrugs Josep Vicent Marques, a sociologist.  Adds Vicente Gonzalez Lizondo, a local politician and fireworks enthusiast: "It's very satisfying to see how the sky lights up."  Valencia, Spain's third-largest city after Madrid and Barcelona, with a metropolitan population of more than one million, is a city of contradictions.  The capital of a prosperous region of sun, sea and orange plantations with an economic growth rate one percentage point above the national average, it's heir to a mercantile tradition stretching back to the Phoenicians.  The region's present wealth is based on a combination of tourism, agriculture and a host of small industries.  But the area's warm climate and comfortable life often seem to encourage rhetoric and show rather than action.  As a result, as Spain modernizes with a speed that has other nations gaping, Valencia is caught between the opposing tendencies of thrift and extravagance.  In the competition with other major Spanish cities, some fear Valencia risks getting left behind.  The fireworks and fallas, as the March festivities are known, can't be blamed for such problems.  They're just an external manifestation of an enviable Mediterranean joie de vivre.  But statistics suggest that there may be grounds for worry.  Despite a strongly export-oriented economy -- with 10% of Spain's population, the region accounts for approximately 17% of national exports -- the Pais Valenciano slipped for the first time for years from first to second place behind Catalonia in Spain's export stakes in the first four months of 1989.  Barcelona, the capital of Catalonia, will host the Olympic Games in 1992, and Seville will have a world's fair the same year.  In terms of foreign investment, too, Valencia is doing less well than other areas such as Catalonia.  Despite the successful record of large Ford Motor Co. and International Business Machines Corp. factories set up here in the 1970s, foreign companies coming to Spain have largely snubbed Valencia in recent years.  "Perhaps we're just too comfortable, and so don't recognize the need to attract new things to Valencia," muses an industry executive.  Now, local officials and business leaders are trying to counteract this trend.  The regional government has helped finance construction of a technology park, and the city's two universities have started offering courses in business administration.  Valencia's Socialist mayor, Clementina Rodenas, says she wants to convert the city into a modern business hub by moving older industry out and promoting banking and financial services, Valencia's sea port and its international trade-fair center.  "For years, this city has spent its time talking about its future," she says.  "Now, we have to get to work."  In its favor, Valencia can count on a strong commercial tradition and the dexterity of its citizens.  Captured by James the Conqueror of Aragon from the Moors in 1238 and made the capital of a newly forged kingdom, Valencia's cosmopolitan mix of Christians, Jews, Moors and Levantines made it one of the business and intellectual centers of the Mediterranean in the Middle Ages.  Today, local industry still bears witness to a tradition of craftsmanship in ceramics, furniture, shoe manufacturing and other sectors.  Some of Spain's most prominent family-owned companies are based here: porcelain manufacturer Lladro SA; fruit processor Pascual Hermanos SA; and Tycesa, the producer of Lois jeans.  The city has one of Spain's four regional stock exchanges.  The experience of Ford, which chose Valencia for its first car factory in southern Europe, demonstrates the area's strong points.  When Ford set up its plant amid orange groves south of Valencia 13 years ago, building work was finished one month ahead of schedule.  Instead of an expected 18-month lag for attaining full production, workers learned so fast that maximum output was reached in half the time.  Now, the factory employs 10,000 and has one of the company's best quality ratings in Europe.  Ford is investing 51 billion pesetas ($426 million) here on production lines for its new Fiesta model.  And yet, Valencia's Mediterranean character still threatens to put a brake on expansion.  In addition to their mercantilism, Valencians are notorious for individualism and lack of community spirit.  Two local sayings sum up their attitudes, says a businessman.  One roughly corresponds to "I couldn't give a damn."  The other, more difficult to translate, denotes a local tendency to act without thinking things out first.  In terms of efficiency, the results can be disastrous.  While politicians argue over whether Valencians speak a full-blown language, Valencian, or just a dialect that is a variant of Catalan, the language of neighboring Catalonia, truck drivers and tourists swelter in traffic jams caused by "the red light of Europe" -- a Valencian traffic light that is the first to break the chain of motorways linking Spain with Europe.  While large sums are lavished on an art center and a glass-walled music auditorium dubbed the Microwave Oven because of its intense heat in summer, ancient buildings around the city's gothic cathedral crumble in decay.  A new bypass around the city is being built, but it won't be finished for several years.  In the meantime, one of the city council's latest projects is a 225-foot-long recumbent statue of Jonathan Swift's Gulliver.  If nothing else, such projects have the merit of provoking debate.  "There's always a controversy about something," says Amadeo Fabregat, the director of a newly created regional television station.  But the controversies rarely reach a breaking point.  He adds: "Hardly anything ever happens.  It's like the fireworks" -- noise, light but then nothing.  To give Valencia a boost, regional authorities are encouraging local businessmen to take advantage of new securities-trading rules to develop Valencia's role as a financial market.  An organization to aid small and medium-sized industries, set up by city hall, is encouraging companies to group together to finance research and development projects.  But despite such initiatives, it's still largely up to individual entrepreneurs to forge ahead on their own.  Some, like Amadeo Folques, part-owner of a baby-shoe factory, are no longer content just to sit back and enjoy the fireworks.  Mr. Folques and two younger brothers who work with him built their company from scratch.  Their father, a teacher ousted from his job after the Civil War because of his left-wing sympathies, made a modest living from two shoe shops.  As a high school student in the early 1960s, Mr. Folques started making baby shoes as a sideline.  "In the first year, we made 50 pairs," he recalls.  Now, wearing an open-necked shirt, Mr. Folques sits in a cluttered office in a Valencian suburb, pointing at a map of the world with pins in it showing the countries to which his family company exports baby shoes.  In rented factory space behind, 70 employees aided by sophisticated computer systems design, produce and pack 750,000 natty pairs of tiny footwear annually.  It already has more than half of the Spanish market for baby shoes and sizable market shares in countries such as France, Austria and Italy.  But the cultural environment isn't easy.  Unlike Barcelona, Valencia has never had a strong middle class committed to economic expansion.  Instead, a proclivity to caustic humor and a yearning after past glories characterize Valencian society.  In another suburb, streets of warehouses are given over to craftsmen building the fallas, or burnable sculptures, that every year adorn Valencia's street corners in the March festivities.  When the fallas have been set up, on street corners and intersections throughout Valencia with consequent dislocation of traffic, "We all have a good laugh, including at ourselves," says Mr. Gonzalez Lizondo.  Two former Swiss-franc futures traders pleaded guilty in federal court to defrauding customers, and they agreed to cooperate with the government's investigation of the Chicago futures markets.  The former traders, William A. Walsh, 24 years old, and Mark E. Fuhrman, 39, pleaded guilty to making two illegal trades each last year with an undercover Federal Bureau of Investigation agent, who posed as a trader on the Chicago Mercantile Exchange.  Robert D. Mosky, 33, a Swiss-franc trader, pleaded innocent to racketeering conspiracy charges, 26 counts of mail and wire fraud, and 37 counts of commodities trading fraud.  Separately, Chicago Board of Trade members approved an increase in the fining authority of their directors to $250,000 per violation of exchange rules from $75,000.  The three men who entered the court pleas were among 46 people indicted here last week as a result of a federal investigation of futures trading on the Merc and the Board of Trade.  Twelve Japanese-yen futures traders pleaded innocent to fraud charges Wednesday, following three earlier guilty pleas from yen traders.  Six more yen futures traders who were indicted have yet to enter their pleas.  The remaining indicted traders, 19 from the Board of Trade soybean futures pit and three from its Treasury bond futures pit, are expected to enter pleas within two weeks.  Further indictments are expected in coming months.  Tokyo stocks closed lower after pushing the Nikkei index to a high for the day of close to 35000.  Share prices in London ended lower as the market underwent a limited, technical correction following its recent rally.  In Tokyo, high-priced stocks dominated the top 10 trading list, as they have all week, replacing normally popular large-capitalization issues like Nippon Steel.  The Nikkei average of 225 issues fell 139.47 points to 34719.80 following a 99.79-point gain in the previous session.  The high for the day was 34911.80.  The Nikkei has never closed above 35000.  In early trading in Tokyo Friday, the Nikkei index rebounded 110.73 points to 34830.53.  Thursday's volume on the first section was estimated at about 650 million shares, up from 545.73 million shares Wednesday.  Declining issues outnumbered advancers 583 to 346, while 172 issues were unchanged.  Despite the small volume, the Nikkei managed to remain at relatively high levels because of buy orders that streamed in for higher-priced issues.  Investors often go after high-priced stocks when volume is low because even a small amount of buy orders can push up their prices, traders said.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which gained 19.21 points Wednesday, fell 3.78 points to 2640.13.  Traders said high-priced issues usually remain popular for about two days at a time, at most, and this week's boost, fueled by Nintendo and Sony, has been unusually long.  Nintendo's surge early this week came after its announcement of a 50% gratis issue.  Yesterday, it gained 1,400 yen ($10.08) to 18,200 yen ($130.98).  Buying efforts for Sony, made by one of the "Big Four" brokerage houses since last week, spilled over into related or similarly high-priced issues.  Sony advanced 440 yen to 8,680, Fanuc was up 140 yen at 6,940, while Kyocera gained 160 yen to 6,700.  TDK rose 170 yen to 6,120.  One fund manager said buy orders for these high-technology issues may have been backed by their bright earnings prospects, but many other high-priced issues didn't have any particular incentives.  Other gainers included Sanrio, which was up 120 yen at 5,420.  Seven-Eleven was up 160 yen, closing at 7,650.  Nissin Food ended at 3,980 yen, up 330.  Housing issues, which fared well in the morning, ended mixed because of profit-taking, traders said.  One of the "Big Four" brokerage houses has been trying to stir up interest in the sector and make it a "pillar" of the market, an analyst said.  But the attempt hasn't been very successful because of the shift of attention to higher-priced stocks.  Daiwa House closed at 2,720 yen, down from its high for the day but up 10 yen from Wednesday's close.  Sekisui House fell 10 yen to 2,260.  Misawa Homes ended flat.  Meanwhile, in London, the market started weaker but recovered momentum around midday following supportive earnings reports and speculative buying interest in a few stocks.  Early afternoon indications that Wall Street would open weaker deterred investors and encouraged mild profit-taking.  The descent was accentuated by the actions of market makers, who trimmed prices in an effort to spark buying interest.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index ended down 13.1 points at 2347.3, just a shade above the day's low of 2346.4.  At its best, the index rose to 2364.7.  Despite the downturn, dealers said, institutions remained reluctant to part with stock.  "A lot of business today was just market makers juggling stock," a trader said.  The narrower Financial Times 30-share index closed down 10.6 points at 1961.4.  Turnover registered a fairly buoyant 574.5 million shares, up from 520.9 million Wednesday.  Speculative interest continued to focus on Scottish & Newcastle as rumors spread that Elders IXL has sold its nearly 30% stake in the Scottish brewer to a "friendly" party.  The shares ended at 404 pence ($6.57) on robust turnover of 4.1 million shares.  Tight markets in several favorite stocks sent Burmah 12 pence higher to 645 and Pearson up 4 pence to 803.  "Both stocks are viewed as possible takeover candidates," a dealer said.  Stores Group Kingfisher, which has rallied sharply in recent weeks, retreated 9 pence to 363 after U.K. brokerage house Hoare Govett issued a cautious report on the group's second-half earnings prospects.  Dealers said there were also rumors of an impending rights issue.  In Frankfurt, share prices ended mixed in lively trading after giving up most of their early gains.  Stock prices in Brussels closed mixed in moderately heavy trading as profit-taking eroded some shares' recent increases.  Nevertheless, the Brussels stock market index rose to its eighth consecutive record.  Elsewhere, shares closed higher in Stockholm and lower in Zurich, Amsterdam and Milan.  South African gold stocks closed higher.  In Hong Kong, shares closed lower in moderately active trading as the market's initial enthusiasm gave way to concern about a swirl of rumors concerning China's political leaders.  Shares in Singapore rose on a broad front following the announcement Wednesday of bullish 1989 gross domestic product growth figures.  Prime Minister Lee Kuan Yew said in a holiday speech that growth of 7.5% to 8.5% is expected this year, an upward revision from an original estimate of 6% to 7%.  Taipei shares continued to drop sharply as bearish sentiment pervaded the market.  In other Asian and Pacific trading, share prices closed lower in Sydney and Wellington, mixed in Manila and higher in Seoul.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 9 Aug 8 Year  @ U.S. ................... 319.7 321.5 + 24.8  @ Britain ................ 713.3 709.4 + 30.6  @ Canada ................. 435.8 436.9 + 18.7  @ Japan .................. 1564.7 1553.6 + 10.1  @ France ................. 524.6 524.1 + 18.5  @ Germany ................ 251.8 252.0 + 21.1  @ Hong Kong .............. 1961.5 1945.6 - 3.4  @ Switzerland ............ 237.1 232.8 + 37.1  @ Australia .............. 341.3 342.3 + 17.6  @ World index ............ 547.6 547.4 + 10.8  A telephone operator at R.J. Reynolds Tobacco Co.'s headquarters in Winston-Salem, N.C., answered the phone sobbing.  "These are the people I've worked with for 13 years," she said, in no particular hurry to patch a caller through.  "It's the buy-out thing, you know.  I'm real blue."  It wasn't a surprise, of course, but RJR Nabisco Inc.'s announcement yesterday that it was eliminating 1,640 jobs at its giant tobacco unit stung the more than 12,000 RJR employees who make and market cigarettes in North Carolina.  Many of the RJR workers measure their tenure with the company in decades, and the younger ones know it won't be easy finding jobs as cushy as those they had with RJR.  "Nobody in town pays the way they do," said Charles Beck, a former RJR executive who has his own consulting firm.  But perhaps surprisingly, many RJR employees say they don't blame the company's owner, Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co., for the firings, although a few said the New York takeover firm had promised not to make so many cuts.  Rather, to many, the villain of Winston-Salem remains F. Ross Johnson, RJR's former chief executive officer, who put the company in play with a buy-out offer last fall.  "It's all so unnecessary," said one RJR veteran.  "Johnson put this thing in motion and destroyed a company that had an enormous number of powerful brands and should have been a growth company."  Mr. Johnson didn't return phone calls yesterday.  Many of the 825 salaried and 700 hourly workers slated to be dismissed didn't know their fate yesterday, because termination notices weren't being given out in several departments until today.  When asked about morale, one recently fired employee replied: "None."  For years, R.J. Reynolds had operated in Winstom-Salem as a throwback to the heyday of Southern paternalism.  The company built local hospitals, schools, libraries and playgrounds.  Its employees still go to company-run medical and dental clinics.  In keeping with tradition, among the first outsiders to learn of the current firings were the city administrators, apprised earlier this week.  But the layoffs and other cost-saving measures associated with helping Kohlberg Kravis pay its monumental buy-out debt show how that benevolent style may be gone forever.  Although RJR is giving laid-off workers at least eight months of severance pay and benefits to help them settle into new jobs, workers expect the company's generosity to fade after it dispenses with the fired workers.  "The old tobacco philosophy is gone," says one recently fired employee.  "You better fasten your seat belt."  Several employees said work at the tobacco headquarters came to a virtual halt in recent weeks, as people mulled the possibility of being fired.  "Everybody has been holding hands trying to bind themselves together," said Jasper Randleman, an RJR veteran of 31 years who retired last year.  Mr. Randleman said trust within the company has also been lost.  "They've heard so much hogwash from senior management that they don't believe anybody anymore."  Raymond Mabe, a line mechanic in one of RJR's cigarette factories, said many employees blame the anti-smoking lobby, especially former Surgeon General C. Everett Koop, for sales problems in the cigarette industry.  In its letter to employees about the firings, RJR cited the lower sales.  Mr. Mabe, even though he says he was advised by RJR doctors to quit smoking because he was developing emphysema, said: "They done good when they got Koop out of office."  Deep in its Texas heart, this is still Jim Wright country.  And so as voters tomorrow begin the process of replacing Mr. Wright, forced from the speaker's chair and the House by charges of ethical violations, there remains a political vacuum in the stockyards, barrios, high-tech workshops and defense plants of Tarrant County.  Mr. Wright is gone from office but certainly not forgotten, and the result is that the eight candidates struggling to succeed him have generated so little enthusiasm that, in a poll taken as the final week of campaigning began, more than three voters in five couldn't bring themselves to support any of the contestants.  "It's hard for people to be dragged through Wright's resignation and then in a matter of weeks try to decide who they want to have that seat," says Perry Cockerell, legal counsel to the county Republican party.  "It's hard to believe we have to elect a congressman."  Chances are, in fact, that no candidate will emerge with the more than 50% needed to win Mr. Wright's seat tomorrow.  The two leading vote-getters -- probably one from each party -- will meet in a runoff later this summer, but they'll have little to debate besides abortion.  The candidates all oppose new taxes and vow to defend the defense budget, so important in a region where weapons plants and military installations are the oxygen of the local economy.  Local political analysts are looking for a strong showing by a Republican political newcomer, Dr. Bob Lanier, who is best known for his television homilies on how to treat cold sores and how to tell the difference between a poison-ivy rash and chicken pox.  The leading Democratic contender is a starchy former aide to Sen. Lloyd Bentsen, Pete Geren, who has the support of the party hierarchy but has neither been able to sculpt a strong political image for himself nor shake the challenge of Jim Lane, an insurgent who takes a pro-choice position on abortion.  Despite the presence of a handful of colorful figures on the fringe -- a Libertarian candidate who runs a carwash, a Republican anti-abortion activist who has taken in six unwed mothers, and the operator of a fence company who considers himself an expert on William Jenkins Worth, the Mexican War hero who gave his name to the city -- this campaign has been conducted to the score of a dirge.  For weeks, reluctant candidates half-heartedly have courted reluctant voters; even the prospect of Buffalo Sweat Margaritas made with Southern Comfort wasn't enough to lure more than a dozen people to the storied White Elephant Saloon Monday for the principal political event on Dr. Lanier's schedule for the day.  Now even the strongest partisans are complaining privately that the candidates display a startling paucity of political talent.  "Jim Wright was so revered here that there was never any idea we'd need a farm team," says Jody Grigsby, a consultant for nonprofit organizations in Fort Worth.  "We've got eight people running and none is qualified.  None has any background.  They're just now -- now] -- deciding where they are on the issues."  Mostly they've decided that the best tactic is to appeal to the vestigal support of Mr. Wright, who himself hasn't made an endorsement.  "If you speak ill of Jim Wright," says James Riddlesperger, a Texas Christian University expert on local politics, "it will backfire."  So Laraine Bethke, the GOP anti-abortion activist, vows "constituent services on the same level Congressman Wright provided."  Bill Turner, the fence dealer, is so desperate to show a tie to the former speaker that he is distributing a 17-year-old letter from Mr. Wright describing him as a "responsible and respected member of the community."  Dr. Lanier, the leading Republican, complains that Mr. Wright "got a bum deal."  And Mr. Lane sent out a mailing that invoked Mr. Wright's name 29 times and argued he was "the candidate best qualified to carry on the Jim Wright agenda."  Mr. Wright quietly summoned the four Democratic candidates to a luncheon in Fort Worth late last month and urged them, as he explained in an interview, "not to whittle each other up."  Many analysts believe that even if the GOP's Dr. Lanier finishes with the most votes tomorrow, Mr. Wright's endorsement of the surviving Democrat will help his party retain the seat he held for 35 years.  Even so, the fact that Dr. Lanier, whom Texans are more accustomed to approaching for advice on nose bleeds than nuclear deterrence, is running so well is encouraging to Republicans, who are fighting in a district that was drawn to ensure Mr. Wright's repeated, easy re-election.  In recent years, however, the Democratic dominance of the district has dissipated.  Ronald Reagan carried it in 1980 and 1984, and in 1988 George Bush won 53% of the vote.  "The values of Fort Worth -- and of Texas -- are basic, conservative, Republican values," says Fred Meyer, the state party chairman.  "It's finally beginning to show."  Indeed, the GOP has made a breakthrough in state legislative elections here and now is making inroads at the county-judge, tax-assessor and district-judge levels.  "People are willing to consider Republican candidates and don't seem to be embarrassed about it," says GOP Mayor Bob Bolen of Fort Worth.  Dr. Lanier's effort is boosted by his folksy familiarity, built through seven years of television exposure.  It was GOP Sen. Phil Gramm who seized on the idea of running Dr. Lanier, who didn't vote in either the primary or general election last year and once toyed with seeking office as a Democrat.  The son of a gas-meter reader, he worked his way through the medical school at the University of Texas at Galveston by fishing for speckled trout and redfish and then selling his catch to local restaurants.  He's equally resourceful in politics, with the result that the other candidates have had to scramble for a shard of the spotlight.  "I wonder about his sudden interest in public service," Mr. Geren says.  "He hasn't been around except in the living room on TV."  But Mr. Geren, too, faces questions over where he's been the last several years.  He lives a few blocks outside the district boundary, and when he mounted an unsuccessful bid for Congress in the district next to Mr. Wright's in 1986, Sen. Bentsen praised him for his "deep roots" there.  In recent days Dr. Lanier and Mr. Geren have been arguing over whether a country club they both belong to has discriminatory membership policies.  Mr. Geren is also charging that Dr. Lanier, who favors mandatory prison boot camps for drug dealers, is "soft" on drugs because he hasn't explicitly called for cutting foreign aid to countries that supply drugs to the U.S.  And in a debate this week, Mr. Geren was the only candidate not to support U.S. talks with the Palestine Liberation Organization.  The major area of contention among the Democrats is abortion, with Mr. Geren, who advocates "reasonable restrictions" in the "late term" of pregnancy, heeding his Washington advisers and seeming gradually to become more abortion-rights oriented by the day.  A poll conducted by the Fort Worth Star-Telegram showed that only one in 10 district residents favors a ban on abortion, with 66% indicating that the abortion issue is "very important."  Mr. Lane, who has some labor support and the endorsement of Mr. Wright's son, is openly appealing for the abortion-rights and women's vote.  The other night he confronted three women's rights activists and blurted out: "You people have more to lose than anyone in this race."  A strong turnout by a core of voters such as abortion-rights supporters could have a drastic effect tomorrow.  A GOP precinct captain expects the turnout to resemble a city-council election, and Mr. Geren predicts that only one in five voters will go to the polls.  "People know that Jim Wright is gone," he says, "but they haven't focused on the idea that there's going to be someone else in there."  A contract to purchase two Airbus A 310-300 planes has been signed between the European consortium Airbus Industrie and Omnipol, the Czechoslovak foreign trade company, the official news agency CTK reported.  It is the first time since the Communist takeover in 1948 that Czechoslovakia has purchased planes manufactured in the West rather than in the Soviet Union.  The planes, equipped with General Electric Co. engines and 216 seats in two classes, will be used by the Czechoslovak airline CSA "for transportation of cargo and passengers to North America, Canada, the Far East and possibly other destinations," CTK said.  It said the two planes would be supplied in late 1990 and early 1991.  The move is a part of a plan to revamp Czechoslovakia's state airlines in order to attract more tourists.  A federal court gave preliminary approval to a previously announced $18 million settlement by Dun & Bradstreet Corp. of five lawsuits concerning controversial sales practices.  The proposed settlement, announced in June, calls for D&B to make payments to certain of its customers who purchased more than 100 regular units of credit data service each year from January 1983 to June 1988.  The settlement was negotiated between D&B and attorneys representing D&B customers who filed the five lawsuits, all of which sought class-action status.  Notices would be mailed to customers before Sept. 30 explaining the accusations and terms of the settlement, said William Blessing, a Cincinnati attorney involved in the cases.  An 800 telephone number would be provided for additional information.  Attorneys for D&B confirmed the preliminary court approval.  Numerous D&B customers and ex-employees accused the company of misleading customers into buying far more credit data than they needed.  D&B has denied any widespread problems, although it has acknowledged that customers were treated unfairly in some instances.  The cameras are rolling for another episode of "Remote Control," MTV's strange game show on cable television.  Three college kids sit strapped into worn La-Z-Boy recliners, holding remote-control "zappers" aimed at a huge TV screen.  A contestant zaps to the "All in the Family" category, or "channel," and host Ken Ober poses the next question, for 15 points:  Instead of paying rent to Archie Bunker, son-in-law Mike gave $200 to the campaign of which Democratic presidential candidate?  "Nixon?" chirps 21-year-old Christine Kelly, her eyebrows arched hopefully.  "Gerald Ford?" asks David Romankow, 20, who despite that answer has so far drubbed his rivals by a 35-to-0 score.  The third player, 20-year-old Lyle Durham, guesses right: "McGovern."  Minutes later, Christine is eliminated, the studio audience sings "Hit the Road, Jack," and she gets hurtled through a wall of the set, the fate of all losers on the show.  "Remote Control" is a hip and cynical send-up of television in general and game shows in particular.  Its cult following on cable TV loves its oddball format -- loose, ad-libbed and prone to foul-ups.  Its young contestants seem like idiots savants of the television age.  Reared on reruns, they display an encyclopedic knowledge of shows like "The Brady Bunch" but less than impressive mastery of the world outside the tube.  Mr. Ober and his sidekick, Colin Quinn, badger the contestants with sarcasm, insult their intelligence and now and then threaten them with bodily harm.  "It's always fun when they don't know the simplest question on daily life and current events," says Lauren Corrao, executive producer.  "Remote Control" looked like a certain flop when it made its premiere 18 months ago.  Now, 269 episodes later, it is one of MTV's most popular shows.  It is part game show, part situation comedy and part parody.  The best part: Mom and Dad don't get it.  But MTV hopes to expand the audience into mainstream America and beyond.  In September a new "Remote Control" starts the season on 143 stations covering 92% of the U.S.  Coming soon: a "Remote Control" board game, Nintendo game and computer program; "Remote Control" T-shirts, shorts and other items.  MTV executives are even talking "Remote Control" snack food.  It will make a gold mine of a franchise, worth millions of dollars to MTV and its parent, Viacom, Inc., if the rest of America can adapt to this calculated weirdness.  "Remote Control" was born of a junkfood binge.  Asked to come up with MTV's first game show, creators Joseph Davola and Michael Dugan cloistered themselves in a hotel suite with six other MTV-ers, munching on chocolate HoHos and chips.  The show had to be cheap, and it had to be stupid.  "Let's face it, a game show doesn't belong on MTV," says Mr. Dugan, 28 years old and a TV-addicted insomniac who stays up all night watching reruns of "My Three Sons," "The Patty Duke Show" and others on MTV's sister channel, Nick-at-Nite.  "We thought if we're gonna do it, we should let viewers know we think it's as stupid as they do."  Within hours the brainstormers had come up with categories such as "Really Bad TV," "Brady Bunch Physics," and "Dead or Canadian?" (A contestant in this category gets extra credit for knowing that Lorne Greene is both.)  Typical questions: "On a date, would it be easier to get to second base with Laverne or Shirley?" (Laverne.) "On 'The Beverly Hillbillies,' what kind of hound was Jed's dog, Duke?" ("Hushpuppy?" a player says.) "Where on Earth was Capt. James T. Kirk born?" (Riverside, Iowa.)  The show's premise: A man who grew up glued to the TV set stages a nightly game show in his basement.  It is his show, so he can be obnoxious, not obsequious, humiliating his guests instead of humoring them.  "The main goal was to embarrass as many people as possible," says Mr. Dugan.  And so, when the show pauses for a "snack break," the players hold bowls over their heads to shield against a deluge of food -- such as raw hotdogs or Fritos or jelly beans -- dumped on them from buckets suspended overhead.  To audition successfully for the show, contestants must pass a 20-question quiz and do something special for 60 seconds onstage.  One man snorted a piece of string up his nose, coughed it out of his mouth and grabbed both ends, pulling them back and forth.  "It was one of the more horrifying auditions I've seen, but you had to look at it," recalls Gena Rositano, the show's "talent" coordinator.  It so impressed her that she picked him.  MTV spent only $25,000 cluttering the "basement" with garden tools and '60s kitsch.  To cut costs, the crew shoots four or five episodes a day, for six weeks, enough for a six-month run with repeats.  A half-hour segment costs MTV less than $15,000 and reaps more than that in ads.  With the frantic shooting pace, rehearsals are minimal and retakes rare.  But that's all right: The flubs are left in because of the conviction of the show's producers that television is so bad that it's good.  "On this show," says host Ober, a 31-year-old who resembles a teddy bear with a Dudley Doright chin, "the more that goes wrong, the better it looks."  He soon gets a chance to prove it.  Taping is about to start, and a man who resembles Pope John Paul II strolls around in white robes, waiting for "Beat the Pope."  If that channel is picked, the contestant must solve a math problem before the phony pope can finish plucking Vatican flags from furry dunce caps worn by kids in the stands.  But seconds after the show opens, the papal impersonator wanders onstage prematurely with a beatific, what-me-worry? smile on his face.  Mr. Ober doesn't miss a beat: "That's a great ring, Pope] Great tour last year]" he ad libs, as if chatting with a rock star, and then guides him offstage.  Each show features skits that the cast often invents just minutes before the credits begin.  The humor seems Early Teen-Age.  "What about we pick a little kid from the audience and I beat the crap out of him?"  Mr. Quinn says before one show.  Minutes later, he pretends to pummel a 13-year-old girl while the cameras roll.  "That was hilarious, that was so cruel," says Chris Kreski, the show's 26-year-old head writer.  Backstage, Mr. Kreski struggles to come up with a "mom line," the nightly joke in which Mr. Ober is interrupted by the voice of his mother asking him to do some gross chore, such as trimming her mustache.  He brainstorms: "Earwax?  Armpits?  Dead skin off her elbows?  Not a lot of gross parts of the body left."  Mr. Kreski concedes that this isn't exactly "Masterpiece Theater."  "Stupid, right?  Immature?  But that's OK, too," he says.  "Our viewers are stupid and immature.  They expect it."  In the current strikes against three regional Baby Bell telephone companies, one issue stands out: whether employees will pay a bigger share of the soaring costs of health benefits.  The issue involves emotions as well as dollars and cents.  Looming in the background of talks at Nynex Corp., Bell Atlantic Corp. and Pacific Telesis Group are employees such as Greg Greene of Vacaville, Calif., whose eight-month-old daughter, Katherine, had surgery three months ago to patch a hole in her heart.  An infection picked up in the hospital led to the removal of part of her sternum, and she may require costly reconstructive surgery as she grows.  Mr. Greene, who installs data circuits and special lines for Pacific Telesis's Pacific Bell unit, says Katherine's hospital bills totaled almost $100,000.  "Even if you're asked to pay just 10% of the total bill, it is a huge amount," he says.  Who should pay for increasing costs of health-care benefits is a vexing dilemma facing employers nationwide.  "It's an extremely emotional issue and therefore an extremely difficult bargaining issue," says Raymond Williams, the top negotiator for American Telephone & Telegraph Corp.  Earlier this year, AT&T went into labor talks determined to have workers pay a bigger share of its annual $1 billion in health costs.  But because of fierce union resistance, AT&T dropped the demand.  It settled instead for an agreement to set up a network of "preferred-provider" doctors and hospitals that would presumably charge lower rates, without added cost to AT&T's workers.  In a recent poll of 50 large corporations and 50 major union leaders, Metropolitan Life Insurance Co. found that half of the labor leaders regard limiting what employers call health-cost sharing as a top contract priority, ahead of wages and other issues.  About 38% of the executives, the top percentage, said their two biggest negotiating priorities this year are health-cost sharing and job security.  And 90% of 400 employers surveyed recently by insurer NWNL Cos. said they plan to sharply restrict medical benefits for employee families by the year 2000.  The focus on health-care benefits isn't surprising.  A survey by Noble Lowndes, a benefits consulting firm in East Orange, N.J., shows that employers' average medical insurance premium per worker jumped to $3,117 this year from $1,671 in 1985, rising nearly 25% this year alone.  "How would you like to compete with this albatross around your neck called runaway health-care costs?" says Chrysler Corp. Chairman Lee Iacocca.  "For me, it's $700 a car, and still going up at twice the rate of inflation."  But unloading health-care costs on workers is hard, especially for unionized companies.  "While the companies might say going in that they need cost sharing, what comes out in the agreement is cost savings" -- joint labor-management plans to contain doctor and hospital charges, says John Stepp, a Labor Department deputy undersecretary.  The health-benefits issue may cause still wider walkouts at Baby Bell companies.  Strike deadlines come up tomorrow night against U S West Inc., Ameritech and Southwestern Bell Corp.  The Communications Workers of America and the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers, the same unions that negotiated with AT&T, hope to quash further efforts to switch some health costs to employees.  Some Baby Bell officials say AT&T made cost sharing tougher by caving in.  At the Baby Bells, rank-and-file opposition to cost sharing is at least as adamant as it was at AT&T.  Eldon Finch, who repairs telephone cable and installs service for U S West in Tucson, Ariz., says medical bills for his wife, Janet, who suffers from lupus, topped $100,000 last year.  His share exceeded $5,000, and he says he can't afford more.  Because of such burdens, the unions "absolutely and unequivocally" won't allow cost sharing, says George Kohl, a communications workers' official.  The same attitude has prevailed in talks in other industries this year.  The Steelworkers Union has staunchly resisted efforts by steel, aluminum and can companies to transfer more medical costs to employees.  Bethlehem Steel Corp., for instance, wanted to set up a preferred-provider plan that union officials said might well exclude most workers, leaving them paying 20% of all their medical bills.  The union rejected that plan but agreed to consider one without the 20% burden for nonparticipants.  "A lot of our workers are living from paycheck to paycheck," so reduced health coverage would hit hard, says Patti Siehafer, benefits committee chairman for many Steelworkers talks.  With corporate profits improving, unions these days feel less compelled to give ground on health care, as some did during concessionary bargaining a few years ago.  Railroads, unable to settle the matter in 1984 negotiations, this year proposed a "comprehensive" plan under which workers would pay part of any medical bill.  "We say, 'Nothing doing,'" says Richard Kilroy, president of the Transportation Communications Union.  He predicts a negotiating "impasse" over the issue.  Organized labor's success at resisting cost sharing partly reflects the fact that health benefits aren't only a pocketbook issue but an emotional one that threatens personal hardship.  Making workers pay doctor bills that their employer had covered is, to them, "stealing," says Richard Belous, an economist with the National Planning Association, a research group in Washington, D.C.  So when the health burdens of the rank and file are brought into the bargaining, cost sharing often takes a back seat.  The pattern was set in the recent AT&T talks.  Going into the bargaining, AT&T had decided that "employees ought to share some of the costs," Mr. Williams, the company's top negotiator, said at the time.  AT&T wanted a $175-per-person deductible and proposed that employees pay a greater portion of medical expenses up to a $1,000 annual limit.  But the unions, seeing AT&T as a trendsetter, "didn't want to send a signal that workers' health-care benefits could be reduced," says Communications Workers Union President Morton Bahr.  In the end, the battle went beyond the corporate and labor negotiators to AT&T workers such as Linda Kasinowski, who designs circuits at the company's Oakton, Va., regional headquarters.  The younger of her two daughters, Katrina, now five years old, was diagnosed with leukemia in 1986.  The family spends "thousands of dollars" on related health costs, the 39-year-old mother says.  Her husband, able to work only from time to time as a carpenter, has his own medical expenses that often outstrip his income.  "I've often felt like I'm working just to pay doctors," Ms. Kasinowski says.  The unions devised several examples of the adverse effect of the company's proposed cost-sharing plan.  For a surgical patient with a 13-day hospital stay, the worker's portion of the bill rose from $413 to $1,175.  Union negotiators made it clear that rank-and-file workers, "who have difficulty making ends meet, want no part of paying more for medical care," says Mr. Bahr.  Finally, on the last day before the contract was to expire, AT&T acceded to the unions' cost-containment plan, centered on the preferred-provider network.  "What we have here is something that really helps contain costs without reaching to any extent" into workers' pockets, says Harold W. Burlingame, AT&T's senior vice president for human resources.  The two sides also opted for an approach that's gaining favor among unions and some employers alike: seeking to pass the buck to taxpayers.  AT&T and the unions agreed "to mutually work to achieve prompt and lasting national solutions" to climbing health-care costs -- meaning that they will lobby for some kind of national health plan.  Similar lobbying pacts have emerged from Bethlehem Steel and other steel companies.  And rail unions are urging railroads to join in this "obvious solution" to the problem.  Companies and their workers, says Thomas Hickman, an electrical workers' negotiator, "can't be expected to solve something at the bargaining table that we can't control."  ---  @ Who Bears the Burden of Rising Health Costs?  @ The Cost-Sharing Trend  @ These percentages of companies pay:  @ 100% hospital and surgical coverage  @ 1988 26%  @ 1986 33%  @ 1984 54%  @ 100% employer-paid premium for employee only  @ 1988 57%  @ 1986 60%  @ 1984 62%  @ 100% employee-paid premium for family coverage  @ 1988 32%  @ 1986 35%  @ 1984 38%  Source: 1988 Hay/Huggins Benefits Report  @ The High Price of Health  @ AVERAGE MEDICAL INSURANCE  @ PREMIUM FOR EMPLOYERS PERCENTAGE OF PAYROLL  @ (PER EMPLOYEE) FOR MEDICAL INSURANCE  @ 1989 $3,117 13.6%  @ 1988 2,555 11.7  @ 1987 2,159 10.4  @ 1986 1,880 9.4  @ 1985 1,671 8.7  @ 1984 1,453 7.9  Source: Noble Lowndes  owned by a trust affiliated with the family of Vice President Dan Quayle -- filed to make an initial offering of 3.6 million shares of its Class A stock.  The company publishes newspapers in Indiana and Arizona with a combined daily circulation of more than 847,000.  The stock will be sold by shareholders, including relatives of Mr. Quayle, with the company not receiving any proceeds, according to the company's filing and its chief financial officer, David B. Wright.  Central's stock now includes 23.2 million shares of Class A and 33.3 million shares of class B common stock.  The Class B shares are convertible into 3.3 million Class A shares.  The Class A shares have 1/10th of the voting power of the company's Class B shares.  But Class A shares have ten times the dividend and liquidation rights of Class B.  Mr. Quayle is affiliated with a trust of his late grandfather -- the company's founder, Eugene C. Pulliam -- that owns most of the Class B stock, controls 64% of the company's voting power, and isn't selling any holdings, Mr. Wright says.  The Pulliam trustees include Eugene S. Pulliam, the company's executive vice president, who is a son of the founder and Mr. Quayle's uncle.  Central Newspapers has received approval to list the Class A shares on the New York Stock Exchange, according to the filing.  Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Merrill Lynch Capital Markets will underwrite the offering.  Three million of the shares will be sold in the U.S. and the rest internationally.  S&L Rescue Is Looking  Brighter for Properties  THE THRIFT BAILOUT plan approved by Congress last week is encouraging to real estate and finance professionals who had worried that the rescue would result in the "dumping" of property owned by failed savings and loan institutions.  The Resolution Trust Corp., created by the legislation, must devise a way to sell off about $400 billion of real estate.  The industry has been concerned that the sale of buildings at bargain prices could undercut property values.  But the legislation requires that the new federal entity consider the impact of the sale of distressed property on local markets before making a transaction.  It also states that the government must demand a "minimum disposition price" for properties sold in Texas, Louisiana, New Mexico, Arkansas, Colorado and Oklahoma -- states classified as distressed markets.  That price must be no less than 95% of fair market value, as determined by the Resolution Trust.  The hard part, says Stan Ross, co-managing partner at Kenneth Leventhal & Co. in Los Angeles, will be taking inventory of the properties and determining values in fragile markets, some of which are just beginning to recover from overbuilding.  "Success in real estate is more an art than a science," says Cantwell Muckenfuss, partner and S&L specialist in the law firm of Gibson Dunn & Crutcher.  "Trying to come up with legal criteria for how to sell real estate is a new concept and is at odds with the way the commercial real estate market generally works."  Renovating Is Anything  But a Cottage Industry  TAKE HEART, homeowners with half-finished kitchens and leaky plumbing: You aren't alone.  Repair and remodeling is the fastest growing segment of the housing business, expanding faster than new construction.  Renovation spending has risen an average of 10.3% annually since 1980, according to the U.S. Census Bureau.  While the rate of growth has slowed in recent years, repair expenses are still rising.  New construction spending, however, has remained flat.  Owners of rental and owner-occupied housing spent close to $100 billion in 1988 to fix up their properties, compared with $140 billion spent on new construction, the National Association of Homebuilders reports.  One reason for the fix-it-up phenomenon is that sales of existing homes set a nine-year record last year, explains Stephen J. Dobi, a Salomon Brothers Inc. construction analyst.  "When people buy existing homes, there's a natural tendency to want to personalize them," he says.  Many first-time home buyers are edging into the housing market by buying older homes, which are often cheaper than new ones gussied up with the latest conveniences.  Older homes tend to need all kinds of alterations, from new paint to complete new rooms.  Mr. Dobi says that homeowners make almost 70% of their improvements within three years after the purchase.  Hammer Out the Details  With Contractor First  FLARING TEMPERS are accompanying the hot home-improvement business.  Last year, complaints to the U.S. Better Business Bureau about home-improvement firms rose slightly to become the fourth-largest category of gripes.  The bureau also received nearly 1.8 million inquiries about remodeling firms -- a record number.  Because so many people are at war with their contractors, the American Homeowners Foundation, a nonprofit group in Arlington, Va., has come up with a prototype contract to help property owners specify their expectations in writing.  Available by mail for $5.95, the seven-page document provides a format to list a detailed work description, materials to be used, starting and completion dates and a payment schedule.  It also advises homeowners on how to choose the right contractor.  "We received many complaints from homeowners and found out that a very large share of the problems with contractors are a result of items that were never discussed in advance," says John Prufrock, the foundation's vice president.  Problems arose over what was assumed, but never agreed upon orally or in writing by either party, he says.  Make sure a contractor's references are current, the foundation advises.  Ask to see licenses and insurance certificates.  Break the job down into reasonable components and payments and don't get caught with 90% of the job paid for, with the work only half completed.  Strong demand for repair and remodeling has spurred the growth of new and inexperienced contracting companies -- leading to more consumer complaints, Mr. Prufrock says.  "What we've done is tried to force both parties to address all aspects of the contractual relationship."  Odds and Ends  COMMERCIAL property taxes as a percent of total occupancy cost are highest in Minneapolis, at 18.6%, and New York, at 18.1%, according to a Colliers International Property Consultants survey.  Cincinnati, Richmond, Va., and Kansas City, Mo., offer the lowest rates at 3.5%.  Office tenants pay 15.8% in Chicago, 14.6% in Boston, and just 5.4% in Seattle. . . .  "Insulate, insulate," wrote Tom Wolfe in his urban satire "The Bonfire of the Vanities," and in New York, life imitates art.  Jack Resnick & Sons, a real estate developer, is building "the first new Manhattan residence to offer a private outdoor running track that many residents value for safety reasons and may favor over Central Park," promotional material for the luxury building says.  The dollar was stronger, but it is considered adrift in a broad trading range as dealers await new insight into the U.S. economy.  Foreign-exchange traders say they are hungering for fresh economic news that will give the dollar direction, but most predict the two U.S. indicators scheduled for release today won't sate their appetites.  The July readings on U.S. producer prices and retail sales may spark some quick reaction as participants search for a confirmation or rebuttal of last Friday's stronger-than-expected U.S. employment report for July, traders said.  But, unless the indicators fall well outside expectations, the dollar should resume its meandering.  "Basically, although we've been up and down like a yo-yo, we haven't found much direction," said Susan Babcock, vice president of foreign-exchange trading at Hongkong & Shanghai Banking Corp. in New York.  "Inflation is not a real scare; recession is not a real scare.  Near term, the market's relatively featureless," she said.  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.9055 marks, up from 1.8975 marks Wednesday, and at 139.85 yen, up from 139.15 yen.  Sterling was at $1.6169, down from $1.6221.  In Tokyo Friday, the dollar opened for trading at 140.05 yen, up sharply from Thursday's Tokyo close of 139.05 yen.  Thursday, the dollar held rock-steady through most of the Asian day, trading in a narrow range.  As European dealings commenced, the dollar drifted lower, propelled by technical selling after the currency sank through what the market viewed as an important level around 1.89 marks.  However, the chart-inspired drive faded before threatening any new technical marks, and the dollar reversed direction as participants searched for the path of least resistance.  Players managed to trigger a new round of technical buying when the dollar rose through 1.90 marks, before interest waned and the currency settled down for the rest of New York trading.  Most traders predicted that without a leading hand from the two U.S. indicators today, the dollar will remain locked in a range between 1.88 marks and 1.9250 marks into late next week.  The U.S. producer price index is expected to have risen 0.1% in July, with lower energy prices restraining the index.  Excluding volatile energy and food prices, the "core" index should have risen 0.3%, economists project.  Retail sales are seen rebounding in July from two consecutive months of declines.  Economists project the sales will have increased 0.7%, boosted greatly by increased car sales in the midst of aggressive auto manufacturer promotions.  If the indicators reflect expectations, the prevailing view of the U.S. economy, which holds that growth is slowing -- but not plummeting -- and inflation is under control, will remain undisturbed.  As a result, the outlook for U.S. credit policy won't shift much, dealers said.  Traders said last Friday's employment figures relieved some concerns that the U.S. Federal Reserve's earlier tight-credit policy pushed the economy dangerously close to a recession.  They said the new data should confirm activity isn't stagnant while inflation continues to diminish.  Barring sharply lower retail-sales figures, the Fed is seen as unlikely to extend a recent series of credit easings until at least the end of the month.  But if retail sales grow less than 0.3%, traders warned, the market may feel the Fed will consider stimulating the economy again by cutting the federal funds rate.  Fed funds are overnight loans of reserves among Fed member banks.  Lower interest rates generally hurt the domestic currency by reducing the return on interest-bearing investments in that currency.  Higher-than-expected retail sales or PPI data could spark a dollar rally because the Fed may postpone further credit easing to ensure that inflation pressures die out, traders added.  The final leg of a three-day U.S. Treasury refunding program was completed more encouragingly than the first two, traders said.  Foreign investors showed up in larger numbers at the quarterly sale of 30-year bonds, helping bolster the demand for dollars in the New York afternoon.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery settled at $367.30 an ounce, up 40 cents.  Estimated volume was a light two million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Friday, gold was quoted at $366.15 an ounce.  The influence-peddling investigation at the Department of Housing and Urban Development has reached Wall Street.  PaineWebber Group Inc., which employs a key figure in the unfolding congressional investigation, yesterday said it is conducting its own investigation into the firm's activities with HUD.  The link between HUD and PaineWebber is Lance Wilson, a 41-year-old PaineWebber first vice president in the firm's public finance group.  He is a former executive assistant to Samuel Pierce, the secretary of HUD during the Reagan administration.  Mr. Wilson said he will respond to a congressional subpoena to testify about allegations of influence peddling and mismanagement at HUD on Mr. Pierce's watch.  Mr. Wilson was to have testified two weeks ago, but failed to appear, saying his attorney was ill.  A top HUD official last year rejected the advice of a seven-member panel of HUD officials and selected PaineWebber as financial adviser on the sale of about $400 million in government securities.  The panel had recommended another firm, according to a senior HUD official.  HUD officials said that Mr. Wilson, who had a close relationship with Mr. Pierce, was actively involved in PaineWebber's proposal.  Mr. Wilson, whose part in the PaineWebber selection was reported in Thursday's New York Times, served as Mr. Pierce's executive assistant before leaving HUD in 1984.  To handle the sale of the government securities, PaineWebber selected Salomon Brothers Inc. and Goldman, Sachs & Co. as the lead underwriters in separate placements.  Both underwriters retained the New York law firm of Battle, Fowler as their legal advisers on the sales.  Mr. Pierce was a partner in Battle Fowler before becoming HUD secretary in January 1981.  Goldman Sachs didn't respond to messages seeking comment.  Robert Baker, a spokesman for Salomon Brothers, said that after Salomon was selected as senior manager, PaineWebber asked the firm to consider Battle Fowler for underwriters' counsel.  In an interview, Henry Edelman, a former PaineWebber vice president who headed a team that put together the company's HUD proposal, said he didn't select Battle Fowler but disclosed that Mr. Wilson had "promoted" Battle Fowler inside PaineWebber.  "Lance Wilson told a lot of people that they (Battle Fowler) were well-qualified. . . .  Lance was high on them," Mr. Edelman said.  He said Mr. Wilson provided him with "technical advice" on the 100-page proposal.  He said he wasn't aware of any favoritism in the selection.  He said that Mr. Wilson would periodically report to him that HUD officials were continuing to deliberate on the various proposals before them.  Battle Fowler declined to answer questions about the underwriting transactions or other HUD-related involvement by the firm.  A Battle Fowler partner, Thomas Glynn, said that the firm "has a reputation for integrity, competence and high ethical standards in the conduct of its law practice.  Any suggestion or innuendo to the contrary is absurd."  Mr. Wilson reaped substantial profits from HUD projects both as an investor and a consultant after he left government, according to HUD documents and internal audits.  Neither Mr. Wilson nor PaineWebber has been charged with any wrongdoing.  But PaineWebber officials are concerned about possible effects on the firm from the widening investigation.  PaineWebber executives are also concerned about an anonymous internal memorandum addressed to Donald B. Marron, the firm's chairman and chief executive.  The memo mentions the resignation last month of Mr. Wilson's boss, Lee K. Barba.  Mr. Barba, a PaineWebber director, was in charge of the firm's fixed-income division, which hired Mr. Wilson in 1986.  PaineWebber employees say the memo was circulated among about 50 investment bankers and their staffs this week.  Mr. Barba now works at Bankers Trust Co.  He didn't return phone calls seeking comment.  Reached at his PaineWebber office, Mr. Wilson said: "I have not seen the memo so I can't comment.  I can't comment about anything having to do with PaineWebber.  I instructed my attorney to accept service {of the subpoena}.  I've said all along I would testify."  The PaineWebber probe was prompted by congressional testimony and other reports about Mr. Wilson.  Robert M. Berson, general counsel at PaineWebber, said the firm started an investigation into its activities with HUD several weeks ago.  "We're trying to find out if there is any wrongdoing.  We know of no wrongdoing involving Lance Wilson or PaineWebber.  He's still on our payroll.  I don't know whether that will change or not.  He's represented by counsel, and he and his counsel will be conferring."  Mr. Berson acknowledged that within PaineWebber there is considerable discomfort over the HUD investigation.  "Anytime there are news stories that a government agency is conducting an investigation into wrongdoing" and an employee of the firm is mentioned in connection with it, "yes, it's difficult for us.  It's very difficult for someone who has been asked to testify to know what his future will be at the firm," Mr. Berson added, referring to Mr. Wilson.  Mr. Berson also said PaineWebber officials were shocked by the anonymous memo to Mr. Marron.  "We think the memo is sheer, utter nonsense," he said.  He said Mr. Barba resigned "because of policy differences" over the direction of new business, not because of Mr. Wilson.  Mr. Berson attributed the memo to "some disgruntled employees," who, he said, can be found "in any large organization."  A recovery from recent weakness in oil markets gained momentum yesterday as petroleum prices surged world-wide.  The rally was most evident in U.S. futures trading, where crude oil broke through the technically-important $18.50-a-barrel level.  On the New York Mercantile Exchange, West Texas Intermediate crude for September delivery traded as high as $18.70 a barrel.  It settled at $18.59, up 38 cents for the day.  October and November futures contracts for the U.S. benchmark crude were up 32 cents and 29 cents a barrel, respectively.  Futures prices of petroleum products also increased.  Unleaded gasoline for September delivery rose 0.85 cent a gallon to settle at 51.43 cents.  September heating oil was up 0.78 cent a gallon to settle at 50.21 cents.  The stronger petroleum prices were reflected in refiners' postings in the oil fields.  Although the field prices for West Texas Intermediate still trail those in spot and futures markets, several refiners yesterday advanced their postings for the crude by 25 cents a barrel to $17.50.  There also was noticeable strength in oil markets outside the U.S.  Some analysts, in fact, called it a European-led rally.  They cited reports of tighter supplies of North Sea Brent crude resulting from an alleged accumulation of August cargos by a major trader.  Whatever the reason, prices of North Sea crudes were 30 cents to 35 cents a barrel higher on European spot markets, according to Dow Jones International Petroleum Report.  Similar increases were reported for North African and Middle Eastern crudes.  But despite yesterday's gains, petroleum prices still have a long way to go to reach the levels of only a month ago, when oil prices were $1.50 to $2 a barrel higher.  And there is considerable skepticism as to how long the current rally might last.  Some analysts suggested petroleum demand may be weakening in the third quarter, and others cited the continuing high production by the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries.  OPEC output is currently estimated at 21.5 million barrels a day, or two million above the second-half production ceiling of 19.5 million.  "Can this market continue to roll ahead without the underpinnings of strong fundamentals?" asked Nauman Barakat, a first vice president of Shearson Lehman Hutton.  One positive factor for oil markets is that gasoline consumption seems to be picking up again in the U.S., said Philip L. Dodge, an oil analyst with Nomura Securities International.  Still, he said, "This (rally) is a temporary reprieve from a negative trend."  In other commodity markets yesterday:  COPPER: Futures prices rose on actual and potential mine production problems.  The September delivery rose 1.55 cents a pound to $1.1225.  The big Bougainville mine in Papua New Guinea, now may not be ready to resume operations by year's end, if then, because of continuing attacks by rebel landowners, said Fred Demler, metals economist for Drexel Burnham Lambert, New York.  In Chile, Mr. Demler noted, there are drought problems, which have brought about a 10% cut in power that will affect mining operations.  Miners in Peru on Monday will begin an indefinite strike, he said.  There were problems in Africa, as well.  In Zambia, miners were reported to have set fire to a union office because they were angry about a 12% wage increase negotiated for them by the union, Mr. Demler said.  This increase contrasted with boosts of as much as 50% being given to government workers, he said.  In Zaire, International Monetary Fund investigators are reported to be checking a loss of $400 million in foreign exchange earned by copper exports, according to Mr. Demler.  Copper is Zaire's main export and that country is asking for financial aid from the IMF, Mr. Demler said.  On the demand side, Japan and China have been good buyers of copper, he said, and dealer premiums continue to hold at 4.5 cents to five cents over the corresponding futures positions.  As for supplies, copper inventories in warehouses of the London Metal Exchange have recently risen, Mr. Demler said, but global stocks are down from earlier this year.  "There will be a modest increase in supplies over the next few weeks, but with the actual and potential loss of production, the industry may not be in a position to deal with the seasonal upturn in demand in the fall," he said.  SUGAR: Futures prices eased.  The October contract ended 0.22 cent a pound lower at 13.85 cents.  "It was the same old story: An early rally ran into trade selling," an analyst said.  The expectations that India may be a big buyer of sugar on the world market appear to have lost some impact.  "That's not to say that India won't buy, but the indications are that it hasn't bought, and this is contributing to the softer tone.  This is being indicated by the fact that the October delivery's premium over March has tended to narrow slightly recently.  If there had been any purchases by India, or the immediate expectation of any, the October price would have risen sharply, and the premium would have widened," the analyst said.  Another analyst said that the market remained without any fundamental developments and that the decline was mostly technical in nature.  When the October price dropped below 14 cents a pound, selling orders that had been placed around that level were touched off, accelerating the decline, he said.  ORANGE JUICE: Futures prices rose.  The September contract ended 5.65 cents a pound higher at $1.602.  Cash prices for the concentrate remained firm, which contributed to the rise in futures, an analyst said.  However, she added, the longer-term picture still is bearish, based on expectations of a large Brazilian orange crop.  Another analyst, Stephen Platt of Dean Witter Reynolds, Chicago, said the ability of the cashmarket prices to hold while futures prices were easing, since the start of this month, triggered renewed demand for futures.  "The selling in futures was somewhat overdone, and the fact that futures prices were at a discount to those in the cash market attracted some demand from processors," he said.  Those purchases, in turn, touched off aggressive buying back of contracts by traders who had previously sold short in anticipation of declining prices, he said.  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL ---------------------- %  @COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ POSITIVE  @Manitowoc $ .63 ... $ .40 (3) 57.50  @Molex $ .75 ... $ .60 (4) 25.00  @Foote Cone & Beld $ .66 ... $ .56 (7) 17.86  @Greenery Rehab $ .17 ... $ .16 (3) 6.25  @Sbarro $ .18 ... $ .17 (4) 5.88  @ NEGATIVE  @Echo Bay Mines $ .07 ... $ .13 (4) 46.15  @Service Corp. Intl $ .30 ... $ .34 (5) 11.76  @Columbia Gas Sys $ .08 ... $ .09 (7) 11.11  @ Source: Zacks Investment Research  The thrift-rescue legislation passed by Congress would require savings and loans to immediately have tangible capital equal to 1.5% of their assets.  An analysis by Sheshunoff & Co., Austin, Texas, shows that 672 institutions had tangible capital of less than 1.5% on March 31, 1989.  Those institutions are listed here alphabetically on a state-by-state basis.  @ TANG. CAP.  @ AS A %  @ NAME CITY OF ASSETS  @ ALASKA  @ First Fed. of Alaska-x Anchorage -72.36  @ Home Savings Bank-x Anchorage -43.41  @ ALABAMA  @ Altus Bank Mobile 0.42  @ Baldwin County FSB-x Robertsdale - 2.39  @ City Fed S&L-x Birmingham - 5.71  @ First SB of Alabama-x Hamilton - 6.01  @ Guaranty Fed S&L-x Birmingham -16.38  @ Phenix Fed S&L-x Phenix City -45.05  @ ARKANSAS  @ Commonwealth S&L-x Osceola -16.51  @ First America Fort Smith - 2.66  @ First Fed of Arkansas-x Little Rock -36.67  @ First Fed S&L-x Fayetteville -15.13  @ First Fed S&L-x Malvern -18.75  @ First FSB Rogers 0.24  @ First State Savings-x Mountain Hm -31.69  @ Grand Prairie S&L Stuttgart - 2.04  @ Home Fed S&L-x Mountain Hm *  @ Independence Fed S&L-x Batesville *  @ Landmark Savings-x Hot Springs -41.63  @ Madison Guaranty-x Augusta -16.97  @ Savers Fed-x Little Rock -48.88  @ Superior Fed Bank Fort Smith - 2.39  @ Unipoint FSB-x Trumann -73.44  @ ARIZONA  @ Merabank Phoenix - 2.16  @ Security S&L-x Scottsdale -82.18  @ Southwest S&L Phoenix -11.86  @ Sun State S&L-x Phoenix - 2.49  @ Universal S&L-x Scottsdale -23.42  @ Western S&L-x Phoenix - 3.84  @ CALIFORNIA  @ Arrowhead Pacific-x San Bernardin -50.20  @ Butte S&L Chico - 0.08  @ Cabrillo Savings Bank-x Hayward - 1.44  @ Charter Savings Bank Huntington Be - 0.87  @ City Fed S&L-x Oakland -47.92  @ City S&L-x Westlake Vill - 4.58  @ Constitution Fed S&L Tustin 0.34  @ Delta Savings Bank Westminster - 0.11  @ Family S&L Los Angeles 0.15  @ First Calif.  Svngs-x Orange -47.74  @ First Fed S&L-x Bakersfield - 6.36  @ First Fed S&L San Bernardin - 0.48  @ Founders S&L-x Los Angeles -32.65  @ Gateway Savings Bank-x San Francisco -91.15  @ Gibraltar Savings-x Beverly Hills - 0.56  @ Guardian Fed S&L-x Bakersfield - 0.99  @ Huntington S&L Huntington Be 0.17  @ Imperial SA San Diego 1.45  @ Independence S&L-x Vallejo - 2.93  @ Investment S&L Woodland Hill 1.38  @ Mercury S&L Huntington Be 0.51  @ New West Fed S&L Stockton 0.91  @ Pacific Savings Bank-x Costa Mesa -23.40  @ Perpetual SA-x Santa Ana -57.69  @ Republic Fed S&L Altadena - 0.16  @ Royal Oak S&L-x Manteca - 3.96  @ Santa Barbara S&L Santa Barbara 0.50  @ Security Fed S&L Garden Grove - 4.69  @ Sierra Fed S&L-x Beverly Hills - 0.66  @ Southern California S&L Beverly Hills - 0.83  @ Southwest S&L-x Los Angeles - 7.01  @ Sutter Buttes S&L Yuba City 0.50  @ Unified Savings -x Northridge -59.05  @ Viking S&L Santa Monica - 1.32  @ Washington S&L-x Stockton - 4.56  @ Westco Savings-x Wilmington - 6.09  @ Western Fed S&L Marina Del Re 1.05  @ Westwood S&L-x Los Angeles -71.01  @ COLORADO  @ Alpine Fed S&L-x Steamboat Spr - 8.54  @ American Fed of Colo-x Colorado Spr -18.48  @ Aspen S&L Aspen - 7.01  @ Colorado FSB Sterling - 1.19  @ Colorado S&L-x Englewood -20.16  @ Equity FSB-x Denver -14.95  @ First Fed S&L-x Colorado Spr -13.48  @ Great West Svng Craig - 3.67  @ Mesa Fed S&L-x Grnd Junction - 1.55  @ Modern Fed S&L-x Grnd Junction - 3.75  @ Otero Savings Fed S&L-x Colorado Spr -17.57  @ Rocky Mountain S&L-x Woodland Park -18.71  @ Sun S&L-x Parker -32.24  @ Valley Fed S&L-x Grnd Junction -88.85  @ CONNECTICUT  @ Columbia FSB-x Westport -16.49  @ Community Fed S&L Bridgeport - 0.64  @ Northeast Savings Hartford - 0.91  @ DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA  @ Independence Federal Washington 1.37  @ Washington FSB Washington 1.43  @ DELAWARE  @ First FSB Wilmington - 2.20  @ FLORIDA  @ American Pioneer Orlando - 0.36  @ Beach Fed S&L Boynton Beach 0.08  @ Brickelbanc SA-x Miami -22.68  @ Centrust Savings Bank Miami - 0.31  @ Citizens Fed Miami 0.36  @ Citizens FSB Jacksonville - 9.17  @ Commonwealth S&L-x Margate - 1.40  @ Community Fed S&L-x Tampa *  @ Duval Fed S&L Jacksonville - 4.29  @ Financial Fed Dade Cty Miami Lakes 1.44  @ Financial Security-x Delray Beach -22.41  @ First Citizens Fed S&L Fort Pierce - 5.97  @ First Family Fed S&L Eustis 0.50  @ First Fed S&L-x Largo -27.21  @ First Fed Seminole Cty Sanford - 2.73  @ First Fed of Florida-x Key West -22.80  @ First Venice S&L-x Venice - 8.89  @ First, FA Orlando - 0.26  @ Flagler Fed S&L Miami - 0.38  @ Florida FSB St. Petersburg 0.56  @ Freedom S&L-x Tampa -27.59  @ Goldome SA St. Petersburg - 6.76  @ Hansen Savings Bank Palm Bch Gard 1.02  @ Haven Fed S&L Winter Have - 5.51  @ Liberty Fed S&L-x Port Richey -56.49  @ Lincoln S&L-x Miami - 6.81  @ Miami Savings Bank-x Miami -14.00  @ New Metropolitan Fed Hialeah -65.53  @ Palm Beach FSB Palm Bch Gard 0.90  @ Pioneer Savings Bank Clearwater - 3.13  @ Royal Palm Savings-x West Palm Bch - 4.91  @ Security First Fed S&L Daytona Beach - 2.24  @ Security FSB of Florida Panama City 1.01  @ Southern Floridabanc-x Boca Raton -91.26  @ Tropical Fed S&L-x Miami -3  @ United Svng f Ameica Melbourne 1.00  @ Washington Shores SB Orlando 0.30  @ GEORGIA  @Albany First Fed S&L Albany - 1.58  @ Cartersville FSB of Ga.-x Cartersville -15.38  @ Charter Fed S&L West Point - 0.29  @ First Fed S&L-x Americus - 5.85  @ First Fed S&L-x Atlanta - 5.39  @ First Fed S&L Milledgeville 1.28  @ First Fed S&L-x Summerville -14.88  @ Fulton Fed S&L Atlanta - 0.94  @ Great Southern Fed-x Savannah -12.63  @ Guaranty FSB Warner Robins - 4.57  @ Habersham FSB-x Atlanta - 2.05  @ Home Fed S&L Rome - 0.86  @ Moultrie FSB Moultrie - 0.60  @ United Fed S&L Smyrna - 1.18  @ HAWAII  @ Honfed Bank Honolulu - 1.42  @ IOWA  @ First Fed of Estherville-x Estherville - 1.61  @ American Fed of Iowa Des Moines - 2.66  @ Banc Iowa Savings Bank Cedar Rapids - 1.22  @ First Fed S&L of Creston Creston 0.27  @ Firstcentral Bank Chariton - 0.20  @ Home Fed S&L Algona 1.46  @ Home Plan S&L Johnston - 1.86  @ Mississippi Valley S&L Burlington 1.05  @ Sioux Valley S&L-x Cherokee -58.51  @ Statesman Bk for Svng Waterloo - 0.59  @ Sun Savings Bank Fort Dodge 0.74  @ United FSB Des Moines 1.44  @ ILLINOIS  @ American Sec Fed-x Chicago - 3.89  @ Amerimac Svng-x Hillsboro -13.29  @ Argo S&L Summit - 1.38  @ Arlington Heights Fed Arlington Hgh - 4.62  @ Aurora Fed S&L Aurora - 0.18  @ Black Hawk Fed S&L Rock Island 0.36  @ Capitol Fed Bk for Svng Chicago -11.68  @ Century FSB Chicago - 4.26  @ Champion Fed S&L Bloomington - 1.54  @ Charleston Fed S&L Charleston 1.24  @ Chillicothe Fed S&L Chillicothe - 8.90  @ Citizens S&L Springfield - 4.10  @ Clyde Fed S&L N. Riverside - 3.01  @ Columbian S&L Charleston - 1.19  @ Community Savings Bank East Moline - 2.86  @ Condordia Fed Bk-x Lansing -14.83  @ Edgar County S&L Paris 0.28  @ Enterprise Svng Bk Chicago - 7.28  @ Fidelity Fed S&L Galesburg - 9.50  @ Fidelity S&L of Danville Danville - 2.32  @ First Fed of Belvidere Belvidere 0.18  @ First Fed of East Alton-x East Alton - 6.99  @ First Fed of Macon Cty Decatur 0.63  @ First Fed S&L of Tuscola Tuscola 0.36  @ First Savings Bank Zion - 1.99  @ First Svng of Amer-x Orland Park *  @ Frontier Financial Belleville - 5.21  @ Gem City S&L Quincy - 4.43  @ Germania Bank Alton 1.34  @ Great American Fed S&L Oak Park - 1.04  @ Hancock S&L Carthage 0.92  @ Heartland Fed S&L Mattoon - 1.68  @ Heritage Fed S&L Sparta - 1.40  @ Heritage S&L Jerseyville - 0.80  @ Hinsdale Fed S&L Hinsdale 1.16  @ Home Fed of Centralia-x Centralia - 5.11  @ Home Fed S&L of Joliet-x Joliet -11.26  @ Home Fed of Lake City Waukegan - 0.15  @ Home Fed of Rockford Rockford - 0.73  @ Hometown S&L Winfield - 3.65  @ Homewood Fed S&L Homewood - 5.62  @ Horizon FSB Wilmette - 8.17  @ Illini Fed S&L Fairview Heig - 1.05  @ Illinois Savings Bank-x Peoria - 7.91  @ Libertyville Fed S&L-x Libertyville -11.74  @ Lincoln-Way Fed Savings New Lenox - 2.62  @ Lyons Savings Bank Countryside 1.13  @ Madison County Fed-x Granite City - 7.43  @ Mid America Fed S&L Clarendon Hil 1.42  @ Midwest Home FSB-x Belleville - 9.73  @ Midwestern SA-x Macomb -17.42  @ Morris Fed S&L Morris 0.76  @ Morton Fed S&L Morton - 4.79  @ New Athens S&L New Athens - 1.23  @ Norwood FSB Chicago - 0.24  @ Olympic Fed S&L Berwyn - 9.64  @ Peerlees Fed of Chicago Chicago - 0.73  @ Peoples B&L of Oblong Oblong - 0.19  @ Regency Savings Bank Naperville - 1.88  @ Republic Savings Bank Matteson 0.09  @ Saline Valley First Fed Harrisburg - 1.33  @ Security S&L Peoria - 5.06  @ Skokie Fed S&L-x Skokie - 2.01  @ St. Anthony Fed S&L Cicero - 2.34  @ St. Charles S&L St. Charles - 4.34  @ Summit First Fed S&L Summit - 3.30  @ Talman Home Fed S&L Chicago - 4.32  @ United FSB Galesburg 0.82  @ United SA Silvis - 7.35  @ United Svng of America Chicago - 5.45  @ University Finl Svng Chicago 0.95  @ INDIANA  @ Fidelity Fed of Seymour Seymour 1.40  @ First S&L of Central Ind.  Anderson - 4.05  @ Hometown FSB Delphi - 6.56  @ Mutual Fed S&L Terre Haute - 2.21  @ Pioneer Fed S&L-x Plymouth -13.45  @ Union FSB Indianapolis - 1.13  @ Union FSB of Frankton Frankton 0.98  @ Union FSB of Indianapolis Indianapolis 0.50  @ KANSAS  @ Anchor SA-x Kansas City - 5.99  @ Barber County S&L-x Medicine Lodg -13.25  @ Colonial SA of America-x Liberal -33.76  @ Colonial Savings Prairie Villa - 7.10  @ First Fed S&L-x Coffeyville -37.98  @ First Fed S&L-x Hutchinson -26.72  @ First FSB Newton - 0.07  @ First FSB of Kansas-x Willington -31.77  @ First Kansas Fed Osawatomie 1.38  @ First of Kansas Banking-x Hays - 3.47  @ Mid Kansas Fed S&L Wichita - 2.44  @ Mid-America Fed S&L-x Parsons -10.19  @ Peoples Heritage Fed Salina - 2.24  @ Peoples S&L-x Parsons -10.36  @ Pioneer S&L Prairie Villa 0.82  @ Shawnee Fed S&L-x Topeka - 5.27  @ Sun-x Kansas City -19.03  @ Topeka Savings-x Topeka -50.47  @ Valley Fed/Hutchinson-x Hutchinson -26.74  @ KENTUCKY  @ First Fed S&L Leitchfield - 3.13  @ First FSB Campbellsville 1.47  @ Future FSB Louisville - 3.42  @ Henderson Home Fed Henderson - 0.54  @ Rosedale Fed S&L Erlanger - 3.37  @ LOUISIANA  @ Acadia S&L-x Crowley -99.62  @ American S&L New Orleans -15.12  @ Capital-Union Savings FA Baton Rouge - 8.52  @ Central S&L New Orleans -37.37  @ Citizens Hmstd Assn New Orleans - 9.08  @ Columbia Hmstd Assn Metairie - 2.69  @ Commercial FSB-x Hammond - 2.38  @ Delta S&L Kenner -29.02  @ Desoto Fed S&L Mansfield 0.97  @ Elmwood Fed S&L-x Harahan -26.56  @ Enterprise Fed S&L-x Marrero -24.07  @ Evangeline Fed S&L-x Lafayette *  @ Family Fed S&L-x Shreveport -17.05  @ First City S&L Baton Rouge - 4.44  @ First Fed S&L-x Baton Rouge -42.11  @ First Fed S&L Breaux Bridge - 1.49  @ First Fed S&L-x Eunice -11.96  @ First Fed S&L-x New Iberia -10.60  @ First Fed S&L-x Shreveport -26.99  @ First Fed S&L Thibodaux 0.31  @ First Fed S&L Winnfield - 1.18  @ First FSB of New Orleans Metairie - 2.97  @ First Louisiana FSB Lafayette -11.29  @ First Savings of La-x La Place *  @ Fontainebleau FSB-x Slidell -31.03  @ French Market Hmstd-x Metairie -19.57  @ Home S&L New Orleans - 2.16  @ Horizon Fed S&L-x Metairie -25.54  @ Iberville B&L Plaquemine 0.80  @ Jennings Fed S&L Jennings 0.98  @ Lafayette S&L-x Gretna - 1.27  @ Louisiana SA Lake Charles - 2.90  @ Parish FSB-x Denham Spr - 4.23  @ Pelican Hmstd & SA Metairie -15.27  @ Peoples Fed/Thibodaux-x Thibodaux -13.56  @ Peoples Hmstd Monroe - 5.28  @ Red River S&L Coushatta - 3.74  @ River City FSB Baton Rouge -98.23  @ Security Hmstd Assn New Orleans - 8.99  @ South S&L Slidell - 7.97  @ Terrebonne S&L Houma -10.72  @ United Fed S&L Vidalia 0.16  @ MASSACHUSETTS  @ Home FSB Worcester - 4.32  @ Milford Fed S&L Milford 1.02  @ MARYLAND  @ Baltimore Fed Finl-x Baltimore -13.79  @ Chevy Chase FSB Chevy Chase 0.62  @ Fairview Fed S&L Ellicott City 0.34  @ First Annapolis SB Annapolis - 6.63  @ Gibraltar FSB-x Annapolis -12.50  @ Irvington Fed S&L Baltimore 0.31  @ Liberty FSB Randallstown - 5.58  @ Royal Oak Fed S&L Randallstown - 4.02  @ Standard FSB Gaithersburg 0.98  @ Vermont Fed S&L Timonium - 9.01  @ Yorkridge-Calvert S&L Baltimore - 2.24  @ MAINE  @ American Bank Sanford -12.68  @ MICHIGAN  @ Detroit Fed S&L Detroit 0.52  @ Great Lakes Bancorp Ann Arbor 1.36  @ Guaranty FSB-x Taylor - 3.20  @ Peoples SA-x St. Joseph - 5.88  @ MINNESOTA  @ Fairmont Fed S&L Fairmont - 2.91  @ Falls Fed S&L Internatl Falls - 0.88  @ First Fed S&L Thief Riv Falls - 0.84  @ First Minnesota Savings Minneapolis - 0.24  @ Midwest Fed/Minneap-x Minneapolis -26.97  @ St. Louis County Fed S&L Duluth 0.52  @ TCF Minneapolis 1.21  @ United FSB Windom - 1.95  @ Viking SA Alexandria 0.05  @ MISSOURI  @ Blue Valley Fed S&L-x Kansas City -11.92  @ Boonslick S&L Boonville - 0.19  @ Cass Fed of St. Louis-x Florissant -27.92  @ Colonial Fed S&L Cape Girardea - 6.76  @ Community Fed S&L St. Louis - 9.26  @ Financial Fed S&L-x Joplin -25.36  @ First Fed S&L of SE Mo.-x Cape Girardea -12.58  @ First State SA Sedalia 0.25  @ Hannibal Mutual Hannibal - 0.26  @ Home SA of Kansas City Kansas City 1.11  @ Marion County Mutual Hannibal 0.75  @ Mid Missouri S&L-x Boonville - 9.46  @ Missouri SA-x Clayton - 3.71  @ Provident S&L St. Joseph 1.01  @ St. Louis County Fed S&L Ferguson - 6.18  @ United Postal SA St. Louis - 0.16  @ MISSISSIPPI  @ Central S&L-x Jackson -50.09  @ Charter Bank Hattiesburg 0.82  @ Delta Fed S&L-x Drew -49.97  @ Fidelity FSB-x Corinth -51.38  @ First Fed S&L Belzoni - 1.05  @ First Fed S&L Biloxi 0.70  @ First Fed S&L Greenwood - 5.97  @ First Fed S&L Starkville 0.88  @ First Fed of Brookhaven Brookhaven - 1.02  @ First Guaranty Hattiesburg - 0.12  @ First Jackson Svng BK Jackson - 4.37  @ Mercantile Savings Bank Southaven - 0.77  @ Peoples Fed S&L Bay St. Louis 1.48  @ Republic Bank for Svng-x Jackson *  @ Southern Fed Bank Gulfport 0.56  @ State Mutual Fed S&L-x Jackson -21.43  @ Unifirst Bank for Svng Jackson - 2.77  @ NORTH CAROLINA  @ Cooperative S&L Wilmington 1.23  @ First American Svng Bk Greensboro - 5.16  @ First Fed S&L Charlotte - 2.87  @ Great Atlantic SB-x Manteo -14.88  @ Guaranty Svng Bk Fayetteville - 3.17  @ Heritage Fed S&L-x Monroe -16.74  @ Mutual S&L Charlotte 1.00  @ North Carolina Fed S&L Charlotte 0.72  @ Surety Fed S&L Morganton - 1.55  @ Watauga S&L Boone - 1.12  @ NORTH DAKOTA  @ First Fed of Bismark Bismark - 5.44  @ First Fed S&L of Fargo Fargo 0.13  @ Midwest FSB Minot - 7.27  @ NEBRASKA  @ American Charter Fed Lincoln 0.08  @ Columbus FSB Columbus - 0.19  @ Commercial Fed S&L Omaha - 0.56  @ Custer Fed S&L Broken Bow - 2.19  @ Equitable FSB-x Fremont -10.02  @ Equitable S&L Columbus - 1.10  @ First Fed S&L York - 1.35  @ Heritage FSB Omaha - 1.76  @ Midwest Fed S&L-x Nebraska City -18.95  @ Nile Valley Fed S&L-x Scottsbluff -55.57  @ Occidental/Nebraska-x Omaha -11.75  @ Platte Valley Fed S&L-x Gering -31.42  @ NEW JERSEY  @ Carteret Savings Bank Newark 1.03  @ Cenlar FSB Princeton - 1.03  @ Center S&L Clifton 1.25  @ Chatham S&L Chatham 0.13  @ City FSB Bedminster 0.76  @ Colonial Savings Bank Roselle Park 0.36  @ Community Fed S&L Ramsey 0.99  @ Elysian FSB-x Hoboken - 3.49  @ Fellowship S&L Bergenfield - 3.83  @ First Atlantic S&L Plainfield - 0.75  @ First Fed of Montclair Montclair 0.81  @ First Jersey S&L Wyckoff - 0.60  @ Glen Ridge S&L Glen Ridge - 1.70  @ Hansen Svng Bk E. Brunswick - 5.85  @ Irving S&L Paterson - 4.05  @ Jersey Shore S&L Toms River - 1.96  @ Metropolitan Fed S&L-x Denville - 4.34  @ Monarch Fed S&L Kearny - 0.32  @ Mutual Aid S&L Manasquan 1.41  @ Nassau S&L Princeton - 0.02  @ Newton Savings Bank Newton - 2.09  @ North Jersey S&L-x Passaic -30.93  @ Nutley Savings Bank Nutley - 0.75  @ Old Borough S&L Trenton 0.12  @ Palisade S&L Ridgefield Pa - 4.61  @ Ramseys S&L Ramsey - 2.26  @ Riverside Savings Bank Riverside 0.73  @ Security Svng Bank Vineland 0.48  @ Shadow Lawn Svng Bank Long Branch - 2.44  @ Statewide Savings Bank Jersey City 0.17  @ United S&L of Trenton Trenton 0.51  @ Yorkwood S&L Maplewood - 3.01  @ NEW MEXICO  @ Abq Bank Albuquerque 0.65  @ American Fed S&L-x Albuquerque -13.81  @ First Fed S&L Las Vegas - 0.31  @ New Mexico Fed S&L-x Albuquerque - 5.57  @ Sandia Fed S&L-x Albuquerque *  @ Security Savings Bank Carlsbad -13.78  @ Silver S&L Silver City 1.39  @ Sun Country/N.M.-x Albuquerque -50.67  @ Valley FSB-x Roswell -70.57  @ NEW YORK  @ Anchor Savings Bank Northport - 0.64  @ Beacon FSB Baldwin - 0.63  @ Central Fed Savings FSB Long Beach - 5.83  @ Champlain Valley Fed Plattsburgh 1.40  @ City & Suburban FSB Bronx 0.76  @ Eastern Fed of Sayville Sayville - 3.49  @ Edison Fed S&L New York 0.74  @ Empire of America FSB Buffalo - 5.22  @ Ensign Bank New York - 7.16  @ Fidelity New York FSB Floral Park - 3.49  @ First Fed of Rochester Rochester - 0.10  @ Long Island SB Centereach -10.67  @ Mohawk Valley FSB Ilion 1.36  @ Monroe Savings Bank Rochester - 6.52  @ Nassau Fed S&L Brooklyn -13.49  @ Riverhead Savings Bank Riverhead 0.07  @ Salamanca Fed S&L Salamanca 0.38  @ Seamen's Bank New York - 1.30  @ Seneca Fed S&L Baldwinsville 0.35  @ Whitestone Savings Whitestone - 7.26  @ OHIO  @ Arcanum Fed S&L Arcanum - 0.23  @ Broadview Svng Bk-x Cleveland - 1.93  @ C S L Savings Bank Tiffin - 0.55  @ Centennial S&L Cheviot 1.20  @ Citizens Fed S&L Dayton 1.19  @ Citizens Lima - 0.94  @ Civic Savings Bank-x Portsmouth - 6.36  @ First American SB Canton - 0.29  @ First Fed S&L Mt Vernon - 0.82  @ First S&L Massillon - 3.64  @ Freedom Fed S&L Columbus - 6.50  @ Gem SA Dayton - 3.30  @ Geneva Fed S&L Geneva - 2.64  @ Home S&L Defiance - 0.23  @ Lincoln S&L Ironton 0.56  @ Merchants & Mechanics Springfield - 4.08  @ Mid-America Fed S&L Columbus - 5.07  @ Midland-Buckeye Fed-x Alliance - 8.83  @ Mutual FSB Zanesville - 1.87  @ Park View Fed S&L Cleveland - 1.58  @ Peoples Fed Svngs Bank Wooster 1.25  @ Peoples Savings Bank Ashtabula - 2.38  @ State Home SA Bowling Green - 2.89  @ United Home Fed Toledo - 2.30  @ Women's FSB Cleveland 0.49  @ OKLAHMA  @ American Fed S&L Ada - 3.80  @ American Home S&L Edmond 0.21  @ Chisholm Kingfisher 0.55  @ Cimarron Fed S&L Muskogee 0.02  @ Clinton S&L Clinton 1.19  @ Continental Fed S&L-x Oklahoma City - 4.32  @ Cross Roads S&L-x Checotah 0.50  @ Duncan S&L-x Duncan - 1.69  @ Family FSB Sapulpa - 2.55  @ First Fed S&L-x Seminole -11.04  @ First Fed of Chickasha Chickasha 1.28  @ Globe Savings Bank El Reno - 0.11  @ Grand FSB Grove 0.01  @ Great Plains Fed S&L Weatherford - 2.64  @ Heartland Fed S&L Ponca City - 0.15  @ Northwest Fed S&L Woodward - 2.12  @ Peoples Fed S&L Bartlesville 0.99  @ Red River Fed S&L Lawton 0.00  @ State Fed S&L Tulsa - 2.85  @ Texas Western Fed S&L Tulsa - 2.57  @ OREGON  @ Benj.  Franklin Fed Portland - 2.08  @ Family Fed S&L Dallas - 2.59  @ Far West Fed Bank Portland - 9.63  @ Jackson County Fed S&L Medford 1.19  @ PENNSYLVANIA  @ Atlantic Finl Fed Bala Cynwyd - 3.50  @ Colony Savings Bank Monaca - 1.25  @ Concord-Liberty S&L-x Monroeville -15.91  @ Dollar Bank Pittsburgh 1.13  @ First Fed S&L Pittsburgh - 3.94  @ First FSB Hanover - 5.70  @ Heritage SA Lancaster - 1.87  @ Hill Finl S&L-x Red Hill -17.28  @ Home Unity S&L Lafayette Hill - 1.40  @ Horizon Finl-x Southampton -10.25  @ Landmark SA Pittsburgh 0.62  @ Liberty Bell SA-x Beaver Falls - 8.47  @ Peoples Fed S&L New Kensingto - 0.40  @ Vanguard FSB Vandergrift - 1.95  @ SOUTH CAROLINA  @ American Fed Bank Greenville - 1.78  @ Omni Savings Bank Columbia - 3.30  @ Seabank Savings-x Myrtle Beach - 6.55  @ Security Fed S&L Columbia - 2.74  @ SOUTH DAKOTA  @ First FSB of South Dakota Rapid City 0.89  @ First Western FSB Rapid City - 0.88  @ Yankton S&L Yankton - 0.95  @ TENNESSEE  @ Century FSB-x Trenton -13.54  @ First Fed S&L Waynesboro 1.03  @ Franklin FSB Morristown - 4.22  @ George Washington S&L Jonesboro 1.48  @ Germantown Trust-x Germantown - 8.42  @ Heritage Fed S&L Kingsport 1.15  @ Home Fed S&L-x Memphis -12.57  @ Investor FSB Nashville 1.48  @ Lincoln Fed S&L-x Mt Carmel -10.35  @ Republic Fed S&L Loudon - 1.13  @ United Guaranty FSB-x Tullahoma -16.78  @ TEXAS  @ Alamo SA of Texas-x San Antonio -45.33  @ American Fed Bank FSB Dallas 1.46  @ American FSB-x Austin -12.70  @ American-Brazoria Cty-x Lake Jackson -33.18  @ Ameriway Savings-x Houston -67.60  @ Andrews S&L Andrews 1.22  @ Austin SA Austin 0.95  @ Bancplus SA-x Pasadena -50.48  @ Bankers S&L-x Galveston -15.28  @ Bannerbanc SA Dallas 0.51  @ Bayshore SA-x La Porte -66.67  @ Bedford SA-x Bedford -27.76  @ Benjamin Franklin SA-x Houston - 8.05  @ Bexar SA-x San Antonio -32.79  @ Bright Banc SA-x Dallas -21.72  @ Capitol City SA-x Austin - 4.56  @ Centennial SB-x Greenville -11.44  @ Central Texas S&L-x Waco -15.31  @ Century S&L-x Baytown -74.84  @ Certified SA Georgetown - 3.30  @ Citizens of Texas S&L-x Baytown *  @ City SA-x League City -40.04  @ Columbia SA Nassau Bay 1.37  @ Commerce SA-x San Antonio -16.03  @ Commonwealth SA-x Houston -38.82  @ Consolidated Fed S&L Dallas 1.09  @ Continental Savings-x Bellaire *  @ Cornerstone SA-x Houston -11.13  @ Cypress Banc SA Pittsburg 0.21  @ Deep East Texas SA-x Jasper - 8.83  @ Denton SA Denton 0.76  @ East Texas S&L Tyler - 1.22  @ El Paso Fed S&L El Paso - 2.50  @ Excel Banc SA-x Laredo -20.37  @ Fed Savingsbanc of SW-x Kilgore - 6.92  @ Fidelity S&L-x Port Arthur -11.76  @ Fini Savings Dallas - 0.28  @ First Bankers Trust Midland - 0.74  @ First Capital of Texas-x Houston -70.81  @ First Equity SA-x Tomball -55.05  @ First Fed S&L Laredo - 0.48  @ First Fed S&L New Braunfels - 0.25  @ First Fed S&L-x Waco - 9.93  @ First Fed S&L Wichita Falls - 4.07  @ First Fed S&L of Conroe Conroe - 0.37  @ First FSB Lubbock 0.41  @ First Garland SA Garland - 1.39  @ First S&L Borger - 3.69  @ First SA of Brenham Brenham - 6.00  @ First SA of SE Texas-x Silsbee -13.46  @ First South SA-x Port Neches -81.82  @ First State SA-x San Antonio -82.64  @ Fort Bend Fed S&L Rosenberg 1.14  @ Fortune Finl Copperas Cove - 1.27  @ Franklin Fed.  Bancorp Austin 1.25  @ General SA-x Henderson -13.74  @ Gill SA-x Hondo -58.65  @ Golden Circle SA-x Corsicana - 4.43  @ Golden Triangle S&L-x Bridge City *  @ Graham S&L Graham 0.87  @ Guadalupe S&L Kerrville - 3.50  @ Guaranty FSB Dallas - 0.73  @ Hallmark SA-x Plano -11.13  @ Hearne B&L Hearne - 0.33  @ Heritagebanc SA-x Duncanville -10.39  @ Humble S&L-x Humble -91.04  @ Jasper Fed S&L-x Jasper -17.95  @ Karnes County S&L Karnes City -10.22  @ La Hacienda SA-x San Antonio *  @ Liberty County Fed S&L-x Liberty - 5.89  @ Liberty SA Houston - 3.02  @ Marshall Fed S&L Marshall - 1.18  @ Merabank Texas El Paso 0.79  @ Meridian SA-x Arlington *  @ Meritbanc SA-x Houston -50.51  @ Metropolitan Finl S&L Dallas 0.39  @ Mission SA of Texas-x San Antonio -30.19  @ Murray SA-x Dallas - 8.59  @ Mutual B&L Weatherford 1.31  @ New Braunfels S&L-x New Braunfels -10.97  @ North American SA-x San Antonio - 8.11  @ North Plains S&L Dumas 0.92  @ North Texas Fed S&L Wichita Falls - 4.64  @ Olney S&L Olney 1.03  @ Padre Fed S&L-x Corpus Cristi -83.25  @ Palo Duro S&L Amarillo - 1.66  @ Park Cities SA-x Dallas -21.87  @ Permian S&L-x Kermit -14.35  @ Plano S&L Plano - 0.26  @ Remington SA Elgin - 0.52  @ Resource SA-x Denison -10.13  @ Rusk Fed S&L-x Rusk -31.37  @ Sabine Valley S&L-x Center -11.24  @ San Antonio SA-x San Antonio - 8.57  @ San Jacinto SA Bellaire 1.46  @ Savings Banc Arlington - 1.12  @ Savings of Texas Assn-x Jacksonville -42.86  @ Security SA-x Texarkana *  @ Southeast Texas S&L-x Woodville - 5.33  @ Southeastern SA-x Dayton *  @ Southmost S&L-x Brownsville -40.04  @ Southside S&L Austin - 2.64  @ Southwest SA Dallas - 1.90  @ Southwestern S&L El Paso 0.45  @ Spindletop SA-x Beaumont -91.24  @ Spring Branch S&L-x Houston -76.41  @ Standard SA Houston -13.32  @ Suburban SA-x San Antonio -24.70  @ Sunbelt Savings FSB Dallas - 0.04  @ Superior FSB Nacogdoches - 5.71  @ Surety SA El Paso - 0.11  @ Taylorbanc SA Taylor - 1.26  @ TCF Banc SA Houston -92.55  @ Texasbanc SA Conroe 1.04  @ Timberland SA-x Nacogdoches - 7.93  @ Trinity Valley S&L-x Cleveland -12.71  @ Universal SA-x Houston *  @ University SA-x Houston -51.36  @ Uvalde S&L Uvalde 0.71  @ Valley Fed S&L Mcallen 0.19  @ Victoria SA-x Victoria - 7.04  @ Village SA-x Houston -78.94  @ Vision Banc SA-x Kingsville -53.56  @ Western Gulf S&L-x Bay City -91.43  @ UTAH  @ American S&L-x Salt Lake City - 9.74  @ Deseret Fed S&L-x Salt Lake City -51.02  @ Mountainwest S&L-x Ogden -19.39  @ Williamsburg SB Salt Lake City 1.06  @ VIRGINIA  @ Atlantic Permanent SB Norfolk - 1.16  @ Berkley FSB Norfolk - 0.65  @ Charter FSB Bristol - 1.29  @ Community Fed S&L-x Newport News -13.93  @ Emporia Fed S&L Emporia - 0.37  @ Fedstar Savings Bank Alexandria - 6.52  @ Heritage Savings Bank Richmond - 0.61  @ Lincoln S&L Richmond - 8.96  @ Peoples S&L FA-x Hampton - 2.94  @ Security Fed S&L Richmond - 6.01  @ WASHINGTON  @ First Western Fed S&L Wenatchee - 0.06  @ Gibraltar Savings-x Bellevue - 2.32  @ Sterling SA Spokane - 2.51  @ WISCONSIN  @ Community S&L-x Fond Du Lac - 9.24  @ Durand Fed S&L-x Durand -36.79  @ First Fed S&L of Madison Madison 1.21  @ Monycor Savings Bank Barron 1.20  @ WEST VIRGINIA  @ First Standard SB Fairmont - 6.76  @ WYOMING  @ First Guaranty S&L Gillette 0.89  @ Provident Fed S&L Casper - 0.74  @ X- Under government conservatorship of July 31, 1989.  @ *- Tangible capital deficit exceeds assets.  @ Source: Sheshunoff & Co., Austin, Texas  DURAMED PHARMACEUTICALS Inc., Cincinnati, said it completed a public offering of 2.3 million common shares at $6.75 each.  The generic prescription drug concern said it will use the $14 million of net proceeds for retirement of bank debt, studies necessary for new product approvals and general corporate purposes.  The offering was managed by Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. and J.C. Bradford & Co.  In the 1930s one of Adolf Hitler's advisers told the Fuehrer he was worried about rising inflation.  "My answer to inflation," Hitler snapped, "is the concentration camps."  When Gen. Augusto Pinochet took over Chile in 1973, some of his many critics thought they saw a lot of Hitler in the new dictator.  The general certainly was authoritarian in the extreme, and hundreds of Chileans were killed, imprisoned or simply made to disappear.  The Chilean economy, to put it mildly, was in rotten shape.  Salvador Allende Gossens, chosen president in 1970 in a hotly contested election, set out on a highly populist program, including nationalization of major enterprises, extensive land reform and redistribution of income.  For a while, everything seemed to be going well.  The inflation-adjusted gross national product grew by 9% in 1971, compared with only 2.1% in 1970.  Inflation-adjusted wages rose by an astonishing 17% in 1971.  The gains were the early result of pouring a lot of money and credit into the economy.  In 1972, the bill came due.  The gross national product declined, and inflation soared, rising to 500% by 1973.  Economic chaos in Chile obviously worried major Chilean companies and foreign corporations doing business there.  These special interests undoubtedly had a hand in the army action in 1973 that overthrew the government and resulted in Allende's death.  But Rudiger Dornbusch of the Massachusetts Institute of Technology and Sebastian Edwards of the University of California at Los Angeles suggest in a study (National Bureau of Economic Research Working Paper No. 2986) that Allende's government sooner or later was doomed by its own economic mismanagement.  The Pinochet government brought with it a team of economic advisers, several of whom had been trained at the University of Chicago.  Accepting the advice of the "Chicago boys," the government instituted a number of free-market reforms.  During this period Milton Friedman, the professor who had taught some of the Chicago boys their economics, lectured at a Chilean university.  For months afterward, he had to explain that he had not taught the government its brutally repressive tactics.  By 1979, Chile's only major economic problem was inflation.  The rate was near 30%, far below the 500% of 1973 but still an important concern.  The government thereupon decided it had a solution.  It decided to fix the exchange rate.  As Mr. Dornbusch notes in another National Bureau paper (Reprint No. 1022), the rate was set at 39 pesos to the U.S. dollar, supposedly forevermore.  This was done in spite of the fact that Chile's 30% inflation rate was well above the world rate.  This might have made a certain amount of sense had Gen. Pinochet been willing to put Chile through the economic wringer, squeezing out the inflation.  But the general didn't exactly have that in mind.  Even dictators worry occasionally about their personal popularity.  So along with tying the peso to the dollar, the government decided to index wages.  Indexing is hard to administer under the best of circumstances and causes insoluble problems when done the Chilean way.  The Pinochet government indexed wages backward.  Inflation had begun to edge downward, but Chilean workers' future wages were set to reflect past inflation.  Workers' wages zoomed upward; for once, the government had done something the public loved.  The exchange rate was becoming steadily more and more overvalued, which meant that import prices were falling.  As long as the central bank was willing -- and able -- to convert pesos into dollars, Chileans went on an import-buying splurge, loading up on autos, electrical equipment and many other foreign items.  The Pinochet government kept insisting that everything was fine, but many Chileans began to realize that, if nothing else, the central bank eventually would run out of foreign money.  This stimulated an even greater run on imports.  Needless to say, the government's policy collapsed.  Tariffs and quotas are back, and inflation, as Mr. Dornbusch says, "is back to the point where the adventure started."  But Gen. Pinochet had not stopped trying to become a popular dictator.  In 1988 his government more or less suspended all efforts to check inflation and poured money into the economy.  The general, you see, was facing a referendum last fall that he expected to win.  He lost and, reluctantly, accepted the idea that his successor would be freely elected.  So in December Chile will choose its first civilian government in 16 years.  The leading candidate seems to be Patricio Aylwin, who heads a 17-party coalition of pro-democracy parties.  It's hard for a 17-party coalition to forge a clear program, and so far the only thing that seems certain is that an Aylwin government would spend a lot of time sorting out the human rights abuses of the Pinochet regime.  A conservative candidate, Hernan Buchi, has what may be a political disadvantage of having served as Gen. Pinochet's finance minister, although no one is tying him to the regime's cruelties.  The dictator would like to preserve some of the good things he has accomplished by getting politicians out of making monetary and fiscal policy.  These chores would be turned over to the central bank.  The catch is that Gen. Pinochet wants to appoint the bank's governors before he leaves office.  That's OK with Mr. Buchi, but Mr. Aylwin's group says the new administration should have the right to make monetary and fiscal plans without facing a possible veto by Pinochet appointees.  Lasting political success is hard to come by in Latin America.  As Gen. Pinochet is finding, even a dictator may have trouble achieving it.  Japan's new prime minister, striving to shore up his party's image as it heads into parliamentary elections, included two women in his new cabinet, one of whom isn't a politician.  But otherwise, Toshiki Kaifu made his cabinet choices mainly with a view to maintaining an acceptable balance between the various factions of the ruling Liberal Democratic Party.  It's the same criterion Mr. Kaifu's recent predecessors have used, but with public criticism of LDP factionalism running high, Mr. Kaifu's selection procedure is likely to be received as evidence that the party has learned little from its recent troubles.  That could hurt the party in elections for the lower house of the Diet, or parliament, which could come as early as October.  Mr. Kaifu reportedly wanted to select more non-politicians but met resistance from LDP politicians and refusals from some of the non-politicians he approached.  And despite the party's attempt to emphasize youth by electing the 58-year-old Mr. Kaifu as its leader, the average age of the cabinet actually rose -- to almost 63 under Mr. Kaifu from about 60 under Sosuke Uno, his immediate predecessor.  Mr. Kaifu's cabinet choices marked the continued rise of two relatively young LDP politicians who could become major powers some day.  Ryutaro Hashimoto, 52, the party's most popular politician in public-opinion polls, was named finance minister.  He'll be in the new cabinet's hot seat, with the treacherous job of sugar-coating the recently enacted 3% consumption tax without backing away from it altogether.  Ichiro Ozawa, 47, a powerful lieutenant of former Prime Minister Noboru Takeshita, was named secretary general of the LDP.  He'll be responsible for the party's election strategy at a time when pundits are predicting the LDP, which lost its parliamentary upper-house majority last month, could lose its majority in the lower house as well.  For Japan's major trade partners, the new administration is likely to mean more of the same.  With the longevity of the Kaifu cabinet open to question, the world is unlikely to see any new foreign-policy initiatives or any major concessions to foreign demands from Japan in the near future.  Indeed, Taro Nakayama promised "policy continuity" in his first public statement as foreign minister.  Hiroshi Mitsuzuka, Mr. Uno's foreign minister, became the LDP's policy-affairs chief, one of the party's top positions.  Although women have served as cabinet ministers before, this is the first time two have served at the same time.  Mr. Kaifu selected Mayumi Moriyama, 61, an upper-house LDP Diet member, to head the environment agency and Sumiko Takahara, 56, an author and social critic, to head the Economic Planning Agency.  Neither agency has been particularly powerful, but in the past couple of years the EPA has emerged as a major voice for a more open economy in general and for more leisure time for workers in particular.  Ms. Takahara sounded similar themes in her first press conference, saying the government "must manage the economy with more attention to improving people's lives."  The emphasis on women was a clear response to the so-called Madonna strategy that vaulted the opposition to victory in the upper-house elections three weeks ago.  Not only was the opposition led by a woman, Japan Socialist Party head Takako Doi, but the Socialists selected a number of women candidates who enjoyed surprising success.  The upper house yesterday proposed Ms. Doi as prime minister, but under the Japanese constitution the lower house, which is still controlled by the LDP, has the final say in naming a premier.  The largest LDP faction, that of former Prime Minister Takeshita, got the biggest representation in the new cabinet with five seats, including Messrs.  Ozawa and Hashimoto.  Mitsuhiro Kaneko, a Japan Communist Party leader, said, "It's clear that this is a de facto Takeshita cabinet."  The factions of former Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone, former LDP Secretary-General Shintaro Abe and former Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa each got four seats.  For the Nakasone faction, this represented a gain of one seat from the Uno cabinet, but for the Miyazawa faction it represented a loss of one seat.  The Miyazawa faction supported a Kaifu opponent, Yoshiro Hayashi, and Japanese pundits have speculated that after several years of LDP unity the party may be reverting to an earlier confrontational pattern, with the Miyazawa faction opposing the Takeshita, Abe and Nakasone factions.  Mr. Kaifu belongs to the relatively small Komoto faction, which got two seats in the cabinet: Ms. Moriyama's environment portfolio and the chief cabinet secretary post, which went to 69-year-old Tokuo Yamashita.  Mr. Yamashita will serve as the government's chief spokesman and as the prime minister's chief of staff.  Shintaro Ishihara, a nationalist Diet member who ran unsuccessfully against Mr. Kaifu for prime minister, announced that he was leaving the Abe faction.  The outspoken 56-year-old Mr. Ishihara has been critical of the faction system and his departure could be in preparation for another run for the top job in the future.  America West Airlines said it flew 675 million revenue passenger miles in July, a 7.4% increase from 628.4 million revenue passenger miles in July 1988.  Load factor for the month was 58.6%, compared with 64.5% a year ago.  In the year-to-date, the regional carrier said traffic rose 8.6% to 4.28 billion revenue passenger miles from 3.94 billion revenue passenger miles in the earlier period.  Load factor, or the percentage of seats filled, was about flat at 57.1%, compared with 57.2% in the comparable period.  TRANSCANADA PIPELINES Ltd., Toronto, said it plans to issue 130 million Canadian dollars (US$110.9 million) of 10.5% debentures maturing Aug. 20, 2010.  TransCanada, a natural gas pipeline concern, said proceeds would be used to reduce debt incurred to finance its 1989 pipeline construction program.  The debenture issue will be underwritten by a group of securities dealers including Wood Gundy Inc., Gordon Capital Corp., and Trilon Securities Corp., the company said.  TransCanada is controlled by Montreal-based BCE Inc., a telecommunications and industrial holding concern.  Metro Mobile CTS Inc. is being dropped from the telephone utility industry group of the Dow Jones Equity Market Index and replaced with Class A shares of McCaw Cellular Communications Inc., effective today.  Prices of consumer goods and services jumped 10.3% in July, exceeding the increases of 9.7% in June and 8.5% in July 1988, according to preliminary reports by the government's National Statistics Office.  The latest increase reflects the highest level of inflation since the government of President Corazon Aquino assumed power three years ago.  Among the different commodity groups surveyed, the statistics office said housing and repairs generated the highest rise in July at 12.7%, because of higher prices of construction materials and rentals of apartments and houses.  A comparative figure wasn't given.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Southwestern Bell Capital Corp. -- 75 million Australian dollars of 14% notes due Sept. 1, 1992, priced at par late Tuesday.  The noncallable issue is rated single-A-1 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and single-A by Standard & Poor's Corp., and will be sold through underwriters led by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  The issuer is a unit of Southwestern Bell Corp.  @ MUNICIPALS  Illinois Housing Development Authority -- $83,445,000 of residential mortgage revenue bonds, Series 1989 A and B, tentatively priced by a Bear, Stearns & Co. group.  Interest on the approximately $65 million of Series A bonds will be treated as a preference item in calculating the Federal alternative minimum tax that may be imposed on certain investors.  Series B bonds aren't affected.  Series A bonds are due 1992-2000, 2020 and 2022.  The serial bonds are priced at par to yield from 6.30% in 1992 to 7% in 2000.  There are $45 million of tender option bonds due 2020 that aren't being formally reoffered.  There are $14,725,000 of 7 1/2% term bonds due 2022, tentatively priced at par.  Series B bonds are due 1992-2000, 2009 and 2017.  The serial bonds are priced at par to yield from 6.10% in 1992 to 6.75% in 2000.  There are $5,715,000 of 7.15% term bonds due 2009, priced at par, and $10,035,000 of 7.2% term bonds due 2017, priced at par.  The bonds are rated single-A-plus by S&P, according to the lead underwriter.  Orlando Utilities Commission, Fla. -- $75 million of water and electric subordinated revenue bonds, Series 1989C, due 2011-2015 and 2023, through a Merrill Lynch Capital Markets group.  The bonds, rated double-A by Moody's and double-Aminus by S&P, were priced to yield from 7% in 2011 to about 7.06% in 2023.  Serial bonds, which all carry 7% coupons, were priced to yield from 7% in 2011 to about 7.04% in 2015.  Term bonds due 2023 have a 7% coupon and were priced at 99 1/4 to yield about 7.06%.  Vermont -- $65 million of general obligation temporary notes, dated Aug. 17, 1989, and due June 28, 1990, split among three competing underwriter accounts.  A Shawmut Bank group appeared to have the winning bid for $30 million of the notes, which it reoffered subject to the formal award with a 6.4% coupon, priced to yield 6.10%.  A Citicorp Securities Inc. group may have had the winning bid for $20 million of the notes.  The notes were being reoffered, subject to the formal award, with a 6 1/2% coupon, priced to yield 6.10%.  Bank of Boston, alone, appeared to have had the winning bid for the $15 million balance of the notes.  It wasn't formally reoffering any notes.  The notes are rated MIG-1 by Moody's and SP1-plus by S&P.  @ EUROBONDS  GMAC Australia Finance Ltd. (U.S. parent) -- A$60 million of 15 1/8% bonds due Sept. 13, 1993, priced at 101 1/2 to yield 15.21% less full fees, via Deutsche Bank Capital Markets Ltd. Guaranteed by General Motors Acceptance Corp. Fees 1 3/4.  The late Claude Pepper "personified and identified with many of the issues Ileana and the Republican Party stand for," says Vice President Dan Quayle, without blinking an eye.  He's come to Miami to help Ileana Ros-Lehtinen, the Republican candidate to succeed Mr. Pepper in a special Aug. 29 House election.  Mrs. Ros-Lehtinen, seated at the head table, doesn't blink an eye, either.  Hundreds of Republicans attending a fund-raiser here at the Omni Hotel nod in solemn agreement.  But the legendary Mr. Pepper, a Democrat who represented this teeming, multi-ethnic district for more than 25 years until his death at the age of 88 on May 30, was a lifelong liberal.  Years ago, they called him "Red" Pepper.  Mrs. Ros-Lehtinen, who stepped down from her state senate seat to make this race, is a dedicated anti-abortion, anti-Castro, anti-tax conservative.  "It is intellectually dishonest for them {the Republicans} to grab the Pepper mantle this way," says former Rep. Buddy MacKay, the Democratic state campaign chairman.  "Everybody should understand that if Ileana is elected, she'll cancel out every vote Claude Pepper ever made."  But, given Democratic disarray and the district's demographics, Mrs. Ros-Lehtinen, 36, is favored by most experts here to win the election, which she describes as "a classic battle between tax-and-spend liberals and fiscal conservatives."  More fundamentally, though, it's an ethnic showdown.  Cuban-Americans will flock to the polls in an outburst of ethnic pride that might obscure to other voters her tough views on foreign relations, government spending and abortion. (She promises in her brochures that on her first day in Congress she "will file legislation to protect the flag from burning or desecration," while acknowledging in an interview that others have beaten her to that particular legislative hopper.)  Mrs. Ros-Lehtinen -- her husband is Dexter Lehtinen, the U.S. attorney here -- won the Republican primary Aug. 1 with an astonishing 83% of the vote against three opponents, avoiding a runoff.  The Democrats weren't so lucky.  In a seven-way race, super-lawyer Gerald Richman, 48, edged City Commissioner Rosario Kennedy, 28% to 27%.  Finishing third, out of the running, was Mr. Pepper's niece, Jo Ann Pepper, a probation officer.  She is now supporting Mrs. Kennedy in the Aug. 15 runoff against Mr. Richman.  Leading Democrats had hoped the 44-year-old Mrs. Kennedy would win the nomination without a runoff and go on to neutralize Mrs. Ros-Lehtinen's ethnic appeal.  Like Mrs. Ros-Lehtinen, Mrs. Kennedy was born in Havana.  They both fled Cuba with their families when Fidel Castro seized power.  Mr. Pepper's district, the 18th, is an ethnic wonderland, pulsing with soul, Creole, Nicaraguan, Puerto Rican and, especially, Cuban rhythms.  It's a place where "Anglos" is a common phrase, encompassing anyone who is neither Hispanic nor black -- including Jews and Italians.  Of the 185,000 voters in the district, 82,000 are Anglos, or, as Dade County's elections department lists them, "non-Latin whites" (about half of whom are Jewish), 69,000 are Hispanic and 34,000 are "non-Latin blacks."  The district includes the cities of Miami, Miami Beach and Key Biscayne, and parts of Coral Gables and Hialeah.  The conundrum is that the Hispanics vote Republican and most of the Anglos vote Democratic.  That means the black vote -- hardly a factor in the Aug. 1 returns, with a 6% turnout -- could be decisive if someone figures out how to energize it.  This rich ethnic punch was spiked by GOP National Chairman Lee Atwater when he declared that the district ought to be the first in the nation represented by a Cuban-American.  Mrs. Ros-Lehtinen insists that Chairman Atwater's comments were "a terrible statement, so ethnically divisive," but Jorge Mas Canosa, powerful leader of the Cuban-American National Foundation, continues to argue the premise of a Cuban seat.  "We have paid our dues," he says.  "It's the American way, to have one of our own in Congress."  He supports Mrs. Ros-Lehtinen.  Rosario Arguelles Kennedy (once married to former Miami Mayor David Kennedy, her campaign manager) was the leading Democratic contender from the start, winning support of labor and most of the party apparatus.  She is that rare species: a Democratic Cuban-American.  Enter Mr. Richman, the senior partner in one of the city's biggest and most successful law firms.  He's Jewish and lives in Miami Beach.  He started out as a political unknown, running on his own money with a small staff of amateurs.  But he had a slogan: "This," he said in speeches and in his TV ads, "is not a Cuban seat.  It is not an Anglo seat.  It is an American seat."  Mr. Richman came in first, surprising himself and almost everyone else.  Some oddsmakers think Mr. Richman will win the runoff, given his overwhelming support among high-turnout Jewish voters.  Mrs. Kennedy's problem is that while this district contains the heaviest concentration of Cuban-Americans in the nation, almost all of them are Republican.  Even the figures -- they list 16% of the Democrats as Hispanic -- are deceptive, for half of them are low-turnout Puerto Ricans.  Mrs. Kennedy needs a solid turnout from black voters, and insists she will get it.  It is the one way she might win.  The motivating factor here is ethnicity.  Cuban-Americans are still seething over John Kennedy's failure to support the Bay of Pigs invasion and Jimmy Carter's decision to accept a boat lift of Cubans that included prisoners and mental patients.  These voters, many of whom were successful, middle-class people in pre-Castro Cuba, insist, above all else, that politicians take a pledge never to negotiate with Fidel Castro.  Rep. Pepper won their loyalty by making that pledge and by supporting military aid to the Nicaraguan rebels.  "We are very conservative because we lost our homeland to communism," says Mrs. Ros-Lehtinen.  "We remain extremely sensitive to foreign-policy issues.  The only Cuban-Americans who ever talk about negotiating with Castro are Democrats.  The idea is ludicrous."  Mrs. Kennedy, the Democratic Cuban-American candidate, talks much the same way on that special issue.  "We can never negotiate with Castro," she says.  "He's a traitor and a murderer."  Either Democrat -- Mr. Richman or Mrs. Kennedy -- will challenge Mrs. Ros-Lehtinen on several key issues.  High on the list is abortion.  Mrs. Ros-Lehtinen, in the words of the Miami Right to Life committee, "has been an active, courageous, outspoken pro-life advocate."  The group is supporting her.  Mrs. Kennedy, on the other hand, has received $5,000 campaign contributions from both the National Abortion Rights Action League and Voters for Choice.  Mr. Richman is also for abortion rights.  "Ileana," he says, "is a pro-life candidate, out of touch with people in this district and this state."  Gun control is another significant issue.  Both Democrats take a stronger gun-control position than Mrs. Ros-Lehtinen.  No matter who emerges as the Democratic challenger to Mrs. Ros-Lehtinen, one group in the 18th District may feel left out.  There are 34,000 black voters in this congressional district, many of them living in crime-plagued, riot-swept Liberty City and -- so far at least -- they don't seem enthusiastic about any of the candidates.  The Food and Drug Administration has asked the leader of an unofficial drug experiment to stop giving the drug Compound Q to AIDS patients.  The FDA's request to the San Francisco advocacy group Project Inform comes about a month after a death and several cases of dementia occurred among volunteers in a 60-patient group using an imported Chinese form of the drug.  FDA investigators also are conducting an inquiry into the treatment group and the death.  No conclusion has been announced.  In a letter to project director Martin Delaney, Carl Peck of the FDA urged that the group "discontinue any further unapproved experimentation with tricosanthin {Compound Q} and {not} initiate any new use of of tricosanthin without a valid {investigational new drug permit}."  The letter also invited the group to work cooperatively with the FDA and the drug's U.S. manufacturer on future trials.  Mr. Delaney called the letter "a victory" and added that he was "pleased with its overall thrust."  Compound Q, a cucumber extract long used in China to treat tumors and induce abortion, is believed to kill AIDS virus-infected cells in the test tube.  The drug is being developed by Genelabs Inc. of Redwood City, Calif., and tested by scientists at San Francisco General Hospital.  Genelabs and the hospital have been critical of the Project Inform experiment, which skipped the tiny graduated doses of a classic safety trial and moved straight to higher levels.  Dr. Peck, who is director of the FDA's Center for Drug Evaluation and Research, invited Mr. Delaney to meet with the FDA, and held out hope that Project Inform might play a role in future community-based trials of the drug -- with government review.  In general, Dr. Peck urged that such community trials be conducted in compliance with federal drug safety regulations and that they use standardized drugs to ensure consistency and purity.  In response to the FDA's invitation, Mr. Delaney said, "Sure, we want to {be part of community trials}."  He added that "we're pleased it gives us an opportunity to have contact with Genelabs, because they need to see our data.  The solution is for us all to come to the table."  The Canadian government auctioned 750 million Canadian dollars (US$640.3 million) of 9.25% bonds maturing Dec. 15, 1994.  The average accepted yield bid was 9.293% for a price equivalent of 99.798.  The government said it will auction next Tuesday C$650 million of 9.25% bonds maturing May 1, 1996.  Proceeds of both issues will be used for general government purposes.  Gibbons, Green, van Amerongen Limited Partnership said it completed its $980 million acquisition of Ohio Mattress Co., Cleveland.  Gibbons Green purchased 96% of Ohio Mattress shares through a $25.50-a-share tender offer and merged the nation's largest bedding manufacturer into a Gibbons Green affiliate.  Holders of the remaining Ohio Mattress shares will receive warrants to purchase under certain circumstances 10% of the stock in the new concern, Ohio Mattress Holding Co.  Eastern Enterprises has agreed in principle to buy Millipore Corp.'s Process Water Division for $54 million.  Eastern said it expects to sign a definitive agreement for the acquisition within the next two weeks and to complete the acquisition early in the fourth quarter.  Millipore, a Bedford, Mass., maker of analytical and purification products, said the division had world-wide sales in 1988 of more than $45 million.  Eastern is an energy and marine transportation concern.  Some 20 prestigious colleges and universities may have violated federal antitrust laws by exchanging certain financial information at meetings that are apparently the target of a Justice Department investigation, antitrust experts and former government officials said.  The key to whether antitrust violations could be proven would depend on whether federal prosecutors find that the schools agreed to fix tuition increases for specific years or scholarship amounts for specific students, the antitrust experts said.  The schools' main justification -- that they exchange certain financial information to avoid an unseemly bidding war for top students -- probably wouldn't carry much weight in court if the government decided to bring suit to block the longstanding practice, the antitrust experts agreed.  Moreover, several former government officials said, the fact that the Justice Department is investigating how prices are set in a field not usually viewed as commercial may indicate that prosecutors will enforce antitrust laws more vigorously under the Bush administration than they did under President Reagan.  A department spokeswoman confirmed that the antitrust division has sent formal requests for information on tuition and financial-aid practices to "about 20" schools over the past six weeks.  School officials said in interviews that the targets of the investigation apparently include members of an informal group of 23 prestigious colleges and universities -- including Harvard and other Ivy League schools -- that systematically exchange financial information at a meeting every spring.  The Washington Post first reported the probe yesterday.  Justice Department officials declined to provide details of the investigation but said it is at "a very preliminary" stage.  The department spokeswoman said the requests sent to the schools "mention the Sherman Act," which prohibits any transaction "in restraint of trade or commerce" and provides for penalties including fines and imprisonment.  School officials interviewed yesterday uniformly said that they don't discuss tuition levels until after rates for the coming year have been announced by the individual schools.  Tuition increases at most colleges and universities in recent years have run substantially above inflation.  The College Board, a New York educational association, in figures to be released today, said that tuition at private, four-year colleges will rise an average of 9% for the 1989-90 school year.  The College Board said total annual costs to students at those institutions, including such items as room and board, will rise to about $14,500.  Annual costs at the most expensive institutions rose to more than $18,000 this past academic year.  Members of the group of 23 elite colleges and universities have previously acknowledged that for the past 35 years their representatives have met annually to share information on common applicants seeking financial aid.  As a result of this process, many students receive financial-aid offers from a number of the participating schools that require identical out-of-pocket expenses to be paid by the applicants or their families.  In addition to Harvard, the other 22 schools that meet every spring are: Amherst College; Barnard College; Bowdoin College; Brown University; Bryn Mawr College; Colby College; Columbia University; Cornell University; Dartmouth College; Mount Holyoke College; Massachusetts Institute of Technology; Middlebury College; the University of Pennsylvania; Princeton University; Smith College; Trinity College; Tufts University; Vassar College; Wellesley College; Wesleyan University; Williams College; and Yale University.  Of that group, Amherst, Bowdoin, Colby, Harvard and Tufts have received investigative letters from the Justice Department, officials at the schools said.  Officials at Wellesley, MIT, Princeton and Yale said they hadn't received the requests for information as of yesterday.  At least one school not in the group, the University of Chicago, has also received a Justice Department request, suggesting that the inquiry may go beyond the spring meeting of the 23 schools.  The schools have contended that sharing financial information is proper because federal statutes establish a basic formula for determining applicants' financial need for scholarships.  The schools have said they discuss why, using the same formula, they frequently come up with different assessments of what a family can afford.  The goal, according to university officials, is to make sure that scholarships are based only on need and to prevent schools from bidding against each other for talented applicants.  "The intent is to . . . take the financial-aid decision out of the running as a factor," when students choose a college, a Bowdoin spokesman said.  In its requests, the Justice Department asked schools for a broad array of information on tuition, financial aid and faculty salaries, from 1985 to now, school officials said.  Officials at Amherst, Harvard and Tufts all said they believe their practices are in compliance with the law.  Antitrust experts said the mere exchange of price or scholarship information among schools wouldn't necessarily be illegal.  But if the exchange were accompanied by evidence that the schools had agreed to offer uniform financial-aid packages to particular students or to fix tuition increases, "that would be a traditional antitrust violation," said Irving Scher, a New York lawyer who heads the American Bar Association's antitrust section.  Although they aren't normally viewed as the sort of businesses regulated by antitrust laws, colleges and universities "are to some extent selling a product -- education -- with a price -- tuition," said Phillip Areeda, an antitrust professor at Harvard Law School.  American Greetings Corp. said it repurchased about 304,000 shares of its Class B common stock from the trust of Morris S. Stone, deceased former vice chairman of the greeting-card concern.  The company said it paid $29 a share, Monday's closing market price, or a total of $8.8 million.  Following the purchase, the company has outstanding 2,084,876 shares of Class B and 29,699,919 shares of Class A common stock.  LPL Technologies Inc. said it completed the acquisition of substantially all the connector operations of BRIntec Corp. for about $61 million.  BICC PLC, a British cable concern, recently purchased BRIntec for its cable businesses and agreed to sell the connectors business to LPL for $62.5 million.  LPL said the price was negotiated down.  The connector companies operate within two groups, Pyle National and Garry Electronic/General Connector.  LPL also makes coaxial cable, fiber-optic systems and interconnect systems.  Clark Equipment Co. said it will buy stock from holders who owned fewer than 100 of its common shares as of July 28.  Clark makes industrial equipment.  A participating shareholder will receive a per-share price equal to the average of the closing market prices listed on the New York Stock Exchange for the period from Tuesday through Sept. 13.  In Big Board trading, Clark closed at $42.875 a share, down 37.5 cents.  Mail Boxes Etc. said it signed an agreement with MBE Japan Co. to develop MBE franchises in Japan.  The franchiser of neighborhood, business and communication-service centers said MBE Japan, based in Osaka, plans to open its first MBE center there by year end.  Japan's corporate investment in plant and equipment, the driving force behind the present long-lasting economic growth, will continue to increase through the rest of the year, according to the results of a survey released by the Economic Planning Agency.  The quarterly survey, involving some 4,400 companies capitalized at more than 100 million yen ($720,000) showed that equipment investment will grow 7.6% in the July-September quarter from the previous three months and climb 10.5% in the October-December quarter.  That means that equipment investment will rise for 10 consecutive quarters, since the July-September period of 1987.  Japan's Economic Planning Agency said its index of consumer sentiment fell for the second consecutive quarter, dragged down largely by the reaction to price increases following the introduction of a 3% sales tax in April.  The "index of consumer attitude," taken from a survey of 5,040 households on June 15, fell to 44.8 from 47.3 last December.  The agency didn't say what member of each household was interviewed.  A large part of the decline came from the indexed response to the question, "Do you think the rate of price increase is faster compared with a year earlier?"  This index plunged to 22.3 from 35.0 in the last survey, taken before the consumption tax was introduced.  Identical characterizations of the pace by all respondents would produce an index of 100.  Gross domestic product among the 12 European Community nations rose by a real 1.2% during the first quarter of 1989, the highest rate since the third quarter of 1987, according to the EC statistics agency, Eurostat.  Eurostat said a 4.4% increase in investment, the highest in four years, underpinned the healthy EC economic performance during the first quarter.  Investment grew 1% during the last quarter of 1988.  Export growth was up 3.7% for the quarter, compared with a 1.6% rise during the previous quarter.  Imports rose 1.3%, less than the 3.2% climb during the last three months of 1988.  Italy's unadjusted index of industrial production rose 2.7% in June from May and was up 3.1% from a year earlier, the state statistical institute Istat said.  Istat said the index, on which 1985 equals 100, was 128.9 in June, compared with 125.5 in May and 125 in June 1988.  The index for June 1988 was revised because of a change in the base year.  Industrial production in the first half rose an average of 2.9% from the first six months of 1988, Istat said.  The seasonally adjusted index of industrial output rose 1.4% in June from May.  Istat didn't provide an adjusted comparison with the year-earlier period.  When Margaret Countryman's husband died in a Winnebago County, Ill., jail cell after his arrest on drunk-driving charges, she filed a lawsuit claiming that the county's negligence had contributed to her husband's death.  A jury awarded Mrs. Countryman $200,000.  But on appeal, the county said it had been improperly prevented from introducing evidence that Mr. Countryman had been having an extramarital affair.  The county argued such information was relevant because Mrs. Countryman was seeking compensation for the loss of her husband's companionship.  And if her husband's companionship wasn't exclusive, presumably its value was diminished.  Until recently, courts have generally ruled that the value of such evidence is outweighed by the prejudicial effect it's likely to have on the jury.  But, in its 1985 decision, the appeals court found that Mr. Countryman's alleged infidelities were indeed relevant to establishing what the couple's relationship had been like at the time of Mr. Countryman's death.  The court noted that despite Mrs. Countryman's contention that she never contemplated divorce or separation after learning of the affair, "the potential corrosive effect" of such a discovery made it relevant to the case.  The Winnebago County court isn't alone in taking a new look at the admissibility of such evidence.  Other cases, in California, Illinois and Michigan, have also involved such testimony.  And plaintiffs' lawyers are watching with growing alarm.  "There is a tendency to open the door to factual data that years ago would not have been admissible," says Eugene E. Brassfield, the Rockford, Ill., lawyer who represented Mrs. Countryman.  "More judges are willing to let the jury decide whether the evidence is important and what weight to give it."  He says the case was settled following the appeals-court ruling.  The trend toward allowing evidence of infidelity in wrongful-death cases is evolving just as such evidence is becoming less important in divorce, alimony and child-support cases, lawyers say.  No-fault divorce laws, in particular, have decreased reliance on titillating tales of extramarital affairs.  While some states allow plaintiffs to make claims only for loss of a deceased spouse's earning power, at least 18 states consider additional claims for a "loss of consortium."  Defense attorneys argue that evidence of infidelities is critical in deciding a loss-of-consortium claim, which accounts for the intangibles of a relationship, such as loss of companionship, affection and sexual relations.  Common sense dictates that evidence of infidelities might have a bearing on these things, says defense lawyer Kevin Doherty of Haskell & Perrin in Chicago.  For their part, plaintiffs' lawyers say the survivor's perception of the marital relationship should determine loss-of-consortium damages.  Whether the deceased had sexual relationships with others is a separate issue, these lawyers say.  When defending against a wrongful-death action, government bodies and corporations have long turned to the "scoundrel defense," says Ronald Green of Epstein, Becker & Green, who has represented corporations in defense of such suits.  He says that as more suits delved into details of nonmarital sexual relationships, the scope of admissible information expanded to include marital infidelities.  The change has been most apparent in the 1980s, say lawyers involved in these suits.  As late as 1979, the California Supreme Court, in its first ruling on the issue, refused to compel a plaintiff to list the names and addresses of any women he dated during his marriage on the ground that it would violate their privacy.  One justice said he feared the jury would turn its attention away from the defendant's possible negligence in the death of the wife to the surviving spouse's morals.  Now that courts are allowing such evidence, some personal-injury lawyers contend that the threat of having details of extramarital affairs aired in open court has given defense attorneys a wedge to force settlements more quickly.  Richard E. Brown, a San Francisco personal-injury lawyer, says his client lost her husband when a Delta Air Lines plane crashed in August 1985.  Shortly after the crash, the distraught client told a sympathetic Delta representative that her deceased husband may have been having an affair, Mr. Brown says.  During settlement negotiations, Mr. Brown says, Delta lawyers brought up the information and made a low settlement offer.  His client intends to go to trial, says Mr. Brown, because she believes her testimony about the couple's relationship will persuade the jury of her loss.  A spokeswoman for Delta says the company, as a policy matter, doesn't comment on pending litigation.  But even in cases in which courts allow evidence of infidelities to be considered, some lawyers contend that the introduction of such evidence could backfire on the defense.  Russ Herman, president of the American Trial Lawyers Association, says such evidence could easily increase a jury's sympathy for the bereaved spouse and actually lead to greater damages.  West Germany's retail sales rose in June a real, or inflation-adjusted, 3.6% from a year ago, the Federal Statistics Office said.  In the first half of 1989, retail sales rose a real 2.3% from the year-earlier period, the agency said.  Seasonally adjusted unemployment in the 12 European Community countries was steady at 9.3% in June, unchanged from April and May, the EC's statistics agency Eurostat said.  The rate was down eight-tenths of a percentage point from a year earlier.  The largest declines were recorded in Spain, where joblessness fell 2.6 percentage points to 17.4%; Britain, where it was down 2.1 points to 6.7%; and Belgium, where it fell 1.2 points to 9.5%.  Unemployment remained highest in Spain, followed by Ireland, at 17.3%; Italy, 10.8%; the Netherlands, 10.2%; France, 10%; Belgium; Denmark, 7.3%; Britain; West Germany, 5.9%; Portugal, 5.6%, and Luxembourg; 1.9%.  Figures for Greece weren't available.  On an unadjusted basis, EC unemployment was 8.9% in June, down from 9% in May and 9.3% in April.  It's the rare cop who reads Emily Dickinson on his lunch hour.  But then as detectives go, Lucas Davenport is something of a law unto himself.  He's probably the only policeman in the Twin Cities to drive a Porsche to work.  And he's certainly the only one to moonlight as a successful designer of role-playing fantasy games.  The lieutenant will need every iota of his gamesmanship to outmaneuver the deadly adversary he faces in "Rules of Prey" (Putnam's, 317 pages, $18.95).  Davenport's opponent: a kinky serial killer who likes to leave notes on the bodies of his female victims.  As the messages suggest ("Never murder anyone you know"; "Never have a motive"), this self-dubbed "maddog" is no ordinary nutcase.  In fact, we learn in the opening pages that the killer is a lawyer who researches his prey as thoroughly as a brief and knows how to avoid leaving any incriminating evidence.  Though the killer's psyche is likely to convince only hard-line Freudians, this debut thriller's plot should chill the rest of us.  As the seemingly normal murderer crosses paths with his future victims during the course of a business day, we're reminded of our own frightening vulnerability.  We can avoid dark alleys and deserted subway platforms, but how about showing a plausible-sounding person a house?  The central duel of wits is only the most visible of the games being played in this disturbing page-turner.  Competing reporters angle for scoops heedless of what effect their disclosures may have on the investigation.  Detective Davenport starts an affair with the only survivor of the attacks, while continuing a relationship with one anchorwoman and using another.  Credit author "John Sandford's" background in journalism for the ring of authenticity.  He's actually Pulitzer Prize-winner John Camp of the St. Paul Pioneer Press Dispatch, which also has the benefit of his taut prose.  ---  It would be hard to imagine a more incongruous setting for foul play than the sundappled Nebraska farmland of "The Story of Annie D." (Houghton Mifflin, 206 pages, $17.95).  But one fine day on the bench by the town duck pond the nude body of a young woman is discovere -- draped, strangled and minus a hunk of hair.  Soon there's another, and then a third.  As recounted by Annie D., the clear-eyed narrator of Susan Taylor Chehak's fine first novel, the murders initially do not seem unduly alarming.  Maybe this is because the community of Wizen River has a somewhat moonstruck aura.  Middle-aged Annie tells us about her friend Phoebe Tooker, who's constantly fighting a temptation to drive her Chevy wagon into a ditch; about Phoebe's philandering husband, Jack, drowned when a 20-pound-carp pulls him down into his own ice-fishing hole; and about their estranged daughter, Lacey, who becomes pregnant by wild Casey Boots.  The tale of Wizen River unfolds easily in Annie's discursive voice, captivating as dish from the town gossip over a backyard fence.  What emerges from these interwoven lives is a vivid evocation of place, of an inexorably changing world in which, as Annie puts it, "Everyone's expecting more and somehow turning up with less."  With Ms. Chehak in the driver's seat, the story, unlike Phoebe Tooker's car, never veers off course.  ---  A heavy-drinking, hard-bitten detective in the City of Angels has some pretty big gumshoes to fill.  Simeon Grist, making his debut in Timothy Hallinan's "The Four Last Things" (NAL Books, 318 pages, $16.95), isn't likely to make anybody forget Philip Marlowe.  Grist's wise-guy cynicism is as standard-issue as his P.I. license.  And the ex-prof's preciousness -- using the alias "Swinburne" or saying a car door "opened as gratefully as a Catholic at her final confession" -- helps wear out his welcome fast.  This is too bad because the case he's investigating is devilishly devious.  It involves the unholy activities of The Church of the Eternal Moment, a cult combining New Age channeling and old-fashioned greed.  Along the way we meet some of the most agreeably eccentric supporting players this side of "L.A.  Law."  They include Eleanor Chan, Grist's understandably-ex girlfriend and author of "The Right-Brain Cookbook," and Dexter Smif, who indulges his philosophical bent while removing animal carcasses for the county and seeing how many negatives he can shoehorn into a sentence.  Maybe for the next of the Grist trilogy the dustjacket says Mr. Hallinan is writing, he'll exercise a little more of this invention on his hero and, in the best Tinseltown tradition, give him a makeover.  Sunstar Foods Inc. said the buyer of its consumer-foods division will be a Chicago-based unit of RHM PLC of Windsor, England.  Late last month, Sunstar announced plans to sell the division for $6.8 million plus the assumption of certain liabilities, but didn't identify the buyer.  The RHM Holdings (USA) Inc. unit owns several food-manufacturing businesses.  The parent is a food processor.  Sunstar's food division is its last remaining unit.  Earlier this summer the company sold its beef division.  Robert E. Mercer, retired chairman of Goodyear Tire & Rubber Co., was elected a director of this trucking concern, expanding the board to 11 members.  Coca-Cola Co., adding to the momentum of its growth overseas, agreed to set up a joint venture to acquire a bottling company in New Zealand for about $130 million in cash and debt.  The soft-drink giant also said it completed the acquisition of Societe Parisienne de Boissons Gazeuses, a French bottling unit of Pernod-Ricard S.A. Coca-Cola also disclosed that the purchase price was about $140 million.  Both moves reflect Coca-Cola's aggressive acquisition and joint venture strategy to boost soft-drink consumption world-wide.  By acquiring stakes in bottling companies in the U.S. and overseas, Coca-Cola has been able to improve the bottlers' efficiency and production.  In New Zealand, Coca-Cola and C-C Bottlers Ltd., an Australian Coca-Cola bottler, will form a joint venture to acquire Oasis Industries Ltd. Oasis's parent company, Lion Nathan Ltd., recently said it planned to sell the soft-drink business to concentrate on its core retailing and brewing interests, Coca-Cola said.  Oasis, the largest soft-drink company in New Zealand, already is a Coca-Cola bottler.  Coca-Cola estimates it has more than a 50% share of New Zealand's carbonated soft-drink market, which totals a relatively small 45 million to 50 million gallons a year.  Coca-Cola, nonetheless, has had some success generating respectable consumption rates there.  On a per-capita basis, New Zealanders drink about one-third as much soda pop as people in the U.S., Coca-Cola estimates.  It was partly because of Coca-Cola's displeasure with sluggish consumption growth in France that the company sought to acquire control of Pernod-Ricard's bottling business, industry analysts have said.  Consumption in the important French market lags far behind that in the U.S. and also trails that of its European neighbors.  Coca-Cola said the acquisition of the French bottling business ends more than a year of litigation with Pernod-Ricard over control of bottling and distribution of Coca-Cola products in France.  Societe Parisienne accounts for about 80% of Coca-Cola's soft drinks sold in France.  Separately, Moody's Investors Service raised its rating on about $100 million of 12.125% subordinated notes, due 1995, of Coca-Cola Bottling Co. Consolidated to Ba-2 from Ba-3.  Moody's attributed the upgrade to the company's "financial turnaround" and "strategies that have enhanced the bottler's competitive position and its productivity."  Coca-Coca has a 30% interest in the Charlotte, N.C.-based bottling business.  WorldCorp Inc. said it boosted its cash reserves by $12.7 million through a program that converted about 2.5 million warrants to common stock.  Separately, the holding company for World Airways and Key Airlines purchased about 1.5 million warrants and options over the past two months at an aggregate cost of about $3.8 million.  The company now has about 12.8 million common shares outstanding.  Since April 1987, WorldCorp said it has retired about 13.7 million common-share equivalents.  Team Inc. said it received $1.7 million in maintenance contracts from the Texas State Highway Department for concrete and asphalt pothole repair.  Team provides repair and conservation services for industries and governments.  Quebec Premier Robert Bourassa called an early provincial election for September 25.  Mr. Bourassa will wage his campaign based on his strong pro-business economic record and, barring a major campaign disaster, is expected to win handily.  Mr. Bourassa's Liberal Party held 98 of the 123 seats in the outgoing Quebec legislature, the National Assembly.  The opposition Parti Quebecois held 19 seats, one seat was held by an independent and four seats were vacant.  The number of seats up for grabs increases by three to 125 in this election.  At a news conference, Mr. Bourassa insisted he doesn't think victory is assured.  "Nothing is ever easy in an election," he said.  But recent opinion polls haven't detected any surge in support for the opposition Parti Quebecois and its renewed commitment to the political separation of Quebec from Canada.  Parti Quebecois support has hovered around the 30% level for several months and that could translate into as few as a dozen seats in the National Assembly, giving Mr. Bourassa's Liberals an overwhelming majority.  Parti Quebecois leader Jacques Parizeau has made a vague pledge to begin taking over certain powers from the federal government immediately following an election victory.  The repatriation of powers would be approved on a step-by-step basis by voters in referendums and eventually would result in Quebec's full separation from Canada.  But the process hasn't been defined in detail and has attracted little interest.  Mr. Parizeau led a sort of "back-to-basics" movement within the Parti Quebecois after his predecessor, Pierre-Marc Johnson, lost to Mr. Bourassa in the last election, a little less than four years ago.  Mr. Parizeau, a former Parti Quebecois finance minister, and his allies eventually forced Mr. Johnson to quit the party leadership and brought back political independence as the party's key goal, which had been abandoned under Mr. Johnson.  In his last campaign, Mr. Bourassa promised jobs, economic growth, tax cuts and a reduction in the provincial government deficit -- promises he largely kept.  Although the Quebec economy is slowing this year, growth in real provincial domestic product has topped 4% over the last three years, above the Canadian average.  Mr. Bourassa did cut the provincial deficit and income tax rates dropped at least slightly for most taxpayers.  This time around he will promise more of the same.  Mr. Bourassa will face a few potentially troublesome issues during the short 47-day campaign.  The province's nurses overwhelmingly rejected the government's last contract offer and may stage a strike or use other pressure tactics.  Additionally, a shipment of toxic waste from a suburban Montreal warehouse set to be destroyed in Britain was turned back from Liverpool and will presumably return to Quebec, where facilities for disposing of the waste don't exist.  Also, English-speaking voters may abandon Mr. Bourassa's Liberals in favor of an upstart group, the Equality Party, to protest language legislation passed last winter that limited the posting of commercial signs in English.  Anglophones, as English-speakers are known, also may simply skip going to the polls.  But most political analysts feel the impact of any protest vote by Anglophones will be minimal.  Raycomm Transworld Industries Inc. said it received a three-year contract for $20 million to $25 million from the Jet Propulsion Laboratories, Pasadena, Calif.  The contract calls for a Raycomm unit to provide technical-personnel support through 1992.  Raycomm Transworld provides temporary professional and technical personnel to a broad range of industries.  This newspaper reported a couple of weeks ago that the marketing people at Fox Inc.'s film division were worried that many Americans don't know the meaning of "abyss."  Now they can worry that too many people will understand the meaning of the word all too well.  Those who endure all two hours and 18 minutes of Fox's new film, "The Abyss," will have had firsthand experience of sinking into something Webster's New World Dictionary defines as "too deep for measurement," a "bottomless gulf."  The adjective for this experience, in case you're wondering, is "abysmal."  Writer and director James Cameron has harpooned this lavishly produced movie, his personal great white whale, with nearly every B-movie cliche.  He did leave out the most obvious movie reference, however, perhaps the only one that makes sense in an underwater saga: sharks.  There aren't any sharks, though there is an insidious little jet-propelled something-or-other painted like Jaws.  There aren't any fish at all, not even an octopus or an eel.  Mr. Cameron's "Abyss" is a good example of what happens when a skilled director of successful action pictures has enough razzle-dazzle style to convince critics and studio executives that he is a Big Thinker, when he may just be a little thinker with a good eye.  Mr. Cameron's two previous hits were "The Terminator" and "Aliens."  Both these sci-fi pictures were masterful updates on genre films: cowboy soldiers in outer space ("Aliens"); Dirty Harry doing his thing in a post-nuclear world ("Terminator").  His timing was perfect, his ideas unpretentious.  Talking about "The Terminator" when it was released, Mr. Cameron explained that the movie "has the things in it I wanted in a movie when I was 16.  Robots, pretty girls, time travel, action."  Pressed by the urgency of major success, Mr. Cameron had to come up with a really big idea.  So he thought and he thought.  Then he announced he'd hit on it.  He would take his space-travel-haunted-house-action themes and submerge them under water.  Apparently this struck the folks at Fox as pure genius.  They told Mr. Cameron to put on his diving gear -- top-of-the-line stuff that reportedly sent the movie's budget above $60 million.  The director wants to assure his fans that he isn't locked in some adolescent fantasy world.  Now, promoting "The Abyss," he has said: "It has hardware, but it's not about hardware.  It has action, but it's not about action.  It's about people . . ."  That must be why there aren't any fish.  It doesn't explain why Mr. Cameron felt compelled to trot over to George Lucas's Industrial Light & Magic shop to pick up a load of expensive looking neon creatures, including a lavender E.T. knockoff.  On the other hand, Mr. Cameron doesn't give his aliens much airtime (no doubt he couldn't figure out exactly what they were doing in his picture either).  It appears, then, that he really does want us to concentrate on the people.  Okay.  Let's start with the main characters, the squabbling husband-and-wife team.  They are played by the talented actors Ed Harris and Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio, who look glassy-eyed, as though they are suffering from the bends.  He is Bud Brigman, the foreman of an underwater oil-drilling rig; she's Lindsey, the rig's project engineer.  It's difficult to tell what anyone is doing in the murky netherworld of "The Abyss."  But then, it doesn't really matter exactly why Bud and Lindsey -- and their crew -- have been pressed into service to search for a distressed nuclear submarine.  Mr. Cameron wanted them there, forced together in a small space under dire circumstances as a way to work out their marital problems.  Lindsey is portrayed as a strong woman, but sensitive, not all that different from the character played by Sigourney Weaver in "Aliens."  However, like every other character in this movie, Lindsey is left to founder in this watery bouillabaisse, where instead of fish there float the bones of too many other movies -- and television programs: There's a little reminder of "Ben Casey" for fans of doctor shows.  Though it's impossible to follow any one of the many plots during the movie's first hour or so, Mr. Cameron does create a compellingly claustrophobic atmosphere.  This is something he knows how to do very well and he's done it before.  His earlier movies also effectively used the horror-movie technique of the slow build toward something terrifying, or momentous.  It was always clear that a showdown was coming.  Here, the prospects for some exciting inevitability start to dissolve as it becomes more and more difficult to figure out not only what the showdown could be, but who will be doing the facing off.  That leaves the thrill of Mr. Cameron's idea, the excitement of the deep blue sea.  But the deep blue of his sea doesn't look too different from the hazy blue of his outer space.  Indeed, all Mr. Cameron's studio pictures have been shot in grays and blues.  Maybe he should think of "The Abyss" as the end of his Blue Period.  ---  VIDEO TIP: Neither film will play nearly as well without benefit of a big screen and Dolby sound, but it's worth looking at the first two pictures Mr. Cameron made after leaving Roger Corman's B-movie factory.  "The Terminator," while not the masterpiece many sane people insist it is, made exquisite use of Arnold Schwarzenegger, who plays a human-looking (sort of) machine.  And "Aliens," the movie that got Sigourney Weaver dubbed Rambo-lina, has satisfying amounts of action, and exploded fragments of humans and monsters and slime.  Stockholders of Dollar Federal Savings Bank, Hamilton, Ohio, agreed to be acquired by Great Lakes Bancorp, Ann Arbor, for $12.4 million.  Dollar Federal holders will receive $37.50 for each Dollar Federal common share.  Foreign correspondents are tourists whose bills are paid by somebody else, and whose generalizations and complaints of parts dimly known go not onto the backs of postcards but instead into articles or spots on the nightly news.  Like tourists, too, the foreign correspondent's elusive goal is to "meet the people," to try to form a rounded view of how and why these strange creatures do things differently from us.  And once "the people" have been duly met, they are often fair game for brutal excoriation, for not knowing how or what to eat or when to eat it, or how to run an airline.  The excoriated people generally pay no attention: Tourist and foreign correspondent are telling their tales back home, in a foreign language, so the people involved can't hear or read it.  Unless the foreign correspondent unleashes his skills on his own kind.  Mort Rosenblum is a foreign correspondent of distinction, having spent the last two decades putting out fires for the Associated Press in, he counts, 145 countries, reporting on droughts and famines and coups and countercoups, but also on how the Earth's assorted folk use what nature and man provide.  This reporting has opened his eyes, he writes, and now he's turned those eyes on the biggest foreign country of them all in "Back Home: A Foreign Correspondent Rediscovers America" (Morrow, 447 pages, $19.95).  The lasting impression is one of aggressive ignorance on the part of most of the people Mr. Rosenblum encounters.  Wherever he goes, he gamely tries to elicit some tiny spark of interest in the wide world he has seen, to talk about Africa, say, or Europe in America on a level that one could talk about America in Africa or Europe.  Forget it.  Nobody knows where these places are and nobody cares.  A wire service reporter in Texas tells him to stop bugging her about helping Africa.  At his old elementary school in Tucson, Ariz., he strikes momentary gold: He asks the kids if they know a famous French person.  One replies "Jack Shellac," which Mr. Rosenblum gratefully accepts as a surprising reference to former prime minister Jacques Chirac.  Later he learns that the kid was referring to a TV cartoon character called Blaque Jacque Shellaque, who's supposed to be a Canadian fur trapper anyway.  Says the school principal proudly: "We are Americans, so we don't have to learn about other cultures and peoples.  They don't exist."  This outrages Mr. Rosenblum, and it should outrage all Americans.  But what outrages and bewilders him even more is the aggression, the everyday frustration breeding the violence he encounters on airplanes and freeways, in discount stores and on television.  He asks sociologists and educators and judges about this American habit to meddle in one's own and everybody else's trivial problems while the true problems are left to fester.  But much more fruitfully, he just observes.  He observes that if he attempts to light up his pipe just about anywhere, he is shouted at, spat at, and generally made to feel criminal.  He observes enough guns getting sold at an Oklahoma gun fair to stock the army of your average developing country.  He observes boiling hatred on the face of and filthy language from the mouth of a woman who thinks he jostled her son.  He observes that every telephone operator instantly calls him Mort, but none can seem to get his calls through.  He observes policemen stopping and handcuffing some friends who haven't paid a parking ticket, while all around him serious crime flourishes.  He observes nobody focusing on the homeless and the drug addicts littering our streets.  He observes a stunning absence of proportion.  "What amazes the outsider is the lack of compromise," he writes.  "Obviously too many smokers ignored polite requests not to pollute the immediate atmosphere.  Nonsmokers refuse to distinguish between the odd puff of smoke and a spurt of cyanide gas.  So we legislate, prohibit and moralize.  What should be a simple societal adjustment becomes all-out war, in which the victors take no prisoners.  On one flight a woman was outraged when the flight attendant could not find room for her coat in the nonsmoking section.  Okay, secondary smoke.  But lapel cancer?"  The book is best when Mr. Rosenblum steps back and reflects.  Like all foreign correspondents, he's better reporting what he's actually seen than repeating what he's read somewhere else, which he does here a bit too much.  He's also a sucker for hokum.  We probably don't need all of the references to the "Dallas" ranch, the Miss America pageant, Dollywood, Hollywood, Disneyland, Graceland and Heritage U.S.A. and a pointless ride on James Taylor's turnpike from Stockbridge to Boston to get the point about American culture.  I wanted more of the wonderful scenes in Louisiana bayou country and Indiana basketball and playing golf with country-rock singer Jerry Jeff Walker in Texas.  But these are quibbles, which don't greatly detract from a book that paints a valuable picture of America in transition from Reagan to Bush, and, though Mr. Rosenblum mercifully doesn't dwell on the topic, in transition from dominant superpower to cohabiting superpower.  It is a book that, unfortunately, is right about the attitude of Americans toward foreigners who observe us, even if those foreigners were born in Tucson.  It deserves to be widely read, attacked, raged at and digested, but, if Mr. Rosenblum's reporting is accurate, it probably won't be.  ---  Mr. Revzin, the Journal's Paris bureau chief, has been a foreign correspondent for nine of the last 12 years.  The Bush administration's goal in this latest bout of Middle Eastern terrorism seems to be the release of Joseph Cicippio, and perhaps one or two other hostages as well.  That would end the "crisis": The media would lose interest in the affair and President Bush's approval ratings would inch farther into the stratosphere.  But in fact, if the Bush administration accomplishes what it wants, it will be handing yet another victory to Hezbollah and its Iranian sponsors.  Once again, the terrorists will have paralyzed the U.S. government.  Once again, they will have used murder to manipulate American public opinion, proving to Israel that the price of counterterrorism is no longer to be paid just in Israeli lives but in the loss of American support.  Who says terrorists don't understand deterrence?  Hezbollah and the two states that enable it to operate -- Syria and Iran -- will have gained respect in the Middle East for defying a superpower.  Iran will even expect America's gratitude for not killing more hostages.  With all these profits, why would any of the terror groups ever get out of the hostage business?  Yet the Bush administration moves inexorably down this path, by making the release of hostages its primary goal.  But the crisis is not that eight American lives are now in danger.  They have been in danger ever since they were kidnapped.  The real crisis is that for more than 10 years state-sponsored terrorism has brought American foreign policy to a standstill with numbing regularity.  And until this crisis is resolved, every American in every volatile area of the world is a potential hostage.  Instead, the Bush administration should set itself the following goals:  1.  Restore American credibility.  If the U.S. can't deal with a band of thugs, how can it force peace settlements, defend allies, or preserve stability?  2.  Re-establish rules of the game.  Superpowers must set the parameters of legitimate behavior in world affairs.  The U.S. must make clear that states that attempt to profit from terrorism will regret it.  3.  Deter terrorists.  Terrorist groups must be punished, both to hold them responsible for their past actions and to deter future misconduct.  Naturally, diplomacy is to be preferred to force.  The administration's efforts to pressure the Iranians and Syrians, to enlist the Algerians, to even involve the Soviet Union are all laudable and necessary.  But there should be no pleading for the lives of hostages.  The goal must be that Iran and Syria discourage and disband Hezbollah and its sister groups.  Those two governments have the power to end the kidnapping.  Iran's officials present demands on behalf of the hostage-takers.  Its interior minister publicly recommends that acts of terrorism be committed.  Its government supplies money and arms to Hezbollah and its subsidiaries, and could defund and delegitimize these groups.  The Syrians, who control the Bekaa Valley and the southern suburbs of Beirut, could shut down terrorist training camps and disrupt their operations.  At the least they could cut the flow of aid coming to Hezbollah through the Iranian embassy in Damascus.  Consider an analogy.  If the Nicaraguan Contras' principal sponsor, the U.S., were to stop funding and arming them, and if the country from which they operate, Honduras, were to throw them out, as it has said it will, the Contras would be emasculated and effectively finished.  Indeed that seems to be what will happen.  What Daniel Ortega did to the Contras, George Bush must do to Hezbollah.  The carrots the U.S. could offer Iran are substantial.  Over the long term, the U.S. could help Iran rebuild its crumbled economy, ancient technological base and weary military; in the short term, it could take a more conciliatory position on its frozen assets.  But not in exchange for the hostages; rather, in exchange for disbanding the hostage-taking groups themselves.  If the Iranians and Syrians ignore diplomatic pressure and keep manipulating the American public, then the U.S. must achieve its objectives by force.  Iran's economy is shattered; few noticed that President Rafsanjani's offer to have the hostages released was accompanied by calls for severe domestic austerity.  Syria is also vulnerable to economic coercion, as Patrick Clawson pointed out on this page yesterday, and is anxious to avert international attention from its bloody activities in Lebanon.  If these pressures don't work, then pressure must become violence -- against Hezbollah first, and, if necessary, against Iranian and Syrian targets later.  There are two ways to think about force.  The first, which postwar America has been more comfortable with, is the "economy of force" model, which uses limited and discrete quantities of force to help negotiations and push bargaining along.  The other way, the way in which Middle Eastern nations think about it, is to use force to inflict pain and suffering, and to break an opponent's will by making circumstances unendurable for him.  As Samuel Huntington put it the spring, 1986, National Interest, "Military forces are not primarily instruments of communication to convey signals to an enemy; they are instead instruments of coercion to compell him to alter his behavior."  The U.S. should use this model.  Once your opponent realizes that you have set yourself arbitrary limits, he knows that he can win so long as he is prepared to go just one notch higher than you.  Anyway, the American military is illsuited to limited warfare.  Whenever it has had to perform these kinds of surgical operations it has failed.  As Mr. Huntington has suggested, the U.S. should rely upon its strengths by going on the offensive, aiming for a first-round knockout, exploiting technology, and using "bigness, not brains."  Nudging an opponent toward compromise with discrete increments of force assumes that your antagonist shares interests with you, that you at least speak the common language of diplomacy.  None of this is true with Hezbollah.  It is futile for those without security clearances to take hard positions on whether the U.S. does or does not know where the terrorists are.  But in the past few days, Robert Macfarlane and Adm. James Lyons have revealed that the U.S. was ready to strike terrorist strongholds on two occasions during the Reagan administration.  The Bush administration was also planning to strike bases if Mr. Cicippio had been killed.  The real problem appears to be that the U.S. does know where to attack, but that the hostages are being held at those very sites.  Hezbollah is "de facto" at war with the U.S.  It has killed between 250 and 300 Americans, as well as almost 100 allies.  The hostages it now holds are, in effect, prisoners of war.  The U.S. did not want to enter this war, and its captured citizens did not enlist as soldiers.  But those who wage war rarely ask their victims for permission to do so.  Now the U.S. must respond, and must set no arbitrary limits upon its actions.  Political and military circumstances may require that it hit Iranian targets, as it hit Libyan ones three years ago.  The idea that terrorists cannot be deterred is not only unproven but discredited.  After the U.S. raid on Libya, not only Lybyan but Syrian sponsored attacks slacked off.  In their recent actions, the Lebanese terrorists have shown shrewd calculation.  Claiming to kill Col. William Higgins in response to the Israeli kidnapping of Sheikh Abdul Karim Obeid sowed discord between Israel and America, and put pressure on the American government to ask Syria and Iran for help.  But killing Mr. Cicippio would have gone too far, enraging the American public and possibly leading to an American air strike, so they suspended that death threat.  The fact that the terrorists' goals are utterly anti-American and their means ruthless does not mean that they are madmen.  The Soviet response to its one recent case of terrorism has ensured that there have been no others.  On Sept. 30, 1985, four minor Soviet officials were kidnapped in Beirut and on Oct. 2, one was murdered.  It was unclear who the kidnappers were or where the hostages had been taken.  The Soviet Union officially stated that it would hold not just the terrorists responsible but also "all those who could have stopped the criminal action but did not do everything possible to this effect."  Soviet official statements also emphasized that "this was an evil deed for which there can be no forgiveness."  Within days, Syrian, Druze, Palestinian and Shiite militias began combing Beirut and Sidon, rounding up dozens of people for searches and interrogations.  The Syrian chief of military intelligence arrived in Beirut to mastermind the operation personally.  The Iranian government sent three officials to help.  On Oct. 30 -- exactly one month after the kidnapping -- the kidnappers had been identified and the hostages located and released.  Meanwhile, elsewhere in Beirut, the American CIA station chief, William Buckley, was being tortured to death while the National Security Council sold arms to the Iranians.  The problem may not be that Hezbollah does not understand costs and benefits, but that it understands them too well.  And till now there have been many benefits and few costs.  That won't change if another American president plays another round of the hostage-concession game.  ---  Mr. Zakaria is a fellow at the Harvard's Center for Science and International Affairs.  Throngs of eager customers scan paperbacks on Zen poetry and feminist theory.  Clerks in beards that rarely see a barber offer literate advice.  New York magazine calls the place "arguably the best bookstore in town."  For years, Saint Mark's Bookshop earned steady profits as an egghead institution in the hip East Village.  Attracting such customers as writer Susan Sontag, the store says sales grew as much as 40% a year.  But today, the store is fighting to stay alive.  A third of the shelves are empty because publishers have cut off delivery.  Last week, the owners laid off most of the employees and cut the hours.  "We're still packed on Saturdays, but people go out empty-handed because there's so little stock," says partner Robert Contant.  At the current rate, the store won't see New Year's, he adds.  The store's sudden plunge is a classic example of how an underfinanced expansion can rock a small business.  And it shows the perils of allowing changing circumstances to pre-empt a long-term business strategy.  "We had this track record of success, and we just didn't think the business could fail," says a stunned Mr. Contant.  Yet the store's woes stem directly from its own success, which prompted the expansion.  Five former bookstore employees in their 30s, worried about their future, started the business in 1977 when the East Village counter-culture was dying out and yuppies hadn't yet discovered the area.  "We each borrowed $2,000 from relatives and put in $3,000 worth of sweat equity," Mr. Contant says.  Earning no pay, the owners also worked other jobs to stay alive.  But the thrill of starting the store made up for the 16-hour days.  "It was a great feeling," says Terence McCoy, who moonlighted as a proofreader to pay the rent on his $88-a-month tenement apartment.  Determined to avoid diet books and bestsellers, the partners found there is good money in titles like "Ethics and the Limits of Philosophy" and "Structuralism and Semiotics" -- if you know what to stock.  Customers came in droves.  "You find books you just couldn't find elsewhere," says Robert Lobe, a librarian and regular customer.  "This store has its pulse on what creative people and young intellectuals are reading."  Eventually all those tomes on film theory and the philosophy of R.G. Collingwood added up to nearly $2 million in annual sales.  "In the beginning, a good day was $200.  Later it was $5,000 -- and $8,000 on Saturday," Mr. Contant says.  With its large staff -- as many as 25 people -- the store didn't generate colossal profits, but in terms of sales per square foot, it became one of the country's most successful independent bookstores, he adds.  But success soon meant there weren't enough square feet.  "When we got a shipment, we had to keep it in boxes for a week while we sold books to make room," says Mr. Contant.  "We had boxes lined up in the basement unopened."  This led to the crucial decision that could prove to be the store's undoing.  In 1987, the owners decided to move into a space twice the size -- but without enough financing to fully cover renovation costs.  Ironically, before deciding to move, the partners had developed a strategy that would have solved the inventory problem and avoided the need to move, they say.  The partners figured that by computerizing the inventory and ordering process, they could place smaller but more-frequent orders with their 200 suppliers.  With a computer, the store would be able to order monthly from publishers, compared with the usual three times a year.  This would have allowed stocking more titles with less inventory -- and staying in the original store, which had only 1,000 square feet of selling space.  "If we hadn't moved, we would still have a going bookstore," says Mr. McCoy.  But, instead of sticking to the strategy, the partners say they fell for the trap of simply reacting to events.  First, their landlord began keeping empty apartments in the building off the market, leading the partners to fear that she was considering selling the building.  When she wouldn't give the store a long-term lease renewal, the booksellers began to worry that they would lose their premises.  At the same time, a store with nearly twice the selling space became available on the same block -- the perfect location and the only large space on the block likely to open up.  With numerous businesses -- including an antique-clothes store called Andy's Chee-Pees and a trendy rock-music record store -- the block is one of the busiest locations in New York's bustling East Village.  The partners felt they couldn't afford to let the chance slip by -- even though their rent would more than double from $5,000 to $12,000 a month in the first year.  Signing the new lease, they borrowed $50,000 from friends and relatives to renovate the premises.  They say banks gave them the cold shoulder because their only real collateral was books, which are hard to liquidate at a good price.  They have since paid back the $50,000, but at a pace that strained their finances, they say.  Meanwhile, cost overruns drove the cost of renovating the sales space alone to around $90,000.  Lacking funds, they couldn't immediately finish the basement, which they planned to use for office space and storage.  Needing office and storage space, the booksellers decided to keep the old store temporarily.  To pay the added expenses, they also planned to use it as an annex of the new main store.  But this required added staff and paying two rents, which the annex sales didn't come close to justifying, they say.  On top of this, the remaining owners had the unrelated expense of buying out the fourth partner. (The fifth had left years earlier.)  By the time the new store's basement was ready to use and the store could give up the annex, total renovation costs had soared to more than $130,000.  To cope with the expense, the store fell into one of the major pitfalls of small business: in essence, borrowing from suppliers by paying bills late.  "Normally, we owed about $200,000 to publishers, but now we owe $360,000," Mr. Contant says.  Instead of paying in 90 days or less, the store found itself paying publishers after 180 days.  "We didn't realize how serious it had become," Mr. Contant says.  "We had so many suppliers we could always juggle them," he recalls.  Mr. McCoy adds: "Suddenly it was like gridlock.  The publishers all cut us off."  With shipments halted, the store has nothing to sell beyond existing inventory.  The wholesale value of the stock in hand has declined to less than $140,000 from $220,000 normally, Mr. Contant says.  But sales of the dwindling stock aren't enough to keep the store afloat, he says.  Without so much debt brought on by the expansion, the store could easily pay its way with operations.  Before the inventory problems set in, sales in the new store had risen to $1.9 million a year from a peak of $1.4 million in the old store, Mr. McCoy says.  The store needs more than $100,000 to survive the current crisis, Mr. McCoy says.  To attract new investment, the owners are busy contacting booklovers with capital.  Having cut the staff to five (including the owners) from 12, the store now shuts its doors at 9 p.m. -- instead of 11 p.m. during the week and midnight on weekends.  In a move to raise cash fast, the store yesterday slashed the price of nearly every book in stock by 25%.  "We're getting down to the wire," Mr. Contant says.  Money-fund yields retreated more than a tenth of a percentage point in the week ended Tuesday, repeating an almost identical drop the week before.  The average seven-day compound yield on taxable money-market mutual funds slipped to 8.68% from 8.84%, according to Donoghue's Money Fund Report.  The seven-day compound yield assumes that the average yield for the week continues unchanged for a year and that all interest is reinvested.  Yields on tax-exempt funds also dropped more than a tenth of a percentage, to 5.58% from 5.69% the previous week.  For an investor in the 33% tax bracket, the current yield is equal to a taxable yield of 8.32%; in the 28% bracket, it equals a 7.75% yield.  Assets of the 386 taxable funds tracked by Donoghue rose $3.4 billion to $331.3 billion in the latest week.  That compares with a $2 billion average every week since the beginning of the year, said Susan Cook, editor of the Holliston, Mass., newsletter.  At the same time, however, assets of the 191 tax-exempt funds tracked by Donoghue declined $474.9 million to $67.7 billion.  Ms. Cook said taxable money-fund assets continue to rise while yields are falling because money market mutual-fund yields are still attractive compared with returns on other short-term investments.  For example, the average yield on six-month certificates of deposit of less than $50,000 stood at 7.86% in the week ended Tuesday, according to Banxquote Money Markets.  Uncertainty in the markets also contributed to the rise in assets, Ms. Cook said.  "Given the ups and downs of the stock and bond markets, these funds are being used as a safe haven for investors to temporarily park their cash," she said.  Yields have been falling steadily on money funds since late April, when the average seven-day compound yield on taxable funds stood at 9.62%.  The average seven-day simple yield on the taxable funds was 8.33%, down from 8.47% the previous week.  The average 30-day simple yield was 8.53%, down from 8.64% a week ago.  The average 30-day compound yield on the funds dropped to 8.90% from 9.02% the week before.  Average maturity of the funds was 41 days, down from 42 days the week before.  Maturities are considered an indication of which way professional money managers expect interest rates to head.  Shorter maturities are considered a signal that rates are rising because they allow reinvestment of assets sooner at higher rates; longer maturities signal declining rates because they lock in comparatively high rates for longer periods.  The average maturity of the funds was as short as 29 days at the start of this year, before the Federal Reserve began lowering interest rates.  "No, we don't accept it," says the clerk of the Grand Hotel Capodimonte in Sorrento.  The reservationholder points to an entry in the Michelin Guide indicating that this establishment does too take the American Express Co. card, but the clerk insists.  As the would-be guest requests a taxi and the name of another hotel, the manager approaches.  "All right, we'll take the card for the hotel room," he says, taking a packet of charge forms out of a locked cabinet.  "But if you want to eat here, you'll have to pay cash."  So it goes for American Express cardholders in Italy.  Their motto might well be: Better to leave home without it.  Whether traveling to provincial tourist haunts or having business lunches at chic spots in Milan, paying with American Express -- even when the symbol is displayed outside -- is hit or miss.  "I'm sorry," says the manager of a pricey Milan restaurant as embarrassed diners fish in their pockets for cash to cover the bill.  "We can't accept the card, you see, because they take a huge commission -- something like 15%.  Then it can take months to get our money.  With two-thirds of our clients using American Express, we were going broke."  American Express Co. acknowledges that it has a problem.  "It's true" that there is resistance to the card, says Isabella di Montezemolo, the company's head of public affairs for Italy.  Tommaso Zanzotto, president of American Express Travel-Related Services International, concedes that Italy is "a little behind in terms of the plastic revolution" and says there "may be a couple of isolated incidents" where merchants refuse to accept the American Express card, but he denies the company has major problems there.  He cites a late 1987 survey of Italian cardholders in which 98.2% said they were satisfied with the service they received.  Mr. Zanzotto says he expects Italians to significantly increase credit-card use in the next four or five years; so far, only three million cards are spread among Italy's 57 million citizens, and plastic is used for only 1% of all transactions.  In Spain, seven million credit cards are in circulation; in France and Britain, 20 million each; and in the U.S., 220 million.  But, with exchange controls to be dropped next year and Italians getting richer, the numbers are growing.  "Italian banks are beginning to realize that consumer credit of all kinds can be a cash cow," says Maurizio Mussati, financial services consultant for Booz-Allen Italia.  Spurred on by competition from foreign rivals like Citibank, Italian banks are starting to promote credit cards and other consumer services.  The potential for growth is there, agrees Patrick Frazer, director of research at the Lafferty Group, a London firm that follows the credit-card industry.  But he adds that American Express is hardly assured of success.  American Express charges a higher fee than other cards, he says, and "they have a bad reputation as a slow payer" to businesses.  Credit-card companies are cagey about disclosing their commissions, but American Express's range of fees doesn't go much higher than 6%, says Ms. di Montezemolo, the spokeswoman.  She says a small leather-goods shop would pay a higher commission than a big hotel or an airline doing a large volume of business.  But she scoffs at the Milan restaurateur's 15% estimate as far off base.  Analysts and banking sources say most other cards charge 2% to 4%.  Visa's Italian franchise is owned by Banca d'America & d'Italia, a unit of Deutsche Bank AG. Shopkeepers who accept Visa can take their credit vouchers to one of BAI's more than 100 branches, most of which are in large and medium-sized cities in northern and central Italy, and have the money transferred to their accounts immediately (which in Italy takes three or four days).  American Express lacks a bank network and therefore requires shopkeepers to mail their vouchers to Rome headquarters for processing.  In inefficient Italy, that adds an average of eight business days -- each way -- to the payment system.  But that is expected to change soon, because BAI has agreed to start paying American Express vouchers at its branches as well.  Visa's bank-linked payments and lower fees made it Italy's most widely distributed credit card until recently.  In 1986, a consortium of Italian banks launched Carta Si, a credit card that now claims 32.4% of the market, compared with Visa's 27.2% and American Express's 17.8%.  Carta Si is offered by 500 Italian banks, and some 1.2 million Italians have it.  That compares with 1.1 million who hold Visa, 500,000 with American Express and 150,000 with Diner's Club, banking sources say.  American Express likes to say that its cardholders are bigger spenders than holders of Visa or bank cards.  American Express cards have higher credit limits and are often provided by the cardholders' employers for business expenses.  Part of the reason for American Express's limited acceptance in Italy reflects the way the retail market works, analysts say.  In Italy, supermarket, hotel and department-store chains are still underdeveloped.  Most purchases are in small, family-owned shops.  These are the least likely to accept credit cards -- they prefer to bargain with individual clients, for cash.  Italy's few big chains, such as the department store La Rinascente, owned by Fiat S.p.A., don't create problems when confronted with an American Express card.  Nor, for the most part, do fancy shops, although a Milan boutique called Carducci 38 notes that during sales it reduces its discount for those paying with plastic to 35% from the customary 40%.  Most other such shops either insist on cash or make credit card users pay full price.  And at places like China Town, an inexpensive Chinese restaurant in Rome, it's more than likely that the waiter will return with a client's credit card, politely saying, "We ran out of charge forms for American Express.  Don't you have another credit card -- Visa?  Mastercard?  Carta Si?"  Atlantic Richfield Co., the big West Coast gasoline marketer, is gambling that it can get the lead out and still compete for the 20% of motorists in its selling area who drive older automobiles.  Arco, which caters to price-conscious buyers in five Western states, has notified its Southern California dealers that it will dump its leaded regular gasoline effective Sept. 1 and begin promoting a middle-octane, medium-priced unleaded fuel.  In other parts of the country, gasoline companies have already de-emphasized or dropped leaded fuel in favor of three unleaded grades -- a pricey high-octane premium, a midgrade and regular.  But in the West, regular with lead added remains popular because of a sizable population of pre-1975 cars.  Leaded gasoline can't be used in later models because it fouls pollution control gear.  Right now, of the leading West Coast marketers, only Unocal Corp. does without a leaded grade in favor of a midgrade unleaded gasoline.  Arco officials in Los Angeles wouldn't discuss their plans but acknowledged the coming switch.  "We are dropping our leaded gas in Southern California," said Ed Reilly, senior vice president, marketing.  "I think everybody knows it's just a first step" to switching throughout its market.  Though Arco won't describe the chemical properties of its new unleaded gasoline, it has hinted to some distributors that it will be promoted to customers who now fill up with leaded as well as to owners of newer models.  While there is disagreement, many owners of pre-1975 cars believe lead additives provide necessary lubrication to engine valves that newer cars don't need.  So, even though unleaded premium gasoline can often meet the higher octane requirements of many older cars, demand for leaded has remained healthy longer than most industry officials expected.  For Arco, the decision to drop leaded and add a new unleaded grade is a calculated risk.  The West Coast market is large and fast-growing.  California alone accounts for 11% of all U.S. gasoline sales, and in the past four years the state's overall gasoline demand has increased at almost twice the national rate.  Arco competes with other major marketers by having the cheapest gas on the block.  And its leaded gasoline, usually its price leader, makes up a larger portion of its sales than it does at other companies.  In Los Angeles, 17.4% of Arco's business is leaded gasoline, while at Chevron Corp. the share is only 12.4% and at Shell Oil Co. it's 12.8%.  The company is apparently betting that it can continue to attract older-car owners with a new unleaded with adequate octane and moderate price, and at the same time undercut its rivals in the unleaded premium market.  Arco dealers are expecting an 88-octane midgrade unleaded, very close to the rating of leaded regular and also suitable for many of the West Coast newer cars now using unleaded premium.  The midgrade could be as much as a dime a gallon cheaper than these premiums, offering a money-saving choice these buyers now don't have.  Outside of the West, such buying-down has been going on with a vengeance in the wake of the spring's sharp run-up in all gasoline prices.  Arco also tries to undercut its competitors with a premium unleaded at 91 octane, slightly below the rating -- and price -- of many other major brands.  "This is similar to when Arco dropped its credit card in 1982," said McDonald J. Beavers, president of Whitney Leigh Corp., a Tulsa gasoline industry survey firm.  "They're going to turn their backs somewhat on regular leaded customers and lose some of that, but they feel they can more than make up for it."  Eastern Airlines' lawyers are seeking almost $6 million for their work during the first four months of Eastern's reorganization, according to fee applications filed in U.S. Bankruptcy Court in New York.  Separate fee applications, totaling almost $1.7 million, were filed by the lawyers for Eastern's creditors committee and by the law firm of court-appointed examiner David I. Shapiro.  The applications detail the lawyers' charges for work between March 9, when Eastern sought protection from its creditors under Chapter 11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code, and June 30.  The law firms will file fee applications every three months until Eastern emerges from bankruptcy court with a plan of reorganization.  The fees, if approved by U.S. Bankruptcy Judge Burton R. Lifland, would come from Eastern's assets.  A hearing on the applications is scheduled for Sept. 5, and the judge has asked that any objections to the fees be filed by Aug. 29.  Objections to fees are "terribly infrequent" in bankruptcy cases, said Joel Zweibel, the attorney for Eastern's creditors committee.  "It's very rare that you can prove there's been a specific misrepresentation," he said.  "Basically, it's ye old honor system."  The largest fee application, totaling $3.8 million, was filed Tuesday by Weil, Gotshal & Manges, the New York law firm handling the reorganization of Eastern, a unit of Texas Air Corp.  Weil Gotshal has 80 to 85 lawyers working on the Eastern case for fees ranging from $70 to $375 an hour.  The Weil Gotshal team is led by Bruce R. Zirinsky, whose 1,156 hours of work are valued at $346,890, or $300 an hour, and Harvey Miller, who logged 804 hours of work at $375 an hour, for a total of $301,650.  The New York firm of Hughes Hubbard & Reed, which represented Eastern in the sale of its shuttle to New York developer Donald Trump, is seeking almost $800,000 in fees for its work.  Eastern's advisers on labor issues from the Washington, D.C., firm of Akin, Gump, Strauss, Hauer & Feld, are seeking about $1 million in fees.  David Boies, a partner at the New York firm of Cravath, Swaine & Moore who is advising Eastern and Texas Air, filed an application for $298,000 on behalf of his firm.  Mr. Boies, who did not total the hours he logged, charges $350 an hour.  Mr. Shapiro, the examiner appointed April 5 to oversee Eastern's reorganization and its previous asset sales, filed a request for $236,100 in fees, representing 787 hours of work at $300 an hour.  Fourteen other lawyers at Mr. Shapiro's law firm, Dickstein, Shapiro & Morin of Washington, are working on the Eastern case.  They requested a total of $507,698 for 3,469 hours of work.  Mr. Zweibel, the attorney for the creditors committee, is seeking fees totaling $241,500 for 644 hours of work, or $375 an hour, since March 23, when he was retained by the creditors committee.  Mr. Zweibel's law firm, Kramer, Levin, Nessen, Kamin & Frankel of New York, is seeking a total of $946,106 for the work of 36 lawyers, including Mr. Zweibel, and 13 legal assistants.  "Penises will not be exposed at the taxpayer's expense."  In the cool recesses of the Capitol, Sen. Jesse Helms has been hotly defending us all from "obscene and indecent" art.  He is riding high after his amendment cutting appropriations for the National Endowment for the Arts sailed through a nearly empty chamber on a voice vote.  Then the arts world noticed, and the din hasn't stopped.  Sen. Helms, never known for his passionate attachment to the art of his time, found a perfect target (and a perfect magnet for publicity) in two photographic exhibitions that had been partly funded with federal grants.  One included a shot of a crucifix supposedly submerged in the urine of the photographer, one Andres Serrano.  The other was a traveling show of tulips, celebrities and homosexual sado-masochistic practices photographed by the late Robert Mapplethorpe.  The fuss started when Washington's staid Corcoran Gallery of Art canceled the Mapplethorpe show.  The less-prestigious Washington Project for the Arts (WPA) defiantly picked up the exhibit, soon playing it to packed houses.  But by then, the stage was set for a full-scale war between the self-appointed yahoos and the self-appointed defenders of artistic freedom and the First Amendment.  "I knew we would regret the end of the Cold War," says New York's Sen. Daniel Patrick Moynihan.  By last week, so many positions had been taken and salvos fired that detachment or the long view was everywhere to be found.  "This reflects an attitude toward art that's been here for 200 years, that art is not part of the tradition of this country," says William Luers, president of New York's Metropolitan Museum of Art.  "My real concern is that this will result in more tax-policy changes {similar to the 1986 tax reforms that discouraged donations of art to institutions} that will further devastate museums."  "Oh, you have to recognize that this does happen periodically," agrees J. Carter Brown, director of Washington's National Gallery.  "We are saddled with a Philistine heritage, but I've been here 28 years and Congress has shown a great deal more tolerance.  So one is disappointed, but I see no great change of course."  Others see the beginning of the end -- or at least an ominous transmogrification -- of the NEA, which statistically has been on the side of the angels.  In its quarter century of federal philanthropy, some 85,000 grants have been awarded to individual artists and arts organizations, of which one-quarter of one-tenth of one percent has been considered controversial.  But now Rep. Sidney Yates, Congress's staunchest champion of the arts and a masterful boll weevil, has begun to buckle, carving up parts of the heretofore sacrosanct $170 million endowment.  A $45,000 slap-on-the-wrist cut in NEA funding and some potentially meaningless changes in sub-granting procedures have already passed the House version of the endowment's appropriations bill.  "I thought this was a way of allowing {Congress} to vote its concern without crippling the NEA," explains Mr. Yates.  "Bull," says Sen. Helms.  When Congress reconvenes next month, Rep. Yates must do battle with the Helms forces (headed by Sen. Robert Byrd) in the closed-door conference committee.  In addition to Mr. Helms's amendment -- which also seeks to deny federal funding to any artist whose work "denigrates, debases or reviles a person, group or class of citizens on the base of race, creed, sex, handicap, age or national origin" -- other Senate-sponsored riders would cut overall endowment funding by $1.2 million below the House appropriations; would specifically punish the visual arts program (which, ironically, had no part in either exhibit) with a $400,000 cut; and most punitively, would slap a five-year ban on any federal funding to Philadelphia's Institute of Contemporary Art (which originated the Mapplethorpe show) and the Southeastern Center for Contemporary Art (which awarded Mr. Serrano his $15,000 grant).  The Senate has also proposed a $100,000 research grant for an inquiry into the current endowment funding procedures -- the peer panel review system.  Sen. Helms seems to have no second thoughts about all this.  Drawing deeply on a Lucky Strike, he says: "We never had a problems with {the NEA} until an acknowledged homosexual who died of AIDS -- and I'm sorry he did -- came along with a series of photographs designed to promote homosexuality.  There I draw the line."  It is a line that many Beltway Cassandras say may divide lawmakers in "the smut and obscenity vote of the year," a line running through an exceptionally tricky political quagmire, in which the basic aesthetic issues tend to sink below the surface.  "It is difficult for any congressman to stand on the floor of Congress and go against this because the RNC {Republican National Committee} has made it a partisan issue," explains one Washington art lobbyist.  "Every congressman is thinking how the ad will play at home."  Under Lee Atwater's take-no-prisoners chairmanship, the RNC has been busy faxing and mailing press releases reading "{your} Congressmen voted to continue the NEA's practice of using their District's taxpayers' hard-earned money to underwrite this kind of . . . taxpayer-financed obscenity."  As one museum director, who asked not to be identified, says, "This is nothing more than a delicious windfall for the Religious Right."  Indeed, this latest shouting match about free speech, First Amendment rights and taxpayer-financed pornography comes at a time when the "vox populi" is raised in a full-throated roar.  The Rev. Donald Wildmon of Tupelo, Miss., first raised a fuss about Martin Scorsese's "The Last Temptation of Christ."  Then he brought PepsiCo to its knees over Madonna's sexy, crucifix-dangling video.  Meanwhile, citizeness Terry Rakolta trapped Fox Television into tempering its "Married . . .  With Children."  The Supreme Court stoked the fire with its decision protecting flag burning.  Now, Rev. Wildmon has taken up the Serrano picture as his "cause celebre".  His letter-writing campaign is said to have hit six figures.  Washington seems particularly vulnerable to this kind of pressure when the indecorous happens in its own backyard.  Earlier this year, the Kennedy Center refused to stage "Mastergate," Larry Gelbart's Broadway-bound Iran/Contra satire, on the grounds that the Center was "too dependent on the government."  Certainly the Corcoran, an endowmentless private museum whose stock in trade is 19th-century American landscapes and whose board of trustees tends toward "the spineless" as one Washington lobbyist put it, was unprepared to take the anti-Mapplethorpe heat.  Although Corcoran director Christina Orr-Cahall denies she caved in to congressional pressure, she has admitted there are "always practical concerns."  Like a handful of other D.C. arts organizations, the Corcoran receives its NEA funding as well as the equivalent of its state funding directly from Congress through the National Capital Arts and Cultural Affairs program of the Fine Arts Commission.  Meanwhile, this town snoozes through the August recess, waiting for the post-Labor Day conference committee to start pumping vitriol again.  One olive branch that has appeared: Sen. Claiborne Pell, chairman of the Senate endowment reauthorizing committee that meets next year, has insisted he is "reluctant to take further steps to alter" the NEA's existing procedures.  The smart money here is on some sort of back-room compromise involving a token slap -- financial and procedural -- at the NEA.  Some even predict that the five-year funding ban, which is probably unconstitutional, will be allowed to stand, thereby making it a legal rather than a political hot potato.  But even if the NEA suffers nothing more than short-term cutbacks and procedural changes, others expect the oft-mentioned chilling effect to settle on the art world.  Already several artists are refusing to show at the Corcoran.  The Illinois state legislature has punished the School of the Art Institute of Chicago (which mounted the controversial "What Is the Proper Way to Display a U.S. Flag?" exhibit that had veterans and state senators in a don't-tread-on-me uproar earlier this year) by reducing the school's state subsidy from $65,000 to $1.  Meanwhile, the price of Mapplethorpe photographs has reportedly zoomed.  If Sen. Helms stays the course, Mr. Serrano may even find someone to buy his crucifix.  --- Ms. de Vries is a free-lance arts writer based in Boston.  We've often argued that Washington has lost touch with the rest of America.  A pair of recent market surveys compared Washington's tastes and incomes with the rest of the country's and the results are in: The Beltway really is different.  Now, it is true enough that no one has ever suggested that the citizens of the Beltway would have qualified as an audience for Morton Downey Jr. Still, the market researchers have discovered that the average Washingtonian is much less likely than the rest of America to watch cable TV, sew, read the Bible, play with the grandkids, drive a motorcycle or recreation vehicle, hunt, fish, shoot, camp or tinker with the Chevy.  They claim to like the outdoors about as much as the rest of us, so long as they don't have to shoot or hook anything.  According to the survey by National Demographics and Lifestyles, a research outfit based in Denver, the average resident of the Washington metropolitan area has more elegant interests.  They are far more likely than other Americans to sip Chardonnay, jog, play tennis, attend the theater, travel abroad, cook gourmet meals and watch the Sunday "public affairs" shows, the ones whose advertisers pitch commercials to an audience thought receptive to the joys of subsidized ethanol.  The Beltway's rich and famous like to do this, we should add, only when they're not dabbling in real estate or engaging in "career-oriented activities," two other of their "top 10 life styles."  It will surprise no one that Washingtonians don't much like to bowl.  Even Los Angeles, long thought to contain most of the nation's upscale oddballs, is closer to the rest of the country in virtually all of the more mainstream activities than is Washington.  We seem to recall many Beltway complaints about Reaganism and budget "austerity," but it turns out that the 1980s were boom years for the capital area.  Indeed, a second survey reveals that much of the divide separating the Beltway from America is rooted in class.  Washingtonians are simply richer than the rest of the country.  Back in 1980, the area's after-tax household income was less than $30,000, only about 32% above the national norm.  Washington's average after-tax household income last year was $48,038, 48% above the national average and 18% higher than the average for the nine largest markets.  In fact, according to the annual "Survey of Buying Power" compiled by Market Statistics of New York, the nation's capital has become the second-richest big metropolitan market in the U.S. (after Long Island).  The survey reveals, for instance, that Washington last year jumped to first from third among major markets in retail spending, with the average household spending $22,917, according to the Washington Post.  This all throws new light on the recent Washington talk about "greed."  Taxpayers, incidentally, will not be surprised to learn that much of this spending was done by credit card.  What emerges overall from the data is a portrait of an elite culture, a sort of American royal court divorced from common tastes.  This explains why the city is periodically surprised when it is swept by shock waves of public opinion from the hinterlands -- whether to cut taxes or reject a government pay raise.  It also explains why Members of Congress who come to Washington bent on representing the home folks go native.  The local vapors are intoxicating; the boulevards are tree-lined; the restaurants serve gourmet food; the life style is good.  Why rock the boat?  As Hemingway might have said, Washington's rich really are different.  They have more of our money.  H.O. Woltz III, previously president of the Rappahannock Wire Co. unit, was named president and chief operating officer of this wire maker, succeeding Howard O. Woltz Jr., who remains chairman and chief executive officer.  The crack epidemic has just about silenced liberal opposition to tough law-and-order policies.  It is obviously ridiculous to talk about "rehabilitating" an Uzi-toting drug pusher who makes $5,000 a week.  His problem is not lack of self-esteem.  There is nothing a social worker is going to be able to do for him, especially since the social worker is too afraid to venture into his neighborhood.  So William Bennett's tough national drug strategy is getting a lot of initial support.  The plan utilizes treatment and education programs, the remaining "soft" approaches, but it relies primarily on street-level busts and imprisonment.  It will be interesting to see how long liberal support for the strategy lasts.  While it is easy in the abstract to be tough on drugs, some of Mr. Bennett's supporters eventually may find it's tough to be tough on drugs.  It may prove hard, for instance, for them to toughen up the nation's criminal-justice system.  The Bennett report notes that in 1987, a person arrested in New York City for a drug-related felony faced a 50% chance of being indicted, a 38% chance of being convicted and -- the bottom line -- a mere 15% chance of serving time in prison.  In other words, the overwhelming percentage of those arrested are on the street and smirking within days.  The Bennett plan advocates more prosecutors and jail cells.  But among the bottlenecks that remain are myriad procedural rules that purport to ensure a defendant's rights.  Court proceduralism, however, is often just another of the dealers' weapons.  If pushers are going to be faced with a serious deterrent, the rules will have to be refashioned to make convicting these criminals more likely.  Incarceration no doubt also means jailing a disproportionate number of minority youth.  Already, drug enforcement rubs up against raw racial sensitivities.  It's not going to be easy to hold the line on enforcement when charges of racism start flying.  We suspect, though, that most of the residents of inner-city neighborhoods being destroyed by drugs would support Mr. Bennett's tough line.  It may prove even harder to get tough with abusers of the nation's welfare system.  The system is designed to be soft, nurturing and inclusive.  If it is to become involved in a war on drugs, as it must, part of it must become punitive.  For example, the Bennett strategy calls for cleaning dealers out of public-housing projects.  That means evicting the dealers, and sometimes their families.  Again, adept use of the court system makes that difficult; when authorities try to evict dealers, legal-services organizations file motions that block or delay the process.  There will be howls if stories begin to appear about how a drug dealer's crimes have caused his family to be swept out onto the sidewalk.  The Bennett strategy also would give judges the power to withdraw federal benefits from convicted drug offenders.  But what happens when a single mother who is a pusher gets her checks cut off?  That might set a useful example, but the welfare advocates will scream -- and then file a lawsuit.  Similarly, it's very tough to expel drug dealers from a school system, as the plan recommends.  In Anne Arundel County, Md., such expulsions have reduced drug offenses within the school by 60%.  But expulsion is still a policy that is reviled by the education establishment.  It's not going to be easy to be a cop under the Bennett plan.  Police forces tend to like spending their money on computers and cruisers.  Police brass like telegenic arrests of Mr. Big, who generally is replaced in the organization by another Mr. Big.  The Bennett plan calls for cops on foot, making exhausting, unglamorous, retail-level arrests.  That means more spending on police and much tougher work.  All this is not to say that the Bennett plan will fail.  On the contrary, it is a superb integration of the best available thinking on drug issues. (Distilling the best ideas around a public-policy issue is a particular talent of Mr. Bennett's, the former Secretary of Education.) Moreover, it is the nation's only coordinated drug policy, in contrast with the failed hodgepodge that now exists.  If there is resolve to seriously reduce drug use, this is the way to go.  In short, fighting drugs isn't a dainty job.  It will be hard, messy work and it will come with a price.  Some people, notably those liberals who file lawsuits to block anything they don't like, may believe the costs are too high.  Others will argue, not altogether implausibly, that it's worth tolerating today's cycle of drug use to preserve current understanding of civil liberties.  Some moderates, afraid of confronting the welfare establishment, may run for cover when the accusations start to fly.  On the other hand, the American people overwhelmingly think that this is a war worth waging.  Some of the folks enlisting in Mr. Bennett's war, however, better decide now whether they're going to see it through, or whether they're going to surrender at the first sign of a real battle.  If you think a visit to the Mission of San Juan Capistrano affords a respite from our litigious society, think again.  With the price of admission, one receives a warning: "The person using this ticket assumes all risk of personal injury and loss of property.  Management reserves the right to revoke the license granted by this ticket. 'Vaya con Dios.'" And heaven help us.  In your July 5 editorial "Policy and Law" you contradict statements made on your front page of the same issue.  According to your editorial, "Even if Roe v.  Wade is overturned outright, the most that will happen is that to get an abortion some women in certain places will have to cross state lines."  On page one, the story "Turning Point?" states, "the chief effect of the landmark Supreme Court decision upholding Missouri's restrictive abortion law will be to widen the disparity in access to abortion between rich and poor. . . .  for the young, the poor and those in rural areas, abortion will become more difficult to find and, for some, all but impossible."  You further feel that "the pro-choice reaction . . . is sheer hysteria," implying the response is both unwarranted and emotionally based, but in yet another story in the same issue it's reported that the now-defensive pro-choice coalition faces a "battleground" with "only nine states where both houses of the legislature favor keeping abortion legal, and in six of them the margins are narrow.  Moreover, in about half the states both houses of the legislature favor making abortion illegal."  Are you questioning the integrity of your journalists here?  Or do these careless statements reflect the real feelings behind the statement of support for "Roe v.  Wade in terms of social policy"?  Cynthia A. Kater  Raleigh, N.C.  ---  I know exactly when my life began: The moment my mother's egg was fertilized by my father's sperm, creating a combination of all the things necessary to produce a unique, never to be duplicated human: me.  From that moment, had anyone killed me, in or out of the womb, I would not now exist.  As far as my death is concerned, the only difference would be in the timing.  Of course, there was no freedom of choice for me as to whether I should be aborted or allowed to live.  Had there been, I would not have chosen to be aborted.  Would you?  George L. Worsdall  Brunswick, Ohio  ---  You correctly show that in the Common Law, abortion before "quickening" or ensoulment was not considered the taking of life.  That historical view is also the position with which the American people generally still agree.  Moreover, as the Alan Guttmacher Institute shows, more than 90% of abortions occur within the first 12 weeks -- within the first trimester as Roe v.  Wade and Webster v.  Reproductive Health Services Inc. provide -- so that women to whom the right is most important are exercising that right consistent with the same respect for the sanctity of spiritual being (as distinguished from merely physical existence).  Your editorial is well ahead of this public-policy matter as the Supreme Court this fall takes up the next three related cases.  But the American Bar Association and the legislatures of 42 states are ahead of both your editorial and the conservative Supreme Court by about 15 years.  George Barbary  Dallas  ---  Surely you're not suggesting a fertilized ovum is as likely to develop into a frog, a plant, an amoeba or maybe a virus (your words) as it is into a human.  Of course it's a human being.  What else could it be?  Your supercilious reference to the magic moment when life begins is uncalled for.  It is indeed a magical, awesome, sacred moment and it occurs, oddly enough, at the beginning.  Do you seriously mean to suggest it occurs at some other time, perhaps at the stroke of the first midnight following the end of the first trimester?  Equally amusing (were it not so sad) is your endorsement of the quaint notion of "quickening."  How hard must the child kick before you will acknowledge his or her right to life and limb?  Rev. Jerome McHugh  White Plains, N.Y.  ---  Anti-abortionists are gloating over the court's decision.  They used to promote themselves as "pro-life" -- their new slogan is "Stop Baby Killing."  If they were sincerely concerned about the welfare of America's children, they would campaign against the homelessness, hunger and abuse that so many children suffer.  Why aren't they speaking out about the lack of medical care for poor children?  George Orwell described the phenomenon in the novel "1984": If a government can control a people's sexual energy, it can control the population completely.  Bruce Joffe  Piedmont, Calif.  ---  I've noticed some ironies that make the pro-lifers' stand seem hypocritical:  1) A significant number of the pro-life people are also against birth control.  Proper advice and timely help on birth control can prevent the need for most abortions, making this emotional issue largely moot.  2) If life is beautiful and every fetus has a right to live no matter the circumstances under which it will be born, why are the pro-life people abandoning these fetuses once they're born?  How many of them are active in facilitating adoptions?  How many have adopted unwanted children, especially black, Hispanic or handicapped?  3) And, in a plot right out of an absurdist play, a significant number of pro-life people are also conservative "law and order" people who favor the death penalty.  What happened to the sanctity of life?  Girish V. Nadkarni  Chatham, N.J.  ---  You don't need religious terms to define life.  Common sense will do.  Science gives us dramatic pictures of the live baby growing in the mother.  If you don't start life at conception, then when?  The day of birth?  Three months before?  Six months?  When?  Without conception, no baby.  Conception starts the baby.  Conception starts life.  Jack Dunn  Los Angeles  ---  To imply that it is morally permissible to terminate (pre-human? nonhuman? subhuman?) life before some nebulous date when it may become human is absurd.  Whatever that "indeterminate" form of life may be, we know it never develops into a crocodile or a virus.  Unless arbitrarily snuffed out, it is invariably a human.  Why?  Because it was one to begin with.  Charles W. McCollester  South Bend, Ind.  In the spring of 1940, a year before Germany invaded the Soviet Union, 4,143 Polish officers interned by the Russians were taken to a secret-police preserve in the Katyn forest a few miles from here and murdered.  But try telling that to Intourist.  Russian guilt for the Katyn massacre has been considered a hard fact in the West for decades.  A Western bibliography on it includes 496 items.  The Poles are sure they know who did it, too, and are no longer afraid to say so.  But in the 46 years since the crime was uncovered, the Russians haven't changed their official line.  They blame Katyn on the Nazis.  Back when official lines stayed put, Intourist guides had it easy.  With epic propaganda and torrents of statistics, they glibly praised the Soviet Union's eternal progress.  A place like Katyn, where Stalin may have proved himself no better than Hitler, wasn't on anybody's itinerary.  But the Russians now seem on the brink of owning up to the Katyn atrocity.  It is an awkward situation, guaranteed to discomfort a Communist state tourism monopoly.  And it gives one tourist a chance to watch Soviet officials grope along the shifting frontier between the new candor and the old lies.  "Katyn?" says the ample blonde behind the Intourist counter in Moscow.  "There is no Katyn near Smolensk.  It is near Minsk."  All right, since she says so, we go to Minsk.  In the hotel there, the smart young woman at the Intourist desk says she does know all about the Katyn near Smolensk, 175 miles away.  "Thousands of Polish officers were murdered."  By whom?  She smiles and bites her pen.  "I can't imagine," she says, and books a guide for the tourists' Khatyn -- with an "h" -- near Minsk.  Khatyn was once the name of a village on the road to Vitebsk.  It had 149 inhabitants.  In 1943, Nazi troops slaughtered all but one.  An achingly soulful memorial now occupies the spot where Khatyn once stood, a symbolic cemetery for 186 other villages of the region the Nazis wiped out, too.  The memorial, built in 1969, has since been visited by 26 million people.  Dozens of buses are in the parking lot as the Intourist car pulls up with guide Elena Bogdanova and her passenger.  "Very many people come to see this place," she says.  "They feel it is their moral duty."  Replicas of burned -- out cottages spread over a grassy slope, bells clanging in their chimney tops.  Russians on tour file past by the hundreds, women with hankies out, dabbing away tears.  Mrs. Bogdanova lingers at an inscription on a wall: "Nothing is forgotten," she translates.  "No one is forgotten."  Yet some Westerners and Western guidebooks have wondered whether the memorial at Khatyn was built to blur the shameful memory of what happened at Katyn, that other place with a similar name.  Some get the places mixed up.  Mrs. Bogdanova has had it happen on her tours.  "They think this is a place where Soviets killed Poles]" she says.  "But they are talking about the Katyn near Smolensk, where the Nazis killed prisoners and later on blamed it on the Soviets.  I believe what I was told.  I cannot see how that could be done by the Soviet army.  No.  That's too much."  For Poles, a 49-year deception is too much.  Those who died at Katyn, and 11,000 others who vanished, were more than officers.  They were considered the elite, the intelligentsia, men who might have led Poland away from the Soviet camp after the war.  The Soviets entered eastern Poland and took them prisoner in 1939, when Hitler and Stalin were still buddies.  In the spring of '40, they stopped writing home.  Three years later, radio Berlin announced that Nazi troops in occupied Russia had unearthed mass graves in Katyn forest.  With German approval, the Polish Red Cross investigated, and concluded that the graves predated the German invasion.  Nazi propaganda blamed the NKVD, predecessor of the KGB.  The Soviets, denying it, broke relations with the Polish government exiled in London.  At the Nuremberg trials, a Soviet charge against the Nazis for the crime at Katyn quietly lapsed.  In the early 1950s, an American Congressional examination again found the Russians guilty.  And there the matter lay -- a closed case in the West, a painful taboo in the East -- until glasnost came along.  Then Mikhail Gorbachev and Wojciech Jaruzelski decided to clear the air.  Two years ago, they commissioned a panel of historians to fill in the "blank spots" of the Soviet-Polish past.  Katyn led the agenda for the panel's Poles, but the Soviet side balked.  Dredging up Katyn, said one of its members, would only "foment anti-Soviet sentiment in the Polish public."  By last February, the Poles tired of waiting.  They went ahead and published their old Red Cross report in a state magazine, and their side of the panel told the Communist Party newspaper that Katyn was the work of the NKVD.  The livelier Soviet press added its weight in June with a detailed, though neutral, account of the crime in Moscow News.  Now it looks as if the commission may finally face the music at its next meeting, in September.  In the interim, this summer, it falls to Igor Semionenkov of the Intourist office in Smolensk to give a guided tour of the Katyn forest, and to describe what happened there -- and when.  "I will die before I say we are to blame," says his boss, a woman of the old school.  Mr. Semionenkov stays quiet.  A man of 37 who doesn't dress too neatly, he is one guide who knows the official line, but also reads Moscow News.  "Please pay attention; over there are two churches of the 12th century," he says, guiding reflexively on the road out of Smolensk.  The car pulls into a small roadside parking lot.  Across the way, a fresh asphalt path leads into a forest of birch and pine, cordoned off by high, spiked fences.  Westerners say this is a KGB preserve.  A shot rings out from deep in the woods.  "Hunters," says the guide.  The path ends at a flight of stone steps above four grassy beds.  The graves.  Past them is a black-marble wall, inscribed in Polish and Russian: "To victims of fascism.  Polish officers, shot down by Hitlerites in 1941."  And behind the wall, stands a wooden cross, erected last fall by Poland's Roman Catholic Church.  Mr. Semionenkov sits on the steps and tells his Katyn story:  "According to the German version, Stalin wanted to get rid of these Poles.  You can understand quite well that it was very bad to have such an army in the depths of Russia.  Stalin was afraid.  And that is why, according to this version, Russians killed, in this very place, all these officers."  The guide looks down and pulls at his socks.  "Later," he says, "when the Russians liberated Smolensk, a new commission found German bullets in the skulls of the officers.  And the method by which they where shot, in the backs of the heads, was a German method.  And they found German weapons.  That is why the Russians said it was done by the Nazis, in 1941.  And that is everything I know."  Walking back, the guide, responds to a personal question: Who does he think did it?  "For me, it's hard to understand how Russians could do such a thing," he says.  "Of course, Stalin could have been afraid.  That would not justify it.  Not at all.  But it might be so.  They say the truth will be given.  I am free to tell the truth.  If I know it."  But on the next afternoon, Mr. Semionenkov conducts a tour to Katyn for a busload of tourists who believe they know the truth already.  They are history teachers, from the town of Sieradz, in Poland.  The guide, who speaks Polish too, sits in the back of the bus, keeping to himself.  Groups like this began visiting Katyn last fall.  All summer, three or four have come every week.  They aren't about to endure any spiel from Intourist about historical uncertainties.  "Hitler and Stalin were friends," says an old man, turning in his seat to face Mr. Semionenkov.  Another walks to the back of the bus.  "The Polish people knew it long ago.  It was the Russians."  Mr. Semionenkov smiles.  "There is no true evidence."  "This is history]" insists a third man.  "There are no two ways.  Everybody knows]"  "They are of their opinion," the guide mumbles.  The bus arrives.  Mr. Semionenkov follows as the tourists walk to the grave site.  He stands quietly as a priest among them prepares an altar on the same marble wall dedicated to the "victims of fascism."  As the priest delivers his homily, the sun moves through the tall pines.  Sunlight glints off the black marble, and reveals a word, scrawled in candle wax, alongside the carved inscription.  "This I have never seen before," the man from Intourist whispers.  "It is really there."  In Russian letters, someone has written: "STALIN."  UDC-UNIVERSAL DEVELOPMENT L.P., Tempe, Ariz., began a $50 million public offering of newly created Series B preferred stock at $25 a share.  The Series B preferred stock provides for quarterly dividends of 91 cents a share, increasing to 94 cents for quarters beginning after Sept. 30, 1994, and to $1 after Sept. 30, 1999.  UDC, which builds residential communities, began an offer July 19 to repurchase up to two million of its 9.4 million common shares outstanding at $27.50 a share.  Conditions for the purchase included successful completion of the Series B offering, which is scheduled to close before the company's tender offer expires Aug. 18.  The Illinois Commerce Commission signaled its intent to force Commonwealth Edison Co. to refund about $200 million to customers for overspending on the utility's Byron 1 nuclear plant.  Commonwealth Edison said such an order, if upheld in court, would cut 1989 earnings by about $1.40 a share.  Last year the utility earned $737.5 million, or $3.01 a share.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Commonwealth Edison shares closed at $37.50, down 62.5 cents.  The Illinois regulators directed a hearing examiner to prepare a formal order saying Commonwealth Edison overspent by $189.6 million on the $2.5 billion plant, completed in 1985.  In a 1985 ruling, the commission disallowed an additional $101 million of Byron 1 construction expenses.  The seven-member panel is expected to vote on the latest proposed disallowance soon.  The commission's action pleased neither side in the long-running battle over the Byron 1 plant.  Both the utility and consumer advocates said they planned to seek a new hearing from the commission and pledged to appeal the decision in court if necessary.  A Commonwealth Edison spokesman called the proposed disallowance "excessive and unfair" and said, "We think we've built a very efficient and low-cost nuclear plant."  Howard Learner, associate general counsel for Business & Professional People for the Public Interest, a consumer-advocacy law firm that has challenged the cost of Byron 1, said consumers were "entitled to a substantially larger refund than this."  The controversy centers on a study last year by Arthur Young & Co., which was hired by the commission to audit Commonwealth Edison's Byron 1 expenses.  The auditors criticized Commonwealth Edison for failing to control adequately Byron 1's construction costs and found that the plant took 16 months too long to complete, raising its cost by $409 million.  But the auditors also found that Edison customers benefited by the delay because the utility saved money on such related items as coal contracts for plants that Byron 1 would have replaced.  Such savings, the auditors estimated, reduced the overrun to between $133 million and $169 million.  Utility critics say Commonwealth Edison should pay for most of the $409 million overrun, while the company contends it shouldn't pay any extra charge.  The commission's apparent willingness to compromise between those two positions could have considerable impact on the cases of three other Commonwealth Edison nuclear plants that will be decided next year.  Stephen Moore, who heads the Illinois Public Counsel's Office, the state's consumer agency, said Commonwealth Edison could end up losing hundreds of millions of dollars in customer revenue if the commission takes a similar compromise position on the three other nuclear plants.  Pier 1 Imports Inc., a specialty retailer, said its July sales rose 24% to $39.8 million from $32 million a year earlier.  The company said sales rose 5% at stores open for more than a year.  Grant Street National Bank (in Liquidation) said it is speeding up liquidation of its real-estate assets because of the likelihood of further weakening in some real-estate markets.  The bank, which was set up in 1988 to hold low-quality loans of Mellon National Bank when that bank went through a restructuring, reduced the expected cumulative cash flow forecast by $275 million, mainly to reflect expected lower realizations from real estate assets.  However, because the cash will be obtained more quickly, thus reducing interest costs, the bank said it wasn't necessary to reduce the value of its portfolio.  Shareholder equity at June 30 was $39.7 million, Grant Street said, after declining $16.1 million in the second quarter.  While second-quarter collections on assets of $114.9 million exceeded the original cost basis of assets liquidated, collections didn't cover financing costs, expenses and other items.  "We have shifted our strategy in the direction of more rapid liquidation because of continued very soft conditions in several real-estate markets where we have exposure," said William B. Eagleson Jr., chairman, president and chief executive officer.  Also, he said, "We are becoming more concerned about the effect of S&L problems on real-estate values in the years ahead."  With the federal government liquidating troubled savings and loan institutions, there may be enough real estate dumped on the market to depress prices, Grant Street officials explained.  Grant Street has a number of office buildings and other commercial properties in Arizona, Colorado, Texas and Louisiana that could be affected by thrift liquidations, officials said.  The bank also has residential land and other property awaiting development, as well as loans secured by real estate.  Sports-Drink Makers  Out to Tackle Gatorade  ROOKIE sports-drink makers are trying to muscle in on the thirst-quenching business -- a market dominated by Gatorade for more than 20 years.  PowerBurst Corp. boasts that its new PowerBurst drink is sweetened with fructose, which the company says provides sustained energy, rather than the short-term energy spike provided by the sweeteners in Gatorade.  To woo weight-conscious consumers, White Rock Products Corp. has introduced Workout Light, a reduced-calorie sports drink.  Then there's Sports Beverage Inc.'s Pro Motion, which claims it has less sodium and more potassium than Gatorade.  The fast-growing $325 million sports-drink market is ripe for competition, says Tom Pirko, president of Bevmark Inc., a Los Angeles beverage-consulting firm.  "Gatorade has become a mature brand and that makes it vulnerable to upstarts."  But Quaker Oats Co.'s Gatorade may be getting a second wind.  Long pitched as a drink for sports enthusiasts, Gatorade is now trying to win over moms with daytime television ads.  And print ads for Gatorade are running in such unlikely magazines as GQ and Better Homes and Gardens.  Gatorade had been "viewed almost exclusively as a sports drink," says Ron Bottrell, a Quaker spokesman.  "Now, people who may not consider themselves to be athletes are drinking it when they mow the lawn."  Newcomers may find Gatorade's growth tough to match; sales have risen 30% annually for the past five years due mainly to the introduction of new flavors and package sizes.  Several competitors have already dropped out of the race, including Coca-Cola Co.'s Max, which never made it out of the test market.  Sports-drink contenders also will have to compete against the growing number of bottled waters.  "People who exercise want to drink something pure and clean," says Mr. Pirko.  Some "have the impression things like Gatorade are all junked up."  Hotel Ads Criticized  As Short-Sighted  RESIDENCE INN is getting more attention than it bargained for with a new advertising campaign.  The hotel chain ran an ad that featured 12 pairs of men's undershorts; 10 to represent the average stay at a Residence Inn and two to show the average stay at most other hotels.  "Most hotel ads feature a picture of the room," says Joe Okon, the chain's marketing communications director.  "We needed a message that stood out."  But reactions to the Marriott Corp. division's ads have been mixed.  Residence Inn received more than 30 complaints from women who said the ads were sexist and tasteless and showed that the chain doesn't care about female business travelers.  "You'd think they could have picked better symbols," complains Sarah Carlston, a publicist who wrote one of the letters.  "I wonder what they would have used if they were trying to reach women -- bras or panties?"  While Mr. Okon says the chain regrets offending anyone, it doesn't regret running the ads.  He says that during the campaign, calls to the reservations center rose 150% from a year earlier.  Foreign Visitors Crave  U.S. Cars, Sports Gear  FOREIGNERS' desire for U.S. goods is at an all-time high, according to Ogilvy & Mather.  But the ad agency says the most coveted items came as a bit of a surprise.  A study of 257 visitors from eight countries found that U.S. sporting goods, cars, stereo equipment and cosmetics top the list of products they want.  "We expected them to want some American pop kinds of things, like baseball memorabilia and jeans," says Frederick Elkind, vice president of Ogilvy & Mather's TrendSights division.  "They were more interested in areas where we're no longer considered to be competitive, such as home electronics."  Another surprise: Apple pie and hot dogs aren't the foods foreigners want most.  Juices, fruits and vegetables rank highest, Mr. Elkind says, partly because they're scarcer overseas.  Yellow Page Listings  Cater to Night Owls  FOR THOSE who find there aren't enough hours in the day, Pacific Bell believes it has a solution.  The Pacific Telesis Co. unit has started inserting extended-hours guides in 28 of its California yellow-page directories for businesses that stay open outside normal business hours.  But it's far from certain whether these directories will be a success.  Southwestern Bell Corp. dropped a 24-hour guide insert to its yellow pages two years ago because of a lack of advertiser interest.  Only 6% of Pacific Bell's advertisers are listed as extended-hours businesses.  But Pacific Bell says the number of advertisers is growing and that single working parents especially like the new guides.  Odds and Ends  AMERICANS ARE "brown bagging" less often than they did five years ago, according to a Campbell Soup Co. study.  However, some brown-bag items have increased in popularity, such as nacho and potato chips, grapes, tuna fish, yogurt and granola bars.  Foods that take longer to fix, namely salads and sandwiches, are less popular. . . .  Bic Corp. says sales of its new $5 perfume are off to a slow start.  "People think you have to spend a fortune to get a good perfume," says a Bic spokeswoman.  As the adoptive-parent representative on the Florida Adoption Advisory Council, I send fervent thanks for your July 7 editorial "The Adoption Option."  Too many children languish in foster care, first victimized by their natural parents and later by a complex system that overwhelms many caring caseworkers.  Too many pregnant teen-agers are urged to take the "easy way" and abort, convinced by twisted logic that it is kinder to abort than to bear the child and place it for adoption.  Too many strident "pro-choice" advocates shriek that these are "unwanted" babies who would clog up the welfare system if allowed to be born.  We adoptive parents know our children are not only wanted but are loved and cherished.  We know parents who adopt handicapped children and minority children.  Some of us drive indigent pregnant women to the doctor's office and some of us open our homes to them.  Some of us show the women how they can, in fact, be effective parents, because we also know that adoption is not the one answer for every women with a crisis pregnancy.  Christine Adamec  Palm Bay, Fla.  ---  Your editorial appears to be just a rehash of church dogma.  Who is feeding the hungry in the ghettos of the U.S., let alone the ghettos of other countries?  The church people are extremely concerned about unborn babies, and many do help the needy when they can.  But the supply of babies is overwhelming, and every day one sees the emaciating bodies of hungry children on TV, and in magazine and newspaper pictures.  So much suffering could be prevented if people had adequate sex education, and if contraceptives and abortions were implemented.  Only those who can afford children should procreate.  Why should the general public pay for the care of needy children when there is no control on their creation?  We should do what we can to prevent the birth of babies to improve the lot of the poor people.  Your comment on Jane Roe putting her child up for adoption was ill-advised.  She did so only because the courts forced her to carry her child to term.  ---  John DeArrieta Pine Mountain Club, Calif.  ---  The "Adoption Option" is a false one.  Hospitals don't have the capacity for the additional births.  Agencies don't have the funding or staffs to handle the added placements.  Only "certain types" of babies are good adoption risks.  Facilities for nonadopted children are already inadequate.  Also, under the agenda of the anti-choice movement, there will be absolutely nothing that the adoption option will be able to do for the women who wanted an abortion, couldn't have one and died from continuing the pregnancy.  Bruce L. Oliver  Rochester, N.Y.  ---  As one who was adopted as a three-month-old infant, I will be forever grateful that my birth preceded Roe v.  Wade, and that my natural mother was willing to consider the adoption option.  In our day of heated debates and polarization over abortion, adoption should be recognized more widely for the "win-win" solution it can provide.  David C. Huff  Lilburn, Ga.  EXPORTERS EXPECT overseas demand to help avoid recession this year.  Despite a surging dollar that makes pricey U.S. goods less competitive abroad, some manufacturers say exports remain strong.  "Exports are an important area that's holding up and growing faster than the economy as a whole," says Neal Soss, chief economist at First Boston Corp., New York.  He expects the rest of the year to resemble a "relay race" with export and capital spending passing the baton to domestic demand which may revive, thanks to declining interest rates.  Scientific Atlanta Inc., an Atlanta-based telecommunications concern, says export sales jumped to more than 20% of total sales from 14% last year.  "We already have six months booked in backlog," says William E. Johnson, chief executive.  "But we'll certainly be booking more because export has become such a significant factor for us."  Tandem Computers Inc., Cupertino, Calif., says exports soared 30% last year and expects continued growth.  Tandem notes it will have to adjust prices or "take a big hit" if the dynamic dollar keeps rising.  RAIN FOREST activists urge artists to avoid endangered tropical woods.  The San Francisco-based Rainforest Action Network calls for a boycott of all tropical hardwoods from Southeast Asia where some of the oldest rain forests on Earth are being scorched by development.  Sculptor Mark Behme of Silver Spring, Md., stopped using the rare, brilliant orange wood of the Padauk tree a couple of years ago.  Mr. Behme substitutes walnut and cherry, applying stains and dyes for more exotic colors.  He says the switch "hasn't made a difference to sales."  But some feel symbolic restraint by artists and crafstmen no longer carries much weight.  "Now it's the economic guys with hard eyes" who count, says Rick Snyderman, owner of a Philadelphia gallery.  Some businesses change their ways, albeit not solely for ecological reasons.  Marvin Girouard, president of Pier 1 Imports Inc., Fort Worth, Texas, says the firm no longer buys teak items.  "That teak look is a real Scandinavian look and that's not as popular" as it once was, he says.  The ban is a "semiconscious effort," he adds.  HOW LOW can mortgage rates go in the current interest-rate cycle?  An informal survey of about a dozen economists finds they expect rates for 30-year fixed-rate loans to be as much as 1 1/2 percentage points lower by this time next year before trending upward again.  The standard fixed-rate loan purchased by the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. is currently around 9.95%, down from 10.03% at the end of July.  Adjustable rates, too, tumble in the wake of interest-rate cuts by the Federal Reserve Board.  The window of opportunity for first-time buyers could open widest this winter as rates trend downward and home prices weaken further in the off-season chill, says James F. Smith, finance professor at the University of North Carolina, Chapel Hill.  Of course, there are dissenters.  Albert E. DePrince, chief economist at Marine Midland Bank, predicts that the decline in interest rates will end this quarter.  "Americans are up to their ears in housing," says Allen Sinai, Boston Co. chief economist.  COMMUNION WAFERS made from wheat flour can provoke illness in some people with celiac disease -- an intestinal disorder -- according to a letter in a recent New England Journal of Medicine.  The authors suggest using gluten-free wafers since Roman Catholic canon law specifies Eucharist bread be "wheaten only."  WOMEN PREFER gents who pick up the tab on a date (no kidding), according to a survey by New York Woman magazine.  The poll of 500 Big Apple career women, due out in the September issue, also finds that most women feel they owe the date one thing in return: "pleasant conversation."  ONE SMALL STEP for space commercialization comes later this year with the planned launch of a research satellite by Virginia's Center for Innovative Technology, a non-profit group, and Orbital Sciences Corp., Fairfax, Va.  Cost: $1 million-plus.  COLLEGE COST'S 5%-9% hike this fall cools from double-digit pace of early '80s.  The College Board, a New York educational association, says students at four-year public colleges will pay an average $1,694 for tuition and fees, up 7% from the 1988-89 academic year.  At private four-year colleges, the bill jumps 9% to $8,737.  Campus room and board tacks on $3,039 to $3,898 and don't forget books and personal expenses: $1,700 to $1,900.  But the survey can be misleading: the averages are culled from a range of tuition and fee costs that run from $100 to $16,495.  College Board cautions students against picking a school solely by its price tag -- the more expensive colleges usually offer more financial aid and use more of their own funds for assistance.  College Board notes that financial assistance this year hit an all-time high of $26 billion.  Almost half of all students receive some form of public or private aid.  BRIEFS: Former Eagle Scout Steven Spielberg and Panasonic co-sponsor a new Boy Scouts of America merit badge in cinematography. . . .  Directory Data says Des Moines uses the Yellow Pages the most and New York the least. . . .  Trifari offers paper punch-out copies of a popular jewelry set so women can try before they buy.  In October 1982, a woman selling Tupperware-like stuff demonstrated the goods for some students in a dormitory room at the Cortland campus of the State University of New York.  She had been invited there by students to show her wares.  The campus police, having gotten wind of this dangerous activity, showed up and asked her to leave.  She was in violation of State University of New York Resolution 66-156, the police said.  It reads:  "No authorization will be given to private commercial enterprises to operate on State University campuses or in facilities furnished by the University other than to provide for food, legal beverages, campus bookstore, vending, linen supply, laundry, dry cleaning, banking, barber and beautician services and cultural events."  The woman wouldn't leave, so the police charged her with trespass, soliciting without a permit, and loitering.  Several students then sued the university, charging that Resolution 66-156 violated their rights of free speech.  The case moved through the New York courts, with the students losing the first round and winning rounds two and three.  Round four took place at the Supreme Court of the United States.  The decision was handed down June 29.  That was right between the rulings on the flag and abortion, so it got even less than the very little publicity it would have received normally.  Yet it is as important as those two cases.  Maybe more so.  For the case, becoming known as the Tupperware case even though the company involved doesn't sell Tupperware, seriously restricts the right of free speech in America.  At the least, you should know about it.  At the most, you should be outraged.  Over the decades, the Supreme Court has determined that so-called commercial speech -- which it defines as speech leading to a commercial transaction -- has less protection than does the rest of speech.  So if you say "Buy Finnegan's Ice Cream," that has less protection than if you say "Ice cream is good for you." (If you say "Finnegan's Ice Cream Is Good for You," it's debatable whether you're leading up to a commercial transaction, which is one problem with drawing lines when lines shouldn't be drawn.)  The court had established a four-part test to determine whether restraints could be put on commercial speech.  The speech (1) had to concern legal activity and couldn't be misleading.  The proposed ban (2) must involve a substantial government interest, (3) must directly advance that governmental interest, and (4) must be no more extensive than necessary -- must be the least restrictive as is possible -- to serve that interest.  (What's the substantial governmental interest in stopping students at the State University of New York from learning of the wonders of cookware?  "Promoting an educational rather than commercial atmosphere on SUNY's campuses, promoting safety and security, preventing commercial exploitation of students, and preserving residential tranquillity," says the court.  Oh.)  Now, the Rehnquist court, in a six-to-three decision, has changed that fourth prong.  Now, instead of "least restrictive," the ban need merely be "reasonable."  "Least restrictive," is something than can be proved; if you assert something is least restrictive, I am free to prove you wrong by finding a method that restricts even less.  "Reasonable" is a mush word; it's a characterization that can't be proved, a word that will allow all kinds of restraints that you or I -- I'm sure about me, and I have hopes about you -- would find uncalled-for, unconscionable and unconstitutional.  The Tupperware case now will be reargued in lower courts based on the new test.  But the ruling, of course, has an impact on far more than the sale of cookware to students.  "Those who thought they could use the First Amendment to fight alcohol or tobacco ad bans . . . are the clear losers," Bruce Fein, former general counsel to the Federal Communications Commission, says.  "This . . . opens the door to ad-ban proposals."  Indeed, the ruling makes it clear that if Congress passes something called the Protect Our Children From Cigarettes Act of 1989 -- a bill that the House is holding hearings on -- the court will uphold it.  The bill would ban tobacco advertising and promotion that could be seen or heard by anyone under the age of 18, which pretty much rules out any advertising or promotion except for so-called tombstone ads, the I-dare-you-to-read-this type of advertising that underwriters use to announce new stock offerings on the back pages of this newspaper.  After that is passed and upheld, the forces of censorship will turn to banning ads for alcohol.  You can see it coming.  "The same set of hearers cannot be treated as incompetent to cope with one form of speech today and as paragons of virtue tomorrow," Burt Neuborne, a professor of law at New York University, writes in a pamphlet called "Free Speech, Free Markets, Free Choice."  "Once wounded by a well-meaning censor bent on just a little bit of censorship . . . the system of free expression will have been dealt a serious long-term blow."  It's ironic, at the very least, that the case that will lead to increasing suppression of speech in this country arose on a college campus, where academic freedom is sacred, where vigorous debate is encouraged, where outspokenness is prized, where democracy is taught.  So it's encouraging, at first blush, to note that officials from 20 public universities in 17 states intervened, filing a friend-of-the-court brief.  They were joined by the American Council on Education, the American Association of State Colleges and Universities, the National Association of State Universities and Land Grant Colleges, and the National Association of Student Personnel Administrators -- strong believers in academic freedom.  It's encouraging -- until you realize that the universities intervened to argue on behalf of censorship on the campus.  Academic freedom, apparently, does not include freedom to speak.  Or, as Ed Satell, the president of American Future Systems Inc., the company that sells the cookware, puts it: The universities are telling the students they "can't hear what they want to hear in their own rooms."  ---  Have you noticed that terrible wave of flag burning that has taken place ever since the Supreme Court ruled that burning the flag as a form of expression is protected by the Constitution?  Have you noticed how your neighbors, your colleagues, even your children keep rushing outside to burn a flag?  That being the case, aren't you glad Congress has so far held five days of hearings on various laws congressmen have rushed forward to propose?  Who knows how much money those hearings have cost, how much time they've eaten up.  Is it possible the congressmen have been so busy holding hearings that they haven't noticed no one is burning any flags?  ---  Mr. Gartner is editor and co-owner of the Daily Tribune in Ames, Iowa, and president of NBC News in New York.  Strikes by telephone workers aren't nearly so potent a negotiating weapon now that the industry is highly automated.  Since Sunday, when 157,000 members of the Communication Workers of America went on strike against Bell Atlantic Corp., Pacific Telesis Group and Nynex Corp., there has been little disruption of phone service.  Computers continue to hum and lights blink on and off as billions of calls are passed along smoothly to homes and businesses.  "Automation has made it harder for us," acknowledges Steven Rosenthal, a CWA official in Washington.  "There was a time when a strike would have virtually shut down the network."  Today's telephone networks are operated by sophisticated computer switches and fancy software systems that automatically direct and channel phone calls until they reach the right destination.  "The telephone network can do everything by itself," says Jerry S. Fleischman, a division manager of operations at Bell Communications Research in Livingston, N.J.  "The switches know when you've picked up the telephone," Mr. Fleischman explains.  "They recognize where to send the call.  They know routing tables and options.  If there's congestion on the network, they know where to re-route a call."  While the current walkout hasn't interrupted basic telephone service, it is creating some nuisances.  Last Sunday, directory assistance in San Francisco was backed up nearly two hours.  "My wife and I staged shifts" trying to get through to a directory-assistance operator, says John L. Gonzales, a real estate agent.  "We didn't have a phone book, and I was supposed to call my boss at his hotel about dinner arrangements."  What's more, sure-shot phone calls to the emergency number 911 are sometimes going awry.  Requests for new service may not get filled until September, and repairs are being made only in emergency cases.  But such problems aren't enough to force management to make quick concessions at the bargaining tables, especially since the telephone companies are saving a bundle.  The Bells don't have to pay salaries for striking workers, yet the network continues to function, churning out more revenue.  Joel D. Gross, a vice president at Donaldson Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp., recalls that American Telephone & Telegraph Co. posted an earnings increase of two cents a share three years ago when workers went on strike.  Based on an average union wage of $25,000 a year, the three Bell companies would stand to save about $75.4 million if the strike lasts as long as a week.  In the meantime, about 1,500 managers are performing the essential duties -- such as directory assistance, operator services and emergency repair.  But many haven't kept up much with the technology, and they fumble when handling customer calls.  Ken Pitt, a Bell Atlantic spokesman, says in any strike there are difficulties getting up to speed.  But, he adds, the company already is seeing "proficiency gains."  Indeed, one manager in Washington who is filling in as a customer service representative has become proficient enough to look up her personal payment files.  Sure enough, she says, a customer service worker had dutifully recorded that the manager didn't pay a phone bill one month because her dog had eaten it.  Union leaders are hoping to increase pressure on management by asking consumers to bypass the local telephone company when making toll calls and use their long distance carrier instead.  In addition, AFL-CIO leaders urged union members and the public to delay paying their phone bills until the strikes -- over wages and health-care benefits -- are settled.  In the future, new technology will automate the telephone network even more.  The Bell companies are starting to build what they call self-healing networks, which ensure uninterrupted service even when a fiber-optic cable is severed or equipment fails.  Some day, voice-recognition technology could make some operator services obsolete.  Nynex's New England Telephone, for example, has taught computers to recognize numbers and is using them to reroute phone calls.  Instead of a human operator asking callers for the numbers they dialed, computers ask the question.  After "listening" to the response, the computer refers the caller to a new number or recorded message.  Meanwhile, Northern Telecom Ltd. has developed a voice-recognition technology that automates collect calls and calls that are to be billed to a different phone number.  A Federal Reserve report confirms widespread and substantial slowing of the economy and some lessening of inflationary pressures.  "The nation's economy continues to grow slowly," the report by the 12 district Federal Reserve banks found.  Auto sales were weak nearly everywhere but Texas.  Retailers in several regions reduced orders because of disappointing sales.  Manufacturers in a variety of industries have experienced softening demand.  Loan demand was flat or down in several regions.  "It's just what the doctor -- in this case Dr. Greenspan -- ordered," said Robert Parry, president of the San Francisco Fed, referring to Fed Chairman Alan Greenspan.  The Fed has been attempting to slow the economy in order to head off an outbreak of inflation.  The report, based on surveys conducted in July, offers clues to the thinking of the presidents of the Fed banks as they prepare for the Aug. 22 meeting of the Fed's policy-setting Open Market Committee.  The Fed began nudging interest rates lower in late May, making its most recent move at the end of July.  The timing and size of any additional easing of monetary policy depends largely on how Fed policy makers assess the odds of a recession.  The word "recession" isn't mentioned in the new report.  But some of the regional reports point to further slowing ahead, particularly among manufacturers.  Half the New England manufacturers surveyed said orders are "starting to flatten out," and they predict business will get worse.  A third of Philadelphia-area manufacturers reported declining activity.  The Richmond Fed found that factories reporting falling orders and shipments outnumbered those with increases.  The Chicago Fed said backlogs of orders for metal-cutting machine tools had fallen.  "The boom in steel is over," reported the Cleveland Fed.  The St. Louis Fed noted a drop in factory employment.  Weak sales of refrigerators and computer peripherals and rising inventories of paper used in magazines led to layoffs in Arkansas.  But neither Mr. Parry nor Robert Forrestal, president of the Atlanta Fed, sees a recession on the horizon.  "There is a general feeling in the Southeast that the slowdown has in fact occurred . . . but it isn't to the extent that {businesses} are worried about us going over the edge," Mr. Forrestal said.  The report does, however, note scattered signs of improvement in the real-estate industry.  The Dallas Fed said that for the first time in nearly two years, the value of construction contracts in its region has risen above the year-earlier level.  New England realtors said residential sales have improved slightly, partly because of recent declines in interest rates.  "Seattle's real estate market has taken off," the San Francisco Fed said.  "Some contractors are so busy that they are declining opportunities to bid for new work."  The Fed survey also suggests that an acceleration of inflation is now far less of a threat than it appeared six months ago.  More than half of the business leaders polled by the San Francisco Fed in July expect the inflation rate to fall during the next year.  The Atlanta Fed said, "Reports of tight labor supplies and greater than expected wage pressures are rare."  The St. Louis Fed found "little evidence of excessive wage pressures."  And the Boston Fed said that New England businesses "agree that materials prices have peaked and that selling prices are rising modestly at most."  The Cleveland Fed, however, warned that "most of the respondents doubt that a soft landing will succeed in reducing the inflation rate."  That bank's president, Lee Hoskins, is among the Fed policy makers most convinced that the Fed should concentrate on reducing the inflation rate from current levels.  "What we're seeing now," said Mr. Parry, who has sided with Mr. Hoskins in the past, "is that inflationary pressures are being constrained.  My concern six months ago was that underlying inflationary pressures would continue to build.  That isn't as likely at this point."  But, he added, "We can't be satisfied with an average inflation rate that's in the 4% to 5% area."  It's taken almost two decades, but Airbus Industrie, a government-backed aircraft manufacturing consortium owned by West German, French, British and Spanish aerospace companies, has become the world's second largest maker of commercial aircraft after America's Boeing Co. Now it wants to soar free as an independent company.  Executives say Airbus expects to be in the black by the mid-1990s and no longer needs government subsidies.  It wants to be able to buy or build plane components wherever the price is right, instead of relying mostly on its four sponsors.  But getting free won't be easy.  The companies that own Airbus Industrie do more than make up its operating losses -- they are also its prime contractors.  It's an arrangement they don't want to change, though many Airbus executives and some outsiders say it's inefficient and fraught with conflict of interest.  All this is creating strains inside Airbus's Hydra-headed structure.  "There are centrifugal forces in Airbus," says personnel chief Jacques Baniere.  "There are always politics in the background."  These legal, financial and management conflicts loom larger than ever now that Airbus no longer has to be spoon-fed.  They are aggravated by a growing belief that the consortium must remake itself along more traditional business lines to give Boeing a serious race into the next century.  Airbus's owners differ in size, participation and motivation.  As bosses, they want Airbus planes to sell at a profit.  But as contractors, they want top prices for the wings, fuselages and other aircraft components they produce.  The headquarters staff in Toulouse, which coordinates manufacturing and marketing, feels caught in the middle.  After selling 1,200 airplanes since 1970, headquarters thinks it knows a thing or two and wants more control.  In an unusual display of frankness, employees here blame the four partners -- Aerospatiale of France, Messerschmitt Boelkow-Blohm G.m.b.H. of West Germany, British Aerospace PLC and Spain's Construcciones Aeronauticas S.A. -- for a host of ills.  They maintain that the partners pad the prices they charge Airbus and are intent on keeping jobs in their own countries, even to the detriment of the project as a whole.  While conceding that tensions do exist, Airbus's owners reject this view, though they agree change is needed.  They counter that Airbus sells its planes too cheaply.  They feel they have made enough concessions to Airbus, mainly by handing over the sales function rather than doing it themselves.  "We have given our sales force to Airbus Industrie," says Hartmut Mehdorn, president of MBB's transport aircraft group and an Airbus executive board member.  "We've given them certain management powers.  Now they think the partners are only subcontractors and they are the big chaps."  But the Airbus shareholders, he says, won't surrender control.  Until recently, such bickering was ignored internally and kept from public view.  Airbus was consumed with the challenge of becoming an aerospace giant against fierce competition.  Nobody thought much about how Airbus was organized.  But today, with new confidence and bulging order books, "the big challenge of Airbus is to manage its success," says Robert Alizart, vice president of corporate communications.  "We've proved ourselves technologically.  Now we have to prove ourselves in a management sense."  In the early days, a peculiarly French legal structure allowed the four partners the flexibility to build planes together without pooling assets or having to provide scarce equity.  It let the four partners make Airbus decisions without revealing financial secrets.  The outside world hasn't always understood how the consortium works.  A recent survey of airline executives found that, while they think Airbus offers great technology, "the company as such is viewed as a weird animal," says one manager, "while Boeing is {seen as} normal."  Further, the airlines wonder how long "the Airbus arrangement" will hold together, the manager says.  The governments subsidizing Airbus worry that the consortium structure will perpetuate the need for handouts.  Four independent businessmen appointed last year to review Airbus operations and finances recommended that it become a normal business corporation held by the partners, the public or both.  That idea has caught on here in Toulouse.  Officials think Airbus must become more efficient and financially rational and less politicized if it is to capture a greater share of the aircraft market.  They want Airbus to make its own operating decisions and employ directly the 30,000 people who build the planes in partners' factories.  The partners, to a greater or lesser degree, say they endorse the concept.  Recently privatized British Aerospace is the most enthusiastic.  "But it's a difficult path to tread, from a political, legal and financial point of view," concedes Sydney Gillibrand, chairman of British Aerospace's civil aircraft division and an Airbus executive board member.  The matter is under study, he says.  It isn't clear how the partners could afford to capitalize a new company.  Would they pool the eight main factories and all the employees in the four countries that make the planes into a jointly owned holding company?  If so, where would it be domiciled; who would get the tax benefits; and which country would get the trade-balance credit for exporting finished jetliners?  Devising answers "easily could take a decade," says Colm Mannin, Airbus's senior counsel.  The first coping mechanisms were put in place in April.  Decision making was simplified.  Airbus won more control over partners' work.  A financial director was appointed to inspect partners' books and monitor prices charged for Airbus work.  But this isn't enough for the impatient staff in Toulouse.  "Airbus Industrie is the engine, and the partners the brakes," says one executive, who adds that the partners "just don't want" Airbus to stand alone.  Airbus's owners want to keep their aerospace skills in-house rather than hand them over to a new Eurocorporation.  They want to retain jobs.  They want to perform the most sophisticated engineering and production work while subcontracting out the mundane jobs.  And with defense spending shrinking and Airbus on the verge of profitability, they don't see this as any time to let it slip away.  Moreover, the partners fear that an independent Airbus might choose to build the planes in Korea or another lower-cost place.  The current system ensures that can't happen.  On important issues such as launching new planes and dividing work, decisions must be unanimous.  Thus CASA of Spain, with only a 4.2% stake, can block the others if it likes.  Despite the April reorganization, the supervisory and executive boards still include executives who may push national agendas.  "The countries aren't always playing a completely open and transparent game with Airbus," says Mr. Baniere, the personnel chief.  ---  @ Airbus Industrie  @ Ownership by percentage  @ Aerospatiale (France) 37.9%  @ Messerschmitt-Boelkow-Blohm 37.9%  @ British Aerospace (United Kingdom) 20.0%  @ Construcciones Aeronauticas (Spain) 4.2%  @ Airbus founded: 1970  @ Backlog (through July): 706 jetliners  @ Deliveries: 504 jetliners  @ Customers: 80 airlines  @ Source: Airbus Industrie  British companies last year chalked up their highest profits in 25 years, according to a Bank of England survey, but they spent much of the cash buying up companies in other countries.  United Kingdom companies swallowed up 444 firms in other countries, up from 282 in 1987 and 21 in 1986.  The U.S. is the most popular area of British expansion, but U.K. takeovers in continental Europe are increasing.  Partly spurred by the European Community's 1992 single-market project, the number of British commercial and industrial companies' acquisitions in other EC countries jumped 50% in 1988.  U.K. acquisitions abroad last year were more than twice the value of foreign takeovers of British companies.  The central bank noted that an unusually large portion of the recent wave of takeovers by British companies took the form of cash transactions.  In 1988, British companies spent #15.5 billion ($25.12 billion) in cash completing acquisitions.  The Bank of England reported a #7.5 billion net outflow of cash from British companies in 1988, which it said was "easily the largest ever witnessed."  The central bank concluded that "the current merger boom still possesses considerable impetus."  Though 10 successive interest-rate increases have driven up the costs of borrowing, all but the smallest corporations appear to have sizable cash reserves.  The central bank reported that corporations' bank deposits have continued to rise this year.  According to the Bank of England, 1988 was exceptional in many respects.  Loose-credit policies adopted in the months following the October 1987 stock-market crash spurred a consumer buying binge, leading to accelerating inflation and a deteriorating current-account balance, the bank said.  Imports jumped 12%, with manufacturers showing a gaping #7 billion current-account deficit.  As British companies pushed to expand capacity, capital investment soared.  Manufacturing companies increased their investment by 14% last year, while construction, distribution and certain service companies increased investment by 18%.  The Bank of England cited government predictions that U.K. corporate investment would continue to rise this year.  The surge in investment and profitability is further evidence that the 1987 stock-market crash was a limited financial shock.  "The equity price fall represented a correction to the rapid rise in prices earlier in the year," the bank said.  One enduring impact of the crash has been to stir more takeovers, since many companies' shares have been trading at relatively depressed prices.  Looking forward, the Bank of England said that despite the huge outflow of funds to finance foreign takeovers, the corporate sector's finances remain healthy.  The bank also noted that while Britain's rate of inflation, currently 8.3%, is worrisome, it's below inflation peaks of 1980 and 1975.  ---  @ Britain's Takeover Binge  @ VALUE IN BILLIONS OF DOLLARS  @ (Number of transactions)  @ 1986 1987 1988  @ $24.15 $24.96 $35.81  @ Domestic (696) (1,125) (1,224)  @ U.K. companies  @ buying firms in 7.62 9.72 8.91  @ other countries (21) (282) (444)  @ Foreign  @ companies 0.97 1.94 4.05  @ buying U.K. firms (27) (42) (76)  @ Source: Bank of England  The investment jungle has more perils than an Indiana Jones movie, and spotting the pitfalls can be difficult.  But a case appealed to the Supreme Court earlier this year gives an unusual view of just how thorny things can get.  Most investors feel that the worst thing that can happen to them is that their account will suffer a string of losses.  This case shows that something worse can happen: an account may be kept barely solvent while its equity is drained by trading commissions.  In 1980, David Jordan, a retired certified public accountant living in Kansas City, Mo., had come to doubt his ability to trade commodities profitably.  Rather than quit, he moved his trading account to the local office of Clayton Brokerage Co., a now-defunct commodity broker based in St. Louis.  There, according to evidence submitted in the case, matters went from bad to worse, and Mr. Jordan eventually took Clayton to court.  In 1986 a federal district court jury in Kansas City accepted Mr. Jordan's claim that he was injured by Clayton and a Clayton broker.  So what happened to Mr. Jordan?  From Feb. 3 to March 13, 1981, the broker made 84 trades in Mr. Jordan's account, and the value of the account fell by $7,923, according to Mr. Jordan's attorney and an expert witness for the plaintiff.  Most of the drop -- a total of $5,292 -- was a result of brokerage commissions.  Leslie Jordan, a Chicago-based expert witness for Mr. Jordan and no relation, testified that in order for the account to simply pay the commissions, it would have had to generate profits of more than 182% a month.  A widely followed federal court ruling and a Commodity Futures Trading Commission standard have declared that when commissions climb above 16.67% of the account's equity value, that gives an investor reason to suspect excessive trading.  But unlike many instances of alleged excessive trading where the accounts quickly run out of money, Mr. Jordan's account never went broke.  At the trial, Mr. Jordan's attorney, Matthew Partin, argued that Mr. Jordan was the victim of a plan to turn the money in his account into brokerage commissions over a period of time.  Mr. Jordan's attorney submitted evidence -- including order tickets and testimony by a former assistant of the broker -- that the attorney claimed showed that the broker switched four profitable trades totaling $1,489 from another account into Mr. Jordan's account so that Mr. Jordan's account wouldn't be wiped out and trading could continue.  The broker wasn't a defendant in the case.  On another occasion, again using order tickets as evidence, Mr. Jordan's lawyer alleged that the broker switched two profitable trades from Mr. Jordan's account into an account in the name of "Xochlit Flores," purportedly a Kansas City beautician whose only known address listed on Clayton's records, according to Mr. Jordan's lawyer, was a post-office box across the street from Clayton's branch office.  Mr. Jordan's attorney said that his investigation showed there was no "Xochlit Flores" and that the account was controlled by the broker.  Mr. Jordan said in an interview that he called the broker periodically to complain, but "he would just ignore it.  He would always come up with some story -- a lot of technical gabble about the market."  In the trial, James W. Hanson, a broker with Clayton, testified that in 1979 and 1980, while he was branch manager of Clayton's Kansas City office, he investigated customer allegations that the broker engaged in discretionary and excessive trading in accounts that were listed as nondiscretionary. (A discretionary account is one in which the broker has the right to enter trading orders without informing the owner of the account.)  As a result of his investigation, Mr. Hanson concluded that the broker had been making unauthorized trades in two customer accounts.  He also testified that he informed his superiors in Clayton's home office of his conclusion.  Despite this information, Clayton relieved Mr. Hanson of his position as branch manager and promoted the broker to that position.  Another employee, who was fired by the brokers, testified she met with an employee of Clayton's compliance department in St. Louis and informed him that the broker was engaged in switching orders from one account to another.  The appeals court decision said that the record contained ample evidence for the jury to conclude that Clayton knew that the broker was engaged in the order switching scheme.  John Cowden, a Kansas City lawyer who handled Clayton's 1986 appeal to the U.S. Eighth Circuit Court of Appeals, declined to comment on the jury verdict.  Attempts to contact Clayton for comment were unsuccessful, as were attempts to contact the broker through one of his attorneys.  Mr. Jordan was awarded damages of nearly $8,000 and a punitive award of $400,000.  The jury also found that Clayton under Missouri common law had breached its fiduciary duties because of self-dealing.  The appeals court upheld the lower court in October 1988.  In March of this year, attorneys for Clayton petitioned the Supreme Court to review several points in the case, but their request has not been acted on.  One of the grounds for appeal was that Clayton's right under the Eighth Amendment to be free from excessive fines -- in this case, 50 times actual damages -- was violated.  Clayton, which sold much of its assets in 1986 to Geldermann Inc., a large Chicago brokerage firm, settled similar claims of four other customers represented by Mr. Jordan's attorney after the original trial ended, according to the attorney, Mr. Partin.  Has Mr. Jordan's experience with Clayton soured him on commodities?  Not at all.  Mr. Jordan said in the interview that he will consider trading commodities again when his case is finally concluded.  Vitro S.A., in what appears to be a first for a Mexican company, made an unsolicited tender offer for Anchor Glass Container Corp. of $20 a share, or about $251.4 million, for the shares that it doesn't already own.  The Monterrey-based conglomerate, flexing the renewed strength of Mexico's private sector, conveyed its offer in a public letter to Anchor Chairman Vincent J. Naimoli.  At the same time, a determined Vitro filed suit in Delaware Chancery Court, seeking to enjoin Tampa, Fla.-based Anchor from taking any action that would interfere with Vitro's bid.  Vitro is making the offer through its indirect subsidiary, THR Corp., which already holds about a 10.3% Anchor stake.  Several glass-industry analysts said Vitro's all-cash offer was surprisingly high, given the fact that loss-plagued Anchor's stock was trading below $10 a share as recently as a week ago.  The analysts said the rich price, and antitrust concerns on the part of larger, U.S. glass companies such as Owens-Illinois Inc., could make it difficult for Anchor to attract a higher bid.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Anchor shares shot up $7.50, or 61%, to close at $19.75, a 52-week high.  Heavy trading of more than 5.1 million shares made Anchor the most active issue on the Big Board.  The stock price had increased at least 5% in each of the previous four sessions, and in two of those had large increases in volume, compared with the issue's average trading volume.  "The bid is a very healthy offer," said Robert Bishop, an analyst with Salomon Brothers Inc., who estimated Anchor's book value -- the difference between corporate assets and liabilities -- at $5 a share.  Mr. Bishop said Vitro's bid represents a multiple of 15 times Anchor's 1988 pretax earnings.  "They're paying a very attractive price for it," he said.  Anchor, like other U.S. glass-container makers, has been squeezed in recent years by a double crunch: Plastic has been displacing glass as the packaging material of choice in a wide range of industries, just as glass makers have been increasing production with new technology.  Anchor is the second-largest U.S. glass company, after Owens-Illinois, with about a 25% share of the market.  Anchor had a second-quarter loss of $10.3 million, compared with net income of $1.8 million, or 13 cents a share, a year earlier.  Revenue was basically flat at $267.2 milion.  In 1988, Anchor had a loss of $8.5 million, on revenue of $977.8 million.  Vitro had 1988 profit of $152 million, on sales of $1.11 billion.  An assistant to Mr. Naimoli said the Anchor chairman was in meetings yesterday, and the company didn't have any comment on Vitro's bid.  Ernesto Martens R., Vitro's president and chief executive officer, said Anchor, with a change of management, can operate more efficiently.  If Vitro purchases Anchor, he said, the company plans to name Clifford Jones, who is president of closely held Latchford Glass Co., Huntington Park, Calif., as Anchor's chief operating officer.  Vitro said yesterday it agreed to purchase Latchford, contingent on the Anchor acquisition's going through.  The Latchford purchase price wasn't specified.  "We believe that if we improve efficiency to state of the art, the company should be successful," Mr. Martens said.  He said Vitro plans to retain Anchor's Tampa headquarters and its operating management, while replacing top executives.  Mexican analysts couldn't recall a precedent for Vitro's unsolicited bid.  "This would be the first, I think," Rogelio Ramirez de la O, a Mexican economist, said.  "I don't know of any other bid where we could use the adjective 'hostile.'"  Some Mexican analysts said that Vitro's decision to go ahead with the bid now may be linked to renewed confidence in the Mexican economy, following the government's conclusion of a debt renegotiation two and a half weeks ago.  The bid is believed to be a result of two factors: the rebound of once heavily indebted Mexican private sector companies, and distortions in the Mexican economy caused by the Mexican government's 21-month-old anti-inflationary controls on wages, prices, and the foreign exchange rate.  The Mexican private sector debt, which once totaled more than $20 billion, has been reduced to just a few billion dollars, through a combination of tough negotiating, cost-cutting and increased exports.  The indebtedness was concentrated in the conglomerates of Monterrey, a northern center of heavy industry that has been called "The Pittsburgh of Mexico."  Vitro, which makes glass containers, automotive products, enamelware and household appliances, and mines raw materials, has reduced its debt to $20 million from $758 million in 1982, Mr. Martens said, and it has boosted exports several times over, to $250 million in 1988.  "The reduction of the debts and the success in exporting has made the big groups very optimistic," said Bernardo Garza Gonzalez, president of an influential business-lobbying group in Monterrey.  "They definitely see their future in the international market and believe they can compete with anyone."  Another factor in the takeover bid is Mexico's growing problem of industrial undercapacity that results from the combination of the export boom and the strong domestic demand created by government price controls.  For a Mexican company seeking to increase capacity, it makes good financial sense to look abroad: Credit in Mexico has been severely restricted, but the near-freeze in the exchange rate has caused the value of the peso to increase in relation to the dollar in relative terms by about 35%.  "With the relatively cheap dollar, it pays for Mexican companies to buy an existing U.S. asset, rather than build in Mexico with the high cost of credit and inefficiencies like poor infrastructure," Mr. Ramirez, the economist, said.  "I think we'll see more of these sorts of bids."  Bayerische Motoren Werke AG said parent-company net income rose 14% in the first half because of strong demand for its luxury sedans.  The West German auto maker said net income climbed to 199 million marks ($104.9 million) from 174 million marks a year earlier.  BMW earlier reported a 19% increase in first-half parent-company sales, to 10.96 billion marks ($5.78 billion) from 9.22 billion marks.  BMW attributed the gains mostly to the success of its up-market 7 series and its mid-range 5 models.  These two models made up nearly half of the 272,217 cars produced in the first half.  Overall car production was up 20% from 227,786 units a year earlier.  Global registrations of BMW cars advanced 16% in the first half, to 285,000, with notable sales gains in West Germany, other West European countries and East Asia.  In the U.S., BMW deliveries matched the year-earlier level, the company said.  General Electric Co. of the U.S. and Taiwan's MITAC International Corp. announced a joint venture to produce advanced electronics and information-processing equipment for defense use in Taiwan.  The partners will have equal stakes in the new company, dubbed GETAC. GE will take charge of technology transfer and foreign sales, while MITAC will be responsible for local management and sales, said Matthew Miau, MITAC Group chairman.  The venture will help improve the quality of Taiwan-made military products and promote the country's long-term goal of becoming a world-wide arms supplier, Mr. Miau said.  The partners expect to invest a total of $6.6 million in the project in the first year and to increase their investment to $14 million within the next five years.  Ultramar PLC said net income more than doubled in the first half, as the acquisition last year of the Wilmington refinery in California allowed the company to benefit from the recent surge in North American refining margins.  The British oil company also benefited from strong Canadian refining operations and a 10% increase in its upstream oil and gas production at a time of higher prices and increased world demand for energy.  Net income rose to #62.5 million ($101.3 million) from #22.7 million a year earlier.  Sales jumped 52%, to #877.4 million ($1.42 billion) from #576.6 million.  Breaking new ground in the area of the constitutional rights of corporations, a federal appeals court ruled that companies charged with criminal contempt have the right to a jury trial if the possible fine exceeds $100,000.  The Second U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals left open the possibility that smaller fines could also require the right to a jury trial, depending on the impact that the fine would have on the corporation.  In its decision, the three-judge panel threw out a $500,000 fine that was imposed on Twentieth Century Fox Film Corp. after a U.S. district judge found that the company had violated a 1951 antitrust consent decree.  In the consent decree, Fox and other motion-picture studios agreed not to engage in various sales practices that violate antitrust law.  The court found that there was ample evidence to support the lower judge's ruling that Fox had violated the decree, but said the judge lacked the power to impose a fine of $500,000 on Fox after denying the company's demand for a jury trial.  Although the right to a jury trial is guaranteed to individuals facing substantial penalties for contempt proceedings, the courts haven't previously established standards for such protection for corporations.  Arthur Eisenberg, legal director of the New York Civil Liberties Union, said, "This decision addresses an issue not previously resolved by the the Second Circuit and not yet resolved by the Supreme Court."  Mr. Eisenberg's organization filed a friend-of-the-court brief for the appeal, arguing that every defendant should be entitled to a jury trial when charged with a serious offense.  He said that criminal contempt against corporations was the only area in which courts haven't yet guaranteed that right for defendants facing serious charges.  "It shouldn't matter that it is a corporation rather than an individual," Mr. Eisenberg said.  For individuals charged with criminal contempt, the highest penalty that may be imposed without a jury trial is generally six months' imprisonment.  If the possible sentence is less than that, criminal contempt isn't considered a serious offense.  The Supreme Court has yet to determine whether there is a right to a jury trial in any criminal contempt case when only a monetary fine is imposed.  The Justice Department, which prosecuted the case against Fox, argued that a corporation charged with contempt is never entitled to a jury trial.  To come up with the $100,000 figure, the appeals court took into consideration the normal maximum fine of $500,000 that Congress has established for most felony convictions of organizations.  The court essentially developed a sliding scale, saying that if the maximum fine is $500,000, then "some significant portion of this figure is the appropriate threshold for determining an organization's right to a jury trial."  The court concluded that $100,000 is a fair threshold for any company, but that a lesser amount might be appropriate for smaller corporations.  John Fonte, the Justice Department attorney who handled the case on appeal, said he hadn't seen the court's decision and couldn't comment.  Fox attorneys didn't return calls seeking comment.  Standard & Poor's Corp. said it affirmed its ratings on about $175 million of this cable television electronics company's debt, including convertible subordinated debentures, which remain triple-B.  The rating concern had put the issues on CreditWatch after General Instrument announced an extensive stock buy-back program.  Dominion Textile Inc. became the fifth Canadian company to adopt a "poison pill" since Inco Ltd. approved a dividend-sweetened measure last October.  Dominion Textile said directors unanimously approved a shareholder-rights plan -- a so-called poison pill -- triggered if any person or group except a "permitted bidder" acquires 20% or more of the company's voting stock.  If the rights are triggered, holders could buy Dominion Textile common stock at a 50% discount, or the company could distribute other securities or assets.  The plan takes effect immediately, subject to approval by holders at the annual meeting Oct. 25.  A permitted bidder must hold less than 5% of the voting stock, make an offer for all shares and get a favorable fairness opinion from a recognized investment banker.  The rights aren't triggered if a permitted bid is approved by a majority of holders at a special meeting.  A Dominion Textile official said the plan had been under discussion for more than a year and was implemented because "we feel our stock price doesn't reflect our earnings potential."  Given the current stock-market environment, directors felt it prudent to enact a plan that would protect holders in the event of an acquisition attempt, the official said.  In thin trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange, Dominion Textile closed at 16.75 Canadian dollars, down 12.5 cents.  At that price, a takeover of the Montreal-based textile concern would cost about C$450 million (US$384 million).  The company is a major North American producer of denim.  Paramount Pictures Corp. has helped make a lot of stars in its time -- glittering names such as Rudolph Valentino, Bing Crosby and Eddie Murphy.  Its latest release, however, features a leading man of a different stripe: Ronald McDonald.  Paramount, the creator of such modern-day hits as "Beverly Hills Cop" and "Top Gun," is rushing headlong into television commercials.  Through a new division it set up in March, the Paramount Communications unit is moving into a business that is fiercely competitive and getting more so -- and it isn't the only studio knocking on ad agency doors.  Lucasfilm Ltd., founded by George Lucas, of "Star Wars" fame, opened its own commercial shop on May 1.  Cannell Studios, creator of the TV shows "Wiseguy" and "The A-Team," already runs a commercial unit.  Other film studios are watching closely.  In years past, no movie director with a shred of pride would think of dabbling in commercials.  But directing TV ads has become downright fashionable among even Hollywood's biggest names.  They are taking a lucrative cue from British directors like Adrian Lyne ("Flashdance") and Ridley Scott ("Bladerunner"), who move effortlessly from commercials to feature films and back again.  The movie companies now hope to cash in on the trend.  With the crush of commercials littering the TV-scape, "what do you do to get noticed?" asks Tom Bruehl, Paramount studio's vice president of video operations, who oversees the commercial unit.  "You either have a breakthrough concept in every commercial -- or you use higher-quality production values."  Since breakthrough concepts are rare, he adds, advertisers should flock to Paramount for its glossy production values.  Still, most of the commercials that Paramount's new unit, called Paramount Images, has directed are rather run-of-the mill ads, not glossy multimillion-dollar extravaganzas.  Its 14 projects, totaling more than 40 separate commercials, include spots for such everyday products as Crayola crayons, Subway sandwiches, Kibbles n' Bits cat food, and McDonald's, for which it created one ad starring, yes, Ronald McDonald himself.  Mr. Bruehl concedes that he would like to see Paramount attract splashier fare.  "I think that comes," he adds.  "I'm realistic; I know we have to prove ourselves to the agencies."  The agencies also need convincing that a touch of Hollywood is an advantage.  The studios each have a stable of full-time commercial directors and offer a select few big-name feature film directors as well.  Yet "most feature film directors don't have that respect for the 30-second time frame and how precious every second is," says Robert Wolf, who heads the Chiat/Day ad agency office here.  "The guys who are totally new to it usually don't do it well."  Of the four "star" directors Paramount has lined up for commercials, only one, Steve Miner, a director of the ABC TV show "The Wonder Years," is doing much work.  The others, including Leonard Nimoy of Mr. Spock fame, who more recently directed "The Good Mother," haven't yet directed any spots.  At Lucasfilm, whose commercial unit has handled "eight or nine" projects, celebrity directors including Michael J. Fox and actor Peter Horton of ABC's "thirtysomething" also haven't shot commercials yet, says Peter Friedman, executive producer. (Mr.  Fox is filming "Back to the Future" parts two and three, and isn't available.)  But the studios are optimistic.  An increasingly cost-conscious lot, they see commercials largely as a way to put studio sets, props and talent to work during the down time between major feature and TV show filmings.  On the Paramount lot, two McDonald's spots were shot on the stage vacated by the now-canceled NBC series "Family Ties."  The on-site shop that builds sets like the spaceship for the "Star Trek" movies custom-made a bathtub for a 2,000-pound bull used in a Crayola commercial.  "It gives the directors a chance to have all the toys they possibly could want to play with at hand, and it makes life much easier for the directors," says Paul Babb, Paramount Image's executive producer.  Lucasfilm, meanwhile, calls on its Industrial Light & Magic special-effects division for its commercials.  Peter Friedman, executive producer of the commercial unit, says special effects were used heavily in a new spot created for USAir.  None of Lucasfilm's commercials will appear until fall, but the studio already has attracted some major clients, including part of the much-anticipated new Burger King campaign and a new Commodore computer campaign, both directed by Matthew Robbins, director of the film "Batteries Not Included."  Jonathan Miller, who started Image Point, the commercial production unit of Cannell Studios, adds that the affiliation with a studio helps attract directing talent.  "Every commercial director has a dream of doing a long feature one day.  One of the ways we attract directors is to say, 'We'll give you an opportunity to work in longer-form TV,'" Mr. Miller says.  One Image Point commercial director, he says, will direct an episode of the Cannell production "Wiseguy" next month.  In the current environment, though, with directors clawing over every last commercial and with ad agencies attempting to cut commercial prices any way they can, financial stability may be just as important to directors.  "This is a very difficult and incredibly competitive business we're in right now," says Lucasfilm's Mr. Friedman.  "There's a lot of hot young boutique production companies around, but will they be around in a year?  You want to have a company behind you that has staying power.  And that's why people will go with a Paramount or a Lucasfilm."  ---  Revlon Drops 2 Agencies  Revlon Inc. yesterday terminated its relationships with Hill, Holliday, Connors, Cosmopulos and Sudler & Hennessey, both based in New York.  The accounts serviced at the two shops together billed an estimated $15 million.  A Revlon spokesman said those accounts will either be reassigned to Revlon's Creative Workshop, its in-house agency, or to Tarlow Advertising, the New York shop it acquired in an unusual deal late last month.  As part of that deal, the ad agency's president, Dick Tarlow, assumed the additional job as the top advertising executive at Revlon headquarters.  The ad switches prompted speculation that further consolidation may be on the horizon for the cosmetics giant.  Mr. Tarlow declined to comment, but a Revlon spokesman indicated that the agencies were dropped "for classic client-agency reasons."  The only agencies to survive yesterday's cut are Ketchum Advertising, New York, which is working on a major product introduction for a new line of hair-care products; and Peter Rogers Associates, which handles the advertising for Scaasi, a perfume.  Young & Rubicam continues as agency of record for network and print media buying.  Hill Holliday handled advertising for Revlon's Charlie and Trouble fragrances, Clean & Clear hair care line and Nutrasome hair care treatment.  Just last month, the agency was awarded the ad account for a new deodorant.  Sudler & Hennessey, a unit of Y&R, handled the advertising for Flex hair-care products and Mitchum deodorant.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   EARNINGS: Foote, Cone & Belding Communications, Chicago, reported second-quarter net income rose 42% to $6.7 million, or 66 cents a share, from $4.7 million, or 55 cents a share, a year-earlier.  Gtech Corp. said it agreed to be acquired by an investor group consisting of some of its executives and Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Capital Corp., for $16.625 a share.  The $290 million transaction includes, in addition to the merger consideration, amounts paid to refinance certain debts, fees and expenses.  Gtech, which designs and operates computerized on-line lottery transactions, has slightly less than 10 million shares outstanding.  Donaldson is a unit of Equitable Life Assurance Society of the U.S.  Gtech said the transaction was approved by its board after a special committee of independent directors recommended acceptance of the proposal.  The company, which disclosed in June that "certain parties" were interested in acquiring it, said commitments have been received for the financing required to complete the transaction.  Completion of the merger is subject to certain conditions, including approval by Gtech shareholders and receipt of the necessary financing and governmental approvals, including assurances from lottery authorities relating to the continuation of the company's contracts.  Should the merger plan be terminated, Donaldson is entitled to reimbursement of up to about $4.7 million in expenses and, under certain circumstances, the payment of an additional $8.5 million.  In the fiscal year ended Feb. 25, Gtech had net income of $5 million, or 52 cents a share, on revenue of $147.1 million.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Gtech closed at $16, up 75 cents.  Electra Investment Trust PLC announced a double-barreled investment and management-compensation plan, which promptly pushed the company's share price up 7%.  Electra, one of Britain's biggest and most consistently successful investment companies, said it would join with seven international institutions to form a #365 million ($593.7 million) fund that would invest in management buy-outs, restructurings and joint ventures involving closely held European companies.  And in an admitted effort to recruit and retain key investment managers in a sharply competitive job market, Electra said it would sell its investment management unit to a newly formed company 20%-owned by Electra's management team, which would pay #750,000 for the stake.  The new company, Kingsway Managers Holdings Ltd., would manage Electra's world-wide venture-capital portfolio, as well as the new fund, which has a designated maximum of #550 million.  Both measures will be submitted for shareholder approval at a special meeting scheduled for Sept. 13.  Michael Bentley, Electra's deputy chairman and chief executive officer, and Michael Stoddart, chairman, said in interviews that the Kingsway arrangement is designed to raise fund managers' compensation by giving them a performance-based piece of the action.  "We are rewarding executives by making them partners in the management company" at a time of fierce competition for people with free-spending U.S. and British investment banks, Mr. Stoddart said.  Electra would own 49.9% of the new management company.  It also would have a performance-based compensation scheme that, Electra indicated to analysts, could sharply boost Electra's earnings.  The remaining 30.1% of Kingsway would be bought by five of the international investors for a total of #3.25 million.  In late dealings on London's stock exchange, Electra shares traded at 340 pence ($5.53), up 22 pence from Tuesday's close.  Under the plan, "Electra would have much more funds under management and would completely change the perspective of the management company," said Colin Kingsnorth, an analyst with Olliff & Partners, a securities firm.  He added, "Their ability to attract top people in the City {London's financial district} has improved."  According to Mr. Kingsnorth, at a meeting with analysts yesterday, Electra executives said that had the new plan been in place, after-tax earnings for the 12 months ended last March 31 would have been #10.5 million, or 57% more than posted earnings of #6.7 million.  Electra would contribute #200 million to the new #365 million fund.  The largest of the other seven investors would be the pension fund of General Electric Co. of Fairfield, Conn., with a #35 million stake, Mr. Bentley said.  The other investors would be Credit Commercial de France, Globe Investment Trust, Industrial Bank of Japan, Government of Singapore Investment Corp., U.S. Steel & Carnegie Pension Fund and the Howard Hughes Medical Institute.  Mr. Stoddart indicated that the fund would be wary of investing in leveraged buy-outs.  "The market for LBOs is getting tough," because of high interest rates, share prices and inflation, he said.  Stocks finished lower in heavy trading as a wave of futures-related sell programs and profit-taking overrode sharp gains in some takeover-related stocks issues.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average fell 13.09 to 2686.08.  For the second day this week, volume surpassed 200 million shares, rising to 209,900,000 from 200,340,000 Tuesday.  Among the broader indexes, the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index fell 2.41 to 346.94, and the New York Stock Exchange composite slipped 0.93 to 193.20.  Declining issues on the Big Board outnumbered advancers, 876-636.  Some traders said news of a dispute between the U.S. and Panama acted as a catalyst for nervous investors to begin selling late in the session.  Reports that U.S. troops had been arrested at a fort where Gen. Manuel Noriega has offices came as the downturn got under way.  It was announced after the market closed that the troops had been released.  "The market was basically in the negative if you look at the advance and decline" numbers, said Philip Puccio, managing director in charge of equity trading at Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.  "Most of the action was in the deal and transportation stocks."  In its second largest one-day gain ever, the Dow Jones Transportation Average rose 50.49 to 1406.29.  UAL, the parent of United Airlines, gained 24 5/8 to 243 7/8, above investor Marvin Davis's reported bid for the company of $240 a share.  Among other airline shares, AMR, the parent of American Airlines, rose 3 to 76 7/8, Delta Air Lines rose 2 5/8 to 79 3/8, Alaska Air Group advanced 7/8 to 29 1/4, and Midway Airlines rose 3/8 to 20 7/8.  Texas Air, the parent of Continental and Eastern airlines, gained 7/8 to 17 3/8.  USAir Group, which fell 1 5/8 Tuesday after disclosing a series of steps to defend against potential takeovers, rebounded 1/4 to 51 5/8.  Trucking companies' stocks contributed to the surge in the transportation average.  Merrill Lynch raised its investment ratings on Consolidated Freightways, which rose 3/4 to 33 1/8 on the Big Board, and Yellow Freight System, which climbed 7/8 to 30 3/8 in the over-the-counter market.  Merrill Lynch analyst Douglas Rockel told Dow Jones Professional Investor Report the two carriers are well-positioned to benefit from a stronger economy and an expected consolidation in the industry.  Roadway Services, another major trucking concern, rose 3/4 to 37 3/4 in OTC trading; Merrill Lynch maintained its "above average" rating on the stock.  General Motors gained 3/8 to 45 1/8.  A top official said GM expects to increase its U.S. passenger-car market share, currently 36.2%, to 37% in 1990.  Other top-performing blue-chip issues included Eastman Kodak, which went up 1 5/8 to 50 5/8 on 3.2 million shares, and Woolworth, which added 1/4 to 60 7/8 after issuing its second-quarter earnings report.  Takeover or restructuring speculation swirled around several other stocks and drove them higher.  Paramount Communications, rumored to be a target since its failed bid for Time, jumped 2 1/2 to close at 62 1/8 on volume of 4.1 million shares.  Several analysts and takeover stock traders, however, said that none of the rumored bidders appears likely to follow through with a hostile bid for Paramount.  Some media stocks rose along with Paramount, including Tribune, up 1 1/8 to 58 5/8, and McGraw-Hill, which gained 1 1/4 to 76 1/4.  Time Warner jumped 1 3/8 to 143 1/8.  Hilton Hotels rose 4 to 111 7/8.  Hilton's board is expected to meet soon, perhaps today, to hear reports from two advisers who were hired to explore the possible sale of the company.  Avon Products, which has rejected a takeover proposal from Minneapolis investor Irwin Jacobs, closed 1 3/8 higher at 38 5/8; volume was heavy.  Several big California thrifts now are viewed as potential takeover targets, as the thrift bailout bill just signed by President Bush makes it easier for commercial banks to acquire them.  Great American Bank jumped 1 5/8 to 13 1/8, GlenFed rose 1 1/2 to 25 1/2, and Golden West Financial, parent of World Savings, jumped 1 1/2 to 51 1/2.  Tambrands rose 3 1/2 to 68 1/2 on rumors that Johnson & Johnson plans to make an offer for the company.  Johnson & Johnson declined to comment.  Takeover-related trading accounted for much of the volume in Anchor Glass Container, which jumped 7 1/2 to 19 3/4 on 5.1 million shares.  It was the target of a $20-a-share bid from Vitro, a Mexican company.  Engelhard surged 3 1/8 to 24 5/8 amid speculation that Minorco, which owns 30% of the company's common, might acquire the rest or sell its stake.  The company said it didn't have any indication that Minorco was moving in either direction.  Away from the takeover front, a number of oil stocks were caught in the market's sell-off.  Exxon dropped 3/4 to 44 1/8, Chevron fell 1 to 54 5/8, Amoco declined 1 1/8 to 46 3/8, Mobil slid 1 1/4 to 51 1/8, and Sun retreated 1 3/8 to 37 1/4.  United Telecommunications tumbled 3 to 77 5/8.  Smith Barney lowered its investment rating on the company, which adopted a new shareholder rights plan.  Novo-Nordisk dropped 2 3/8 to 47 3/8.  The company said second-quarter net income fell to 63 cents a share from 86 cents a year earlier.  The American Stock Exchange Index set its fourth record in five sessions by gaining 0.19 to 381.15.  Volume totaled 19,010,000 shares, compared with 16,350,000 Tuesday.  There were 275 issues advancing, 313 declining and 266 unchanged.  J.M. Peters jumped 2 3/8 to 14 on rumors that Southmark, a troubled real estate concern, might sell the 87% of Peters owned by its San Jacinto Savings & Loan Association unit.  Michaels Stores advanced 1 1/8 to 10.  The company accepted a cash-and-stock offer valued at $12 a share from Grauer & Wheat Investments and Acadia Partners.  Straight Talk  ("There's a new buzzword for the nations's debt." -- News note)  The euphemism "dissavings"  Is not fooling people a bit;  To economic realists  It's a.k.a. "the deficit."  -- George O. Ludcke.  ---  Life in the Fax Lane  Forget about chronology  When buying new technology.  As a rule of thumb: It's obsolete  When the payments are complete.  -- Pat D'Amico.  Computer Associates International Inc. said there is "substantial uncertainty" about its results for the quarter ending Sept. 30, marking the second time in a month the company has had to scale back expectations.  The software company, which has been growing by leaps and bounds, said that its planned acquisition of Cullinet Software Inc. has been delayed and that customers are holding off on purchase decisions until the takeover is completed.  Computer Associates said the delays affect sales of database management products, a core area for both Computer Associates and Cullinet, as well as those of other products as part of package sales.  In Garden City, N.Y., a spokeswoman said the company hopes to close the Cullinet acquisition in a month or so, less than a month later than originally expected.  But, she said, "there won't be enough time in the quarter" to complete all the delayed sales to its customers.  The company said that the acquisition of Cullinet had been held up by bureaucratic problems, and indicated it expects to get back on track in the following quarter.  Computer Associates said it couldn't determine how fiscal second-quarter results would compare with the year-earlier period, when it earned $28.9 million, or 36 cents a share, on revenue of $223.7 million.  But the announcement, coming after the stock market closed, is likely to hurt the stock, because investors have become accustomed to earnings and revenue jumps of 30% or more each quarter.  Last month, when the company reported that revenue rose roughly 30% in the fiscal first quarter, instead of the expected 45%, the stock tumbled to $16.25 from $19.50 a share.  The stock has since recovered, and closed yesterday at $19.375, down 12.5 cents, in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Investors apparently have accepted the company's statement that the first-quarter problem was a short-term one caused by the strong dollar, which reduces the value of foreign sales.  Yesterday's announcement will also revive the controversy that has surrounded the company.  It has bought up competitors so fast that its revenue is more than seven times what it was five years ago, exceeding $1 billion annually, and some investors have been wondering whether the growth can last.  Supporters say the company has grown by ruthlessly cutting costs and by using its extensive sales force to rejuvenate the products it acquired.  The supporters also say the company has shrewdly focused on an unglamorous area -- software that makes mainframes run more efficiently -- and has avoided the competitive bloodbaths that sometimes occur in other parts of the software industry.  But a number of investors have assembled a huge short position in Computer Associates stock -- meaning they have sold borrowed stock, hoping to buy it back later at a much lower price.  The critics argue that the company has sustained its growth only through acquisition and is now so big that it can't buy companies fast enough to maintain that growth.  They also say Computer Associates has managed its financial statements more aggressively than is prudent -- mainly in the way it tallies maintenance revenue and carries accounts receivable on its books.  While consumers are earning less on their bank deposits these days, they are paying banks just as much and, in some cases, more for personal loans.  Yields on certificates of deposit have dropped one percentage point or more since late April.  But interest rates on credit cards and unsecured personal loans have actually risen a bit, on average.  And, at a time when many new car dealers are wringing their hands about groaning inventories of unsold 1989 models, rates on most auto loans have hardly budged.  "By holding borrowing rates high while slashing rates on CDs, banks are widening their spread at the expense of the consumer," says Robert K. Heady, publisher of Bank Rate Monitor, a newsletter based in North Palm Beach, Fla., that tracks deposit and loan rates.  The spread, or the difference between what banks pay for funds and what they charge for loans, translates into profit margins.  Banks generally adjust interest rates on deposits and loans as yields rise and fall on money market securities such as Treasury bills.  But when rates fall, it's usually depositors -- not borrowers -- who see the declines first.  This time, Mr. Heady says, the disparity between deposit and loan rates is the widest it has been at the beginning of a downward trend in interest rates since bank interest rates were deregulated six and a half years ago.  At Citibank in New York, for instance, the annual yield on a one-year CD has plummeted more than two percentage points, to 7.46% from 9.64% in late April.  Meanwhile, the interest rate on unsecured personal loans is unchanged at 17.9%, and the rate on new-car loans is up to 14.75% from 13.9% in late April.  In the Washington, D.C., area, according to Bank Rate Monitor, Perpetual Savings Bank is charging 17% annually on personal loans, up from 16.5%, and 11.75% on new-car loans, up from 11.25%.  The yield on one-year CDs has fallen to 8.71% from 9.63%.  Most interest rates have fallen about a percentage point in the past three months.  The federal funds rate, the rate on overnight loans among banks, is currently about 9%, down from just under 10%.  Six-month Treasury bills sold at Monday's auction yielded 8.12%; those sold April 24 had a 9.25% yield.  Some bank loan rates have come down, too.  According to Bank Rate Monitor's index, the average rate on a 30-year fixed-rate mortgage currently is 9.77%, down from about 11% in late April.  The introductory rate on a one-year adjustable rate mortgage with a 30-year term has fallen to an average 8.60% from 9.62%.  Rates on other adjustable-rate loans, such as many home-equity loans, also have fallen.  Most of those are linked to the prime lending rate, a benchmark that now stands at 10.5%, compared with 11.5% in the spring.  Some personal loans and auto loans also carry adjustable rates.  Generally, however, rates on personal and auto loans, as well as credit-card rates, aren't linked directly to what happens in the money markets.  Instead, banks set them on the basis of a variety of factors, including competition.  "It's a balancing act," says Bernard Schumacher, senior vice president and treasurer of Perpetual Savings Bank.  "We have to be careful not to take ourselves out of the market."  Mr. Schumacher notes that it's harder to attract depositors as interest rates fall, but loan demand picks up.  As a result, banks have to rely more on money they borrow to fund loan demand.  Certainly, consumers haven't stopped borrowing.  The Federal Reserve's latest report on consumer debt, released Tuesday, showed that consumer installment credit outstanding rose almost $3 billion in June, equal to a 5.1% annual rate of growth.  Bankers maintain that the widening gap between loan and deposit rates is justified.  When interest rates start to fall, "the lender has to ask himself if that's a permanent phenomenon," says Robert Duggar, chief economist for the American Bankers Association, a Washington, D.C.-based trade group.  "It may be better to leave a higher rate in place than to have to readjust it upward later."  Moreover, Mr. Duggar says, lending rates reflect administrative costs and loan losses as well as a bank's cost of funds.  "Increases in delinquencies can mean that even though the cost of funds goes down, profitability can go down, too," he notes.  Bank Rate Monitor's Mr. Heady predicts that the massive federal bailout of troubled thrift institutions will mean higher loan rates for consumers.  Premiums paid by banks and thrifts into federal deposit insurance funds will rise substantially under the legislation signed into law yesterday, raising the cost of doing business for financial institutions.  "Loan rates are less visible than savings account yields," Mr. Heady says.  "Banks splash their latest CD rates across their windows in three-foot high letters."  Harris Corp., shedding operations to focus on its core businesses, reported a loss of $52 million for its fourth quarter ended June 30 because of $86.8 million in restructuring charges.  The electronic-part and office-equipment concern, which earned $1.8 million, or five cents a share, a year earlier, said most of the period's extraordinary charges were from a provision the company took for the sale of its data-communications and personal-computer-based office-systems businesses.  The company said profit from continuing operations almost tripled to $34.8 million from $12.8 million a year earlier.  Revenue rose 63% to $768.3 million from $471.8 million.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Harris shares rose 12.5 cents to close at $34.50.  In the year, Harris earned $21.3 million, or 55 cents a share, compared with $100.5 million, or $2.50 a share, in fiscal 1988.  Fiscal 1989 results include charges of $94.8 million from discontinued operations.  Revenue rose 22% to $2.25 billion from $1.84 billion.  Profit from continuing operations in the year rose 31% to $167.2 million from $127.5 million.  Quarterly and yearly results include two months of results from Lanier Worldwide Inc., bought in the fourth quarter.  The fiscal-year results include seven months of results from the GE Solid State semiconductor business, acquired in November.  John T. Hartley, Harris's chairman and chief executive officer, said the company has restructured to focus on four businesses: advanced electronic systems, semiconductors, communications and office-equipment sales and servicing.  He said Harris is selling its Dallas-based data-communications business, which produces terminals and other hardware that operate with mainframe computers, and its PC-based office systems operations, because those two markets are too price sensitive and margins are too low.  "Unfortunately, as one of the smaller suppliers, our volume put us at a significant competitive disadvantage with the high-volume suppliers," he said.  Mr. Harley said Harris expects "good earnings growth next year."  In the heat of last year's elections, Congress passed with self-congratulatory fanfare a $2.8 billion bill to fight drugs.  It was, proclaimed Sen. Daniel Moynihan, "the first true bill addressing the totality of drug abuse in the history of this body."  But the lawmakers actually spent only about $500 million of the money authorized under the legislation this fiscal year.  And so far, hardly any of the promised additional $2.3 billion has been forthcoming.  "We lost our bill," concedes Sen. Moynihan, a New York Democrat.  As the legislation shows, the much-heralded war on drugs often is more rhetoric than reality.  The federal government has shoveled out more than $21 billion for antidrug efforts over the past eight years, but the money has been disgorged in scattershot fashion, through tortuous layers of government and with scant evaluation of what works and what doesn't.  The result isn't so much a war as a free-for-all.  A Maryland program provides a small but revealing example.  Gina DeLeonardis, the director of a Baltimore County treatment center, recently used a $25,000 federal grant together with state money to set up a drug-counseling program for inmates at the county jail.  However, the effort was delayed for 18 months while funding was passed from Washington to the state to the county.  Receiving no guidance, Ms. DeLeonardis bought an $11,000 classroom-trailer in which to counsel the prisoners.  The program is finally under way, but the trailer sits, rarely used, on a macadam lot next to the 19th-century jail.  The reason: Jail authorities haven't decided how to make it secure.  "We need every dollar we can get, but who's in charge?" asks an exasperated Ms. DeLeonardis.  The answer is everybody and nobody.  Everybody wants to fight drugs, but some of the fiercest battles are fought over how to mount the attack.  And the battle is about to heat up.  William Bennett, the Bush administration's outspoken drug czar, is promising to shake up federal programs by proposing a new "national strategy" by Sept. 5.  He says he will lean heavily toward tougher local law enforcement.  This would put him on a collision course with many in Congress who want to switch the emphasis to prevention, treatment and research.  Whatever the strategy, a major problem is that few federal drug dollars "hit the target," Sen. David Pryor complains.  Too much of the money, the Arkansas Democrat charges, goes into questionable projects: Encouraged by some success with using dogs to sniff out narcotics in luggage, the Customs Service recently awarded a $90,000 contract for research on an "electronic nose," for example.  The top priority of the Reagan administration's war on drugs was to break up major narcotics rings within the U.S. and stop drugs at the border.  Since 1981, such efforts have consumed 80% of the $21 billion spent by the federal government on fighting drugs, and there have been some gains.  The Coast Guard and Customs Service seized 27.2 metric tons of cocaine in fiscal 1986, up from 1.7 tons in 1981.  But the huge effort hardly put a dent in the drug traffic.  Latin American exporters simply increased production.  The amount of coke flowing into the U.S. increased to 153 metric tons in 1985 from 68 metric tons in 1981, according to the latest government estimates.  With more drugs on the street, cocaine prices have plunged 60% in some big cities, law-enforcement officials say.  Rand Corp., in a study conducted for the Pentagon, concluded that the only impact of the $5.72 billion spent on Coast Guard cutters, Customs Service jets and radar-equipped blimps was to trim supplies enough to raise prices of illegal drugs about 4% above the level they otherwise would have been.  Increasing that percentage to 6% could cost an additional $1 billion a year, estimates Peter Reuter, the senior author of the study.  "It's very hard to see that putting more into interdiction will do much to cut the flow of drugs," he contends.  Even Attorney General Dick Thornburgh concedes: "If you want to lose the war on drugs, leave it just to law enforcement."  In its 1988 bill, Congress moved to switch priorities by requiring that 60% of future federal spending on drugs be targeted to the "demand side."  The bill, which passed 346-11 in the House and by a voice vote in the Senate in the early morning just before lawmakers returned home to face voters, authorized dozens of programs.  It would increase drug-abuse education, cocaine treatment and medical care for addicts with AIDS.  Because of budget restrictions, most of these efforts weren't funded, but the legislation promised that Congress would spend "such funds as may be necessary" to operate the programs in the future.  But more money hasn't been provided.  In a broader spending bill, the House recently did propose $822 million for drugs, but the Senate didn't vote any because of the Bush administration's budget worries.  Congress settled on a compromise of $75 million, most of which will go for standard Justice Department needs, such as paying prosecutors and marshals.  "We aren't funding the {antidrug} program," acknowledges Democratic Sen. Joseph Biden of Delaware.  "We aren't making an attempt like we promised the American people we would."  President Bush has proposed spending nearly $6 billion to fight drugs, a $1 billion increase, in fiscal 1990, which begins Oct. 1.  He says he wants more prisons, more federal agents and more prosecutors -- the same shopping list Mr. Bennett, the drug czar, has emphasized in recent speeches.  Mr. Bennett has promised to fight for as much as $1 billion more in drug spending on top of what the president proposed.  Once again, though, the budget may turn tough rhetoric into empty promises.  When Mr. Bennett's plan comes out in September, Congress will be well on the way to carrying out the fiscal 1990 budget compromise that it reached with the White House earlier this year.  If Mr. Bennett asks Congress for more money, he probably won't get it until the 1991 budget, administration officials say.  Laments one senior White House adviser: "You can already hear the outraged attacks from the Hill: 'The Bush administration is doing nothing about drugs] The drug czar can't get anything done]'"  Even if more drug programs were funded today, there wouldn't be a quick impact.  Washington provides only about 20% of the total funds spent nationally on drug treatment and education; the rest comes from state, local and private sources.  Nevertheless, federal money is crucial because it prompts matching allocations from state legislatures.  "Our only real way to expand programs is with federal money" as the spur, says Alan Baker, an official with the Maryland Alcohol and Drug Abuse Administration.  The problem is that it takes years for money to move from Washington to localities.  In Florida, which receives about half of its $66 million annual antidrug budget from Congress, federal money appropriated in 1986 is only now reaching cocaine-detoxification programs trying to cut months-long waiting lists, says Linda Lewis, the state's drug administrator.  "The bills in Washington always sound great, but we can't tell when we'll actually get the money," she says.  The labyrinthine flow of money would make even a grizzled bureaucrat dizzy.  Typically, the first step in Florida, as in most states, is the governor's office applying for a share of federal grant money.  If, months later, the money is granted, state agencies spend more months putting on "dog and pony shows" in hopes of getting a share, Ms. Lewis says.  Meanwhile, the legislature, as part of the state's budget process, begins reviewing the allocation of all federal money granted to Florida.  Legislators sometimes redirect expenditures within agencies to benefit their constituents.  Only then, up to two years later, do state agencies start to solicit bids from private contractors who actually run treatment programs.  In addition, federal seed money is planted indiscriminately, and the results often aren't monitored.  So, federal dollars support drastically different, and sometimes contradictory, treatment methods across the country.  "We're spending blindly," says Rep. Charles Rangel, a New York Democrat.  "We don't know what we've bought."  Baltimore County's drug-treatment center, for example, uses a "holistic, family-oriented" strategy in loosely structured group-therapy sessions.  The center, partly funded by federal money, offers outpatient counseling in a squat three-story building near a suburban shopping mall.  Counselors lead discussions on developing self-esteem and identifying stresses that contribute to drug use.  Patients aren't required to have stopped taking drugs to get help; the staff believes it wouldn't be realistic to expect that in such a program.  And there aren't any reliable statistics on success rates.  In contrast, Daytop Village, a program based in New York City and operating all over New York state with the aid of about $1 million a year in federal support, employs high-intensity "therapeutic communities."  These are group homes where patients live and perform menial labor under strict discipline.  A central tenet at Daytop is that patients can't stay if they continue to use drugs.  "Drug-free is the only approach that works; otherwise {former addicts} inevitably go back to the stuff," contends Stan Satlin, Daytop's communications director.  Daytop patients agree.  "I couldn't trust myself," says Teddy Weinert, a 38-year-old former cocaine addict and alcoholic who lives at Daytop's New York City facility and has almost completed the program.  "With coke," he says, "you need someone to force you to stop immediately -- cold turkey."  Just under half of the people entering the Daytop program stay with it for its full 18 months, but Daytop surveys show that 92.5% of those finishing the program stay drug-free.  Federal officials admit chagrin over their failure to keep track of what happens to their grants.  "There is very little data collection and very little evaluation," says Joseph Autry, associate administrator of the federal Alcohol, Drug Abuse and Mental Health Administration.  The agency, part of the Health and Human Services Department, will dispense $1.84 billion this fiscal year.  But it has lacked "the authority {and} the funding from Congress" for more than nominal oversight, Dr. Autry says.  The 1988 drug bill provided $40 million for a survey of 5% of the agency's state programs, but that hasn't begun yet, he adds.  A new push to emphasize demand-side efforts and research would be in direct contrast to the Reagan administration's approach.  While Nancy Reagan was exhorting children to "Just Say No to Drugs," her husband successfully pushed Congress to cut funding for treatment and prevention by 40% from 1981 through 1986.  Research money was cut so sharply that drug research practically dried up.  Much of the research money has been restored recently, but, meanwhile, scientists have refitted laboratories for other projects or chosen different fields where grant money is more plentiful, says Herbert Kleber, an addiction researcher at Yale University.  "Now, there is lots of {federal} money available for research, but no one to do it," says Dr. Kleber, who will serve as a deputy to Mr. Bennett.  Mr. Bennett, who advocates throwing first-time drug offenders into military-style boot camps, says he supports treatment but can't tell what works.  During a recent nationwide tour, he vowed to weed out "fly-by-night" treatment programs receiving federal aid and to favor those that emphasize coercion as well as therapy.  "Crack addicts don't just get up one morning and say, 'Hey, I think I'll go in for some treatment,'" Mr. Bennett argues.  "You have to force people sometimes."  Despite the delays and wasted federal money, some antidrug efforts are reaching their targets.  In the Baltimore County treatment program, two counselors see about 100 inmates a month in group sessions that focus on ways to kick cocaine and heroin.  Although the program hasn't been formally evaluated, experts agree that prison treatment ought to be expanded because, nationwide, up to 70% of inmates have drug problems, which should be dealt with before prisoners are released.  Federal money, combined with state funds, allowed Joseph S., a convicted check forger, to get off a heavy cocaine habit.  The wiry 24-year-old, who asked that his last name not be used, says the jail counseling program's simple message of self-reliance made him realize that "it's up to me; if I do the cocaine, I'm going to do the crimes" to get drug money.  Grateful for his treatment during a recently completed 18-month sentence, Joseph claims he hasn't used drugs for months, though they had been available in the jail.  Ms. DeLeonardis is pleased that more federal antidrug money may be coming, but she isn't counting on it.  "I'd expand the jail counseling," she says, "but who knows what will be 'in' next year in Washington and whether I'd have the money to pay the new counselors I'd like to hire."  ---  @ Federal Antidrug Spending by Strategy  @ (Fiscal years 1981-1989)  @ Border Interdiction $7.1 billion  @ Domestic Investigation $3.8 billion  @ Drug-Abuse Prevention $2.4 billion  @ Drug-Abuse Treatment $2.4 billion  @ Prisons $2.2 billion  @ International Investigation $1.1 billion  @ Prosecution $1.0 billion  @ State and Local Assistance $666 million  @ Intelligence $306 million  @ Regulatory Compliance $200 million  @ Research and Development $109 million  @ Source: U.S. General Accounting Office  Lomas Financial Corp. said it has completed the sale of its credit-card operations for $435 million in cash and $65 million in preferred stock to a group led by Merrill Lynch Capital Partners Inc.  The unit, Lomas Bankers Corp., is the nation's 11th-largest issuer of MasterCard and Visa credit cards, with 1.7 million customers and $1.35 billion in assets in the form of credit-card receivables.  Jess Hay, Lomas Financial chairman and chief executive officer, said proceeds from the sale of the unit will be used to retire a $375 million bridge loan provided by the financial-services concern's lead banks last month for liquidity purposes and to reduce other debt.  Mr. Hay said that because the Merrill Lynch group will assume the unit's debt, the sale will reduce Lomas Financial debt about 30% to $3.8 billion from $5.6 billion.  Lomas said Merrill Lynch Capital Partners, a subsidiary of Merrill Lynch & Co., will purchase Lomas Bankers through an acquisition corporation capitalized by the $65 million in preferred stock issued to Lomas Financial and $100 million in common stock purchased by other investors.  Additional capital will be provided by Morgan Guaranty Trust Co. and Merrill Lynch Capital Partners.  In addition to the preferred stock, Lomas said it agreed to buy $10 million in common stock in the acquiring corporation.  The financial-services concern had a loss of $282.4 million in the year ended June 30, including large reserves and write-downs on Texas real-estate holdings.  As part of the company's continuing efforts to restructure and reduce debt, Mr. Hay said Lomas still plans to sell its leasing subsidiary and restructure most of its other debt.  Petroleum prices were mostly higher, raising the possibility that the price slide of recent weeks may be nearing an end.  Some analysts suggested prices may already have bottomed, at least for the short term, with West Texas Intermediate, the U.S. benchmark crude, settling in a range of $17.50 to $18.50 a barrel and Middle East crudes holding around $15.  In U.S. futures trading yesterday, West Texas Intermediate for September delivery closed at $18.21 a barrel, up nine cents.  Crude contracts for later months closed 12 cents to 15 cents a barrel higher on the New York Mercantile Exchange.  Outside the U.S., spot prices of North Sea and Middle East crudes generally were five cents to 15 cents higher for the second day.  Still, these levels of prices generally are down $2 a barrel since the third week of July.  The declines have been blamed on continued high output by the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries and on some signs that third-quarter petroleum demand may be more sluggish than expected.  There is concern among some that these factors, particularly the high OPEC output, could trigger further erosion in oil prices over the weeks ahead.  "I think we will see a little more softening," said Neil Chandi, president of Crescent International Petroleum Ltd.  "There is a glut of crude around," he said.  So far, however, there is little evidence that the summer surge in OPEC output will result in a replay of last year's oil-market developments that caused the price of West Texas Intermediate to fall below $13 a barrel.  By most accounts, OPEC production is holding at around 21.5 million barrels a day.  That is around one million barrels a day more than had been expected for thirdquarter OPEC output.  But analysts note it hasn't yet meant a big buildup in the world's oil inventories.  "Inventories are still fairly balanced," said Edward N. Krapels, president of Energy Security Analysis Inc., a Washingtonbased firm that monitors oil supplies world-wide.  Crude oil stocks have increased recently.  Mr. Krapels's latest Euroil-stock report shows a buildup of nine million barrels in Europe's crude oil inventories.  According to the American Petroleum Institute, U.S. crude oil stocks rose 3.4 million barrels last week to a total of 333.5 million.  But these aren't burdensome levels.  U.S. crude inventories are well below the nearly 348 million barrels of a year ago.  Robert Boslego, a Winchester, Mass., consultant who analyzes U.S. oil statistics for clients, said there's a possible "price recovery in the short-term based on the fact that crude inventories have fallen to relatively low levels."  In other U.S. commodity markets yesterday:  GRAINS AND SOYBEANS: Corn-futures prices dipped as traders took to the sidelines in anticipation of the Agriculture Department's first official estimate of the fall harvests, which is slated for release after the close of trading today.  Some traders expect the government to project a corn harvest 53% larger than last year's drought-stunted crop.  Prices were also depressed by slow corn-export business, said Susan Leighty, an analyst at PrudentialBache Securities Inc., New York.  Wheat and soybean futures prices rose.  COPPER: Futures prices advanced modestly in light trading.  The September contract rose 0.60 cent a pound to $1.107.  One trader, Richard Hirsch of Sharps Pixley, New York metals brokers, observed that it was a "dog-days August market" for the most part.  "After a 15-cents-a-pound rally from early July, the market is now consolidating by holding steady," Mr. Hirsch said.  "When it's considered that this is the month when plants close, more in Europe than in the U.S., and interest in copper is seasonally at a low ebb, it is surprising that the September position, which has found support at the $1.10 level, is behaving as well as it is," he said.  An analyst said most of the focus by traders was on the strike at Highland Valley, British Columbia.  The mediator and the company and union are expected to resume talks today.  Earlier this week there were expectations that a solution might be reached this week, but the late start of the talks might delay that.  A contributing factor to New York's steadiness was an advance in London, which was stimulated by reports of some Chinese buying of copper, the analyst said.  The Chinese buying has been long awaited, and while it isn't aggressive, it is injecting a supporting tone, he said.  SUGAR: Futures prices rose.  The October contract ended with a gain of 0.26 cent a pound at 14.07 cents.  After several days of drifting lower, some support was uncovered at around the 13.75-cents level, said Judith Ganes, analyst for Shearson Lehman Hutton, New York.  Talk that India might buy 200,000 to 250,000 tons of physical sugar to make up for a domestic production shortfall helped boost futures prices, analysts said.  Ms. Ganes observed that over the long term, the fundamentals remain bullish.  Supplies are tight, she said, and any sign of significant physical-market purchases could spur a price rally.  She said over the near term, however, nervousness is being created by a lack of demand for physical sugar and the fact that there has been some aggressive selling of futures by sugar-trade concerns.  But another analyst said that while the unconfirmed reports of India being a possible buyer helped the market, "if they had indeed bought, there would have been a much stronger rally."  It was basically a market without any fundamental developments, he said.  A federal district judge found that the former head of a New York City Teamsters union local violated insider-trading laws by using information stolen from the law firm of Sullivan & Cromwell.  The former union official, Albert J. DeAngelis, was the sole defendant remaining in the case, which involved transactions from January 1981 through December 1982.  In its civil suit, the Securities and Exchange Commission charged Mr. DeAngelis with making illegal profits of $362,793 through the insider trading.  The judge ordered Mr. DeAngelis to disgorge all the profits, plus interest.  Criminal charges against Mr. DeAngelis were previously dropped.  The other defendants in the case included a former office manager at Sullivan & Cromwell and his stockbroker, who both pleaded guilty to criminal charges of insider trading in 1985.  The rest of the defendants in the case either lost or settled civil suits resulting in the disgorgement of their profits.  U.S. Judge Kimba M. Wood found that Mr. DeAngelis illegally used inside information when he traded in the securities of Marathon Oil Co., Penn Central Corp. and Signode Corp.  The information was obtained from the employee at Sullivan & Cromwell and then passed on to Mr. DeAngelis.  Mr. DeAngelis's attorney couldn't be reached for comment.  At the trial, Mr. DeAngelis claimed that he bought the stocks based on information he gleaned from articles in foreign newspapers and an article in a Teamsters booklet.  He was unable to produce those articles or to recall details of them in court, the judge said.  Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. may drive a hard bargain in negotiating corporate takeovers, but one of the company's drivers is apparently no bargain.  The California Tax Franchise Board said that Morris P. Siemel pleaded no contest to tax evasion yesterday in state municipal court.  Mr. Siemel, the tax board said, was the private chauffeur of George Roberts, the R of KKR, who now runs his own firm here.  Mr. Siemel was paid $173,000 for two years work as a chauffeur in 1986 and 1987, the tax board said.  That comes to $237 a day for every day of the two-year period, including Sundays and holidays.  The Franchise Tax Board's computer two years ago spotted that Mr. Siemel neglected to pay any state income taxes.  "The income showed up but there was no tax return," says Jim Reber, an agency spokesman.  "So we began to notify him.  We were in contact for two years, but no tax payments.  He left us no alternative."  The filing of criminal charges finally inspired Mr. Siemel.  Earlier this week, he paid more than $21,000 in back taxes.  Judge Paul Alvarado, taking the restitution into account, gave the driver 18 months probation and ordered him to perform 150 hours of community service.  Mr. Roberts's secretary said he is unreachable for two weeks, and she couldn't disclose where he is.  A spokesman for KKR said he wouldn't be saying anything about this.  But a source close to KKR said that "KKR employees make a base salary, and receive annual bonuses and profit sharing based on the company's performance. . . .  Over the last two years, they've done well.  A rising tide lifts all boats, even the ones that spring leaks."  Mr. Siemel didn't see anything funny about it.  "I had some problem with the tax board.  I took care of it.  I would rather not talk about anything."  Neither KKR nor Mr. Siemel would say whether he is still employed.  When asked whether driving Mr. Roberts around was worth $173,008, a tax official said: "That is something you ought to ask Mr. Roberts."  The pay does back up KKR, the king of leveraged buy-outs, in its assertions that takeovers are good for the common working stiff as well as tycoons.  Sir James Goldsmith selected three prominent Americans to serve as independent trustees of B.A.T Industries PLC's Farmers Group Inc. unit if the Anglo-French financier wins his #13.35 billion ($21.71 billion) takeover bid for B.A.T.  Sir James's bidding group needs U.S. clearance to secure control of Farmers, a big California insurer.  Sir James says he wants to sell Farmers.  Pending any sale, Sir James has pledged to put the group into an independent voting trust to guarantee Farmers' autonomy.  The independent trust arrangement is one of Sir James's strategies to win regulatory approval.  The three proposed trustees are Daniel Evans, former governor and senator of Washington; Shirley Hufstedler, former federal court judge and secretary of education under President Carter; and David Sherwood, chairman of the New York Insurance Exchange and former president of Prudential Insurance Co. Sir James said the three would "ensure that the interests of Farmers' policy holders are properly administered, regulated and protected."  A spokesman for B.A.T, which is battling the takeover attempt, said: "The issue isn't the people but the principle."  He added that appointing the individuals won't necessarily meet the state requirements for approval of any change in control of Farmers.  Officials at the Kansas and California state insurance departments said they hadn't been notified of the proposal.  Officials at several other state insurance departments said the proposal would be considered during the regulatory process, but none would comment directly on the qualifications of the proposed trustees.  Michaels Stores Inc., a company controlled by the Wyly family, said it agreed to be acquired for at least $98.3 million while another of the Wyly companies, USACafes L.P., said it is in talks regarding a possible sale.  Late yesterday, USACafes, a franchiser of Bonanza restaurants that is nearly half-owned by Sam and Charles Wyly, said it is holding discussions about the sale of the company, although it said there isn't any assurance that a transaction will occur.  A USACafes spokesman said he didn't know who the company was talking to about a possible sale.  He said the announcement was made in response to unusually heavy trading in USACafes securities.  The company's units closed at $9.375, up 37.5 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Also yesterday, Michaels, an arts and crafts retailer that is 30% owned by Sam and Charles Wyly, said it agreed to be acquired by an investment group that includes Grauer & Wheat Investments Inc. of Dallas and Acadia Partners L.P., a Fort Worth, Texas, partnership that includes the Robert M. Bass Group.  Terms of the offer call for the group to pay $9.50 in cash and $2.50 face value of a new preferred stock for each of Michaels' 10.3 million shares outstanding.  But analysts said they were uncertain of the total value of the transaction because they lacked specifics on how the preferred stock offering would be structured.  Michaels stock had been trading at about $7.50 a share prior to July 19 when the company announced it was holding talks with potential buyers.  Since then, the stock has fluctuated between $8 and $9.50 a share, closing at $10 a share, up $1.125, yesterday in heavy trading on the American Stock Exchange.  Michaels said that Sam Wyly and his family have granted the investment group, MSI Holdings, an option to acquire all stock, warrants and options held by them and would ask other stockholders to approve the merger at a meeting this fall.  The company said the transaction is also subject to regulatory approval and certain other conditions.  Neither Sam nor Charles Wyly could be reached for comment.  CMS Enhancements Inc., Tustin, Calif., said it was awarded the major share of a $55 million contract to distribute a new International Business Machines Corp. hard-disk storage unit for personal computers.  CMS said it will market the IBM 0661 hard-disk file under the name Cougar at a suggested retail price of $2,995.  The disk provides storage capacity equivalent to 160,000 double-spaced typed pages and can access information in an average of 12.5 milliseconds.  The disk is expected to be used with IBM and IBM-compatible personal computers as well as more powerful systems.  Federal banking regulators said they are considering whether to repudiate the above-market interest rates on certificates of deposits in troubled savings-and-loan institutions seized by the government.  As President Bush signed sweeping legislation that will enact an industry bailout and restructuring, regulators began wrestling with that issue and numerous others affecting deposit rates, how quickly sick S&Ls will be sold, and under what terms.  The process includes gearing up a new federal agency, the Resolution Trust Corp., which will dispose of insolvent thrifts and their assets under direction of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. Serving up the first slice of the $50 billion committed by the bill to sick thrifts, regulators said they will spend roughly $215 million this week to close, sell or merge three insolvent thrifts.  The three institutions are to be named today.  "With this bill's substantial funding, we will begin, here and now, to eliminate the ongoing losses of the insolvent firms," said Mr. Bush.  "I'm proud to sign this monster."  Already, federal officials have seized 262 insolvent S&Ls, in preparation for the bill's enactment.  By the end of 1991, officials expect to take control of as many as 425 additional sick S&Ls.  But depositors and industry executives will begin seeing the effects of the bill much sooner.  FDIC Chairman William Seidman said the RTC, which will have control of the sick S&Ls, hasn't yet decided whether to honor the above-market CD rates that the sick thrifts paid customers in order to attract funds.  Certificates of deposit, for example, could be cashed out earlier, reducing some of the interest due to the customer, while paying all of the principal.  While it has always been the policy of the FDIC to honor the CD rates and terms, Mr. Seidman said the future course "is still in discussion."  Before the government seized control, dozens of insolvent thrifts remained afloat solely because their unusually high rates brought in a flood of deposits, often in the form of $100,000 jumbo CDs.  The rates -- often one or two percentage points higher than solvent, healthy thrifts were offering -- were a bonanza for investors, who couldn't lose because federal deposit insurance backed them up if the institution ultimately went under.  A decision to pay off the CDs early would probably draw at least some support on Capitol Hill, but would infuriate the financial firms that collected deposits from investors and packaged them into $100,000 blocks.  Many congressmen have criticized so-called deposit brokers for funneling billions of dollars to insolvent thrifts when it was clear the government would eventually pick up the tab.  Whether that policy changes, administration officials believe that consumers will soon see a decline in rates paid to depositors.  As a result of a compromise with Congress over how the funds would be raised, $20 billion must be spent before the fiscal year ends Sept. 30.  About $15 billion of that will be pumped into sick thrifts, which have been driving up the deposit rates.  A decline in interest rates paid to depositors, a senior administration official said, is likely to be felt by Oct. 1.  Signing the bill, which authorizes spending at least $166 billion over 10 years, launched the dismantling of one federal agency and the birth of another.  On an easel next to Mr. Bush was a new seal to be placed in the windows of all S&Ls: "Deposits Fully Insured up to $100,000.  Backed with the Full Faith and Credit of the United States Government."  Meanwhile, at the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, the signs for the thrift insurance fund, the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp., were being removed and replaced with new logos for the Resolution Trust Corp.  The RTC's Oversight Board, which includes Federal Reserve Board Chairman Alan Greenspan, Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady, Housing Secretary Jack Kemp and other Treasury officials, met to determine what future deals by the FDIC to dispose of sick thrifts would look like.  Deputy Treasury Secretary John Robson was named interim president of the board.  Unlike transactions last year by thrift regulators at the Bank Board, the FDIC said it's likely to use cash to compensate buyers of sick thrifts for the bad assets they take on, rather than using notes or complex formulas that guarantee some form of return.  That policy will prevail even if the $50 billion to close ailing thrifts proves insufficient, and the government won't engage in "uneconomic deals," said presidential assistant Richard Breeden.  "What we won't do is follow the path of trying to stretch the dollars as FSLIC was forced to do . . . because they didn't have short-term cash to handle the problem," Mr. Breeden said.  "We're going to go after these deals and do it right, and do {the deals} at the lowest possible cost," he said.  "If we end up running out of money, fine, then we'll run out of money and end up asking for more."  ---  @ Under RTC Control  @ The 262 savings and loans institutions under the control of the Resolution Trust Corp. hold $89.3 billion in deposits.  The top 10 states, ranked by deposits, are:  @ TOTAL DEPOSITS NUMBER OF  @ (In millions) INSTITUTIONS  @ Texas $27,737 72  @ California 15,119 22  @ Arizona 7,761 5  @ Florida 4,370 13  @ Pennsylvania 4,226 4  @ Arkansas 2,943 12  @ Louisiana 2,799 27  @ Colorado 2,082 11  @ Minnesota 2,038 1  @ Illinois 1,969 15  @ NOTE: Data based on March 31, 1989, call reports.  The city of Los Angeles has spent roughly $1 million so far to keep some local entrepreneurs from competing against a cable-TV monopoly controlled out of Boston.  It apparently doesn't matter that the entrepreneurs are black, in a city with a black mayor and a stated policy of encouraging minority-owned businesses.  It's more that this is the tightly sealed world of cable television.  With a handful of exceptions, the roughly 9,000 cable franchises in the U.S. are monopolies, granted by local governments to a favored company, one usually partly owned by politically well-connected people.  Governments pass out such monopolies and fiercely defend them, yet don't regulate prices charged to customers.  The "franchise fees" that local governments charge cable operators rise with the revenues, and total hundreds of millions of dollars annually.  But the winds of competition are rustling in the cable business.  Two or three dozen communities now allow second cable companies to compete, estimates John Mansell, a senior analyst with Paul Kagan Associates, a media research firm.  Public unhappiness over service and rising prices is fueling the push for competition.  Just last week, the General Accounting Office released a study saying rates charged by cable operators for basic service jumped 29% between December 1986 and October 1988.  Preferred Communications Inc. has a suit pending in federal district court here aimed at forcing the city to grant it a franchise.  Preferred is owned by a group of local, mostly black investors, headed by two brothers, Clinton and Carl Galloway.  A win by Preferred could make it easier for competitors to get in the door nationwide.  Nationally, the status quo is a recipe for bad government and bad cable service, critics contend.  "It is one of the most corrupt processes imaginable," says Sol Schildhause, former chief of the cable-TV branch of the Federal Communications Commission and now a private attorney whose firm represents Preferred in its suit.  Defenders argue that cable television is one of those businesses, like a utility, that works best as a monopoly.  Given the expense and street disruption required to lay cable to every home in an area, putting in more than one system is simply a waste of resources and an annoyance for residents in the area, they say.  Operators argue that in some places competition was tried, but it failed, leaving a monopoly anyway.  "It's simply not viable to have two franchises in one area," says Marc Nathanson, chairman of Los Angeles-based Falcon Cable TV, which operates cable franchises nationwide.  Nor is price regulation necessary, cable operators say, because cable prices are held down by competition with regular, free broadcasters and other media.  Recent price surges were simply a "catch-up" for prior years when cable rates were regulated and artificially depressed, operators contend.  In Vidalia, Ga., John Collins and his Southland Cablevision Inc. are going head to head with a unit of Tele-Communications Inc., the biggest cable operator in the U.S.  Since Southland was launched in March 1988, it has taken about 2,000 of TCI's 4,800 cable customers, according to Mr. Collins, a former building contractor.  TCI says the number is lower than that, but won't be more specific.  Faced with a rival, TCI has slashed prices.  Mr. Collins says he meets those cuts in the parts of his service where he can afford to and resorts to guerrilla tactics when he can't cut prices.  After a recent 37% price cut by TCI on basic monthly service, Mr. Collins trumpeted his competitor's action in newspaper ads that ran in Georgia cities where TCI has cable monopolies and didn't cut prices.  "That should get them a few phone calls," Mr. Collins says.  TCI says it has received some calls because of the advertisements but doesn't expect any lasting damage.  The cable giant also vows to do all it can, within the law, to beat competitors.  And, a spokesman adds, "We expect to see more competition from the Collinses of the world."  Would-be competitors hope that's the case, but headway has been slow, especially in the courts.  The Galloways, for instance, have been trying for nearly a decade to get a franchise to serve the Watts district of Los Angeles and other parts of the city's largely black south-central area.  Their suit, which is already six years old, was originally dismissed.  Today, three years after the U.S. Supreme Court ruled in favor of reinstating the case, the brothers are still waiting for the judge in the case to set a trial date.  "I sometimes think it would be easier to get a trial in Russia," says Clinton Galloway, president and chief executive officer of Preferred Communications.  Los Angeles city officials say competition hasn't worked in other cities and won't work here.  With streets torn up to install lines, "there is a lot of disruption from building a second cable system," says Ed Perez, the assistant city attorney handling the Preferred suit.  The Galloway side argues that the city allows other private interests, from skyscraper construction to movie making, to inconvenience citizens in the pursuit of profit.  And as for economic viability, they want the marketplace to be the arbiter.  The Galloways, not surprisingly, say their real mistake was not playing politics with the powers that be.  In the late 1970s when the city invited interested parties to compete for the south-central franchise, the Galloways formed an investment group and submitted a bid.  But from early on there was city hall pressure to drop that bid and "get on the team," recalls Clinton Galloway.  The "team," he says, included friends and political allies of some of the black city council members and Mayor Tom Bradley.  At one point, the mayor himself held a private meeting with the Galloways and the others to urge such a combination.  The Galloways declined.  "We wanted to run our own cable company," says Clinton Galloway.  Later, in a deposition as part of the suit, Mr. Bradley testified that he was merely trying to "enhance" the chances of the franchise going to a black-owned firm.  In fact, the city council and mayor awarded the franchise to a white-controlled company named A Community Cable Entertainment/Services System Inc., and known as Access.  Kaufman & Broad Inc., the big Los Angeles-based homebuilder, originally owned 80% of Access; that stake is now held by Continental Cablevision, a big Boston-based cable operator. (Dow Jones & Co., publisher of this newspaper, formerly owned a 17% stake in Continental.) The remaining 20% of Access went to many of the same parties that had been proposed as partners to the Galloways.  Mr. Perez, the assistant city attorney, says there isn't any evidence of improper political influence in all this.  "But is the appearance bad?  Yes, the appearance is bad," he concedes.  Nor are appearances helped by two memos from Channing Johnson, one of the leading minority shareholders, to a top Bradley aide.  One says that "appropriate political support" might be needed in negotiating details of the deal with Kaufman & Broad.  The other memo notes that the distribution of some of the shares had to pass muster with a senior city councilman.  The Galloways insist the city simply never looked for improprieties, even though some seemed obvious candidates for review.  For instance, Mr. Johnson, before becoming a minority shareholder was a city council aide who actually helped set up the south-central franchise.  He then quit his city job and lobbied hard to get a piece of the franchise, despite a municipal ordinance that bars former city employees from certain types of lobbying activities.  Mr. Johnson denies any wrongdoing.  The district attorney's office conducted an investigation that consisted of trying to interview Mr. Johnson and his former city council boss.  When both refused to talk, the investigation was closed, according to a district attorney's report on the matter that the Galloways obtained.  Mr. Perez, the city official, says he hasn't closely examined the Johnson case, but in similar conflict-of-interest situations the city has interpreted the ordinance to apply only to a former official when he is representing another party.  If he is also representing himself as a part owner, it's legal, says Mr. Perez, though he clearly isn't completely comfortable with that interpretation.  "It's a loophole you could drive a Mack truck through," he says.  ---  @ Cable Television's Growing Reach  @ As cable becomes widespread ...  @ Households with basic cable available 86%  @ Households taking basic cable 52%  @ Households not taking basic cable 34%  @ Households with no basic cable available 14%  @ Users pay more for the service  @ AVERAGE CABLE REVENUE  @ MONTHLY PRICE FROM BASIC  @ OF BASIC CABLE SERVICES  @ (In dollars) (In millions of dollars)  @ 1980 $7.85 $1,648.5  @ 1981 8.14 2,100.1  @ 1982 8.46 2,678.6  @ 1983 8.76 3,101.0  @ 1984 9.20 3,632.2  @ 1985 10.25 4,366.5  @ 1986 11.09 5,083.7  @ 1987 13.27 6,552.7  @ 1988 14.40 7,724.7  @ Source: Paul Kagan Associates, Inc., Cable TV Investor  Del Webb Corp., Phoenix, Ariz., reported net income of $185,000 for the second quarter, compared with a loss of $832,000 a year earlier.  Revenue rose 46% to $35.3 million from $24.1 million.  Webb, which is restructuring into a developer of adult communities, has sold off most of its recreational and casino holdings.  During the quarter, Webb completed the restructuring of the Claridge hotel-casino in Atlantic City, N.J., ending its operating involvement with the property.  Philip J. Dion, Webb's chairman, noted that the small profit occurred despite a sharp downturn in the Arizona real estate market.  Mr. Dion said he doesn't expect to see any improvement in market conditions for at least several months.  For the six months, Webb posted a loss of $2.7 million, compared with a loss of $5 million a year earlier.  Revenue rose 28% to $51.7 million from $40.5 million.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Webb closed at $11, up 12.5 cents.  Southwest Gas Corp., Las Vegas, Nev., posted a 91% drop in second-quarter net income, to $388,000 from $4.3 million, or 21 cents a share, a year earlier.  Because of preferred-dividend requirements, there were no per-share earnings this year.  Consolidated revenue rose 7.8%, to $183.4 million from $170.2 million.  The natural-gas utility and savings and loan cited weather that was warmer than expected, lowering the normal demand for gas heat, and gasline-repair expenses.  On the thrift side, a 40% increase in interest expense more than offset the unit's 18% increase in interest income.  For the six months, net fell 8.8%, to $21.9 million, or $1.16 a share, from $24.1 million, or $1.32 a share, a year earlier.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Southwest Gas closed at $18.50, down 12.5 cents.  SOUTH CAROLINA'S withholding tax on certain proceeds of non-residents' sales of real estate there is to be collected by the buyer.  A recent Tax Report incorrectly said the seller is responsible for collecting the tax.  (See: "Tax Report: A Special Summary and Forecast of Federal and State Tax Developments" -- WSJ Aug. 9, 1989)  Wayne E. Hedien, 55 years old, was named a director of this retailing, financial services and real estate firm.  Mr. Hedien, chairman and chief executive officer of Allstate Insurance Group, fills a board vacancy left by former Allstate Chairman Richard J. Haayen who retired.  Jack Friedman, president and chief executive of LJN Toys Ltd., was named chairman of LJN, the toy products marketing unit of this diversified entertainment concern.  Lawrence J. Kirk Jr., 36, previously corporate director of planning for MCA, succeeds Mr. Friedman, 50, as president and chief executive of LJN.  CABLE: Turner Broadcasting System Inc.'s Cable News Network unit signed a five-year contract with Intersputnik, the Soviet satellite agency, to transmit CNN programming by satellite to India, Africa and Southeast Asia.  XEROX Corp. said 12.6 million shares were tendered at $68 or less under its recent self-tender offer.  The company didn't disclose the total number of shares tendered.  (See: "Business Brief -- Xerox Corp.: Stock Will Be Repurchased At $68 a Common Share" -- WSJ Aug. 9, 1989)  Walter F. Williams, president, chief executive officer and chairman of Bethlehem Steel Corp., was elected a director of this reinsurance holding company.  The board increased to 12 members.  In reinsurance, insurance firms give up part of their premiums to other companies, which then take on part of the risk.  Donald F. Swanson, 62 year-old retired vice chairman of General Mills Inc., was named chairman of this railroad concern, effective Sept. 20.  He succeeds Dennis M. Cavanaugh, 51, who is retiring.  Money Market Deposits-a 6.26%  Super-NOW Accounts-a 5.06%  Six-month Certificates-a 8.05%  One-year Certificates-a 8.01%  Thirty-month Accounts-a 7.93%  Five-Year Certificates-a 7.91%  U.S. Savings Bonds-b 7.81%  a-Average rate paid yesterday by 100 large banks and thrifts in the 10 largest metropolitan areas as compiled by Bank Rate Monitor.  b-Current annual yield.  Guaranteed minimum 6%.  Doskocil Cos. said it amended its agreement to sell the retail and fresh-meats division of its Wilson Foods Corp. unit, changing the price to about $150 million in cash, notes and equity from $140 million in cash.  Doskocil, a Hutchinson, Kan., maker of pizza toppings and deli meats, said WFC Acquisition Corp. has agreed to pay $110 million in cash; a seven-year, $35 million, payment-in-kind senior subordinated debenture; a $5 million subordinated, payment-in-kind note due next June 30; and equity equal to about 7% of the new company.  WFC, which is controlled by investor and Vail ski-resort owner George Gillett, also agreed to transfer ownership of his Peck Foods Corp. to WFC as part of the transaction.  Peck is a Milwaukee, Wis., processed-meats manufacturer.  The transaction is contingent upon WFC arranging financing.  Jerry Ruttenbur, 45 years old, was named vice president, network products, at Redmond, Wash.-based Nintendo of America Inc., the U.S. unit of this maker of game computers, effective in October.  Mr. Ruttenbur is a consultant to Nintendo and Time Inc.'s Home Box Office unit, where he previously was senior vice president, video division.  Louis M. Larson, formerly a senior vice president at Finalco Inc., was named president of James Madison Financial Corp., this bank holding company's leasing subsidiary.  Mr. Larson succeeds Thomas Scanlon, who retired earlier this year.  Before joining Finalco, Mr. Larson had sales-management positions at CPT Corp. and Xerox Corp.  Sierracin Corp. said it accepted a $15-a-share offer from a management-led group to acquire the 52% of Sierracin it doesn't already own.  Based on the company's 3.9 million shares outstanding, the offer has an indicated value of $30.4 million.  The offer was made in June by SCS Acquisition Corp., which includes Sierracin's chairman, Christoph Tribull, several other executives and Asahi Glass Co. of Tokyo.  In American Stock Exchange trading yesterday, Sierracin closed at $14.125, up 12.5 cents.  Sierracin, a maker of torque motors and windows for military and space applications, said the offer must be approved by holders and is subject to several other conditions, including settlement of a 1987 shareholder lawsuit.  The suit accused Mr. Tribull and other company officers of fraud, breach of fiduciary duty and sought Mr. Tribull's ouster.  Mr. Tribull has denied the allegations.  Roy J. Witten resigned as president and chief operating officer of this oil-field products concern to pursue other business interests.  The two posts were assumed on an interim basis by Alan H. Bush, chairman and chief executive officer.  Nicholas Stavropoulos was named chief financial officer and vice president-finance, a newly created postion.  The utility said four separate financial departments will report to Mr. Stavropoulos.  Previously Mr. Stavropoulos was vice president-rates & planning.  If First City Bancorp of Texas had had the last word, Roy Kimsey's back yard wouldn't be full of sexually aroused ostriches.  The big bank holding company, acquired in 1988 by a group led by former Chicago banker A. Robert Abboud, recently refused a loan request from Mr. Kimsey, an independent oil man and longtime customer who wanted to get into the increasingly lucrative ostrich business.  He needed $10,000 to buy a male to mate with the two females he keeps behind the house.  Spurned, he went instead to the locally owned United Bank, which stepped forward with the cash to buy a 400-pound bird named Bert.  "It just scares (First City) to death when I mention ostriches," says Mr. Kimsey of the episode.  "They said they'd be embarrassed to take it to their loan committee."  First City won't comment for publication about that.  Timid -- if not prudish -- lending is but one result of the new banking climate in Texas.  As out-of-staters, ranging from New York's Chemical Banking Corp. to Banc One Corp. of Columbus, Ohio, finish picking up the pieces of the state's battered banks, Texans are struggling to make some adjustments.  The newcomers have introduced scores of newfangled retail banking "products" and waged a fierce marketing war.  But it doesn't all boil down to easy credit.  Banks these days are taking pains to avoid anything like the disastrous real-estate and energy loans that brought down their predecessors.  Freewheeling lending practices have gone the way of the Texas longhorn.  So has the quaint old notion that a bank should try to carry its customers through hard times.  Perhaps most galling of all to proud sons of the Lone Star State is the impression they have that bean-counting interlopers have seized control of their economic destiny.  In an era of branch banking and centralized decision-making, business borrowers complain that local banks owned by big holding companies have lost their autonomy and their commitment to local development.  Many customers have lost something too: Their loyalty to the local bank.  Here in Midland, the epicenter of the state's devastated oil industry, the banking upheaval is taken very personally.  Attempts to introduce banking procedures common enough elsewhere -- like credit checks and loan application forms -- have customers in a fury that isn't likely to subside soon.  "There's going to have to be some funerals around here to change that thinking," sighs a local officer with NCNB Texas National Bank, a unit of NCNB Corp. of Charlotte, N.C.  NCNB has had a particularly rough reception from Texans who have mocked it, variously, as "No Credit for No Body"; "Nobody Cares, Nobody Bothers"; and "Name Change National Bank."  A big peeve in Midland is that local officials of the bank can't seem to make decisions without approval from headquarters.  "I think it's absolutely terrible that several banks in Midland are owned by outside interests," says oil man John Cox.  He and several other prominent citizens declined an NCNB offer to join a "senior advisory board," contending that the local people weren't really going to have any control over decisions.  Times really have changed.  When the First National Bank of Midland was independent, locals eagerly served on its board, which was a true board of directors.  And why not?  First National spent nearly a century backing every civic improvement project imaginable, from the town square to the Boy Scouts to a hospital in town.  It lent money, made donations and encouraged others to do likewise.  It grubstaked many of the city's businesses and carried indebted ranchers through droughts, sometimes over the objections of federal bank examiners punctilious about lending standards.  But it was here that the Texas banking crisis began, with the 1983 collapse of First National.  Owned by millionaire oil men, the bank fell victim to the get-rich-quick hysteria of the late-1970s oil boom, eventually making loans to just about anybody who asked for one.  At least it seemed that way.  First National made it easier for a loan officer to grant a loan than to deny it: Rejections, unlike approvals, required a superior's signature.  "People had so much money, they were punching holes they knew had no chance of hitting oil," says Harry Spannaus, the executive vice president of the Permian Basin Petroleum Association.  One local wheeler-dealer even bragged of getting a $50,000 loan -- which he then used to bet on the Super Bowl.  When oil prices plummeted, First National was doomed.  Over the next five years, as bad loans took their toll across the state, the bank was taken over by RepublicBank Corp., which then merged with InterFirst Corp. to form First RepublicBank Corp., by far the state's largest bank holding company.  And when it collapsed, in 1988, its banks were auctioned off to NCNB in the largest federally assisted bank bailout ever. (First Republic isn't related to First Republic Bancorp.  Inc. of San Francisco.)  Now NCNB is trying to win back the town -- at times rather clumsily.  The bank's commercials invited Texans to Chairman Francis "Buddy" Kemp's Dallas office for coffee.  In Midland, the bank retained 87year-old John Butler, a former chairman of First National, as a consultant and gave him a big corner office where he could visit with patrons.  But while it serves free coffee and soft drinks with one hand, NCNB is busy throttling some longtime customers with the other.  The bank has tossed nearly $7 billion of doubtful loans into its special-asset division, where all losses are covered by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp.  As manager of the division, which is aptly called "SAD," NCNB comes under regulatory pressure to get the loans off the books, either by forcing borrowers to refinance them elsewhere or by foreclosing and selling the collateral.  The arrangement -- regarded by Wall Street as a major plus for NCNB -- gives the bank little incentive to work out delicate loan restructurings in tough times, or to give borrowers the benefit of the doubt.  Indeed, NCNB has been known to put some performing loans into the SAD if the value of the collateral has been eroded (which has happened in Texas real estate) or if the bank decides that the borrower's cash flow stands to decline.  Thus, a former Midland mayor awoke recently to find that NCNB had tossed all five of his business loans onto the scrap heap for liquidation -- even though he wasn't behind in any payments and only one of his oil operations was experiencing cash-flow problems.  The politician was able to refinance his loans, mostly through competing banks that didn't think he was quite the risk NCNB adjudged him to be.  But he frets that many others won't be as fortunate, and he worries that NCNB's aversion to risk is hobbling the town's economic recovery efforts.  Nor does the new regime at the bank seem to put much stock in old loyalties.  In 1982, when Thomas C. Brown was one of the town's highest-flying oil men, he led a campaign to save the struggling First National.  At the request of the bank's president, he and a small group of wealthy investors bought First National's headquarters building at an inflated price, allowing the bank to book a profit for the year.  But now that the boom times are gone -- along with his three Falcon 10 jets -- Mr. Brown is quarreling with NCNB over how to repay more than $20 million in old personal loans.  "They were great people," the 62-year-old Mr. Brown says of the old First National management.  "But that's history."  An NCNB spokeswoman in Midland declines to comment on this or other loans, saying the bank "doesn't discuss specific customer relationships."  In the view of some people in Midland, NCNB is hardly the only bad guy to swagger into town.  All of the bailed-out banks suffer from the reputation, earned or not, that all they do is collect deposits and send them out of state, while ignoring local businesses starved for credit.  According to statistics compiled by Sheshunoff & Co., a research outfit in Austin, Chemical's Texas Commerce Bancshares unit last year had lent out just 24% of its gross deposits; First City lent 57%; the Texas American Bancshares unit here, which was recently taken over by Deposit Guaranty Bank in Dallas, had a mere 26% of its deposits out in loans.  By contrast, locally owned United has put 71% of its deposits to work in the community as loans, while locally owned Midland American Bank lent 61%.  NCNB doesn't release branch financial figures.  The numbers -- which are gleefully circulated by the independents -- have local business people steaming.  "The only way you can get a loan is by putting up an arm or a leg or maybe both, near as I can figure," says Donna King, whose company makes oil-well blowout preventers in nearby Odessa.  Holding-company bankers tend to blame their low loan-to-deposit ratios on the battered local economy, which has savaged balance sheets.  "Anybody who has a viable and doable loan request will certainly get their loan request granted," says Matthew Murphy, the president of NCNB-Midland, who denies that branch managers have lost any lending authority.  "Unfortunately, there are lots of people coming in with loan requests who aren't qualified."  Students of banking say it is more complicated than that.  For one thing, the newcomers generally have imposed much stricter credit policies than their predecessors had.  With statewide networks, the holding companies understandably divert resources from towns like Midland to places with more economic potential.  And local managers don't have the authority to embroider on the rules -- that bankers once enjoyed.  When a large petroleum products distributor learned he needed five levels of approval for a simple revolving credit line, for example, he closed his account with NCNB.  The last straw, he says, was NCNB's insistence that his customers -- who are scattered across West Texass -- end their payments to a Dallas address for the sake of efficiency.  He protested, but to no avail.  Having to send checks to Dallas, he says, doesn't make people feel they are dealing with a local company.  "Our competitors would have had a field day," he says.  The big banks' rocky start in Midland has created opportunities for aggressive independents like United Bank -- which got Mr. Kimsey's ostrich business, the miffed distributor's account and some of the former mayor's business.  Started in 1983 by local businessmen, United has an asset base that has swelled from virtually nothing to nearly $200 million.  Belying the notion that good borrowers can't be found hereabouts, United has been quite profitable, keeping its nonperforming loan ratio to a healthy 0.78% of total loans last year while racking up earnings of $2.3 million.  United's directors have used their local contacts to woo customers from the competition.  Cadell Liedtke, a 34-year-old oil man and board member, says he vouched for a friend who needed a quick $80,000 to close an oil deal because a competing bank was moving too slowly.  "He paid that loan off in 90 days, and we still have his business," Mr. Liedtke says.  But despite the initial successes of community-run banks like United, many independents fear they will eventually be squeezed out by the big boys.  With deep pockets -- and the ability to keep down overhead by consolidating back-office functions -- the big bank holding companies can offer depositors rates independents may not be able to match for very long.  Nor can they match the holding companies' marketing might.  The out-of-staters have poured millions into advertisements touting smorgasbords of new retail banking products.  So Texas consumers -- who used to take a back seat to commercial clients -- are flocking to the new accounts, even as businessmen howl about the banks' tightfisted lending.  In less than a year, Texas Commerce signed up more than 54,000 Texas households in its OnePlus program, a consumer account promoted by parent Chemical that links savings, checking and certificates of deposit and bundles everything into one monthly statement.  As a retail lender in the days when real bankers wouldn't deign to touch a car loan when they could be doing multimillion-dollar oil deals, Jolene Trolinder, a vice president at the Midland branch, felt out of it.  But now, NCNB flies her to Dallas for occasional morale building.  She has won a bonus for meeting her lending goals -- a portable TV set -- and she is angling for the grand prize, a Caribbean cruise.  Still, for many Midlanders, this new, uncharted territory is confusing at best.  Gone forever are the days when Midland oil barons plunked their millions into local banks at passbook rates and thought they were doing the right thing.  Now, the smart money moves around a lot.  "There's no loyalty any more," says a Texas banker of the old school who is now an NCNB officer.  "If (customers) can get a half a percent more at some S&L on a $100,000 CD, they'll go there.  If it's an Iranian bank north of town they'll go there.  They don't give a damn who owns it."  Gone forever, too, are the days when Midland borrowers could get funds on the strength of a handshake.  Now, like everybody else, they have to bother with loan applications and credit investigations.  A local real-estate broker recalls the client who flew into a rage when a bank asked him to fill out an application for a mortgage loan.  The client, who had more money in a CD at the bank than he was requesting for the loan "was ready to cancel the whole deal," the broker says.  For bank employees, the new age in Texas banking hit like a neutron bomb.  The old First National building remains, but under NCNB, 210 people work in the facility that once was home to nearly 1,000.  Most left soon after First National failed.  And the 24th-floor board room, which commands the best view in town, is now a restaurant.  At 2:30 one afternoon, H.L. Brinson, with a neatly clipped white mustache and cowboy hat, shuffles in, passing empty teller cages and circling the nearly deserted customer lounge.  Dejected, the 78-year-old rancher and oil man turns to leave: "I'm looking for someone who's been here for 40 years like me," he explains.  "But I can't find anybody."  Wednesday, August 9, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9 1/2% high, 9 1/16% low, 9 1/2% near closing bid, 9 5/8% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.70% 15 to 43 days; 8.50% 44 to 59 days; 8.25% 60 to 89 days; 8% 90 to 119 days; 7.875% 120 to 149 days; 7.75% 150 to 179 days; 7.375% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.75% 30 days; 8.60% 60 days; 8.50% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.14% one month; 8.09% two months; 8.04% three months; 7.97% six months; 7.89% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.70% one month; 8.55% three months; 8.45% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.65% 30 days; 8.48% 60 days; 8.32% 90 days; 8.20% 120 days; 8.13% 150 days; 8.05% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% one month; 8 13/16% to 8 11/16% two months; 8 3/4% to 8 5/8% three months; 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% four months; 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% five months; 8 9/16% to 8 7/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 7/8% one month; 8 3/4% three months; 8 9/16% six months; 8 1/2% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, August 7, 1989,auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.94% 13 weeks; 7.70% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days.10.06%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 9.91%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.80%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.51%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  United Technologies Corp. was given a $188.7 million Navy contract for 18 Seahawk helicopters.  Lockheed Corp.'s Lockheed Support Systems Inc. received a $15.3 million Air Force contract for aircraft maintenance at Reese Air Force Base in Texas.  Allied-Signal Inc. won an $11.9 million Army contract for auxiliary power units.  Perkin-Elmer Corp. got an $11.4 million Army contract for advanced electron-beam lithography equipment.  E. Douglas Kenna, 64 years old, was elected chairman of this maker of roofing materials and computer tape.  He had been a director and succeeds Malcolm C. Myers, 65, who remains a director.  Neither has an operating role at the company.  The Nevada Gaming Control Board voted to extend the gaming license of the troubled Aladdin hotel-casino in Las Vegas until Oct. 11, giving owner Ginji Yasuda time to explore a sale of the property.  The casino is scheduled to be auctioned Sept. 6 unless Mr. Yasuda pays off a $32.5 million mortgage or files for protection under federal bankruptcy laws.  Mr. Yasuda, who is said to be ill, didn't appear at the hearing held in Carson City, Nev.  Mr. Yasuda, a Korean-born businessman raised in Japan, was the first foreigner licensed to operate a casino in Nevada.  He bought the Aladdin for $54 million in 1986, and spent more than $20 million refurbishing it.  Among other restrictions, the state agency required Mr. Yasuda to fully disclose personal loans.  Board members raised concerns about Mr. Yasuda's financial and personal associations since his license was first granted.  Mr. Yasuda's lawyers weren't reachable to comment.  The investment banking firm promoted 18 people to the level of senior managing director.  In New York, those promoted were Michael J. Abatemarco, controller; Kevin J. Finnerty, mortgage-backed securities; William S. Gersten, convertible bonds; David H. Glaser, mergers and acquisitions; Nancy Havens-Hasty, bankruptcy group; Richard S. Hurwitz, high-yield group; Michael D. Luce, corporate finance; Marcia Myerberg, mortgage-backed securities; Craig M. Overlander, fixed income sales management; Aldo Parcesepe, over-the-counter; and Gary Schneider, research.  In Los Angeles those promoted were Andrew E. Haas, retail office co-manager; William Powers, fixed income sales management; and Anthony P. Skvarla, retail office co-manager.  Also, Sheldon I. Stein, corporate finance in Dallas; Stuart Lucas, fixed income trading/sales in London; Howell T. Evans, retail management in Boston; and Roland N. Livney, fixed income sales management in Chicago were promoted to the senior managing director level.  Robert E. Kleehamer, president and chief operating officer, was named to the additional post of chief executive officer, effective Oct. 1.  Mr. Kleehamer, 47, will succeed B.J. Adkins, 59, who will continue as chairman.  The Securities and Exchange Commission filed insider-trader charges against an employee of Hadson Corp., asserting that he, a friend and his mother-in-law bought stock in Ultrasystems Inc. just before the company agreed in 1987 to be acquired by Hadson.  In a complaint filed in U.S. District Court here, the SEC charged that Dennis W. Evans, who was the controller of Ultrasystems' defense and space subsidiary, overheard a conversation between two executives of the company as they discussed the pending Hadson deal.  He then allegedly purchased 2,000 shares of Ultrasystems stock, making several thousand dollars in profit.  Mr. Evans, 37 years old, who stayed on as controller of Hadson's defense systems unit after the Ultrasystems takeover, couldn't immediately be reached.  But Robert Capps, a corporate vice president at Hadson's Oklahoma City headquarters, said, "it's my understanding he has denied any wrongdoing."  The complaint said that on Oct. 28, 1987, Mr. Evans called a friend, asking him to open a brokerage account and accumulate Ultrasystems shares.  The friend, who wasn't identified, allegedly purchased 3,000 shares, keeping 1,000 for himself.  On Oct. 29, the complaint said, Mr. Evans' mother-in-law bought 800 Ultrasystem shares after he advised her to do so.  On Oct. 30, the boards of Ultrasystems and Hadson announced their intent to merge.  Ultrasystems' common stock rose to $9 a share in American Stock Exchange composite trading, before closing at $8.75, up from $5.875 the day before.  Harry J. Weiss, the assistant director for the SEC's enforcement division in Washington, said that he estimated the total amount made by Mr. Evans, his friend and mother-in-law, to be about $10,000.  Compared with large insider-trading cases brought recently by the SEC, "it's a small amount of money," Mr. Weiss said.  Nonetheless, he said, "it shows the commission is not reluctant to bring a case against corporate insiders."  The SEC said it hadn't any plans to bring action against Hadson, the friend or the mother-in-law.  Mr. Weiss declined comment when asked if there are any others connected to the case who might be prosecuted.  The SEC is asking the court to require Mr. Evans to pay back the full amount he, his friend and mother-in-law made in their stock purchases, as well as other unspecified damages.  Karl Gerlinger, 50 years old, was named president and chief executive officer of the BMW of North America Inc. unit, succeeding Gunter Kramer, who remains chairman.  Mr. Gerlinger was the senior executive responsible for the parent auto maker's sales operations in West Germany, Belgium, Switzerland, the Netherlands and Austria.  William Cunningham, 50 years old, was named vice president, world-wide manufacturing operations, at this computer company, succeeding Frank P. Silkman, who retired as senior vice president, manufacturing.  Mr. Cunningham was formerly vice president and general manager of the world-wide manufacturing, distribution, and research and development groups at Apollo Computer Inc.  William G. Burns, Kenneth A. Himmel and Robert P. Mastrovita were named directors of Boston Co., expanding board membership to 16 at the Boston-based unit, which provides private banking, institutional fund management and mutual fund administrative services.  Lillian Vernon Corp. said its founder and chairman, Lillian Vernon Katz, sold 400,000 shares to a group of overseas investors.  A spokesman for the Mount Vernon, N.Y., mail-order catalog company said Mrs. Katz "needed the money for personal reasons."  The shares were sold for $21.50 a share, or $8.6 million.  Mrs. Katz still owns 1.9 million, or 31%, of the company's nearly 6.2 million shares.  The company has filed a registration statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission covering resale of the shares.  The spokesman said, however, that the filing was only a technicality.  The overseas investors, he said, "hold on to stocks longer.  They're more steady, stable investors" than are U.S. institutions and aren't expected to sell the shares anytime soon, he said.  In composite trading on the American Stock Exchange, Lillian Vernon shares closed at $23.50, down 50 cents.  Samuel B. Hayes III, 52-year-old president and chief executive officer of Boatmen's National Bank, a unit, was named a vice chairman of this bank holding company.  He retains his posts at the bank unit.  Cummins Engine Co., Columbus, Ind., said it lowered the threshold that triggers the holder rights plan adopted in 1986.  The maker of diesel engines said that under the amendment, the rights will "flip-in" if a party acquires a 15% ownership position in the company's stock outstanding, unless the party acquiring the stock divests itself to below 15% within five business days.  The rights previously would be triggered at a 25% stake.  Cummins also said the plan was amended to provide its board with an option to redeem rights after a concern acquires 15% or more of its stock by simultaneously issuing new rights that entitle the holder to buy one common share for $1.  The company said the amendments are in response to recent developments, including stakes acquired by Industrial Equity (Pacific) Ltd. and Hanson PLC.  Last month, Industrial Equity disclosed that it had taken a 9.9% stake in Cummins and said it might acquire as much as 25%.  In December, Hanson disclosed that it had taken a 8.32% stake, but descendants of the Cummins founding family purchased that stake last month.  Stephen L. Barr, vice president, corporate finance, at Texas Commerce Bank in Houston, was elected a director of this producer of oil and natural gas, expanding board membership to eight.  General Motors Corp. is setting its 1990 U.S. car market share goal at 37% -- a relatively modest target that still may be difficult to achieve.  At an industry management seminar here yesterday, Executive Vice President Lloyd E. Reuss also said excess production capacity in North America will force some manufacturers to close some plants "for a while" but he declined to comment on analysts' expectations that GM will be one of those manufacturers.  Mr. Reuss said GM is counting on new products in the coming model year to help boost its car and truck market share.  He said GM's "objective" for the car market is 37%, compared with just under 36% currently.  If GM were to meet its goal, 1990 would be the first year since 1984 that the No. 1 auto maker's car-market share rose from the year-earlier level.  In 1984, GM's portion of the car market stood at 44.5%.  Mr. Reuss said GM could gain "a (percentage) point" of truck market share with new offerings including the futuristic APV minivan.  GM's current U.S. truck market share is about 33%.  Over the past few months, GM along with Ford Motor Co. and Chrysler Corp., have cut production temporarily at a number of plants to balance inventories with sales.  But longer term, analysts have predicted that the U.S. auto industry will have the ability to build some two million more vehicles than consumers are likely to demand, requiring permanent plant shutdowns for companies with unpopular products.  Mr. Reuss generally agreed with that concept, saying: "The market's going to decide" how much capacity is too much.  But he said it would be a "disservice" to GM employees to speculate on which plants might close, "because we don't know exactly what the volumes are going to be."  He agreed that there is overcapacity in North America, adding that: "The facts of life over the next few years (are that) there are going to be some plants idle for a while for the industry . . .  There are going to be shifts off here and there . . .  But at this point in time, no one knows who'll be running and who won't."  Among the new products GM is introducing for 1990 are four-door versions of its latest generation of midsized family cars.  The first of these is the Chevrolet Lumina, which dealers say is selling respectably, but isn't a smash hit.  New products alone aren't enough to boost market share.  GM has brought out several new vehicles during the last five years, including a new batch of luxury cars that were supposed to increase sales and GM's slice of the market, but didn't.  Over the next year, GM faces increasing competition from rival companies, particularly Japanese auto makers with plants in North America.  GM also is under pressure because its fixed costs are among the highest in the industry at a time when overcapacity is forcing auto makers to discount their products and slash profit margins.  Of the Big Three auto executives who spoke at yesterday's seminar, Mr. Reuss was the most bullish about the U.S. market.  He predicted that sales of all cars and trucks here next year will come in around 15 million vehicles, about the same as GM's expectation for this year.  Both Chrysler and Ford, however, are predicting sales in 1990 will come in below 15 million.  Ford Executive Vice President Philip E. Benton, Jr. said Ford hasn't established an official company forecast yet, but he would estimate 1990 sales "down a bit" from 1989, possibly in the 14.5 million range.  Chrysler Vice Chairman Gerald Greenwald was the most bearish of the three, saying sales could dip as low as 14.2 million vehicles next year -- 9.4 million cars and 4.8 million trucks.  Mr. Greenwald said Chrysler hasn't any plans "at present" to close any of its plants, but he said he does expect some plant closings at other companies.  All three executives agreed sales incentives will have to continue indefinitely.  Where once rebates and cut-rate financing served as a temporary spur for a lagging market, incentives now have become "the means by which we modulate effective prices month by month," said Mr. Greenwald.  Outlet Communications Inc., Providence, R.I., said it plans to sell two radio stations and two television stations to closely held Chase Communications Inc. of Hartford, Conn., for $120 million.  Outlet said the two parties have exchanged a letter of intent for the sale of radio stations WTOP-AM and WASH-FM in Washington, D.C., and television stations WXIN-TV in Indianapolis and WATL-TV in Atlanta.  It said the transaction is subject to a definitive agreement and approval by both companies' boards.  Outlet's chairman and chief executive officer, David Henderson, said the planned sale resulted from a strategic plan developed by First Boston Corp., which was hired by Outlet in April.  The company said it will continue to review options with respect to the operations of its two remaining television stations, WJAR-TV in Providence and WCMH-TV in Columbus, Ohio.  M/A-COM Inc., Burlington, Mass., said it signed a definitive agreement to sell its government systems division for about $70 million to a group of current and former senior managers of the division.  M/A-COM said the sale will result in a gain for the company but declined to estimate the gain or predict when it would be recognized.  The maker of electronic parts for the defense industry had announced in June its intention to sell the division, which contributed about 15% of its fiscal 1988 sales of $424.2 million.  Northrop Corp. said a federal judge here dismissed a $3 million civil suit brought by the government against the defense contractor for allegedly falsifying test data on MX missile-guidance equipment.  Northrop said the ruling vindicates its position that the company's MX components "have consistently met or bettered Air Force reliability requirements" since entering service three years ago.  The company added: "The accuracy, after 18 successive successful test flights, is better than contracted for."  Justice Department officials couldn't be reached for comment yesterday.  The performance of the MX guidance system had been under heavy congressional attack in 1987 when the department's Washington headquarters filed its civil case here.  At one point, a federal grand jury also was examining Northrop's handling of its MX work, seeing if it double-billed the Defense Department for certain parts and threw out other parts owned by the government.  Slowly, however, the outcry has died down.  Last year, the Justice Department declined to join private litigation claiming fraud in the company's making of MX missile equipment.  It said at the time that "there is not a sufficient basis" to enter the case.  The U.S. attorney's office here also asked the court two years ago to toss out a suit by two former Northrop employees alleging that the company was knowingly using defective parts on the MX.  The employees' action, brought under the federal False Claims Act, sought $150 million in damages and asked the government to take over the matter.  But the Justice Department said that to invoke the False Claims statute -- and to share in any recovery -- plaintiffs must make fresh contentions to the government.  The department explained that it already knew of the allegations before the employees' suit was filed and, therefore, decided to pursue its own case instead.  The employees' suit was dismissed in April 1988 on the grounds that it offered the government no new information.  Northrop said yesterday that the government's suit, which alleged fraud and False Claims Act violations, arose when a heat exchanger and another part of the MX guidance system were damaged during a test.  The company said it will now reimburse the Pentagon $45,050 for the broken equipment.  Northrop noted that the case was "dismissed with prejudice," meaning that it can't be reopened.  However, the company still faces a number of other legal challenges.  It is currently under indictment for allegedly falsifying tests on the air-launched cruise missile and the Harrier fighter jet.  Congressional investigators, moreover, continue to look into charges that the company broke the law in an effort to market F-20 fighters to South Korea.  What Newport Electronics Inc.'s board has said is good enough for shareholders apparently isn't good enough for two directors.  Newport, a maker of electronic measuring devices, said Chairman Barret B. Weekes, its largest holder with an 18.6% stake, and another director notified the company that they intend to tender their shares to High Technology Corp. Newport Electronics has recommended an offer competing with High Technology's bid, which was recently sweetened to $11 a share from $9.50 a share.  The High Technology offer is for 35% of Newport.  Newport, of Santa Ana, Calif., has recommended acceptance of a $9-a-share offer for the whole company from Sensor Control Corp., a Sunnyvale, Calif., maker of pressure sensors and gauges.  The recommendation came over the objection of Mr. Weekes.  The other director planning to tender his shares to High Technology, according to Newport, is Norman Gray, an electronic-engineering consultant to Newport.  Newport said Mr. Gray and his wife hold about 6% of the company.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Newport closed at $8.75 a share, down 50 cents.  With 1.1 million shares outstanding, the indicated market value of Newport is $9.6 million.  Meanwhile, High Technology, a Stamford, Conn., company controlled by self-employed engineer Milton B. Hollander, announced that it was extending its offer until 12:01 EDT Tuesday.  The offer had been set to expire today.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing last month, the Newport board said accepting the High Technology offer might, among other things, subject Newport to paying Sensor a $300,000 breakup fee.  In responding to High Technology's sweetened $11-a-share offer earlier this week, Newport said it "believes the potential acquisition of all its common stock, instead of a partial tender offer for only 35%, is in the best interests of shareholders."  In an interview yesterday, Mr. Weekes said, "I'm one individual out of five on the board" and added that he only recently made up his mind to sell his shares.  When asked if he and Mr. Gray might be helping trigger the $300,000 breakup fee, Mr. Weekes said, "It could be construed that way.  I prefer not to comment on that."  Mr. Gray declined to comment.  Sensor President James Hawkins said, "We agree with Newport's board that our tender offer, combined with our back-end merger, is a better value for shareholders."  High Technology officials couldn't immediately be reached.  Seeing "big, big trouble" coming for newspapers, the publisher of Canada's Globe & Mail says he is trying to "reinvent" the paper for the 1990s.  "I feel like I'm starting all over again," says A. Roy Megarry, who has been publisher of the Globe for the past 11 years.  Toward his goal, almost every senior editor and bureau chief at the nationally circulated newspaper has been replaced since Mr. Megarry abruptly sacked its editor-in-chief on the day after Christmas.  Last month he broke newspaper tradition by giving the new editor-in-chief some of the functions normally handled by marketing and circulation departments.  Next month, the Globe will begin distributing regional magazines in Montreal and Western Canada to people who don't subscribe to the paper, but have what Mr. Megarry calls "Globe demographics."  And, before the year is out, Mr. Megarry says his staff will begin selecting several thousand readers for an experiment that links a subscription to the newspaper with access to its Info Globe data base of newspapers' articles and business information.  In the 1990s, he sees the Globe becoming a print-and-electronic hybrid: summaries and analysis in the paper, statistics and details on the home computer.  Most risky, perhaps, is what the current editor-in-chief, William Thorsell, calls "untangling the Toronto roots of the newspaper."  The newspaper's city desk has been abolished and reporters told to put a "national spin" on their stories, even though 190,000 of the Globe's 330,000 circulation is within an hour's drive of the city.  "They are gambling with those (Toronto) readers.  Needless to say, this opens some opportunities for us," says John Honderich, editor of the rival Toronto Star.  But Mr. Megarry wants to serve a national elite rather than a geographical area.  He doesn't care if his readers turn to another newspaper for local news, as long as they depend on the Globe for business, national, world and arts coverage.  "Let the other newspapers give them the sports they want.  We'll use the money somewhere else, to do the things we do best and do them better," he says.  Mr. Megarry, 52, is a sandy-haired immigrant from Northern Ireland, with a reputation for making abrupt decisions and vigorously pursuing them.  A few years ago, he charged off in the other direction, fighting the Toronto Star and Toronto Sun for local circulation with a new metro section, a "city living" section, a local afternoon edition and a former Toronto mayor as a columnist.  The costly campaign had little effect on the Globe's Toronto circulation and was dropped.  "I'm embarrassed by all this, but it would have been more embarrassing if we'd stuck to the strategy," Mr. Megarry says.  Mr. Megarry left school at 15 and learned accounting at a Belfast linen mill.  He came to Toronto four years later, pursuing a Canadian girl he later married.  He advanced rapidly as an accountant and executive with Canadian companies.  Mr. Megarry was named publisher of the Globe in 1978 after serving as vice president for corporate development of Torstar Corp., which publishes the Toronto Star.  Over the next decade, Mr. Megarry repositioned the Globe by pouring resources into satellite printing-plants and the business section.  The Globe became truly national, publishing in six cities across Canada.  The business section, once limited to 16 pages, is now often thicker than the rest of the paper.  Several years ago, he also launched six slick magazines, from a business monthly to a fashion quarterly, that are distributed free with the newspaper.  Domestic bureaus were added or expanded and the foreign staff was increased.  The 145-year-old Globe has targeted high-income readers so well that its advertising rates are higher than the Star's, which has much more circulation.  The paper's earnings are buried in the accounts of Toronto's Thomson Corp., which owns it, but Mr. Megarry says they are the highest ever this year and ad revenue is up 9%.  So why reinvent it?  Partly because the Financial Post, a new national business daily, began snapping at the Globe's heels last year.  But also because of Mr. Megarry's forecast of trouble in the '90s for newspapers in general.  He points to declining readership, competing methods of advertising and dwindling reader loyalty that forces papers into costly subscription drives to maintain flat circulation.  "What I did in those first couple of years was right for the times," he says, "but it isn't necessarily right for the 1990s."  General Electric Co.'s rail-car leasing unit agreed to purchase similar businesses from Leucadia National Corp. and Brae Corp. for $178.5 million in cash.  The businesses will be purchased by GE Capital Railcar Services, Chicago, a major owner of railway equipment and part of the GE Capital operations.  Leucadia, a New York financial services and real estate holding company, owns about a 74% stake in Brae, a San Francisco rail car and electronic sign concern.  Leucadia said it expects a pretax gain of about $58 million from the sale, most of which will be sheltered by tax loss carry-forwards.  Brae expects a pretax gain of $9.4 million.  The purchases are subject to clearance under federal antitrust law.  GE Capital Railcar said the purchase will expand its 50,000 car inventory by 10,000 units.  McCaw Cellular Communications Inc., Kirkland, Wash., reported that its second-quarter loss widened to $87.5 million, citing costs of developing cellular-phone franchises across the country.  In the year-earlier period, the company had a loss of $61.7 million.  Revenue rose 39% to $120.1 million from $73.1 million.  The heavy investment is being financed by a huge amount of debt.  Interest expense amounted to $64.4 million in the quarter, up from $45 million the year earlier.  Cellular service revenue jumped 77% to $83.7 million, with the number of cellular subscribers increasing 30% to 336,000 as of June 30.  In the first half, the loss widened to $185.2 million from $123.1 million a year earlier.  Revenue increased 58% to $222.2 million, from $141.1 million.  The wider loss, which was expected, was announced after the close of national over-the-counter trading yesterday when McCaw fell 25 cents to $37 a share.  Citytrust Bancorp. said it plans to eliminate about 100 jobs, about 8% of its work force, as part of a cost-reduction program.  Citytrust said the cutbacks will come primarily through attrition and relocation.  However, it said 40 people will be leaving the company within the next few weeks.  The Bridgeport, Conn., company said it expects annual savings of $4.3 million by next year because of the personnel reduction and changes in employee benefits.  Citytrust reported a loss of $34.7 million for the second quarter as a result of a special $40 million loan-loss provision.  The bank has been squeezed by nonperforming real-estate loans brought on by softness in the regional housing market.  The company said its nonperforming loans rose to between $120 million and $130 million for the second quarter from $96 million in the first quarter.  The company said this amount could increase during the second half of the year.  In June, Citytrust said nonperforming assets rose to 3.9% of total loans from 1.8% in 1986.  R.B. "Buck" O'Rielly was named a director of Tucson Electric Power Co. effective Aug. 22, filling one of two vacancies created by the recent resignation of two top executives at the utility.  Mr. O'Rielly is chief executive officer of O'Rielly Motor Co., a Tucson concern that operates auto dealerships and car rental franchises.  The appointment brings board membership to eight, and a company spokesman said the board is considering appointing another outside director.  The vacancies were created in July when Einar Greve, the company's chairman, president and chief executive officer, resigned as an officer and director in the face of a company investigation of internal stock sales by him and other executives.  Joe G. Coykendall, senior vice president and chief financial officer, stepped down from the company and the board effective July 1 to accept another job.  Telxon Corp., Akron, Ohio, reported that net income plunged to $557,000, or four cents a share, for the June 30 first quarter from the year-earlier $3.4 million, or 26 cents a share.  It said results for the rest of fiscal 1990 will continue to trail year-earlier results.  The producer of hand-held computers and computer systems reported operating profit of $502,000, or four cents a share, down from the year-earlier $3.3 million, or 25 cents a share.  Net included credits from tax-loss carry-forwards of $55,000 in the latest quarter and $161,000 a year earlier.  Revenue rose 2.6% to $35.3 million from $34.4 million.  Demand for portable computers remains strong, said Raymond D. Meyo, president and chief executive officer.  But he said Telxon needs operations designed to support its transformation "from a hardware to a systems company."  First-quarter profit also was cut by a longer sales-to-installation cycle, fewer scheduled installations and "aggressive pricing as a means of gaining presence in major corporate accounts," Telxon said.  Interest rates rose as investors turned a cold shoulder toward the Treasury's 10-year note auction yesterday.  And rates could move higher still, said traders and economists.  "The auction came in a little sloppy," said Marshall B. Front, executive vice president at Stein Roe & Farnham Inc., a Chicago-based investment counseling firm.  Tuesday's auction of three-year notes, which kicked off the Treasury's huge quarterly refunding of government debt, also was a disappointment.  With two legs of the three-part auction turning out to be weak, traders now expect today's $9.75 billion offering of 30-year bonds to receive a similarly tepid reception from investors.  After it is completed, the government will have auctioned about $29.5 billion of securities.  "The outlook for the 30-year auction has deteriorated," said Stephen W. Gallagher, money market economist at Kidder, Peabody & Co. Prior to the 10-year note auction, he was expecting an 8% coupon on the new 30-year bonds.  Now he expects a rate of about 8 1/8%.  The 30-year bond was quoted in when-issued trading yesterday at 8.10%.  "We need lower bond prices to attract some interest in the auction," said Mr. Gallagher.  In fact, rates started to creep up after details of the 10-year auction were announced.  The average yield on the new 10-year notes was 8.03%.  That was the lowest average yield at a 10-year note sale since 7.25% on Nov. 5, 1986.  In May, at the last 10-year note sale, the average yield was 9.18%.  After the auction results were announced, the yield on the new notes jumped to 8.04% in when-issued trading.  Before the auction, the yield was quoted at about 8%, and it was 7.98% late Tuesday.  In response, Treasury bond prices, which were about 1/4 point lower for most of the day, fell further.  The benchmark 30-year bond fell 3/4 point, or about $7.50 for each $1,000 face amount.  Traders and analysts said the large domestic institutional customers bought far fewer notes than expected.  Apparently, many investors seem reluctant to invest at a time when the inflation and economic outlook remains cloudy.  Other investors fear that the huge new supply will keep the market sluggish for some time.  "There's a lot of apprehension about this auction," said Mr. Front.  Although he believes the bond market will bounce back once the new securities are digested and as more economic statistics are released, he acknowledged that many domestic investors don't share his optimistic outlook.  "Most people are sitting on the sidelines waiting to see how things will go," he said.  As evidence of the low bidding, traders note that the bid-to-cover ratio at the auction was 1.91 to 1, which is below the average of 2.32 to 1 calculated for the previous 12 sales of 10-year notes.  The ratio, which reflects the number of bids the Treasury receives for each bid it accepts, is used to gauge investor demand.  Individual investors also cut back purchases.  The Treasury said non-competitive tenders, which come mainly from individual investors and small institutions, totaled $344 million, compared with $467 million in the last 10-year note auction in May.  Analysts attribute the lack of interest on the part of small investors to relatively low yields when compared with alternative investments.  Japanese investors were said to have been big buyers of the 10-year notes, although analyst estimates of Japanese buying differed sharply.  Robert McGee, senior vice president and economist at Japan's Tokai Bank Ltd. estimated that Japanese investors purchased about 30%, or about $3 billion, of the 10-year notes.  He said many of the large Japanese insurance companies were flush with cash from Japanese government bonds that recently matured.  That money "is being rolled over into U.S. bonds."  A senior government bond trader at a Japanese investment banking firm said Japanese dealers bought as much as 20%, or about $2 billion, of the 10-year bonds.  Some investors are already looking forward to tomorrow's producers price index and retail sales data.  Economists polled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report expect, on average, a 0.1% increase in the July producer price index.  Meanwhile, traders said the Federal Reserve's so-called beige book had little impact on the market yesterday.  The report, which was released prior to the auction, said the economy continues to grow, but slowly.  The beige book is a summary of economic activity prepared for use at the central bank's next Federal Open Market Committee meeting and reflected information gathered prior to Aug. 1.  "Bond market bulls were hoping that the book would reveal some further weakness to support a rally," said Mr. Front.  Instead, he said, the book had no surprises.  Treasury Securities  Treasury bonds fell after the results of the 10-year note auction were announced.  In late trading, the 30-year benchmark bond was quoted at 108 01/32, compared with 108 26/32 Tuesday.  The yield, which moves in the opposite direction from price, rose to 8.14% from 8.09%.  Short-term interest rates fell.  The discount rate on three-month Treasury bills was quoted late at 7.94%, for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.19%.  The discount rate on six-month Treasury bills was 7.63%, for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.02%.  At yesterday's auction, the 8.03% average yield on the 10-year note was the lowest since 7.25% on Nov. 5, 1986, and was down from 9.18% at the previous 10-year note auction on May 10.  Yesterday's auction was the second leg of the Treasury's three-part $29.5 billion quarterly refunding, which will conclude today with the sale of $9.75 billion of 30-year bonds.  Here are auction details:  Rates are determined by the difference between the purchase price and face value.  Thus, higher bidding narrows the investor's return while lower bidding widens it.  @ 10-Year Notes  @ Applications $18,681,729,000  @ Accepted bids $9,763,352,000  @ Accepted at low price 4%  @ Accepted noncompetitively $344,000,000  @ Average price (Rate) 99.796 (8.03%)  @ High price (Rate) 99.864 (8.02%)  @ Low price (Rate) 99.661 (8.05%)  @ Interest rate 8.00%  @ The bills are dated Aug. 15 and mature Aug. 15, 1999.  Municipals  Investors continued to shy away from both new and seasoned municipal bonds, with the sour sentiment of last week's July employment report still pervading the market and showing no signs of abating.  Municipal dollar bonds were off 1/8 to 1/2 point in late dealings.  The municipal market was buffeted by steady selling by bond funds and other major investors during the session.  One trader said several large lists of bonds up for sale were circulated.  Orlando Utilities Commission, Fla., offered $75 million of revenue bonds through a Merrill Lynch Capital Markets group.  Orders for less than $4 million of the bonds were recorded by late afternoon.  The issue was the largest long-term competitive offering of the day.  Also, a Bear, Stearns & Co. group priced an $83.4 million issue of Illinois Housing Development Authority residential mortgage revenue bonds.  In secondary trading, New Jersey Turnpike Authority's 7.20% issue of 2018 was down 1/4 at 98 1/2 to yield 7.33%, up roughly 0.02 percentage point from Tuesday.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Government National Mortgage Association securities and other mortgage securities fell in late dealings in sympathy with Treasurys.  After holding relatively stable during the course of the session, spreads narrowed as Treasurys declined.  Ginnie Mae 9% securities for August delivery were at 97 18/32 bid late in the day, down 13/32 from Tuesday and yielding about 9.478% to a 12-year average life.  The yield spread to the 10-year Treasury note outstanding was 1.386 percentage points, compared with 1.41 Tuesday.  Ginnie Mae 9 1/2% securities were at 99 19/32, down 12/32, while the 10% securities were at 101 1/2, down 9/32.  Foreign Bonds  Japanese government bond prices ended slightly lower after a morning rally sputtered on fears that the Bank of Japan would disapprove.  The yield on the benchmark bond fell to 5% shortly after the opening, representing a price peak for the recent uptrend.  But profit-taking from portfolio accounts set in, and selling snowballed at midday as rumors spread that Bank of Japan officials were calling dealers to inquire about their recent bond purchases.  Central bank officials in recent weeks have frequently expressed displeasure at "speculative buying" in the bond market.  Still, expectations that U.S. interest rates will fall and the dollar will weaken, as well as the tight supply of Japanese government bonds, continue to fuel bullish sentiment.  Japan's benchmark No. 111 4.6% bond due 1998 closed at a price of 97.19, down 0.06 yen for each 100 yen face value.  The yield rose to 5.06%.  West German bonds ended generally unchanged.  The 6 3/4% bonds due June 1999 remained at 100.75 to yield 6.64%, while the 6 3/4% notes due 1994 were slightly lower at 100.10 to yield 6.71%.  Among German Eurobonds, the World Bank's 6 3/4% bonds due 1999 fell 0.10 point to 99.25 to yield 6.85%.  British government bonds ended little changed after a quiet session.  Among benchmarks, the Treasury's 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 rose 2/32 to 115 29/32 to yield 9.61%, while the 11 3/4% notes due 1991 were unchanged at 100 1/8 to yield 11.60%.  Corporate Issues  Corporate bonds ended 1/4 to 1/2 point lower in slow trading.  Today, First Boston Corp. expects to price a three-part junk bond issue by Ohio Mattress Co.  The issue will consist of $75 million of eight-year senior subordinated notes, $225 million of 10-year senior subordinated discount notes and $175 million of 15-year subordinated debentures.  Price talk calls for a yield of 13 1/4% on the senior subordinated notes, 15 1/4% on the discount notes and 14 1/2% on the subordinated debentures.  Sumitomo Corp. of America said it agreed in principle to acquire Razorback Steel Corp. of Newport, Ark., for more than $20 million in a partnership with its parent, Sumitomo Corp., Tokyo, and two other companies.  The other partners are Yamato Kogyo Co. of Himeji, Japan, and Auburn Steel Co., Auburn, N.Y., a Sumitomo of America spokeswoman said.  The transaction is subject to completion of a definitive agreement, regulatory approvals and approval by Razorback shareholders and members of the partnership, Sumitomo of America said.  The partnership is called Arkansas Steel Associates.  Allied Security Inc., Pittsburgh, said a special committee of directors rejected a management buy-out proposal at $53 a share as too low, and company officials are considering whether to raise their offer.  Also, American Protective Services Inc., Oakland, Calif., which made a $70-a-share bid for Allied, is seeking the Allied shareholder list.  The company, which is a competitor in the security guard field, said it wants to communicate with shareholders to inform them of its offer.  On June 19, Neal H. Holmes, chairman and chief executive officer, and Steven B. Stein, president and chief operating officer, made the $53-a-share offer on behalf of a senior management group.  About a month later, American Protective offered to acquire Allied "in a merger-type transaction" that would bring shareholders $70 a share in cash.  Mr. Holmes and Mr. Stein, who with their families hold 54% of the company's 489,000 shares outstanding, said they had no interest in any transaction with American Protective, so the Allied board didn't pursue that proposal.  Mr. Stein said the group is weighing its options, but isn't considering any transaction with American Protective.  Monarch Capital Corp.'s second-quarter operating profit inched up because it sold some of its venture-capital assets, but its real-estate losses continued and sales of its variable-life insurance declined.  Operating profit rose to $5.3 million, or 68 cents a share, from $5.2 million, or 62 cents a share, a year ago.  The latest period included a one-time charge of $891,000 for retiring debt, which reduced earnings to $4.4 million, or 55 cents a share.  For the six months, pretax insurance earnings fell to $16.2 million from $22.9 million.  The Springfield, Mass., company said the lower earnings resulted from lower variable-life sales and a higher-than-normal level of disability claims.  In the six months, net rose to $10 million, or $1.62 a share, from $9.8 million, or $1.17 a share, a year earlier.  The latest six months included a $2.3 million charge for debt retirement.  Nolan Archibald, Black & Decker's chief executive officer, has been preaching to Wall Street on the virtues of his company's pricey acquisition of Emhart.  Finally, some investors are listening.  Black & Decker's stock traded at 23 3/8 just before it launched its successful $2.8 billion bid for Emhart in March.  The market reacted harshly to the prospect of huge debt, and since then, Black & Decker has languished around 19 to 20.  But in recent days, it has been rising.  Yesterday, it reached a post-acquisition high of 23 7/8 and closed at 23 1/2, down 1/8 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Any thoughts of the power-tool, industrial and household products maker as a takeover play are easy to dismiss.  "You can't do a leveraged buy-out with a company that's already 80% debt," says Clifford Ransom, an analyst with Ferris, Baker Watts in Baltimore, referring to the company's long-term debt-to-capital ratio.  The recent high trading volume, Mr. Ransom suggests, reflects a turnover in investors to those comfortable with more distant horizons.  Many investors who bought the stock a year or two ago as a turnaround play felt they were ambushed by the Emhart deal.  Analysts say Mr. Archibald gave a strong presentation during a two-day Wall Street tour two weeks ago.  Clearly, telling the Black & Decker story is one of Mr. Archibald's favorite tasks.  In 1985, the company was losing money, market share, employees and respect.  Mr. Archibald says his new management team restored the company and repositioned it as the industry leader.  The marriage with Emhart, he claims, is a match made in heaven.  The acquisition, Mr. Archibald says, represents a strategic repositioning into higher-margin products and significantly broadens Black & Decker's earnings base.  More immediately, the company has now targeted five Emhart units for divestiture and expects to use the $1 billion or more in proceeds to cut its $4 billion debt.  Black & Decker has begun an aggressive cost-cutting campaign and estimates that savings could exceed $100 million.  Emhart operates more than 100 manufacturing plants, compared with Black & Decker's 19 plants, and consolidations are expected.  "We want to become the low-cost producer" in all of Black & Decker's markets, Mr. Archibald says.  Finally, Black & Decker is beginning to take advantage of the synergies Mr. Archibald has touted, pumping Emhart hardware and other products through Black & Decker distribution channels, and vice versa.  After the shakedown, Mr. Archibald sees a company with about $4.5 billion in sales, a commanding lead in the do-it-yourself market and a potential for strong, steady growth.  When the stock was trading at 20, he told investors the downside risk was $1 or $2.  And he claims the stock could soar to 60 or 70 in three to five years.  Analysts say this isn't impossible, given their own projections that Black & Decker earnings could soar to $5 to $6 a share over the same period.  Black & Decker's purchase of General Electric's small appliance line in 1985 "was more risky than Emhart," Mr. Archibald declares.  Black & Decker didn't get to keep the GE name.  "We got a dated product line and high-cost facilities" from GE, he says.  But Emhart was far more costly.  For Black & Decker's fiscal year ending in September, analysts had been projecting earnings of $2 or more a share.  With the Emhart deal, they slashed their estimates to around 80 cents because of heavy debt payments.  Next year, instead of earning $2.20 to $2.55 a share, analysts figure Black & Decker will earn $1.45 to $1.65 a share.  By 1991, the earnings picture should brighten.  But Jonathan Goldfarb of Merrill Lynch points out that these earnings projections could be generous, especially if the economy weakens.  He has maintained a "neutral" investment rating for Black & Decker for both the immediate and long-term and suggests that short-term investors might find this a good time to take their profits.  As for the recent stock spurt, Mr. Goldfarb suggests that "many investors are casting around for the laggards" in the current stock rally.  Mr. Archibald's presentations were impressive, he says, and many investors hadn't heard the story before.  The analyst also cites a flattering article about the company in a recent issue of Business Week.  Russell Leavitt of Salomon Brothers sees a couple more reasons why the stock is up: The economy looks somewhat stronger and interest rates are lower, and that's good news for a company with a big debt.  For the short term, Mr. Leavitt says, the stock is "reasonably expensive."  But for the long term -- four to five years from now -- "there's a high probability" Black & Decker will be successful, he says.  Franklin Morton of Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc. has a buy recommendation on the stock.  "This management team has shown an ability to turn a business around, and people are betting it can be done again."  Mr. Morton also notes that Black & Decker management has attractive stock options, keeping managers attuned to shareholders' interests.  ---  @Black & Decker  @(NYSE; Symbol: BDK)  @Business: Portable electric tools and appliances  @Year ended Sept. 25, 1988:  @Sales: $2.28 billion  @Net income: $97.1 million; or $1.65 a share  @Third quarter, June 25, 1989:  @Net loss: $5.2 million vs. profit of $21.4 million, or 36 cents a share  @Average daily trading volume:  @267,983 shares  @Common shares outstanding: 58.7 million  Litton Industries Inc., Beverly Hills, Calif., said it received a multimillion dollar contract from Ford Motor Co. in Europe for machining systems to be used in production of Ford's new Zeta engines.  Terms weren't disclosed, but Litton said it now has about $200 million of work with Ford.  Last October, Ford's European operations signed a $120 million accord with Litton and the latest contract apparently makes up the bulk of the $80 million difference.  The new systems, which will be installed at Ford's Bridgend and Swansea engine plants in South Wales, are scheduled for completion late in 1990.  The contract calls for three machining systems that will manufacture the engines' cylinder heads, connecting rods, camshafts and crankshafts to be developed and produced for Ford.  Douglas Aircraft Co., a division of McDonnell Douglas Corp., said it received orders totaling about $368 million for 12 of its MD-80 series of jetliners from Iberia, the national airline of Spain and a related Spanish domestic airline.  Iberia now holds 24 firm orders and four options for MD-80s as part of its plan to eventually replace all of its 28 DC-9s for international service in Europe.  Iberia elected to take all of the seven new planes it ordered as model MD-87s, a 109-passenger version of the MD-80, which it will configure in a two-class arrangement.  Delivery will begin next June, said Douglas Aircraft, which is based in Long Beach, Calif.  The domestic Spanish carrier Aviaco ordered five MD-88 models for delivery beginning in August 1991.  The MD-88 seats a maximum of 155 passengers.  Both the MD-88s and MD-87s will be powered by Pratt & Whitney JT8D-217C engines.  Profit-taking among higher-priced issues put pressure on Tokyo stocks, but the market still closed firmer as attention shifted quickly to new sectors.  London share prices finished higher but off the day's best levels as an early surge on Wall Street boosted stocks.  Among the winners in Tokyo were financial and pharmaceutical stocks, some steels and housing issues.  But stocks that had led the market since Monday afternoon -- those with prices that are high by the exchange averageran out of steam.  Such issues are believed to offer greater opportunities to profit from short-term trading.  Nintendo, which announced an unusually large gratis issue Monday, continued to attract buying interest but also drew some profit-taking, traders said.  Tuesday, Nintendo rose a limit-high 2,000 yen ($14.41) and pulled a number of other issues higher in its wake.  Yesterday, Nintendo ended at 16,800 yen ($121.08), unchanged.  The stocks that Nintendo pulled higher Tuesday, though, fared less well, ending mostly lower.  They had gotten a boost from speculation that some of them might follow Nintendo's lead and distribute gratis issues of their own.  The Nikkei average of 225 issues was up 99.79 points at 34859.27.  The index gained 129.10 points Tuesday.  In early trading in Tokyo Thursday, the Nikkei index fell 23.85 points to 34835.42.  Volume on the first section Wednesday was estimated at 550 million shares, up from 476.6 million shares Tuesday.  Advancing issues outnumbered decliners 505 to 383, and 206 issues were unchanged.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which was up 9.22 points Tuesday, was up 19.21 points at 2643.91.  Many of the higher-priced issues that have supported the Nikkei since Monday were lower.  Sony, which posted a high Tuesday, fell 60 yen to 8,240, Fanuc was down 160 yen at 6,800 and Kyocera dropped 120 yen to 6,540.  One trader said the decline proved that the rush into higher-priced issues in the last couple of days was simply the latest turn in the market's rapidly shifting "rotational buying."  He said it was only to be expected that the fad had failed to hold investors' attention for long.  The waves of buying rotate rapidly from one sector or theme to another because there is little new money coming into the market, he said.  Investors are reluctant to commit money to stocks, he added.  They are losing faith in lower interest rates in both the U.S. and Japan because the U.S. economy, according to recent data, has more life left in it than had been thought.  Financials were among the issues to which investors rotated, traders said.  Sumitomo Bank advanced 140 yen to 3,910, Mitsubishi Bank was up 80 yen at 3,400 and Sanwa Bank was up 70 yen at 2,970.  Nomura Securities gained 60 yen to 3,450.  Other gaining issues include pharmaceuticals.  Yamanouchi Pharmaceutical was up 40 yen at 3,830, Eisai gained 40 yen to 2,130 and Tanabe rose 40 yen to 1,900.  Housing stocks gave up some of their early gains but ended firmer.  Daiwa House was up 30 yen at 2,710.  Misawa Home gained 10 yen to 2,700.  Sekisui House was up 20 yen at 2,270.  Meanwhile, in London, Wall Street's initial optimism convinced many players that the Dow Jones Industrial Average would bust through its high of 2724.  But they became edgy as the advance in New York began to crumble.  At the close, the Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index was up 12.3 points at 2360.4, marginally off its best level of 2363.6.  Its low of 2345.8 came shortly after the start of official trading.  When trading ended, the narrower Financial Times 30-share index was up 9.7 points at 1972.0.  Volume amounted to 520.9 million shares, down from 543.3 million shares Tuesday.  Buyers continued to seek out Asda, dealers said, on rumors that the food retailer would soon be the object of a takeover bid.  Its shares rose 7 pence (11 cents) to 208 pence ($3.38) after steep rises earlier in the week.  At the close, 10 million shares were traded.  Among other big sellers, blue-chip leaders gained on the strength of the firmer dollar.  In particular, Imperial Chemical Industries rose 35 to #13.13 while Glaxo Holdings rose 13 to #15.43  B.A.T rose 17 pence to 865 on strong volume of 3.1 million shares.  Traders said hefty options purchases boosted the shares.  Several stocks strengthened on what dealers termed short stock situations.  Of these, Pearson gained 30 pence to 799, and Reckitt & Colman rose 26 to #12.28.  Brewer Scottish & Newcastle benefited from talk that the company is on the verge of selling its Thistle chain of hotels and rumors that a U.S. company may be preparing to bid for the group.  Its shares rose 9 pence to 395.  In Frankfurt, shares closed slightly higher after a weak opening linked to widespread profit-taking and a growing market perception that a consolidation is long overdue.  Share prices in Zurich climbed to a high in very heavy trading as large buy orders from foreign investors triggered widespread purchases in all sectors.  In Paris, insurance stocks carried the rest of the market higher in active trading under the impact of a 15.90 billion-franc ($2.48 billion) bid by Cie.  Financiere de Suez for Cie.  Industrielle.  Amsterdam share prices posted modest gains, closing at a record for the fourth consecutive session, buoyed by continued foreign buying and positive sentiment on other world bourses.  Elsewhere, share prices closed higher in Stockholm and Milan and mixed in Brussels.  South African gold stocks closed narrowly mixed.  In Hong Kong, shares moved higher in subdued trading, swept up by the previous day's rally and continuing rumors about local corporations.  But shares in Taipei plunged on rumors that Taiwan and Saudi Arabia had severed diplomatic ties, Chinese leader Deng Xiaoping had died, and Taiwan's second largest investment company, Fortune Group, had gone bankrupt.  In other Asian and Pacific trading, share prices closed higher in Seoul, mixed in Manila and lower in Sydney and Wellington.  Singapore was closed for a holiday.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 8 Aug 7 Year  @ U.S. ..................... 321.5 321.7 + 25.5  @ Britain .................. 709.4 706.9 + 29.9  @ Canada ................... 436.9 433.0 + 19.0  @ Japan .................... 1553.6 1549.1 + 9.4  @ France ................... 524.1 520.4 + 18.4  @ Germany .................. 252.0 248.9 + 21.2  @ Hong Kong ................ 1945.6 1910.3 - 4.1  @ Switzerland .............. 232.8 230.5 + 34.6  @ Australia ................ 342.3 337.3 + 17.9  @ World index .............. 547.4 543.7 + 10.7  Twelve traders from the Japanese yen-futures pit at the Chicago Mercantile Exchange pleaded innocent to fraud charges relating to the government's undercover investigation of Chicago's futures markets.  The 12, some of whom were charged with racketeering and face stiff prison terms and seizure of assets if found guilty, are among 46 traders indicted last week for allegedly defrauding customers.  On Tuesday, three yen-futures traders, Brian and James Sledz and Thomas Braniff, pleaded guilty to one or two counts of mail- and wire-fraud charges and to commodities fraud, and agreed to cooperate with the investigation.  Assistant U.S. Attorney Daniel Gillogly indicated to U.S. District Court Judge George Marovich yesterday that he expected a handful of other yen-futures traders to plead guilty as well.  Twenty-one yen-futures traders were indicted last week.  Traders from the Swiss franc pit at the Merc, as well as from the Chicago Board of Trade's soybean-futures and Treasury bond-futures pits, are expected to enter their pleas during the next two weeks.  Among those pleading innocent yesterday were John M. Baker, Sam A. Cali and Thomas A. Crouch, who were indicted on fraud charges under the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations act, known as RICO, as well as RICO conspiracy charges.  If convicted on these counts they face prison terms of up to 20 years, fines of as much as $250,000 and seizure of exchange memberships and trading profits and commissions.  In addition to the RICO counts, Mr. Baker, 50 years old -- looking pale in a somber business suit, a marked contrast to the brightly colored paisley jackets he often wore on the Merc trading floor -- is charged with 20 counts of mail and wire fraud and 25 counts of commodities-trading fraud.  Mr. Cali, 38, is also charged with 41 counts of mail and wire fraud and 58 counts of commodities-trading fraud.  And Mr. Crouch, 43, faces 19 counts of mail and wire fraud and 20 counts of commodities-trading fraud.  Ray Pace, 33, who also pleaded innocent to RICO conspiracy charges, faces 44 counts of mail and wire fraud and 82 counts of commodities-trading fraud as well.  And Michael D. Smith, 34, pleaded innocent to RICO conspiracy charges, 12 counts of mail and wire fraud and 19 counts of commodities-trading fraud.  Mail, wire and commodities fraud are punishable by prison terms of up to five years and fines of up to $250,000.  Other yen-futures traders pleading innocent include Robert H. Bailin, 36, charged with 10 counts of mail and wire fraud and 22 counts of commodities-trading fraud; Michael I. Greenfield, 28, eight counts of mail and wire fraud and 10 counts of commodities-trading fraud; Kenneth M. Maslak, 37, six counts of mail fraud and seven counts of commodities-trading fraud; and Matthew A. Newberger, 29, one count of mail fraud and one count of commodities-trading fraud.  Also pleading innocent were Joseph P. O'Malley, 38, six counts of mail and wire fraud and eight counts of commodities-trading fraud; Martin J. Riley, 31, one count of mail fraud and two counts of commodities-trading fraud; and Gary A. Wright, 28, seven counts of mail and wire fraud and 10 counts of commodities-trading fraud.  While the yen traders were entering their pleas, Federal Bureau of Investigation Agent Dietrich Volk, who posed as a yen trader to gather evidence against the indicted traders, sat quietly in the front of the courtroom.  After the arraignments, Mr. Volk, dressed in a conservative blue blazer and khaki slacks, shared an elevator with Mr. Crouch and his attorney.  In the elevator Mr. Crouch looked at the gray-haired agent, who appears to be in his mid-30s, and said, "You look like you put on weight."  "A little bit," Mr. Volk replied, stepping out of the elevator and into the FBI's Chicago field office.  Struggling under total debts of $1.2 billion, L.J. Hooker Corp., the U.S. subsidiary of Australia-based Hooker Corp., filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection and hired turnaround expert Sanford C. Sigoloff to manage the company.  The filing, made late yesterday in U.S. Bankruptcy Court in New York, covers 15 different U.S. entities, including the company's largest retail chains, B. Altman & Co. and Bonwit Teller.  The bankruptcy-law filing doesn't include Hooker's joint-venture interest in Parisian Inc., a Birmingham, Ala.-based retailer; Merksamer Jewelers, a Sacramento, Calif., chain 80% owned by Hooker; and certain real-estate operations.  Mr. Sigoloff, 58 years old, currently heads Sigoloff & Associates and, until last December, was chairman and chief executive officer of Wickes Cos., a retailer based in Santa Monica, Calif.  Mr. Sigoloff led a reorganization of Wickes under which it emerged from Chapter 11 proceedings in 1985.  "What this means for Bonwit Teller and B. Altman & Co. is that fresh money will be available to assist them in building their inventories back," Mr. Sigoloff said in an interview.  Mr. Sigoloff, who will function as chief executive of L.J. Hooker, added: "We hope that the trade will understand this and give us key buying credit."  Mr. Sigoloff said he has been acting as a consultant to Hooker for about 10 days.  Although he hasn't yet been in any Bonwit Teller or B. Altman stores, he said he has met with top management.  "We intend to help them flourish," he said.  As reported, L.J. Hooker's parent, a Sydney-based real-estate and retailing concern, has been suffering severe cash-flow problems as a result of high interest rates and a sagging real-estate market in Australia.  Hooker Corp. is now being managed by a court-appointed provisional liquidator.  Last month, its controlling shareholder, Australian businessman George Herscu, resigned as chief executive officer although he remains chairman.  The company's problems were compounded by its rapid expansion in the U.S. during the past three years.  Hooker has spent more than $1 billion in the U.S. in an effort to become a major real-estate developer and retailer.  In addition to its retail chains, L.J. Hooker owns a home-building division, several major shopping malls, and various commercial properties.  As of March 31, the parent company's liabilities totaled A$1.92 billion (US$1.48 billion).  In a statement, Richard Grellman, a Hooker adviser who is a partner in the Sydney office of KPMG Peat Marwick's receivership, reconstructions and insolvency unit, said L.J. Hooker filed for bankruptcy protection because it was "unable to reach a satisfactory agreement with its private lenders on a financing plan to restructure its unsecured debt."  Hooker Corp.'s total debts include A$900 million in unsecured loans and an additional A$700 million that is secured against specific Hooker assets, mainly in the U.S.  It wasn't immediately clear what effect the Chapter 11 filing will have on L.J. Hooker's retail operations.  In recent months, several apparel makers have stopped shipping to B. Altman and Bonwit Teller because of concerns about Hooker's financial condition.  In a statement, Mr. Sigoloff said he expects that L.J. Hooker will be able to provide customers "with as good or better a selection of goods and services as before."  Warren Bailey, chief financial officer of Parisian, said the company won't be affected at all by the L.J. Hooker filing.  "Our financial condition today is such that our credit lines are adequate to handle our needs, and our business continues to be very good.  Our bankers continue to be supportive of management, and we see no impact from this filing," Mr. Bailey said.  One of Mr. Sigoloff's apparent skills at Wickes was his ability to persuade creditors to continue shipping merchandise to Wickes stores despite the company's cashflow problems.  In his statement, Mr. Sigoloff indicated his first priority will be talking with vendors, an especially critical issue for B. Altman and Bonwit Teller.  Both companies are at the start of the critical fall selling season and face severe problems if they can't get new merchandise.  Mr. Sigoloff took over Wickes shortly before the company filed for Chapter 11 in April 1982.  At the time, the company had 250,000 creditors and was the second-largest bankruptcy proceeding in U.S. history in terms of total assets.  Mr. Sigoloff, who has referred to himself as "Ming the Merciless," drastically shrunk the company, selling off assets and reducing the total work force to 28,000 from 40,000.  Although he generally received high marks for efforts at Wickes, Mr. Sigoloff left the company last December after leading an aborted leveraged buy-out attempt.  Wickes is now privately owned by WCI Holdings Corp., a joint partnership formed by Blackstone Group and Wasserstein Perella & Co.  In his statement, Mr. Sigoloff said it was "too early to state specifically what actions he would take" at L.J. Hooker.  The company previously has said it intends to sell most, if not all, of its assets in the U.S. Also, in March L.J. Hooker hired manufacturing executive J. Frank Haasbeek as president.  It was unclear yesterday whether he will stay with the company.  Mr. Haasbeek declined to comment.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Bay View Capital Corp., offering of 625,000 shares of convertible preferred stock at an anticipated price of $50 a share.  The offering will include an additional 93,750 shares to cover over-allotments, via Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Inc.  Great Northern Nekoosa Corp., shelf offering of up to $300 million principal amount of debt securities on terms to be set at the time of sale.  When combined with securities remaining unsold from a previous offering, the filing gives the company as much as $346,800,000 principal amount of securities available for sale.  SunTrust Banks Inc., shelf offering of up to $200 million principal amount of debt securities on terms to be set at the time of sale.  Tenneco Credit Corp., a unit of Tenneco Inc., a shelf offering of up to $500 million principal amount of debt securities on terms to be set at the time of sale.  Hartmarx Corp. filed a $137 million lawsuit this week that alleges Stanley Wax -- former chief executive officer of its Country Miss unit -- hindered the parent's attempts to sell the unit.  Mr. Wax couldn't be reached for comment late last night and it couldn't be learned whether he's represented by a lawyer.  Gary D. Ashman, Hartmarx's lawyer, refused to comment.  The lawsuit charges that Mr. Wax prevented Country Miss's expected buyer -- LB Consulting Inc. -- from doing its due diligence so it could go ahead with the purchase.  Hartmarx seeks $62 million in compensatory damages and $75 million in punitive damages if Mr. Wax's alleged misconduct spoil the sale.  Hartmarx alleges that Mr. Wax wouldn't release documents to LB, told Country Miss employees to withhold information and "specifically" threatened to "blow the LB deal."  According to Hartmarx's legal filing, Country Miss's board voted Aug. 3 that Mr. Wax's employment should be terminated immediately and that he should remove himself from the company's premises.  The filing also indicates that he's still a director and said he owns 5% of Country Miss's stock outstanding.  Hartmarx owns 92%.  Hartmarx agreed June 27 to sell Country Miss, based in Easton, Pa., to LB for about $62 million, the filing says.  Country Miss, which makes and retails moderately priced sportswear, is on the block because it doesn't fit into Hartmarx's focus on upscale, higher-quality clothing lines.  Don't write off Ampco-Pittsburgh Corp.'s 6.6% stake in Midway Airlines Inc. as a passive investment or even a ploy to make a quick profit.  The obscure, family-dominated industrial concern could very well be serious in its stated goal of positioning itself to seek control of the high-flying regional air carrier, which analysts estimate could fetch between $241 million and $251.9 million in a takeover.  "I've never known them to invest in a company simply to put it into play," says a Pittsburgh lawyer close to the company.  "This is a foray into another field of acquisitions for them."  Indeed, for the past two years, Ampco-Pittsburgh, a producer of steel rolls for steel and aluminum finishing mills and other industrial products, has been quietly seeking investments in high-growth businesses.  Under the leadership of Marshall L. Berkman, chairman and chief executive officer, and his brother-in-law Robert A. Paul, president and chief operating officer -- two tough-minded Harvard MBAs -- it has shed such depressed basic industry businesses as rail cars and steel forgings, while investing in a closely held Cleveland biochemical company.  "We're trying to recognize opportunities and move on them," says a company official.  "We're moving into markets and businesses we think have long-term prospects."  It might be a matter of survival.  The company was devastated in the early 1980s, when virtually all of its businesses were rocked by a deep recession.  Once an industrial scavenger that grew through acquisitions and turnarounds of mature, out-of-favor manufacturers, it began shedding virtually all its lines and taking huge write-offs in recent years.  Last year, Ampco-Pittsburgh had a loss from discontinued operations of $32.6 million, which helped contribute to a net loss of $27.1 million for the year.  The recent restructuring has largely been the work of Mr. Berkman, an intense and competitive executive and low-key Mr. Paul, known for his finance expertise.  "It's true a lot of businesses they've been in haven't done well, but they're a strong team," says a Pittsburgh business acquaintance.  They've been credited with recognizing the low-growth prospects of former units and being willing to sell them off or try innovative approaches such as an employee stock ownership plan with the United Steelworkers union at the company's Northwest Steel & Wire operations.  In the first half, Ampco-Pittsburgh posted a profit of $6.2 million, or 65 cents a share, after a $1.9 million tax credit, on sales of $115 million.  At the same time, the company has been looking elsewhere for growth.  While Ampco-Pittsburgh's disclosure of its $10.3 million stake in the air carrier shocked Wall Street, the company apparently studied the investment for some time.  "We weren't reacting" to airline takeover attempts in recent weeks, which have been major market movers, said a company official who didn't want to be identified.  Still, Midway seems a sharp departure for a company that began as the Pittsburgh Screw & Bolt Co. and is still predominantly a heavy manufacturer, with such operations as Union Electric Steel and Buffalo Forge.  But Ampco-Pittsburgh is also part of a larger, more diversified family empire that has interests in a Pittsburgh bank holding company, the Value-Line investment advisory service and a telecommunications concern.  Louis Berkman, the father of Marshall Berkman and an Ampco director, oversees these interests through his closely held Louis Berkman Co., based in Steubenville, Ohio.  Both Marshall Berkman and Robert Paul are also executives and investors in that company.  "The Berkman family has had investments in a whole variety of businesses besides manufacturing," says a Pittsburgh executive.  "They're just quiet about what they do."  Analysts describe Ampco-Pittsburgh, which is 18.6% controlled by Berkman family members, as tight-lipped.  "It's probably the greatest example of a public company operating in a private mode," says Gregory Drahuschak, an analyst with Butcher & Singer Inc., Pittsburgh.  The family itself, while active in local business circles, has intentionally maintained a low profile.  However, disagreements between two Berkman branches spilled into the public arena a few years ago when Louis Berkman sued his brother Jack, who controls Associated Communications Inc. of Pittsburgh.  The suit alleged that Jack Berkman induced the Louis Berkman family to sell its 21% interest in the company for $10 a share at a time when he was in negotiations to sell some of Associated's radio stations.  When the suit, which has since been settled, was filed in 1985, Associated stock was trading at $20 a share.  When acquiring companies in the past, Ampco-Pittsburgh moved swiftly and aggressively.  Marshall Berkman, a fierce tennis player "isn't impulsive but when he sets his mind on something he goes after it like a bulldozer," says a Pittsburgh associate.  Ampco-Pittsburgh in its 13-D filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, said it bought 662,600 Midway common shares between July 25 and Aug. 3 at prices ranging from $14.625 to $18 a share.  Analysts estimate that Midway might be worth $22 to $23 a share to a possible buyer.  In composite New York Stock Exchange trading yesterday, the airline's shares closed at $20.875, up 37.5 cents.  It's possible Ampco-Pittsburgh may seek a partner to acquire more Midway shares or launch a takeover of the air carrier, the company said in its filing.  ---  @ Ampco-Pittsburgh  @ 1988 Sales $250.0 million  @ Income cont. op $5.5 million  @ Loss disc. op $32.6 million  @ Net loss $27.1 million  @ What remains  @ Engineered equipment (Buffalo Forge)  @ Steel Products (Union Electric Steel)  @ Screws for plastic industry (New Castle Industries)  @ What's gone  @ Greenville Steel Car  @ Wyckoff Cold Finished Steel Bars  @ Pittsburgh Forgings  @ Ampco Metal  @ Vulcan  @ Colona Thread Protector  UNITED AIR'S PARENT took the first step toward a possible sale of the airline.  While not rejecting Marvin Davis's $240-a-share, or $5.4 billion, takeover bid, UAL said it will explore all its options.  Davis said he was "encouraged" by the response, which came after UAL's stock soared $24.625, to $243.875.  Meanwhile, United's pilots union hinted it might participate in a management buy-out.  ---  Banking regulators are considering whether to repudiate the above-market interest rates on CDs in troubled thrifts seized by the government.  The issue is one of several facing regulators following Bush's signature yesterday of the S&L bailout measure.  ---  Hooker's U.S. unit filed for Chapter 11 protection and hired turnaround expert Sanford Sigoloff to manage the firm, whose debts total $1.2 billion.  The filing covers 15 U.S. entities, including Hooker's largest retail chains, B. Altman and Bonwit Teller.  ---  The latest Fed survey confirms a broad and substantial slowing of the economy, with some lessening of inflationary pressure.  Recession isn't mentioned, but some areas of the country expect a further slowdown, particularly among manufacturers.  ---  Anchor Glass Container received an unsolicited bid of $20 a share, or $251.4 million, from Vitro S.A., a Mexican conglomerate.  It may be the first time a Mexican firm has made such an offer for a U.S. company.  Anchor shot up $7.50, or 61%, to $19.75.  ---  Computer Associates said there is "substantial uncertainty" about its results for the current quarter.  The company cited the delay of its planned acquisition of Cullinet Software.  ---  Twelve yen-futures traders at the Chicago Merc pleaded innocent to fraud charges relating to the federal investigation of commodities pits.  ---  GM hopes to boost its share of the U.S. car market to 37% from just under 36%, a relatively modest target that still may be hard to achieve. ---  Stock prices fell on profit-taking as the Dow Jones industrials lost 13.09, to 2686.08.  Bonds also tumbled.  The dollar ended modestly higher.  ---  Coca-Cola continued to expand overseas, agreeing to set up a joint venture to buy a New Zealand bottler for $130 million in cash and debt.  ---  Electra Investment Trust of Britain announced a major investment and management-compensation plan aimed at meeting growing competition from U.S. and British firms.  ---  Sir James Goldsmith selected three prominent Americans to be independent trustees of B.A.T's Farmers Group unit if he succeeds in acquiring the British conglomerate.  ---  Commonwealth Edison of Illinois may be forced by state regulators to refund about $200 million to customers for overspending on the utility's Byron 1 nuclear-reactor plant.  ---  Companies charged with criminal contempt have the right to a jury trial if the possible fine exceeds $100,000, a federal appeals court ruled.  ---  Money-fund yields fell over a tenth of a percentage point in the week ended Tuesday, repeating an almost identical drop the week before.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 209,900,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2686.08, off 13.09; transportation 1406.29, up 50.49; utilities 220.32, off 1.32.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3304.42, off 17.99.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 128.41, off 0.21; spot index 128.73, up 0.76.  Dollar: 139.15 yen, up 0.40; 1.8975 marks, up 0.0050.  BCE Inc., a Montreal-based holding company, advised SHL Systemhouse Inc. that it may buy Systemhouse common shares for investment purposes.  BCE doesn't yet own any Systemhouse shares, but it has a warrant to buy a 49% interest in Kinburn Corp., a closely held holding company that owns 50.1% of Systemhouse, an Ottawa-based computer systems integration company.  The Montreal concern also has agreed to buy all Systemhouse shares not taken up under a planned Systemhouse rights offering, which is to raise about 116 million Canadian dollars net (US$99 million).  BCE said it considers Systemhouse shares an attractive investment.  It could buy the shares in financial markets or in privately negotiated transactions, it said.  BCE owns Canada's largest telephone utility, Bell Canada, and has a 52.8% interest in Northern Telecom Ltd., a telecommunications equipment manufacturer, and a 49.1% interest in TransCanada PipeLines Ltd., Canada's biggest gas pipeline utility.  Under Systemhouse's rights offering, shareholders will receive one right for each common share held as of Aug. 17.  The rights will expire Sept. 7.  Five rights will entitle a holder to purchase two common shares at C$11 a share.  This will result in the issuing of 10,724,364 new common shares.  Systemhouse currently has 26,810,911 common shares outstanding.  Systemhouse's shares closed yesterday in over-the-counter trading at $9.25, up 62.5 cents a share.  Systemhouse said proceeds of the rights offering will be used to pay off long-term debt.  The company has been looking for acquisition prospects, particularly in the U.S., that could add materially to what it projects will be a strong corporate growth rate over the next five years.  Takeover speculation failed to sustain the Dow Jones Industrial Average's push above 2700 mark, and bond prices retreated in the face of a less than enthusiastic Treasury auction.  The Dow Jones industrials slid 13.09 points to 2686.08 in another day of heavy trading.  Bond prices dropped following results of the Treasury's auction of 10-year notes.  The dollar rose modestly.  Analysts said that although the price of many potential takeover target stocks climbed yesterday, the gains weren't enough to offset profit-taking as the Dow Jones industrials crossed the 2700 level in intraday trading.  Traders said 2700 remains a psychological barrier for many investors since it's the last major hurdle before the record high of 2722.42.  The price declines were exacerbated late in the day by computer-assisted sell programs.  The stock market also felt the effects of the cool reception given the Treasury's auction of $9.76 billion of 10-year notes.  The prospect of gradually rising interest rates depressed stock prices.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond lost about three-quarters of a point, or about $7.50 for each $1,000 face amount, with about half the loss coming after the auction results were announced.  Yesterday's stock-price drop notwithstanding, many analysts still argue that it's only a matter of time before the Dow Jones Industrial Average surpasses the record it set in August 1987.  The continued speculation in takeover stocks coupled with growing program trading activities will drive prices higher, they say.  The release yesterday of the Federal Reserve's "beige book" -- a summary of economic conditions around the country -- had little impact on markets.  The summary said economic growth is slowing and that inflation doesn't seem to be posing a significant threat.  That's about the way investors have been gauging the economy.  In major market activity:  Stock prices fell in heavy trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 209.9 million shares.  Declining issues on the Big Board were ahead of gainers, 876 to 636.  The dollar rose modestly against major currencies.  In late New York trading the dollar was quoted at 1.8975 marks and 139.15 yen, compared with 1.8925 marks and 138.75 yen Tuesday.  The American Soybean Association and Malaysia's palm-oil interests have declared a truce in their bitter, two-year feud.  The Malaysian Oil Palm Growers' Council said the ASA has agreed to stop portraying the consumption of palm oil as a health risk.  In a well-financed and extensive media campaign in the U.S., the association had maintained that palm oil and other edible tropical oils are loaded with saturated fats, which increase the risk of heart disease.  "We've decided that our efforts to inform the public about tropical fats had run their course and it was time to get on to something more positive about {the merits of} soybean oil," Daniel Reuwee, an ASA spokesman, said.  The ASA's statement fell short of being a retraction of its earlier health-hazard warnings, though Mr. Reuwee regretted that they had "stirred up an awful lot of emotions" in Southeast Asian countries.  The agreement's impact in the U.S. may be quite limited.  Many U.S. food companies already have removed tropical oils from their products under pressure from consumers and health organizations.  They aren't likely to put the oils back in and risk losing sales.  The chief executive officer of Pennwalt Corp., making an extraordinary court appearance at a judge's demand, entered a guilty plea on his company's behalf to charges of polluting a waterway in 1985.  Edwin E. Tuttle, Pennwalt chief executive and chairman, assured U.S. District Judge Jack Tanner that the chemical company will do all it can to avoid another toxic spill.  Environmentalists and legal experts have said Judge Tanner, by requiring Mr. Tuttle to appear, could set a precedent for punishing corporate negligence.  The charges against Pennwalt grew out of the spill of at least 75,000 gallons of bleach into a waterway opening onto Puget Sound.  The bleach, sodium dichromate, contained hexavalent chromium, a cancer-causing agent.  In May, Pennwalt agreed to pay a $1.1 million fine and plead guilty to five misdemeanor counts after criminal charges against four company officials, including three executives, were dropped.  Mr. Tuttle wasn't charged.  Twice, however, Judge Tanner refused to accept guilty pleas from attorneys and lower-ranking executives of the Philadelphia-based company, demanding instead that the "top man" appear before him.  Prosecutors have said the case is one of the first in which the government based its prosecution on corporate negligence rather than deliberate wrongdoing.  We live in a nation where art rarely impinges upon the realms of government and power, aside from such comfortable tangencies as patronage from on high, grant applications from below, musical entertainment at White House dinners, and the design of postage stamps.  We are naive about government sponsorship of the arts, as is shown by the shocked indignation in culture-bearing circles at Congress's shocked indignation at the Mapplethorpe photograph exhibit in the Corcoran and the publicly funded image of a crucifix suspended in a container of urine.  The ancient law that he who pays the piper calls the tune has not been repealed even in this permissive democracy, and the cultural entrepreneurs so eager to welcome National Endowment for the Arts money into the arts may now be more aware that they have invited a dog -- wooly and winsome but not without teeth and an ugly bark -- into their manger.  The most dramatic government-sponsored event in arts and letters in the past year has been the promulgation by a head of state, the late Ayatollah Khomeini, of a death sentence upon a writer, Salman Rushdie, who was not then and had never been a citizen of Iran, but who instead was writing post-modernist fiction within the United Kingdom.  The affair at worst may yet result in murder; at the least it has achieved, for Mr. Rushdie, a severe and apparently permanent impairment of his personal freedom, along with that of his American wife.  What are American artists to make of this astounding event?  The concept of blasphemy seems quaint here, and almost as quaint the notion that artists might have to pay a price in blood for what they write, paint, or compose.  But it is perhaps salutary and, in the root sense, encouraging to be reminded that art is a significant activity, with possibly grave consequences, and that our freedom to be artists as best we can is not one that all societies automatically grant.  Nor, even in a society as generally indulgent as ours, is the artist asked to pay no price whatsoever for the delightful, cathartic exercise of his creative faculties.  Neglect and relative poverty, to begin with, are the likely prices most artists pay for embarking upon the cloudy path of creativity and self-expression.  Further along that path, critical attack from one's differently persuaded artistic colleagues may await, and boycott, banning and blame from the larger society's enforcers of decency and positive values.  In a capitalist society, art is expected to pay its way, and the demands of the marketplace work their own constraints.  To reach market, one must negotiate with middlemen and envision a consumer, with his needs and prejudices.  Friendly censors, in fact, offer guidance at almost every turn of a professional artistic career, and even the most amiable artist must at some point chose between an inner imperative of private vision and the outer imperatives of group acceptance.  In America little appears sacred, in the sense that the Koran is sacred to the spokesmen for Islam, but success is sacred and tempts many to an insincere conformity.  None of this, of course, compares with Mr. Rushdie's ordeal, or with that of Vaclav Havel and Frantisek Starek in Czechoslovakia, or Albert Mukong in Cameroon, or of hundreds of artists under totalitarian regimes around the globe.  But in all cases the artist's defense against a society's impositions and seductions must be the same -- the problematical but deeply felt subjective answer to Pilate's ancient question, "What is truth?"  Each individual holds an impression of the truth, and the discourse of the arts attempts to revise the art consumer's impression in the light of the artist's impression.  It is perhaps in the nature of modern art to be offensive: It wishes to astonish us and invites a revision of our prejudices.  A crucial offense that "The Satanic Verses" gave its persecutors, indeed, concerns, precisely, revision -- the possibility that the Koran itself was in a few verses revised.  One attitude to art, and not purely an old-fashioned one, construes it as a voice of the gods, flowing out through inspired mortals.  It is magic, and the truth it proclaims is absolute, and man's duty is to defend and repeat what he has thus received.  The other attitude expects revision in the arts, experimentation in the sciences, criticism in the public forum, and frequent change in the personnel if not the forms of government.  All change, all revision, is something of an affront, and it leaves certain sacred securities behind.  However, it contains not only destructive and dismissive tendencies but a certain optimism, a faith that the human sensibility can suffer revision and survive and even be the healthier for it.  No doubt Mr. Rushdie knew his book would offend Moslem orthodoxy, just as James Joyce expected in "Ulysses" to offend the Irish Catholic Church, and Vladimir Nabokov in "The Gift" to offend the orthodoxies of Russian Communism, and Nathaniel Hawthorne in his gently polemical works to offend the lingering representatives of Puritan orthodoxy.  No doubt the artists who offended Sens.  Jesse Helms and Alfonse D'Amato expected to offend someone.  But in this century if we are not willing to risk giving offense, we have no claim to the title of artists, and if we are not willing to face the possibility of being ourselves revised, offended, and changed by a work of art, we should leave the book unopened, the picture unviewed, and the symphony unheard.  ---  Mr. Updike's most recent novel is "S."  This is adapted from remarks to the American Academy and Institute of Arts and Letters.  After fueling five consecutive advances that brought the Nasdaq Composite Index to record levels, investors in the over-the-counter market took profits and the composite fell 0.89 to 462.41.  The OTC market is "going to have a bit of a struggle through the mountaintops because of the combination of profit-taking and nervousness," said Ralph Costanza, head of OTC trading at Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  But he and other traders say the correction won't be a prolonged one.  "This is just a little pause -- a regrouping," Mr. Costanza said.  "The buyers will come back."  Most of the profit-taking was in the technology stocks that dominate the OTC market and have been attracting buyers in the latest rally.  Smith Barney yesterday added Intel to the list of stocks it recommends for purchase.  Mr. Costanza said the firm has relatively few technology issues on its recommended list and is "looking for values to single out."  He added: "I think investors are doing the same thing."  Intel, however, fell 1 1/2 to 31 1/2 on 1.5 million shares.  Late Tuesday, another semiconductor maker, closely held Atmel, filed suit against Intel in federal court charging a violation of antitrust laws.  The suit was a response to a request that Intel filed in July with the International Trade Commission asking for an investigation of whether Atmel was violating an earlier commission ruling on memory chips called Eproms.  Nasdaq volume yesterday totaled 155.7 million shares, with 1,033 issues declining in price and 999 advancing.  About 4,400 issues were traded.  Average daily volume so far this month stands at 142.6 million shares.  If that pace is sustained, August will overtake May as the OTC market's busiest month this year; May had average daily turnover of about 140 million shares.  MCI Communications dropped 1 to 37 on 2.9 million shares.  This week, American Telephone & Telegraph filed a complaint with the Federal Communications Commission charging that MCI violated communications law by failing to give the FCC details of major proposals to serve big business customers.  MCI called the complaint "a smokescreen."  SHL Systemhouse rose 5/8 to 9 1/4 on 225,000 shares.  The developer of computer-based information systems said it plans a rights offering to raise $116 million Canadian (US$99 million).  Under the offering, owners of each share of record next Thursday will receive one right.  Five rights entitle the holder to purchase two common shares at C$11 each until Sept. 7.  If all rights are exercised, the company said, 10.7 million shares will be issued.  The company currently has 26.8 million shares outstanding.  Gtech gained 3/4 to 16 on 680,000 shares.  The maker of computer-based lottery systems said it signed a definitive agreement to be acquired by an investor group including some members of its management and Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Capital for $16.63 a share.  Doskocil improved 3/4 to 11 5/8.  The company said WFC Acquisition agreed to pay $150 million for Doskocil's Wilson Foods division, increased from $140 million WFC Acquisition earlier said it would pay.  Manitowoc jumped 1 1/2 to 24 on 227,100 shares.  The maker of cranes earned $6.5 million, or 63 cents, in its fourth quarter, after a loss of about $6 million a year earlier.  Carrington Laboratories rose 1 to 39.  The company announced late Tuesday that it bought a factory in Texas for producing its experimental drug Carrisyn, which it expects to sell as a treatment for acquired immune deficiency syndrome, among other things.  Carrisyn is derived from the aloe vera plant.  Medstone International advanced 1 3/4 to 19 1/2 on 218,300 shares.  There was speculation that the company's machine for dissolving gallstones might be considered for approval at an October meeting of a Food and Drug Administration panel, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  Two OTC trucking issues advanced in active trading after a Merrill Lynch analyst made positive comments about several companies in the industry.  Yellow Freight System improved 7/8 to 30 3/8 on 426,000 shares, and Roadway Services was up 3/4 to 37 3/4 on nearly 300,000 shares.  Cyprus Minerals Co. said it reached an agreement setting its claims against LTV Steel Co. at $505 million.  The mining concern had filed two claims totaling $1.07 billion against LTV Steel for breaking long-term coal contracts when LTV's parent company, LTV Corp., sought bankruptcy-law protection in 1986.  Cyprus also had filed a $723 million claim against LTV Corp. relating to one of LTV Steel's contracts.  Under the companies' agreement, Cyprus is entitled to general unsecured claims against LTV Steel of $335 million on its Emerald Mine coal supply contract and $170 million on its Knox Creek Mine coal supply contract.  It also will hold a general unsecured claim of $335 million against LTV Corp. that will be reduced by any amounts received on the Emerald Mine claim against LTV Steel.  Cyprus said it expects the actual amount it receives under the claims to be substantially less than $505 million.  The amount will depend on what the general unsecured creditors receive under LTV's plan of reorganization.  Under Chapter 11, a company continues to operate but is protected from creditor lawsuits while it works out a plan to pay its debts.  LTV, based in Dallas, is a steel, aerospace and energy concern.  The American Stock Exchange said it will seek to delist Chase Medical Group Inc. because there is no longer an adequate market for the company's shares.  The exchange said that after discussions with Chase officials, it determined there is no longer a sufficient number of shares publicly held or a large enough body of public shareholders.  It said Chase officials now hold 46% of the shares outstanding and noted that Securities Settlement Corp., a unit of Continental Illinois Corp., recently announced it holds another 46%.  The exchange said it will apply to the Securities and Exchange Commission to delist Chase, a Hialeah, Fla.-based operator of outpatient medical centers.  Trading in Chase Medical has been halted since January when Moore & Schley, Cameron & Co. disclosed the firm and its customers controlled more than half of Chase's 2.6 million shares outstanding.  The SEC charged that two Moore & Schley brokers had attempted to corner the market in the stock.  The brokerage firm in June offered to let customers who held Chase shares cancel their trades.  Herzog, Heine, Geduld Inc., a New York investment and trading firm, said yesterday it is making a market in Chase shares over the counter.  The U.S. trade deficit will shrink between $300 million and $500 million for every $1 billion that the government pares from the projected federal budget deficit, the Congressional Budget Office projects.  That means if the government met the Gramm-Rudman law's goal of eliminating the budget deficit by 1993, the current-account trade deficit would shrivel to $35 billion or less, the CBO says in a new report.  The current-account deficit, the broadest measure of the difference between U.S. imports and exports in goods and services, totaled $126.5 billion last year.  Even without changes in current budget policy, the CBO projects that the current-account deficit will narrow to $75 billion by 1994.  Based on the CBO's projections for the economy and for federal receipts, the budget deficit will decline to $122 billion in 1994 without any policy changes.  The fiscal 1988 deficit was $155 billion.  Narrowing the budget deficit further would help shrink the trade deficit by reducing the U.S.'s foreign borrowings.  The CBO also said a narrower budget gap would help by tending to reduce interest rates.  Lower rates would tend to reduce the value of the dollar, making foreign goods and services more costly to Americans and U.S. goods and services more attractive to foreigners.  Burroughs-Wellcome Co., the maker of AZT, agreed with a small biotechnology concern to investigate ways to improve the drug's activity against acquired immune deficiency syndrome.  The unit of Wellcome PLC of London signed a multiyear research and development agreement with Vical Inc. of San Diego to develop new modified versions of AZT, blending it with lipids and phosphates that enhance its action.  These new modified AZT compounds possess a better ability to penetrate macrophages, scavenger cells that are heavily infected by the AIDS virus and that spread the infection from cell to cell, the two companies said.  They also hope that the modified AZT versions may present researchers with a way to overcome the serious problem of the rise of AZT-resistant strains of the virus in patients receiving long-term AZT treatment.  "All the evidence isn't in yet, but there's some reason to believe that this approach may be effective in those resistant strains," said Wick Goodspeed, president of Vical.  Added David Barry, Burroughs-Wellcome's vice president of research, "Some of the less sensitive viruses have looked quite sensitive when exposed to these lipid-modified {AZT} compounds in the test tube.  But it's too soon to know whether this will translate into {patient benefits in} the clinic."  Vical's Mr. Goodspeed said he hoped the new compounds could enter human clinical trials next year.  Liposome Co. received approval from the Food and Drug Administration to begin safety testing in humans of an antibiotic that could help fight infections in AIDS patients and others.  The drug is a cell-penetrating version of gentamicin designed to combat infections in the immune cells.  Known as GENT-65, the drug consists of gentamicin packed into liposomes, or bubbles, made of naturally occurring fats.  Preliminary tests have suggested the body's immune cells engulf the drug-filled liposomes, flooding the cells with the antibacterial agent.  "It's like a Trojan horse," said Susan M. Hernandez, a spokeswoman for the company.  Conventional antibiotics are designed to kill bacteria residing outside cells and have difficulty penetrating cell walls.  But the body's macrophages and other immune cells treat liposomes as foreign invaders and "eat them like little Pacmen," said Marc Ostro, the company's vice chairman and chief science officer.  Liposome said it hopes to use GENT-65 to treat mycobacterium avium intracellulare and salmonellosis, two immune-cell infections that commonly affect patients with AIDS, or acquired immune deficiency syndrome.  The company, which is devoted to liposome technology, also has two anti-cancer drugs in various stages of clinical testing. 